Lisa and Dave --
 
Are you the right people to discuss payment or modified credit terms for EPMI?  The issue with NEPOOL is that our UI/CMP/NSTAR wholesale reqts deals would be harmed if we don't pay these guys.  
 
I don't know if we should pay, but I need to figure out who is on point for paying if that decision is reached.
 
I know that John Llodra is trying to sell these positions.
 
Jim
 
Has anyone brought this to the attention of the cash committee?  (Dave Gorte, Lisa Mellencamp) 
 
Ed
 
 

I left Dave Doot a message.  I need to call Monday.  Does anyone have any real options for EPMI?  I am going to suggest that we modify our credit for two options - weekly billing or wholesale sleave.  
 
At the same time, I don't think that we are in default right now - although our surety bonds are being revoked by the issuer.
 
Ed -- are we in any position to pay NEPOOL for EPMI?  When will the $$ be due?
 
Most importantly, who is making the decision that our UI/CMP/NSTAR positions should not be funded?
 
Sounds like NEPOOL is just about done with Enron and its affiliates.
 
Jim  

As long as we continue not to make any promises, but keep the matter "under review". 

David Doot left me a message that he had not heard back and he was expecting our proposal yesterday (which we had not told him).  He also said that the bonding company was "rumbling" that it was not going to pay.  I do not know what their obligation is to pay, but I would think that "rumbling" is not default, yet.

Jim S. is going to call David Doot back this afternoon. 

Bob -- 

Please follow up with Juan so we can ensure coverage.

Jim

Jim, etal -

Maine Electric Consumer Cooperative ("MECC") & Competitive Electricity Services ("CES")
					vs.
Central Maine Power Company ("CMP") & Bangor Hydro Electric Company (BHE)

Just this morning, I was forwarded paperwork on a notice of a hearing that was held on Dec-03, 2001.  Per Jim Steffes, you have seen this complaint come by your desk.  However, I will forward you a hard copy of what I have in hand.  

In its allegations in the Complaint CES & MECC alleged that Enron intends to breach its contractual obligations to CES & MECC by failing to remit to them their Administrative Fee collected from Customers under their contracts with Enron.

Hard copies of the Complaint on the way.

- Juan

Mary --

I need to know the other bonds that aren't cancelled.  Are there more?

Jim

Come to 9am mtg

FYI.  Thought you'd be interested.

Jim

Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets

Wow!  What a year 2001 has been for the supporters of energy competition.
For every good bit of news (Pat Wood, one of our heroes at CAEM, being
selected to head the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and the
continuing progress that the Canadians - yes, the Canadians - have made
towards energy competition), we have had to bear one disaster and misstep
after another throughout the year.   Let's see, in December 2000, who
couldhave predicted..

1.  The tragic events of September 11th.
2.  The California implosion.
3.  Pennsylvania marketer retrenchment.
4.  Price volatility and high prices (but it could have been worse if Mother
Nature did not help out).
5.  Bush Energy Plan ignores meaningful restructuring.
6.  Enron collapse.
7.  FERC Blinks on Super RTO.
8.  Texas missteps in pilots for opening the market.
9.  No leadership emerged to meet the crisis in restructuring.

2001 was one heck of a year - but thankfully, probably the nadir of the
movement towards energy competition in North America.  As CAEM looks into
our crystal ball (natural gas fired, of course) for the coming year, we see
a better year.  Below are some of the predictions and responses from the
CAEM staff about what we expect to occur.  The responses below are primarily
concerned with electricity, but to a lesser extent, may be applied to
natural gas as well.

As always, do not bet the house on what we have to say.  We are just a
little think tank, kind of like the little engine that could.  And we can.
And we do.

Happy New Year!

The CAEM Staff

P.S. If you would like to add a prediction or two, please send an e-mail
with your name and contact information to Hope Duncan at hduncan@caem.org We
will post them to our web site - www.caem.org  Please identify which
question below is being addressed by your prediction.

 - CAEM PREDICTIONS IN 2002.doc 

I am trying to pull together a list of the pre-petition and post-petition claims against EES and EEMC (and EPMI where collateral may exist as one entity) as well as any other obligation in the key power and gas markets.

I hope to have this tomorrow.

Jim

What was decided at today's  meeting?

Let's talk tomorrow.

Jim

Further detail from Con Ed on the request for payment of delivery charges -

They are saying the deadline is 5 pm EST this Friday, Dec 21.
The amount of arrearage is about $1.5 million (and growing).  This is based on outstanding agency billings from yesterday back to when they stopped receiving payment from us, Nov 29.  They say they send us "a stack of bills every day".
They also need payment detail (which accounts should receive credit for payment) on wire transfers that were received prior to Nov 29.  Rebecca Fite had been involved.  They say information on this was sent to Diann Huddleson and Joe Falcone(CSC) on Dec 10.
The arrearage is now greater than the posted collateral; hence the demand for payment or end of agency billing.

Evan, Diann - are we continuing to track these bills ?

Alan --

1.	Is Sue Mara going with you?  Who else is going?  Anyone from commercial or scheduling?  My understanding is that Ray Alvarez is attending?

2.	Do we have a list of issues that we want to go through with the CAISO?  Maybe outlining our Top Ten before the meeting and getting internal agreement (maybe even with the other participants) makes sense?

Thanks

Ray Alvarez, Dave Perrino, and I are planning on going.  Any thoughts on issues/solutions to raise are welcome.

GAC

 << File: 092401 Meeting Notice.pdf >> 

Wade -

There may also need to be another $100k for EESI.  Jeff is checking.

Jim

Chris -

I did discuss Enron's payment issues with PJM with our team.

To make sure that we are on the same page.

1.	No additional collateral is required at this time.
2.	EPMI owes on 12/20/01 = $1,704,182.63
	EESI owes on 12/20/01 = $134,456.58
3.	The Annual Fee is also due on 12/20/01 = $5,000 (one fee for all affiliated companies).

I will call you tomorrow.

Jim

Jim-

I was hoping that you could give me a status update on the outstanding invoices
from PJM to the two Enron subs. It was my understanding that you were going to
be discussing them with the "5 day" committee today.

Given the ramifications of a default, some of which we spoke of this morning, I
would like to stay as up-to-date as possible with Enron's plans and intentions.

Thank you very much,

Chris Hein 

ISO-NE is seeking the following by December 20, 2001 to continue Enron's presence in the market --

EPMI 	
	Amount Due	$2.1 MM
	Security	$112.1 MM

EES/EEMC
	Amount Due	$6.2 MM
	Security	$22.2 MM

1.	We are verifying these figures (ISO-NE may have EES and EPMI Amount Due reversed)
2.	The process post 12/20/01 is unclear - not sure if Enron companies can schedule without posting Security
3.	Surety Bonds have been revoked and Safeco/Fireman's sent notices that Bonds can not be used for post-petition claims
	EES	#6131506	$12.0 MM
	EES	#11133420767	$8.0 MM
	EEMC	#11133420783	$14.4 MM	
	EPMI	#6131468	$12.0 MM
	EPMI	#6107679	$40.0 MM

I can't imagine that Enron will post collateral in these amounts.  In the CAISO market, Enron has 3 days of projected expenses as Security coupled with a going-forward power supply.  May be an alternative worth considering?

Any other questions, please call me at 3x7673
	

How do I take care of this?

Jim

This request has been pending approval for  2 days and you are the alternate.  Please click http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000079553&Page=Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000079553
Approver            : paul.kaufman@enron.com
Request Create Date : 12/17/01 5:28:48 PM
Requested For       : alan.comnes@enron.com
Resource Name       : eConnect - VPN  Tier 2 - Full Access
Resource Type       : Applications

Ed --

Can you please draft a letter (similar to what Paul Darmitzel sent to gas LDCs) to send to PECO Thursday to indicate that placing our physical load customers on bundled POLR service is not objectionable to EES?  

We have a bill due in PJM this Thursday that may not get paid.  If we don't pay PJM on Thursday, our brief analysis of the PA Supplier Tariff is that PECO can pull these customers back.  

The customers in PECO are GNO (e.g, Suiza), so not sure what the contract issues would be - maybe Michelle can help here.  My understanding is that the contracts should allow EES to serve using Utility power, so we should still have the right to determine to reject or not.

Please let me know if you can do this and if there are any issues.

Thanks,

Jim

Troy --

A few questions --

1.	The counterparty "PGE" - is that Pacific Gas & Electric or Portland General Electric?
2.	When do you think that you would have the "Unknown" researched?
3.	I assume that the costs associated with ERCOT or CAISO are captured in the EPMI and ENA payables?

Thanks.

Jim - Here is the outstanding payables file.  See the tab called pivot.  The first column is labeled core markets.  The utilities listed under gas and power are the ones you provided.  The utilities under "blank" core markets are all the other utilities we have outstanding payables for (in case you want to make sure we didn't miss anything...would be a good idea).  We have sorted the payables into pre petition, post petition, both (crossing pre and post dates), and unknown (we need to research the unknown b/c they are manually paid but most s/b pre).  We have columns for the Avista amounts and non Avista amounts.  Please note that the split between gas and power for PG&e, SCE, and SDGE is not completely accurate b/c we didn't have the data.  Call with questions.  Thanks.
 << File: SAP_PAYABLES_12-18-01copy.XLS >> 

 

Ed is drafting the letter and coordinating with Michelle.

Jim
To confirm earlier conversations and associated action items with respect to PECO Physical Customers (listed below on spreadsheet):

(1)	W/ Brenda: Rejection lists for PJM currently include Cheltenham (Simon) and Lehigh Valley Dairies (Suiza).  These will be pulled from the PJM list.  Suiza is already accounted for on the GNO reject list, Simon is currently not on the reject list (status is pending).
(2)	Jim Steffes: On point for letter to PECO to indicate that we would not object to placing these 15 sites on bundled POLR service.
(3)	Michelle: Has confirmed that DeDASR action for contracts not on reject list (Simon and Macerich) will not affect rights under contract (this would merely represent exercise of EES supply option).
(4)	Next Step: Evan-since all of the contracts here are either on reject list, or are associated with Simon/Macerich (which will not be affected by D-DASR action) we need to initiate DeDASR activities for all 15 sites immediately after our motion to reject the first batch of contracts is filed.

Thanks,
Dale

The attached spreadsheet indicates the fifteen (15) accounts in the PJM Control Area that EESI currently delivers physical power to.  The fifteen (15) accounts are all behind PECO Energy Company.  Most of the contracts were "commodity only" deals that have expired, with the exception of American College which expires 01/31/2002.  

The other accounts are behind bundled outsource deals (i) Simon Properties (Cheltenham Shopping & SDG Macerich Properties) and (ii) Suiza Foods (Lehigh Valley Dairies) and (iii) Prudential Insurance Companies.

Let me know if I can be of further assistance.

Richard

 

Update:

1.  GAS - All sales customers have been reviewed, and we believe the list is ready to go, pending a final review by Janet and Don.  All has been transmitted (copy attached) to Marshall Turner.  We are still lacking any SUPPLY contracts that need to be rejected, but should have it in the morning.

2.  POWER -  All sales customers except for 6 have been identified.  We have transmitted (copy attached) all information with the exception of these 6 to Marshall Turner.  We work tomorrow on resolving the 6, and will provide the data to Marshall at that time.  Of course, these schedules are subject to a final review by Janet and Rogers.

3.  NON-STANDARD DEALS - I do not have an update from last night, and per Marshall Turner, he has not received any additional schedules from Michelle since yesterday (Mondy, 12/17).  What is the status of this filing?

As a reminder, I need the current support from each group for the analysis and reason for rejection.  As we agreed in the meeting this morning, Janet has asked that I be on point for gathering and retaining this.  Please forward me your matrices that suppor this rejection filing.

Janet:  As Outlook was down most of today, I don't think anyone was able to get you the Power matrix.  I do not have the most current one, but I have attached the one as of last Friday to provide you the format.  

Per discussion with Marshall this evening, the motion is being reviewed internally at Weil, Gotshal, and he will keep us posted tomorrow on filing status.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Brenda
x35778

 << File: PowerRejection_ComEd_121801.xls >>  << File: PowerRejection_PJM_121801.xls >>  << File: Gas Customer Rejection List 12-18-01.xls >>  << File: Termination Matrix.xls >>    

My understanding is that Jim Wood is making the recommendation on Etown. Correct?

Jim

Wade,

	Elizabethtown is requesting a $250,000 margin be posted by 5:00 p.m. Dec 20th to remain active behind their citygate. E-town is one of the NJ markets we have chosen to remain active behind and preserve the $1.4 MM of MTM value. E-town will be forwarding to me their w/t instructions today which I will have Kathryn Gonzales forward to you with the amount and details. Let me or Don know if you have any questions. Thanks.

Dave --

I wish you and your family all of the best.  May you have a happy and prosperous New Year.  Please keep in touch.

Jim

Dear Friends,
 
As has been my custom for the last several years since my moving from New Yorkto CaliforniaI am sending a message wishing each and every one of you and your families the Happiest and Healthiest of Holiday Seasons.
 
This year perhaps more than ever I have had the chance to think about how fortunate I have been to be able to send a greeting out to so many people with whom I have had the opportunity to work with and call my friends over the years.  From the old NYPP to ABB, APX and Enron, it has been my pleasure to have worked with you.  No matter where I have gone I have been lucky enough to met and work with some of the best people in the industry.
 
My hope for each of you is to have a prosperous New Year and that I have the opportunity to see you again as time moves forward.
 
Happy Holidays,
 
Dave
David F. Perrino
660 Greenview Place
Los Altos, CA 94024
Home: 650.948.6937
Cell: 415.794.8740

Diann -

Sorry about all of this confusion regarding residential customers.

This guy was listed on the Ken spreadsheet (about T&D bills) as being an EES customer in November.  Is this a residential account?  

Thanks,

Jim

 

Guys --

Don't know if we need to do our own study.  Probably want to get with this prof to discuss.  I agree with his analysis that the electricity markets needs a bunch of sellers - means we should push for distributed generation.  

Thanks

This study also concludes that due to the inelasticity of demand, there needs to be a great deal of sellers (more than in a typical market) to ensure competitive markets.  I am not sure that we want to use this study for our purposes; however, need to be aware it is out there as we discuss any new methods of assessing market power.  Do we need to conduct our own study?

Cornell has published a report of 4 experiments conducted to test market trading behavior and its impact on electricity prices under different price auctions. 

1) uniform price auction
2) uniform price with interruptible loads
3) discriminative auction - generators are paid their actual offers
4) soft-cap auction 

The study is fascinating as real subjects were employed and paid real dollars based on their trading performance.  The findings are consistent with our arguments against price caps - particularly soft caps as installed in California.   I think there is some "empirical" data that can be used in our arguments against price caps.  

More variations of the auctions aimed at testing some assumptions used in these 4 experiments are planned, and industry is invited to participate in the experiments.

You can get the document directly at:
www.pserc.cornell.edu

 << File: cornell market experiment.pdf >> 

Janet --

FYI.  I intend to take vacation this Friday, all of next week, and Dec 31.

Unfortunately, Harry Kingerski, Bob Frank, Jeff Dasovich,and Christi Nicolay will also be on vacation.  

If something urgent comes up, you can call me at home (281-759-8270) or on my cell (713-851-2499).

Thanks,

Jim

Thanks.  

Diann, I know that the last few months (year?) has been tough on all of us.  I appreciate everything you've done.  Thanks.

Jim

Jim, this is a residential customer.  Because of the large number of  termination DASRs we issued en masse  in June, the UDC's did not respond to all.  CSC has been cleaning up these straggler's for the past month and have issued new deDASR's on them.

The one you have listed here is in a de-activating status.

I hope this clarifies and closes this issue.  (just kidding.)  

I'm on vacation 'til next year.  If you need to reach me, please page me.
 

Diann -

Sorry about all of this confusion regarding residential customers.

This guy was listed on the Ken spreadsheet (about T&D bills) as being an EES customer in November.  Is this a residential account?  

Thanks,

Jim

Does everyone have access to the O Drive / Public Affairs directory? 

I'd like to keep an external contact list (PUCs, Utilities, etc.) and any material we are creating (files, documents, etc.) in this area so the entire team has access in case someone is out for the day.

To get into this, go to MY COMPUTER, find the O Drive and then find the Public Affairs folder.  If you don't have access, please let me know.

Thanks, 

Jim

P.S.  If I don't get to speak directly with everyone, I hope that y'all have a safe and happy Holiday Season!  See you in the New Year.   

Paul -- 

Why so "unhappy"?  Isn't this the best time of your life?  I know that I am truly looking forward to telling my grandkids that I not only worked at Enron, but I survived the "collapse".  

Don't worry about the O drive thing - I'll take care of it.

Jim

I have no clue what you're asking here.  

Happy Holiday Season,
The Grinch

Does everyone have access to the O Drive / Public Affairs directory? 

I'd like to keep an external contact list (PUCs, Utilities, etc.) and any material we are creating (files, documents, etc.) in this area so the entire team has access in case someone is out for the day.

To get into this, go to MY COMPUTER, find the O Drive and then find the Public Affairs folder.  If you don't have access, please let me know.

Thanks, 

Jim

P.S.  If I don't get to speak directly with everyone, I hope that y'all have a safe and happy Holiday Season!  See you in the New Year.   

Wade -

I would recommend that no one pay.  The wire instructions are at the bottom of the earlier e-mail.  The $ are pre-petition. 

Thanks.

What are going to do would be my question.  Can you get their wire instructions just in case.  Also, I assume those are pre-petition amounts.  If so, I would clarify to the group.

Wade

Ed --  I'll put in a call to discuss with them the contact point.

Jim

The PECO supplier administration line is 215-841-3700.  I just got what I presume is the after-hours recording.

May need to post TX PUC collateral.

Jim

It is my understanding, as much as anyone knows it today, that between now and January 2, 2002, we do not have to post any collateral or other payments (other than payment for commodity) to keep contracts we want to keep alive.

Dan and Janet are meeing with McMahon today at 2:00 to discuss our overall strategy.  Can you confirm back to me the above comment.

Thanks

Wade

Linda --

Yesterday you mentioned I had a small work assignment during the meeting.  Didn't get the exact details.  Any info is appreciated.

Jim

Charles --

Please work with Susan Lindberg on this as well.

Jim
The DOE is requesting comments from industry regarding proposed changes to an EIA form EIA-417R for reporting "Electric Power System Emergency Report".  This is being revised to become EIA-417 "Electric Emergency Incident and Disturbance Report".  Reporting will be reduced from the existing >3300 entities to approximately 200 control area operators, RTOS, and Security Coordinators.   

However, "Any utility, businesss entity, or energy concern that participates in the electric power industry could be notified by DOE that it needs to provide technical information concerning a particular incident."

There are a series of questions in the notice (attached) directed towards those responsible for providing responses to the form and those utilizing the data.

NERC is developing a response to these forms and I anticipate that many of their utility members will point out that the traders and IPPs need to be included due to the interdependency on the market/trading systems for energy supply.

For the control area data, I ask that Keith and Lloyd review the new form since we are still operating a control area.

I will track the NERC comments - and if need be, may ask Dan Watkiss to draft comments to DOE to protect our interests.

Charles Yeung

FYI

>----- Original Message ----- 

I only have one question - the NYISO may be replaced by a NERTO as soon as this year in December.  What is the timeframe of the contract?  Also, the NYISO rules may change - what happens to our deal?  Do we have rights to restructure?  What happens if ICAP or UCAP goes away as an obligation?

Jim

 
Bonnie Nelson
09/17/2001 02:35 PM
To all, attached please find a revised draft of the Load Curtailment Annex, marked to show changes from the draft distributed to you on September 14.  Also for your convenience, I am attaching a clean draft.

 << File: LCAnnex091401v2.doc >>  << File: LCAnnex091401v2RED.doc >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

I'll be on holiday during this time frame.  Don't wait for me.

Jim

Everyone,

You might recall an email message I sent out a couple of weeks ago about a meeting with Quinn Gillespie to discuss our RTO issues in the context of public/media relations.  We're looking at three dates/times and I am interested in your availability if you plan on participating in the meeting.  First, a few people have asked that we do this meeting by conference call between Houston and DC so it won't involve traveling.  Second, the following dates/times are under consideration:

Wednesday, September 19th 1:00 - 3:00 pm CST
Thursday, September 20th 9:00 - 11:00 am CST
Monday, September 24th 1:00 - 3:00 pm CST

Please let me know if you're interested in participating and, if so, let me know which time slot works for you.  

Thanks,
Janel

John, etal --

Not sure if there is any real "issue" we can push.  Maybe something on the P/L side (see Joe Hartsoe).  Clearly this idea that RTOs will be anti-security is mistaken - it just implies that there should be redundancy of systems.  

Jim

Jim--

Please see e-mail traffic below on any ideas we have for anti-terrorism efforts that might help us on electricity grid management issues.  Any ideas beyond my initial attempt below?

John

P.S.  The monopoly utilities are already saying that forcing large RTOs is bad at this time because we shouldn't be making such massive and complicated changes to the the electric system at a time of war.

Do want to follow up with Steffes and Terry Allen?

The first thing that comes to mind is a directive from Congress to FERC and/or DOE to conduct  a rulemaking on "gride management" that essentially recasts the "Large RTO" plan as a security/grid management plan, etc.  

thoughts?

Linda, 

Regarding the grid safety issue, you will remember that I mentioned
yesterday that Saxby Chambliss has been tapped by the Speaker to coordinate
the terrorism package. I spoke with Krister Holladay of Chambliss' office
today, who is staffing that effort and he said he would be more than happy
to look at any and all proposals and suggestions that we have on grid
safety. He hasn't seen anything yet on this issue and would welcome our
input. 

If the folks in Houston can identify two or three (or more) things that can
be done to enhance safety that also move grid management in the direction we
want it to go generally, this will be a fine opportunity to broaden our
coalition on transimission / rto's. 

It looks like we have an open door here. Let me know what you want me to do.

Terry

Terry Allen
Alexander Strategy Group
1300 Pennsylvania Ave. N.W.  Suite 700
Washington, DC   20004
O. 202.204.3071
tallen@buckham.com
  

Pls fax to SF office today.

Thanks,

Jim

Cmmr. Bilas issued an alternate yesterday on the suspension of direct
access.  The draft is for informational purposes only -- no comments are
allowed.

Essentially the draft updates his alternate from June.  It does not suspend
direct access but opens a proceeding addressing issues surrounding the
suspension. The alternate contains some good language slamming DWR and its
potentially high price contracts.

I do not have an electronic version of the  alternate.  Let me know if you
want a faxed copy.

Jeanne Bennett          

Bryan --

Add this to the report database.

THanks.

Jim
I am talking with Larry Cafero, Minority leader of House, and close personal friend of the Gov.  Initial feedback from Cafero is still positive.  I will likely, within the right timeframe given the WTC tragedy, schedule a meeting with Rowland personally.  I will advise when that will be.  I do agree with Dan's assessment. Don't panic yet. SM

Did Connecticut reject our fuel cell project? If so, details?
[Allegretti, Daniel]  

Yes.  The DPUC issued a draft decision which declines to fund the project from the Conservation and Load Management Fund.  The decision praises the project in the text but includes a footnote which is critical of the project.  In addition, the DPUC issued a press release which is not helpful in promoting the project.

The decision not to fund out of the C&LM fund was not unexpected.  The chairman of the DPUC has been very supportive, along with Governor Rowland, but has been working offline to fund the project instead from the Renewable Energy Investment Fund.  Although the REIF is a much smaller fund it appears the REIF is able to borrow against future receipts and is willing to do so based in part on their expectation of increased funding next legislative session.  We are meeting with the REIF director next Wednesday to confirm where this stands.

In the mean time we have filed exceptions to the draft decision which goes final tomorrow.  We are told that the offending footnote will be removed but that the decision not to commit the C&LM fund will remain unchanged.

In sum, the project has suffered a very real setback but has not at this time been abandoned by EPMI.  Support from Rowland and others remains strong and EPMI would like to see if funding from the REIF this year is in fact viable.

Susan --

Muchas gracias.  Thanks.

Jim

I'll keep an eye on this.

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketing Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: September 17, 2001

RE: EEI Interconnection Project
       ?Conference Call on Friday, September 28th at 11:00 a.m. 
        (EDT)

EEI has recently undertaken an effort to draft Model Interconnection Procedures for new generators, along with a pro forma Interconnection and Operating Agreement.  They have recently distributed those documents to EPSA, as well as other industry trade associations, in an effort to get feedback from other industry groups.  It is, however, unclear when EEI's efforts will be shared with the FERC Staff.

The documents, including an Explanation and Commentary on the draft Procedures and Interconnection and Operating Agreement are attached.  EPSA will hold a conference call on Friday, September 28th at 11:00 a.m. (EDT) to discuss our response to EEI so please feel free to forward these documents to those in your company handling interconnection issues.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA Call. If you have any thoughts on the documents before the September 28th conference Call, please contact Julie Simon at jsimon@epsa.org or Jack Cashin at jcashin@epsa.org.  

Attachments

Does change in law mean the implementation of the NE RTO?  That process is underway and whatever happens with its implementation we should already have a knowledge of?

Jim

Jim,

This is a 3 year deal, beginning Oct. 1.  Our standard terms and conditions, which MG has already executed, includes a "regulatory" out provision.  In addition, a change in law allows EES to terminate.

If ICAP or UCAP goes away, this would be a material change and EES would try to renegotiate the deal with MG or terminate if an acceptable deal cannot be reached.

Thanks - Jeff

I only have one question - the NYISO may be replaced by a NERTO as soon as this year in December.  What is the timeframe of the contract?  Also, the NYISO rules may change - what happens to our deal?  Do we have rights to restructure?  What happens if ICAP or UCAP goes away as an obligation?

Jim

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Bonnie Nelson
09/17/2001 02:35 PM
To all, attached please find a revised draft of the Load Curtailment Annex, marked to show changes from the draft distributed to you on September 14.  Also for your convenience, I am attaching a clean draft.

 << File: LCAnnex091401v2.doc >>  << File: LCAnnex091401v2RED.doc >> 

Call Thane Twiggs.  I'd also be interested in seeing this through - there was a little confusion about Enron's position earlier but we are now ok.
 
Jim

any ideas?  Jean Ryall?
 
Mark
Hi Mark, 
I'm working on a story about the ancillary services market in ERCOT and changes recommended by the PUC and a consultant to ERCOT. I came across the following statement in documents in PUC docket 23220.

Enron: "Enron believes the proposed ERCOT protocols are unlikely to deliver market outcomes envisioned by Senate Bill 7 and has recommended that the commission analyze the benefits that can be expected compared to a market design such as in PJM."

Who can I talk to briefly about changes that Enron would like to see in the ERCOT operated ancillary and balancing energy markets?

Thanks, 
Ann de Rouffignac 

Tammy --

I sent this report to John and Louise last week.  Intend to make it monthly.  Similar to earlier.  I will include you on it going forward.  Sent to John's asst.  Call with any questions.

Jim

 

Jim, 
I know you guys have been busy beyond belief so I haven't had the heart to contact you about the report.  However, Louise is anxious to put a process back in place for the Office of the Chair update book.  

Would you kindly let me know if you could pull one together in the near future and what the frequency ought to be (monthly/bi-monthly)?

Thank you, 
Tammy

Is this good or bad for Enron?  My take is that this doesn't help us push f=
or ONE RTO.
=20
Jim

=20

Attached is the much anticipated order granting clarification of the Commis=
sion's order on the SMD filing.  The heart of this order states that when t=
he FERC refused to act on the SMD filings, its action:

was not intended to stop ISO-NE's or any other parties' efforts that might =
further the objectives of developing and implementing a regional market in =
the Northeast.  The Commission has already identified many aspects of such =
a market that it expects to see:  e.g., congestion management through locat=
ional marginal pricing, and day ahead and real time markets.  These element=
s are likewise present in SMD.  It thus was not the intention of the Commis=
sion that parties should stop work altogether.  Continuation of ISO-NE's ef=
forts at developing the software and related products necessary to implemen=
t SMD would, in fact, be a positive step toward ultimately developing a sin=
gle Northeastern market.  We note, however, that as it continues with the d=
evelopment of SMD, ISO-NE should be mindful of the ultimate goal of a singl=
e Northeastern market design.  We thus urge ISO-NE to continue with develop=
ment of SMD in every aspect, including software, in a sufficiently flexible=
 manner so that any products developed for SMD may be readily adaptable to =
whatever market design is ultimately proposed for the Northeastern RTO.

-pg=20

********************************=20
This message contains PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION intended sole=
ly for the use of the addressee(s) named above.  Any disclosure, distributi=
on, copying or use of the information by others is strictly prohibited.  If=
 you have received this message in error, please advise the sender by immed=
iate reply and delete the original message.  Thank you.=20

 

Please add to Reg Orig section.

Jim

Quick overdue update...

The meeting on the Belmont County - Ormet project that I arranged with the coal office and related agencies went very well.  Enron's coal plant development group is preparing an application and we will be exploring with the Ohio Air Quality Dev't Authority both traditional and creative new financing structures.  I will be arranging a follow-up meeting in a few weeks.  If this goes well, we could develop other projects in Ohio.

I will keep you posted. 

Janine

Don't know where you guys are with the negotiations, but here is another small issue with PG&E that would be nice to work through with them.

Jim

Yes, that's the point.  PG&E should have used the existing accumulated credit balances to clear the final DEBIT bills.  Instead, they cleared Enron's credit balances BEFORE they calculated the final bill.  Then they transferred the amount, which Enron is responsible for, to the customers' first utility bill.

Diann --

So it is correct to say that EES is responsible for the final bills?  If yes, how much $$ is this?

Jim

I understand now.  Thanks.

The customer is not entitled to the credits.  The credits were transferred, then final DA bills calculated and transferred to the customer.  The customer is NOT responsible for these final bills.  Had PG&E not transferred the Enron credits, the final debit bills would have been taken against the credits.

I am a little confused.  Why would the customers be entitled to a credit on bundled service?  EES owns the credits.

Jim,  as far as we know, PG&E is doing this on residential accounts only.  Remember that residential contracts were terminated in May and all accounts returned to utility service.  Instead of using the accumulated credits to clear the final direct access bills, PG&E transferred the credits, then calculated the final amounts.  These debits were then transferred to the customers PG&E bills.  These accounts were NOT reDASRed, so they are no longer Enron customers.  

I have requested a list of all credits transferred from Enron residential customers accounts, plus a listing of direct access bills transferred to these customers.  In the meantime, I feel we need to submit a formal request.

Diann --

I was under the impression that we had taken all necessary steps to protect our customers?  Is this problem just related to residential customers?

Jim

All, I finally got an answer from PG&E concerning the residential customer who had an amount transferred to his utility bill after he was switched from direct access.  PG&E admits that they transferred accumulated credit balances off of the residential accounts BEFORE they calculated the final direct access bill.  The final bills were all debit amounts due to the rate increases and the new procured energy credit calculations.  

PG&E then transferred these debit balances on to the customers' first utility bill.  We found out this had happened when we received calls from angry customers who had received disconnect notices.  They had been told by PG&E that Enron had refused to pay the final bills.  My guess is that most customers paid the balances rather than risk disconnection.

I requested a list of all credit balances transferred from PG&E so we can do an analysis of how much money is involved.  However, I have not sent a written request.  I thought I should confer with you before I send any formal request.

We also have an issue with SCE.  They are transferring debit balances  to residential customers for service PRIOR to direct access.   If you recall, their argument for not reinstating prior balances was that they consider these new accounts.  If that is indeed their process, this is inconsistent.   

Michael -

I've asked the outside consultants to give us a % change for the impact of the refund case.  Try to give these to you asap.  Ray Alvarez will you please follow up with CRA and Jan Acton?

Thanks,

Jim

thanks.

Jim, I talked to Jan Acton not an hour ago and he was hoping to get the info out this evening.  I confirmed your e-mail address to him.  I will call again to see how he is doing.  Ray 

Michael -

I've asked the outside consultants to give us a % change for the impact of the refund case.  Try to give these to you asap.  Ray Alvarez will you please follow up with CRA and Jan Acton?

Thanks,

Jim

Leslie --

What would it cost for outside counsel to do the hearing?  Maybe running an RCR through with the biggest $$ allows Shapiro, etal to discuss next Tuesday?

Jim

I think we should be represented.  Nevada is a big market, so if it gets screwed up, it should be with our participation.

You may remember that Southwest Gas filed a tariff revision in Nevada that would keep a transportation customer who returns to sales on sales for a term of 5 years.  They modified that request to grandfather customers who returned as a result of this past winter's fiasco.  We filed an opposition to this tariff change back in April (I think it was).  Anyway, the PUC of Nevada has scheduled a hearing on the SW filing for Sept. 24 and I need to know if this is an issue you want to pursue.  I can attend, or I can have outside counsel attend, or we can skip it and rely on our written comments. IF we want to file testimony, it would be due 9/17.  Please let me know what you would like me to do on this.  Thanks.

I think that this list is fine.  Any thoughts to including the key Industrial customer and legal rep for the Munis / Coops while in this area?

Jim

 << File: MR-List 91801.xls >> 

Sounds good to me.  Any thoughts to have Milnthorp support the Conservative=
s and Devries (or someone else) do the Liberals?

Jim
Yes I think we can through Sasha J.  - and will do so -=20

Key is Conservative party reaction since they are the governing party..can =
you gauge this ?

As you know, one of our key efforts in Ontario is to build bipartisan suppo=
rt for opening the market in early 2002. That largely involves firming up t=
he position of the Liberal Party (currently in opposition but in a strong p=
osition to win in the next election) in support of moving forward with comp=
etition. The Liberal Party has asked me whether Enron (really someone like =
Rob Milnthorp or Paul Devries) might consider being the co-chair of a fund =
raising event for the party in November 2001. The event would be timed for =
the Independent Power Producers Society of Ontario conference (the largest =
annual energy conference in Canada) and would be targeted at people in the =
Ontario energy sector. Dalton McGuinty, the leader, would speak at the even=
t.  I didn't dismiss the idea out of hand because it may have merit if : a)=
  through such an event, we can secure true bipartisan support for moving f=
orward.  (In other words, if we were to do this, the material would have to=
 state that Rob or Paul is acting as co-chair in recognition of the biparti=
san support for the deregulation initiative and how such bipartisan support=
 is good for the Province etc); and b) we were satisfied that doing so woul=
d not alienate the governing Conservatives. (The Conservatives have always =
encouraged us to do what we can to keep the Liberals on side and I think th=
ey would be sophisticated enough to appreciate that efforts would involve p=
articipation in such fund raising events - particularly if the material use=
d did not endorse the Liberals and merely recognized their support for movi=
ng forward). Let me know what you think.  Aleck (having said all this I sho=
uld admit to being a Liberal)

Should we try and agree with the other market participants on a list of issue prior to the meeting?  Maybe coordination also with FERC staff prior to the meeting?  Don't want to appear that this is "ganging up" but we do need to be prepared to go in with a clear idea of what is a "good" meeting.

Jim

I made a quick call to Dynegy, WIliams and Reliant to see how they were approaching the meeting. 

Williams and Reliant seem to think this is a very positive step, and are bringing decisionmakers and no attorneys.  They each plan to have 2 - 3 people there.  They see this as an opportunity to have FERC staff ask the ISO some hard questions and demand some answers.

Dynegy is less optimistic.  It currently plans to bring Joel Newton out, its FERC attorney, but that decision is "subject to change." Dynegy agreed that the letter and approach were strange.

All three will have someone there who can make decisions and agree to protocols. We may want to do the same -- if we can get someone to come from the desk.

too late.

Didn't you tell EPSA to not use the Monarch?!

Attached is an updated schedule and registration form for the EPSA Fall Membership Meeting, October 23-24 at the Monarch Hotel in Washington, DC.  Please complete the registration and fax it back to Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8260. 

I am pleased to announce that The Honorable Francis Blake, Deputy Secretary of Energy will be our keynote speaker on October 23rd.  

The Monarch Hotel has extended a group rate of $269.00 to meeting attendees.  Please contact the hotel directly at 202-429-2400 to make your reservations.  The cut-off date for the special group rate is October 2.  After that date, we cannot guarantee either availability or rates.

If you have any questions regarding the meeting, please call Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8200.  I hope that you and your families are safe and well and I look forward to seeing you in October.

Laurie Martin
Director of Meetings & Membership
EPSA
lmartin@epsa.org
Phone: 202-628-8200 ext. 121
Fax: 202-628-8260

I will be attending.

Jim

Attached is an updated schedule and registration form for the EPSA Fall Membership Meeting, October 23-24 at the Monarch Hotel in Washington, DC.  Please complete the registration and fax it back to Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8260.

I am pleased to announce that The Honorable Francis Blake, Deputy Secretary of Energy will be our keynote speaker on October 23rd.

The Monarch Hotel has extended a group rate of $269.00 to meeting attendees.  Please contact the hotel directly at 202-429-2400 to make your reservations.  The cut-off date for the special group rate is October 2.  After that date, we cannot guarantee either availability or rates.

If you have any questions regarding the meeting, please call Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8200.  I hope that you and your families are safe and well and I look forward to seeing you in October.

Laurie Martin
Director of Meetings & Membership
EPSA
lmartin@epsa.org
Phone: 202-628-8200 ext. 121
Fax: 202-628-8260

 - Registration form.doc 

Christi --

Like we spoke about yesterday, the key play here will be to understand the retail opportunities.  Let me know how your efforts to get a good synopsis goes.  Don't forget to use Jennifer Thome to help in this effort.

Jim

to Dave Duran's direct reports (East power origination).  They are brainstorming on how to meet their numbers next year.  Draft attached here << File: D.DuranMeeting-0901.ppt >> THANKS!

thanks for the reply.  we will be reviewing the applications in due course.  probably best to work through the standard process.

Mr. Steffes my name is LaTosha Edwards, and I am showing a great interest in a position held in your department. The position is titled Admin Assist, job # 0000110323, I more than just qualify for this job I know this job is for me. At this time I am currently working on the 31st floor as an assistant, my asignment will end on the 21st. Please respond to this e-mail, for I would really like the opportunity to set the atmosphere within the office. Serious about making a future here at Enron, I have only my best to offer. Allow me the chance to speak with you, we can first start with getting my resume to you. I will look for a response soon. Thank You! 

Becky --

FYI.  Does EGM have any past advocacy on NURF?

Jim

NURF (Non-Uniform Rate of Flow) is a proposal currently being discussed at GISB to have hourly firm service on pipelines.  It becomes a cost allocation issue as to who pays for the extra compression etc that may be necessary.

The paper is, for the most part, a fair representation of the NURF discussions ( I'd part with a few of the statements made in 6, 7, & 8).   While the ETS pipelines participated in the development of the outline to ensure that the principles were sound, we do not have any present plans to file a NURF service.  When and if we have real customers that want to contract for NURF service, we will make a filing.   Even though we don't plan any immediate NURF service, I think the dialogue was still useful in making sure that generators understand the operational challenges of serving hourly swings.

I read a paper on NURF (from Dynegy attorney).  What is our pipeline position?  Thanks

I'd let Alan make the call.  As long as we understand the issues well, maybe no reason to take commercial to the mtg.

Jim

We spoke with Debra Bolton, counsel for Mirant yesterday.  She believes that this exercise is the result of complaints by Mirant and others as to ISO sheduling practices.  She plans to attend the meeting.  FERC apparently wants to handle these issues "informally" through meetings and mediation rather than through formal complaints.  So...it appears that it will be a "good" meeting, with the various generators and SCs bringing their concerns/gripes to the table.  I will call FERC staff today to get more insight.  We are planning to cover the meeting with Alan, Dave and me.  Should we also take someone from the desk?  Ray

Should we try and agree with the other market participants on a list of issue prior to the meeting?  Maybe coordination also with FERC staff prior to the meeting?  Don't want to appear that this is "ganging up" but we do need to be prepared to go in with a clear idea of what is a "good" meeting.

Jim

I made a quick call to Dynegy, WIliams and Reliant to see how they were approaching the meeting. 

Williams and Reliant seem to think this is a very positive step, and are bringing decisionmakers and no attorneys.  They each plan to have 2 - 3 people there.  They see this as an opportunity to have FERC staff ask the ISO some hard questions and demand some answers.

Dynegy is less optimistic.  It currently plans to bring Joel Newton out, its FERC attorney, but that decision is "subject to change." Dynegy agreed that the letter and approach were strange.

All three will have someone there who can make decisions and agree to protocols. We may want to do the same -- if we can get someone to come from the desk.

I am talking with Larry Cafero, Minority leader of House, and close personal friend of the Gov.  Initial feedback from Cafero is still positive.  I will likely, within the right timeframe given the WTC tragedy, schedule a meeting with Rowland personally.  I will advise when that will be.  I do agree with Dan's assessment. Don't panic yet. SM

Did Connecticut reject our fuel cell project? If so, details?
[Allegretti, Daniel]  

Yes.  The DPUC issued a draft decision which declines to fund the project from the Conservation and Load Management Fund.  The decision praises the project in the text but includes a footnote which is critical of the project.  In addition, the DPUC issued a press release which is not helpful in promoting the project.

The decision not to fund out of the C&LM fund was not unexpected.  The chairman of the DPUC has been very supportive, along with Governor Rowland, but has been working offline to fund the project instead from the Renewable Energy Investment Fund.  Although the REIF is a much smaller fund it appears the REIF is able to borrow against future receipts and is willing to do so based in part on their expectation of increased funding next legislative session.  We are meeting with the REIF director next Wednesday to confirm where this stands.

In the mean time we have filed exceptions to the draft decision which goes final tomorrow.  We are told that the offending footnote will be removed but that the decision not to commit the C&LM fund will remain unchanged.

In sum, the project has suffered a very real setback but has not at this time been abandoned by EPMI.  Support from Rowland and others remains strong and EPMI would like to see if funding from the REIF this year is in fact viable.

Jennifer --

SBX2 18 and SBX2 85 are important to follow.

Jim

See SB 85, below.

Best,
Jeff

The Assembly Appropriations Committee is scheduled to meet tomorrow to take
up SBX2 78.  The bill may be taken up by the full Assembly after that,
however, that decision has not been made because several Legislators have
indicated that they may not be in Sacramento tomorrow.

The Assembly Revenue and Taxation Committee is going to meet sometime today
off the floor to take up SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott) which would establish a
windfall profits tax.  Additional amendments will be taken that will make
the tax effective on January 1, 2002, define exempt wholesale generator,
marketer, broker, and aggregator, by referencing their PUC definitions, and
exempt QFs.

The Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee will meet upon
adjournment of session today to take up SBX2 39, which would give the CPUC
regulatory authority over non-IOU generation facilities, for
reconsideration.  The bill failed passage during its prior hearing.

The Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee is scheduled to take
up the following bills on September 4 at 1:30 p.m.:

SBX2 85 (Burton) - This bill would prevent the CPUC, upon termination of the
10 percent rate reduction for residential and small commercial customers set
forth in subdivision (a) of Section
368, from subjecting those residential and small commercial customers to any
rate increases or future rate obligations solely as a result of the
termination of the 10 percent rate reduction.

SBX2 18 (Burton) - This bill would establish a dedicated rate component.

A couple of thoughts --

1.	Ashley Brown and Rick have a great relationship.  Don't hesitate to use Rick to find out some details if you need him.

2.	Are we supporting this?  I don't understand why we would agree to make NG the MM with this process / paper?

Thanks.

Here's the first document available relating to the proposal developed at the last FERC facilitated Alliance stakeholder advisory committee meeting -- NGrid's proposal for the stakeholder advisory relationship to itself as interim as well as permanent independent board.  Talk about independence -- you'll see in the attachment that Alliance Companies are redrafting the section that describes interim board authority!
Dear Stakeholders:

	At last Tuesday's meeting in Chicago, National Grid promised to circulate a draft proposal for the stakeholder advisory process of the Alliance.  The attached document is a draft.  Because of the extraordinary circumstances of this week, Grid was unable to get full corporate review of the document, and may want to  further modify it.  Nevertheless, because of  Grid's desire to fulfill its promise, it is circulating the current version of the document for stakeholders to begin thinking about.
   
Best Regards,

Ashley C. Brown

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Howard -

Have you and Jeff Brown talked about the MG deal?  I want to make sure that you understand fully and appreciate any issues / concerns.

Thanks.

Do we need to have a phone call with you, Harry K., Charles Y., Sarah N., Christi N., John Shelk, Gloria O., Vinio Flores to make sure that Enron is on the same page?  I don't think that we will see much support from the business people, although maybe you and I can sit down with Evan Hughes to get his buy-in.

Let me know.

Jim

The attached documents were developed by the Uniform Business Practices Governance Committee and have been distributed to the UBP memberships for comments.  A meeting has been scheduled of our group on September 25th and 26th in St Louis to review comments and hopefully come up with a final document.  I would appreciate your review and comments on these documents.  I need to have these comments back to the committee by COB Tuesday, September 18th.  Thanks for your time and consideration.
 << File: RESB_govern_090701.doc >>  << File: Distrib_Seg_App_B_090601.doc >> 

Do we need to have a meeting to work through this?  What outside counsel is supporting the sale right now?

Jim

but I was of the understanding that the filings were tied to price changes resulting in a different charge to OPC.

thanks, ron.

The filing is required since this is an EWG with cost-based rate authority.  The requirement extends even to indirect transfers of ownership such as this one.

Are we sure that this is required in the context of (i) a transfer of the stock in Doyle owned by Powergen Investco LLC, which represents 50% of the equity interest in Doyle, or (ii) an upstream transfer of 100% of the stock in Powergen to Walton EMC?

Since this is a transfer of jurisdictional assets, the filing required is pursuant to Section 203 of the Federal Power Act and Part 33 of the Commission's regulations. Part 33 lists information to be provided and it is fairly extensive.  In order to show that the transaction is in the public interest, the Commission requires that you provide a description of each applicant's business activities, ownership, affiliates and subsidiaries (with a description of their business activities), a list of wholesale power sales customers of the applicants, and of course a description of the transaction.  We made a similar filing recently for the New Albany sale.  

There may also have to be a Section 205 filing made if any tariff revisions are required. This is usually a pretty quick filing to prepare.  In the case of the New Albany sale, some minor changes had to be made to the affiliate portion of the tariff sheets.

For the New Albany sale, we used LeBoeuf, Lamb as our counsel.  (Christi -- is this typical, or do we sometimes use Bracewell instead?  In any event, if closing is imminent it sounds as if we need to proceed very quickly.  Please call to discuss.)

What is the specific regulatory approval required?

Yes. this requires regulatory approval.  It would be a filing that has a 21 day notice period.  It typically requires 45 - 60 days for approval, but we could ask for expedited approval.  I would recommend hiring Andrea Settanni at B&P to make the filing.  She said it would be less than $5000.  I think that on the past sales, either ENA legal or the commercial group hires the outside counsel.  Susan Lindberg can help coordinate it.  Thanks.

	 -----Original Message-----
	Christi,

	if we are selling our interest in Doyle I LLC to Walton EMC, does this require any regulatory approval?  Keep in mind that it will be PGI selling its interest to Walton EMC in the Doyle I LLC.  Doyle I LLC contniues to be the counterparty to the PPA.  It would seem that this should not be a reg issue but we want to make sure.

	Thanks, Ron.

	 -----Original Message-----
	Ron,

	Given that you want to close by the end of the month, has anyone checked to see what regulatory approval will be needed to transfer our 50% interest.  I suspect that we will need FERC approval as Doyle is an EWG with "cost-based-rate" authority.  As an aside, Dan Watkiss did the regulatory work and might be able to respond most quickly.

	Stuart

			 -----Original Message-----
			Stuart,

			here is the agreement.  The black-line version is included as well.

			Thanks, Ron.

			 << File: 3b1b03!.DOC >> 

			 << File: 3b98RED.DOC >> 

Dan -

Spoke with Janet Dietrich yesterday.  Slight change to our advocacy versus our Monday discussions.  After meeting with Sean Holmes, it was agreed that our policy work would say (1) no retroactive DA suspension (at least not earlier than Sept 1), (2) don't end DA but study how to allow it to continue.

If the CPUC does suspend without retroactive, the fear is that re-starting the CA market will be very difficult.

Please call me when you get some time.

Jim

Thanks.  As long as the business guys (and King & Spalding) aren't preventing the appropriate filings, I'll assume this deal is done.

Jim

No, outside counsel (Bracewell) have confirmed my research that a 203 filing is required.  Bracewell is helping with the 203 filing but King and Spalding are on the purchase and sale agreement.

Do we need to have a meeting to work through this?  What outside counsel is supporting the sale right now?

Jim

but I was of the understanding that the filings were tied to price changes resulting in a different charge to OPC.

thanks, ron.

The filing is required since this is an EWG with cost-based rate authority.  The requirement extends even to indirect transfers of ownership such as this one.

Are we sure that this is required in the context of (i) a transfer of the stock in Doyle owned by Powergen Investco LLC, which represents 50% of the equity interest in Doyle, or (ii) an upstream transfer of 100% of the stock in Powergen to Walton EMC?

Since this is a transfer of jurisdictional assets, the filing required is pursuant to Section 203 of the Federal Power Act and Part 33 of the Commission's regulations. Part 33 lists information to be provided and it is fairly extensive.  In order to show that the transaction is in the public interest, the Commission requires that you provide a description of each applicant's business activities, ownership, affiliates and subsidiaries (with a description of their business activities), a list of wholesale power sales customers of the applicants, and of course a description of the transaction.  We made a similar filing recently for the New Albany sale.  

There may also have to be a Section 205 filing made if any tariff revisions are required. This is usually a pretty quick filing to prepare.  In the case of the New Albany sale, some minor changes had to be made to the affiliate portion of the tariff sheets.

For the New Albany sale, we used LeBoeuf, Lamb as our counsel.  (Christi -- is this typical, or do we sometimes use Bracewell instead?  In any event, if closing is imminent it sounds as if we need to proceed very quickly.  Please call to discuss.)

What is the specific regulatory approval required?

Yes. this requires regulatory approval.  It would be a filing that has a 21 day notice period.  It typically requires 45 - 60 days for approval, but we could ask for expedited approval.  I would recommend hiring Andrea Settanni at B&P to make the filing.  She said it would be less than $5000.  I think that on the past sales, either ENA legal or the commercial group hires the outside counsel.  Susan Lindberg can help coordinate it.  Thanks.

	 -----Original Message-----
	Christi,

	if we are selling our interest in Doyle I LLC to Walton EMC, does this require any regulatory approval?  Keep in mind that it will be PGI selling its interest to Walton EMC in the Doyle I LLC.  Doyle I LLC contniues to be the counterparty to the PPA.  It would seem that this should not be a reg issue but we want to make sure.

	Thanks, Ron.

	 -----Original Message-----
	Ron,

	Given that you want to close by the end of the month, has anyone checked to see what regulatory approval will be needed to transfer our 50% interest.  I suspect that we will need FERC approval as Doyle is an EWG with "cost-based-rate" authority.  As an aside, Dan Watkiss did the regulatory work and might be able to respond most quickly.

	Stuart

			 -----Original Message-----
			Stuart,

			here is the agreement.  The black-line version is included as well.

			Thanks, Ron.

			 << File: 3b1b03!.DOC >> 

			 << File: 3b98RED.DOC >> 

Thanks.  Does Howard understand your deal and the going-forward issues (if any) that he needs to be aware of?  I want to make sure that he knows what is important and unimportant to this (and other load curtailment).

Jim

Jim - I discussed this with EES Legal.  Although we know about the NE RTO being created, we don't know the specific rules that will be implemented.  Therefore, our regulatory out language would be applicable.

Jeff

Does change in law mean the implementation of the NE RTO?  That process is underway and whatever happens with its implementation we should already have a knowledge of?

Jim

Jim,

This is a 3 year deal, beginning Oct. 1.  Our standard terms and conditions, which MG has already executed, includes a "regulatory" out provision.  In addition, a change in law allows EES to terminate.

If ICAP or UCAP goes away, this would be a material change and EES would try to renegotiate the deal with MG or terminate if an acceptable deal cannot be reached.

Thanks - Jeff

I only have one question - the NYISO may be replaced by a NERTO as soon as this year in December.  What is the timeframe of the contract?  Also, the NYISO rules may change - what happens to our deal?  Do we have rights to restructure?  What happens if ICAP or UCAP goes away as an obligation?

Jim

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Bonnie Nelson
09/17/2001 02:35 PM
To all, attached please find a revised draft of the Load Curtailment Annex, marked to show changes from the draft distributed to you on September 14.  Also for your convenience, I am attaching a clean draft.

 << File: LCAnnex091401v2.doc >>  << File: LCAnnex091401v2RED.doc >> 

Paul --

Please give me a call (if possible today).   I am taking vacation from tomorrow through next week Friday.

Jim

Good Morning Team,

I have been able to get through to the Career Placement office at Georgetown.   We are going to be able to move our presentation to Monday, September 24th, same time (6:30 - 9:30)  and same room (202).  The Career Placement Office was very supportive of our decision, and feel that a week delay would be enough time for the students.  We are also going to send a gift basket to the Career Placement Office to show that they are in our Thoughts and Prayers.

Myself or Alyse, needs to hear from those who are participating,

1]	David Howe
2]	Jim Steffes
3]	Denise Furey
4]	Kirk Nuener
5]	Roshena Ham
6]	Brian Wood
7]	Sebastian Corbacho
8]	Scott Griffin
9]	Andrea Gonzalez
10]	Paul LeBeau

if this date still works with your schedule.  

We are already in the process of changing the Hotel, caterers, and informing the students.

Thank you for your patience, we will wait to hear from you. 

Linda -- Pls put on my calendar.

Thanks,

Jim

Hello,
Attached is the 2002 Schedule of EPSA Meetings.  Please mark your calendars.  The Board Planning Meeting date and location will be determined shortly.  Please don't hesitate to contact me with any questions/concerns.

Sherri J. Jackson
Meeting & Membership Coordinator
EPSA
sjackson@epsa.org
Phone (202) 628-8200 ext. 123
Fax (202) 628-8260
www.epsa.org

 - Schedule of Meetings.doc 

Bob --

Did we send this?

Jim
For your comments.

 

I'll be going.  You should go if you want to go.  It's a good opportunity to network.

Jim

Are you going?  Should I attend?

Attached is the preliminary schedule and registration form for the EPSA Fall Membership Meeting, October 23-24 at the Monarch Hotel in Washington, DC.  Please complete the registration and email or fax it back to Sherri Jackson at sjackson@epsa.org or 202-628-8260. 

The Monarch Hotel has extended a group rate of $269.00 to meeting attendees.  Please contact the hotel directly at 202-429-2400 to make your reservations.  The cut-off date for the special group rate is October 2.  After that date, we cannot guarantee either availability or rates.

If you have any questions regarding the meeting, please call Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8200.  I look forward to seeing you in October.

Laurie Martin
Director of Meetings & Membership
EPSA
lmartin@epsa.org
Phone: 202-628-8200 ext. 121
Fax: 202-628-8260

EEI's work is nothing more than the NERC language (but shorter).  Still the key difference - self-regulating versus standard setting.  Given that EEI seems to believe that the Canadian issues are minor, why get rid of the self-regulating nature?

Jim

You may have already been cc:

MEMORANDUM

TO: EPSA Legislative Affairs Committee
       NAERO Working Group

FROM: Scott A. Weiner, Legislative Affairs Committee Chair
            Donn J. Salvosa, Manager of Government Affairs
            Mark Bennett, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE:	September 18, 2001

RE: Reliability Legislation - New Drafts

A number of proposed bills addressing the reliability issue have recently been circulated.  Senate Energy and Natural Resources Chairman Jeff Bingaman (D-NM) recently distributed a draft electricity title to a comprehensive energy bill.  The reliability section of the draft is attached.  The House Energy Subcommittee chaired by Rep. Joe Barton (R-TX) has also circulated language which is attached.  Additionally in response to concerns expressed during a recent EEI CEO meeting, EEI has circulated their own legislative proposal, absent participation from NERC and its consensus group.  Their draft is based on the NERC bill, but contains several significant changes as noted below. This is also attached for your review.  

Senator Bingaman's language encompasses only two pages.  The legislation simply grants to FERC authority to develop and enforce standards.  FERC may choose to adopt any NERC proposed standard.  Lastly, FERC can delegate enforcement of standards to NERC or an RTO if it chooses to do so.  

The House four page draft version of reliability language proposes to do the following: 

- Establish an Electric Reliability Organization (ERO), subject to FERC 
  approval; no Affiliated Regional Reliability Entities (ARREs); it is unclear 
  whether FERC could approve multiple EROs.

- ERO files proposed standards or modifications with FERC, which can 
  approve or remand for further consideration.
- ERO would enforce standards and impose penalties, subject to FERC 
  review.  FERC can assign authority for a given region to an RTO.  Also, 
  FERC on its own can order compliance and penalties.  

- ERO to take "appropriate steps" to coordinate with Canada and Mexico; 
  President to use "best efforts" to reach international agreements.

The EEI proposal includes the following points:

- FERC would establish and maintain jurisdiction over EROs and an 
  appropriate number of ARREs.  FERC can choose to direct the ERO to 
  develop or modify standards.  

- EROs develop standards subject to FERC approval.

- ERO, under FERC direction, will delegate authority to regional entities.  
  This presumably can include ARREs or RTOs.  ERO and appropriate 
  entities would enforce standards.  FERC can also enforce and impose 
  penalties.  

This past Tuesday, EPSA staff meet with Bobby Lamb and Craig Glazer, representatives from PJM, to discuss PJM's legislative proposal.  It was clear from the meeting that there is flexibility to make changes, which could address our areas of concern in order to gain our support.  For example, they told us that some parts of the proposed bill were written to gain support from groups who then favored the NERC bill.   With the recent circulation of other versions of reliability language, they invited us to suggest changes to their reliability language.  The meeting revealed that EPSA's and PJM's views are very similar, and that a potential opportunity exists to develop a better alternative to the NERC Bill.

We are holding a conference call on Thursday, September 20, 2001, at 4:00 P.M. (EDT) to discuss these opportunities and possible new legislative initiatives.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Mark Bennett/EPSA Call.  If you have any questions or concerns please contact Mark Bennett or Donn Salvosa at 202-628-8200.

Becky --

Thanks for the updated list.  I will include it in our database.  

Please continue to coordinate with Roy Boston on the "info" reporting.

Jim

Linda --

Please set up some time (about 1 hour) after I return from my vacation with Dave Duran and Rick Shapiro and myself to discuss Enron's Wholesale & Retail Advocacy Positions.

Thanks.

Jim

FYI.  Please try and attend.  Bob, it would be good to have your issue list on the TFG Brief and next steps before the meeting to this group.

Jim
There will be a California Litigation Team conference call on Thursday, September 20, from 2:00 to 3:00 p.m. Central time.  The call in information is:

Domestic Dial In Number:  1-800-713-8600

International Dial In Number:  1-801-983-4017

Passcode:  56871

Host:  Mark Haedicke

Janette Elbertson
Enron Wholesale Services Legal Department
Telephone:  (713) 853-7906
Fax:  (713) 646-2600
e-mail:  janette.elbertson@enron.com

Bob --

Any concerns with this language?  Not sure if we are even going to file, but want to be ready.  

Sue --

While this draft talks about July 1 retroactive date, I'd guess this would be filed if the CPUC does anything before the Ordering date?

Jim      

Attached is a first draft of the  Appication for Rehearing to be filed in the event the Commission issues a  retroactive direct access suspension decision.  Your comments will be very  much appreciated.
 
Dan
 
Law Offices of Daniel W.  Douglass
5959 Topanga Canyon Blvd.  Suite 244
Woodland Hills, CA  91367
Tel:   (818) 596-2201
Fax:  (818)  346-6502douglass@energyattorney.com 
 
 - 9-21-01 Application for Rehearing - Draft 1.doc 

No, but I'm happy to ride with almost anyone.

Jim

FYI Only...........know anyone?  I'm keeping a file.

A new 228 list.

Kay Young
Legal Specialist
Gerri Irvine is out on medical leave.  I now will be updating and distributing the 228 Riders list.  Attached is the most current list.  Please send any changes to me by email or call me at 713-345-8978.

Susan

 << File: 228rider.doc >> 

Bob --

Jeff talked with Fielder.  Your thoughts on next steps?

Jim

Fielder agreed to sit down and talk as soon as we'd like.
He said that his "legal and tariff guys" told him that "they're on solid ground"; but John admitted that doesn't mean that Edison "is right."
I told him that his lawyers and tariff people may think they're on solid ground with the PUC, but that in no way means that an appellate or ("god forbid) bankruptcy judge will concur with either Edison or the PUC.
I stressed that we weren't interested in meeting to re-hash our respective positions and that we wanted a meeting where we and they come to the table with constructive, good faith options to resolve the issue.
He said that he'd be willing to do that (though most deeply discount anything Edison says these days).
He suggested that we start without lawyers.  I said that we could do that, but that I'd have to check.
I told him that we'd try to get back to him sometime today regarding what we'd like to do.

Possible to discuss briefly?

Best,
Jeff

FYI.

no.  beth t and peggy came up with alternative; i don't know if it was sent.  glad you made it back safely.

Bob --

Did we send this?

Jim
For your comments.

 << File: Attorney General Invest 9_12_01.doc >> 

Janine --

I would have EPMI be the party of record.  Also, please make sure that Susan Lindberg gets a copy of all filings to pass along to the Midwest desk.

Thanks,

Jim

on holiday

Just got an email from Gary Ackerman of the Western Power Trading Forum that he'll be in Houston on Friday and will stop by at 2 p.m.  If any of you are around, I'd love to introduce him (or if you already know him, just say hello). kd

I am trying to find out if anything went out and if so, will be in touch with the document.

Jim

We did not receive the attachment

FYI.

no.  beth t and peggy came up with alternative; i don't know if it was sent.  glad you made it back safely.

Bob --

Did we send this?

Jim
For your comments.

 << File: Attorney General Invest 9_12_01.doc >> 

Alan -

Appreciate your thoughts.

Jim

Jim,

I thought you might be interested in the attached 3-pager.  I leave it
to you to let me know if you'd like to talk further, or get together
when you are in town.

Best of luck

--Jim

 <<Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc>> 
 - Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc <<Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc>> 

yes.

Jim, I've already got you signed up.  Faxed it in today.  Ginger and I put you and Rick up at the Hyatt instead of the Monarch.  Ginger says Rick likes it better so I put you at the same place and will do the same for Christi.  OK?????

HAVE A GREAT EVENING

Linda

Sure

Yes, I just signed Jim up today.  Putting him up at the Park Hyatt where Rick is staying.  I know it costs a few dollars more but its nicer per Ginger.  Want the same?

Can you put this on my calendar and get me signed up?  Thanks

I'll be going.  You should go if you want to go.  It's a good opportunity to network.

Jim

Are you going?  Should I attend?

Attached is the preliminary schedule and registration form for the EPSA Fall Membership Meeting, October 23-24 at the Monarch Hotel in Washington, DC.  Please complete the registration and email or fax it back to Sherri Jackson at sjackson@epsa.org or 202-628-8260. 

The Monarch Hotel has extended a group rate of $269.00 to meeting attendees.  Please contact the hotel directly at 202-429-2400 to make your reservations.  The cut-off date for the special group rate is October 2.  After that date, we cannot guarantee either availability or rates.

If you have any questions regarding the meeting, please call Sherri Jackson at 202-628-8200.  I look forward to seeing you in October.

Laurie Martin
Director of Meetings & Membership
EPSA
lmartin@epsa.org
Phone: 202-628-8200 ext. 121
Fax: 202-628-8260

FYI
I think you should go talk with them and convince them they should reinstate our credit.

Bob --

Jeff talked with Fielder.  Your thoughts on next steps?

Jim

Fielder agreed to sit down and talk as soon as we'd like.
He said that his "legal and tariff guys" told him that "they're on solid ground"; but John admitted that doesn't mean that Edison "is right."
I told him that his lawyers and tariff people may think they're on solid ground with the PUC, but that in no way means that an appellate or ("god forbid) bankruptcy judge will concur with either Edison or the PUC.
I stressed that we weren't interested in meeting to re-hash our respective positions and that we wanted a meeting where we and they come to the table with constructive, good faith options to resolve the issue.
He said that he'd be willing to do that (though most deeply discount anything Edison says these days).
He suggested that we start without lawyers.  I said that we could do that, but that I'd have to check.
I told him that we'd try to get back to him sometime today regarding what we'd like to do.

Possible to discuss briefly?

Best,
Jeff

Richard  --

FYI.

Here is a snapshot of what is going on right now.  It is unusual.

According to ISO, they owe us $1MM (instead of us owing them $37MM)!!!!!
However, don't take this to the bank since Jan Acton of Charles River Associates believes that the ISO made a significant "coding" (ie mathematical formula) error with respect to uninstructed energy, that is behind most of this shift.  On the conference call held Monday, others also noticed discrepancies in the uninstructed energy category so it is likely the ISO will discover and fix the error.
We suspect there is game playing going on (in addition to errors in the data).  CERS went from having to refund $1.2billion, to zero.  Also, significant increases (unexplained) in neutrality charges have been observed. 
ISO asserts their calculations are correct despite the suspected errors and game playing.  However, they have not taken mitigation into account for "spot OOM" transactions.  The magnitude of this is unknown, but could be very large.  This makes the correctness of their data even more suspect.
Obviously, given the foregoing no one can agree to limit the scope of the proceeding through a stipulation excluding settlement disputes from the proceeding.  The numbers are huge as are the shifts or swings in liability with each iteration of new ISO numbers.
Absent agreement on the stipulation, Judge Birchman is scheduled to hear oral argument and decide the issue tomorrow.
Our main concern will be to keep consideration of issues 2 and 3 (refunds and offsets) together in the procedural schedule.

I am meeting with Dan Watkiss at noon to discuss strategy, and Gary Fergus will also be coming in for the hearing.  Another conference call with the ISO regarding their data will take place at 2PM.  I will follow up with another e-mail so as to keep you posted.

Ray

Please add to the database.

Jim

Does this have the information you are looking for, if I update it as required?

Key Gas Issues
September 17, 2001

	Issue	Client	Status	
1. 	Perceived lack of compliance with Order 637 reporting requirements on some pipelines	ENA East, West, MidContinent Desks	Review documentation from Fundamentals group when available.  Then schedule informal meeting with FERC staff to educate and get advice on further steps.	
2. 	California Reporting Requirements	Logistics (ENA, EES)	ENA on schedule to meet deadline of Oct. 1.  EES not on schedule.  Will have to advise FERC unable to meet deadline and request extension.	
3. 	El Paso Turnback/Receipt Point Rights	ENA West Desk	Next step is to file comments on last two technical conferences and raise turnback right as issue again.	
4. 	Affiliate Rules Issues	All	Waiting for issuance of NOPR.  Getting information about Enron firm transport agreements on affiliated pipes and other pipes from Global Contracts.	
5. 	CPUC v. El Paso Complaint Proceeding	ENA West Desk	Parties have filed briefs after hearing.  ALJ plans to issue decision by October 9th.	
6. 	Transco Rate Case	ENA East Desk	Settlement discussions ongoing.  Formal proceeding is at discovery stage.  Analyze impact to ENA.	
7. 	Southwest Gas (state issues)	EES West Desk	Pursuing at ACC.  Resolution of El Paso full requirements customers issues would remove one roadblock.	
8. 	LiveLink Regulatory Reporting	All	Working on LiveLink set-up.  Developing template for summaries.	

Thanks for the informative phone call this morning.  Having the key issues presented in one place was very helpful.

To follow up on the meeting, the following are action items for the group.

1.	December 1 Market Readiness Update Meeting

Thane Twiggs (wholesale) and Nancy Hetrick (retail) will have at this time an understanding of the billing and settlement issues (or not) with their respective areas.  We need to ensure that EES and EPMI are able to get the necessary information to make sure that their bills and settlements are working and that we can bill our retail customers.  I will ask Linda Noske to set up this meeting.  If anyone hears anything else about the market delay, please let Jean Ryall know immediately.  As of right now, it is my impression that we all agree there is no delay scheduled???

2.	Congestion Pass thru to EES' Retail Customers

Thane Twiggs, Nancy Hetrick and Jim Steffes will get with EWS and EES counter parties to try and work through the ability of EES passing thru congestion to its customers per the contract language.  I will lead the process of consulting with EES legal.

3.	Wholesale Issues (Thane Twiggs)

a.	Define workable TCR Product 
b.	End Balanced Schedule requirement 
c.	Fix Capacity Auction process, including credit matters
d.	BENA/OOM/AS
e.	Settlement & Billing

4.	Retail Issues

a.	REP - ISO - Utility Interface (Nancy Hetrick)
b.	Reliant PTB (Pat Keene)
c.	TXU PTB (Pat Keene)
d.	Reliant Negative CTC (Pat Keene)
e.	TXU Negative CTC (Pat Keene)
f.	EES / EPMI License (Gloria Ogenyi + Nancy Hetrick)

5.	Information Flow

All policy statements from anyone within Government Affairs should be first vetted with Jean Ryall to ensure consistency and conformity.  Also, all people on the TO: list above should be included on all e-mail traffic.  I know this may sometimes slow down response to business people, but I think that we can all agree that no one has all the information in this very fast moving environment and unless we have a central clearinghouse we may send the wrong messages.

It is also critical that all commercial people interested in Texas need to hear about the latest.  By having Jean Ryall in the center, she will be able to ensure that no one feels "cut out".

The bi-weekly meeting should be held with Jean Ryall as Host to follow these issues in a timely manner.  

6.	Wholesale Products

Thane Twiggs was going to keep the team apprised of our products and pricing info on a regular basis so we are informed about the market.

Finally, it is critical that everyone work together to get the best results possible for Enron in the Texas market.  This is our "home" base - we need to make sure that our business efforts win big.  

Thanks for everything ya'll have been doing to achieve this result.

Jim

Beth --

Who on your team can I get to move forward with this report?  

Jim

Anthony & Evan --

Who should process this?

Jim

FYI.  Note that we even had a meeting which included EES on 9/5 where the responsible party (Kelly Lovvorn) committed to certain tasks, which he obviously did not perform.  (Kelly is a contract employee.)  

Jim - there will be a charge (probably significant, especially for the "emergency" processing) from CSC to produce the required information.  There is some expectation that Government Affairs should be paying for it, especially since it will be a recurring item for several months.  Who should I go to to resolve this?

Unfortunately, no action was ever taken nor followed through on this request originally initiated 8/14/01, which has now 
put EES in a bind.  Suzanne Calcagno and I have decided to take ownership and will coordinate with Brenda Herod 
and CSC.

We're in the process of writing system specifications and will forward an "emergency" request for data to Brenda and CSC
this afternoon.   

Becky Cantrell will submit a request for an extension to FERC as soon as we determine how quickly CSC can produce the
information required.

Please note, no further action from any other group will be required.  Feel free to give me a call if you have any questions.

Thanks,

Donna Corrigan Greif
713/853-9517

Suzanne,

Please be advised that Kelly Lovvorn (x5-8997) will coordinate the FERC data requirements with IT personnel for the EES Systems.
I passed on all the details regarding data specifications and a high level overview of ENAs plan.

The EES data will need to be pulled from all Settlement applications which include HP9000, STAT, and Altra.  Kelly does
have a few programming resources available in house, yet he may need to request the information from CSC.  If that is the
case, there will be costs associated with the data pull and it will be much more difficult to validate the data.  In addition, there
may also be timing issues (????)....

I have asked Kelly to coordinate directly with you as he has questions/concerns.  You may want to check back with him in a few days to
workout target dates for your team to actually receive the information, who he should forward info to, etc...

Thanks,

dg

(note:  Just as an "extra" thought....as long as we Settle out of Altra/HP/Stat, all FERC data 
 requests (involving pricing w/ volumetric actuals) will need to come from those systems.)

PLEASE INCLUDE THIS INFORMATION.
=20
Jim
=20
=20

Please distribute to North America.
=20

Ginger Dernehl=20
Administrative Coordinator=20
Global Government Affairs=20
Phone# 713-853-7751=20
Fax# 713-646-8160=20

=20

FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS MEMORANDUM FOR HOUSTON

Update on Legislative Issues (September 1-15, 2001)

 ENERGY ISSUES

1.    Senate Energy Chairman Bingaman (D-NM) released his draft "Chairman's=
 Mark" of electricity restructuring legislation.  The draft is positive for=
 Enron on transmission issues (including access, jurisdiction and RTOs) and=
 reliabiilty.  We have concerns about provisions on transparency, market-ba=
sed rates and merger review.  We have said we are generally pleased, while =
we work to amend those provisions about which we have concerns.
=20
2.    We drafted testimony for Jim Steffes to be the EPSA witness at a Hous=
e Energy and Air Quality Subcommittee hearing on reliability, siting and tr=
ansmission pricing issues (the hearing was cancelled due to the tragic even=
ts of September 11, 2001).
=20

TRADE PROMOTION AUTHORITY
=20
House Speaker Dennis Hastert (R-IL) said that he didn't expect the House to=
 vote on Trade Promotion Authority until next month citing a need for House=
 Republicans to "get all our ducks in a row."  Senate Finance Chairman Bauc=
us (D-MT) has stated that he would wait until the House took action on TPA =
before he would introduce his measure.  With the House pushing the vote unt=
il October, it lessens (but doesn't eliminate) the likelihood that a bill w=
ill be done this year.
=20
Ways and Means Chairman Bill Thomas (R-CA), who is taking the lead for the =
House Republicans, has vowed to spend more time working with Democrats to c=
raft a bipartisan product.  Ways and Means Ranking Member Carl Levin (D-MI)=
 has not yet introduced his bill.  He is still meeting with Democrats and h=
as stated that he wants to introduce the most "balanced" bill he can that w=
ill include labor and environmental provisions. =20
=20
The Administration continues to push hard for TPA.  They have made securing=
 trade promotion authority their chief trade objective this year.  Presiden=
t Bush recently said that he wants TPA before the World Trade Organization =
ministerial in November.
=20
BANKRUPTCY REFORM
=20
House and Senate Conferees are hoping that conflicts between the House and =
Senate versions of the Bankruptcy Reform bill will be worked out expeditiou=
sly.  House Judiciary Chairman James Sensenbrenner (R-MI), who is chair of =
the Conference, has stated that the Conference will meet formally for the f=
irst time next week.
=20
There are two sections of the Bankruptcy Reform bill that have significant =
importance to Enron: 1. financial contract netting provisions, which are in=
cluded in both the House and Senate versions; and 2. a technical correction=
s amendment regarding production payments, which is currently included in t=
he House version only. =20
=20
There are 32 members of the House and Senate who have been appointed to the=
 Conference, which is unusually large.  The Conference has to deal with 38 =
amendments that the Senate made to the House bill (including the technical =
corrections amendment regarding production payments).  The Administration h=
as some problems with the bill, none that pertain to our issues.  The progr=
ess is expected to be slow.
=20
FY 2002 TRANSPORTATION APPROPRIATIONS - MEXICO TRUCKING BAN
=20
Just prior to the adjournment for the August Recess, the Senate passed the =
FY 02 Transportation bill, which contained provisions that called for stric=
t safety standards for Mexico trucks gaining unrestricted access to U.S. ro=
ads.  Senator Phil Gramm (R-TX) and Senator John McCain (R-AZ) both vehemen=
tly oppose the restrictive language but in the end allowed a final vote on =
the appropriations measure.  They have vowed, however, to hold the bill up =
in the House-Senate Conference until the Mexico trucking language is resolv=
ed (note: the House prohibitive language is more restrictive, effectively p=
rohibiting Mexico trucks from ever going beyond the current 20-mile radius =
they now have access to).  The White House has, on several occasions, reite=
rated their objection to any language in the bill that would halt or slow d=
own NAFTA provisions allowing cross-border transit, which were to have been=
 enacted January 1, 2001 - making the provision well-behind schedule alread=
y.
=20
While the Mexico's Economic Minister has stated that he would not seek sanc=
tions against the United States for violations of the NAFTA, Mexico Preside=
nt Vincente Fox has stated that he would consider limiting or even prohibit=
ing U.S. trucks on Mexico's roads.  A recent study indicated that the U.S.'=
s failure to execute the cross-border transit provisions of NAFTA could cos=
t Mexico's economy upwards of $100 billion per year. =20
=20
The Senate and House will now go to conference on the measure, and it's exp=
ected to be a contentious debate in Conference. =20
=20
MINIMUM WAGE HIKE
=20
The House will likely act on a minimum wage measure following Senate action=
, which is expected this fall.  House Republican leaders are insisting, how=
ever, that any increase in the minimum wage be accompanied by tax breaks fo=
r small businesses.  Additionally, it is likely that the minimum wage bill =
will be a vehicle for other business tax credits and pro-business measures.=
 =20
=20
Senate Majority Leader Tom Daschle (D-SD) said that the Democratic minimum =
wage bill will come to the floor in the fall.  It is expected, however, tha=
t Senate Republicans will attempt to add several tax cuts, which Democrats =
would oppose unless there are offsets (meaning, the tax measures would have=
 to be paid for elsewhere in the budget). =20
=20
The White House has said it favors a minimum wage increase providing it con=
tains flexibility provisions.  President Bush would be unlikely to veto a m=
easure absent state flexibility provisions if it contained certain tax cut =
components.=20
=20

Vicki --

I have heard recently that EES is signing up customers in Texas that "passes thru" congestion.  There may be some billing and settlement issues given ERCOT's systems.  Basically, we will not know based on our bill from ERCOT what each customer's congestion was.  I want to make sure that EES billing can determine how to charge this?

Who should I talk with?

Jim

Ok.

Jim

59 Diner on I-10 that is.....Jason 

Leslie --

Please let me know what you need to get this issue properly defined by EES.  One option, maybe, would be to take the customers back to sales service.  Would there be any problems with this?  Please let me know.  

Jim

FYI. Apparently we turned back sales customers in Arizona served by Southwest Gas but we are still on the hook for their gas costs.  Altho I was in contact with EES virtually daily since December on about the SW problems, I was told that we were able to terminate their contracts, and was not aware of the lingering exposure issue on pricing until I started getting emails last week.  Needless to say I am not pleased and EES is trying to find a regulatory fix to this problem.  If I had known about it last winter, I would have been able to explain it to them.  I don't think I can get this fixed, and they should have kept the customers, as the delivery problems cleared up in the spring.
On cash-outs, Southwest takes the highest price paid for any incremental volume and applies it to all cash out volumes.  This is the issue we took up at the ACC and argued that it should be based on actual costs, not the single highest price.  BUT this is a different issue than the actual cost of gas for sales purposes.  I would think that the sales gas is based on actual incremental costs.  There is a possibility this can be audited, but we would have to go to the ACC, and as in California, they will not be at all sympathetic to us. They will view this an Enron problem.  I just say that so that you don't think that I can fix this easily (I doubt that I can fix this at all, but let's see what we get from the ACC on the cash out issue, that will be a good indicator.  We were clearly right on that one). 

Leslie-
Is there any way to know what their incremental cost of gas is or how it is calculated?  For example, if SW Gas buys 10,000 MMBtu total for the month at $5.00 and all other purchases were at $3.00, and EES' sales gas for that month was 90,000 MMBtu, can they charge $5.00 for all 90,000?  Are there any audit rights?  Also, I heard that we hired a law firm awhile back to address this issue???  Do you know anything about that or what they did/accomplished?  You may be hearing more about this from Don Black or Jess Hewitt--there is a huge concern about our exposure this winter.  

Under 3.2 of its Transportation Tariff, a SW Gas transportation customer in Arizona who returns to sales will pay the higher of the Gas Commodity Cost (plus any adjustments) or the incremental cost of gas, for a period of 12 months, and then the customer will go back to the PGA.

We are trying to determine the cost of gas for the customers we have turned back to SWG in Arizona.
Thx
Kris S

I assume you found the Southwest Gas Nevada tariff online and checked that rate schedules there?  the commodity cost was $.49390 and there is also a balancing account adjustment.  They file to change their PGA once a year and this year they have proposed no change.

If Reliant is interested in filing, we should seriously consider using EPSA.  Reliant is a member of EPSA.  We could get EPSA to work through Larry Robertson maybe.  

Let's discuss next week in Houston.

Jim

We should think about it but I wonder if there relation with their utility won't ultimately color the positions they are willing to take.  Let me find out when interventions are due, and we can perhaps discuss it next week in Houston.  We can always intervene separately and then file more substantive comments, etc. jointly.  Jim/Paul, do you want me to call Larry Robertson (AZ counsel) to see if he is available to work on this matter for us?  

Leslie,

I had sent a question to my contact in Reliant, it would seem that Reliant is working on an intervention, is this something we would want to join in with?  

As for FERC, in the filing APS I read Commission to mean FERC, when it really was referring to the ACC.

Jim,

Based on your comment, is your concern that if we do intervene and are successful, then APS would find any reason imaginable NOT to do business with Enron?

Thanks,

Dave

is this the "we don't think there is enough wholesale competition in AZ to
allow retail competition to occur, so we "are willing" to let the retail
customers in AZ to buy our merchant plants with an 11% return" filing?  I
am not involved , but I understand we have a  high level group that is
working on a response to APS' ludicrous filing and will be lobbying at the
ACC and AZ legislature on this one.  It is simply uncomprehensible how APS
could think that it makes sense to make such a filing in the same state
whose commission staff seems to think that there is too much merchant
generation being built.

Dan,

Are you familar with this document?  I have just gottne a copy and it
proves how much contempt APS has for deregulation.  Some of the
statements this document contain are unbelievable...If you have any
insights to this I'd be interested in talking to you about this.

Thanks,

Dave

P.S., I hope all went well with your surgery.

Mike --

You should contact Lisa M. about the SCE meeting arrangements.  I will be there in spirit only.

Jim

Bryan --

Please include the first 3 on the Regulatory Ventures section for next month.

Jim
1. Alberta PPA - Transmission Cost Responsibility Hearing 

Enron is leading a coalition of 5 PPA Buyers that successfully advocated the AEUB to convene a process/hearing (the convening of which was opposed by the PPA Owners) to consider the proposal by the Transmission Administrator to apply transmission charges to PPA Buyers for transmission capacity that solely accrues to the financial benefit of PPA Owners.  One week of hearings were held in spring 2001 with the hearing scheduled to be completed in November 2001.  Value to Enron Canada if we prevail at hearing is approximately $Cdn 60 million.

2. Alberta PPA - Alberta Government Agreement to Split Enron's Sundance B PPA in Two PPAs

Government Affairs successfully lobbied Alberta Energy officials and Minister of Energy to agree to approve regulatory changes necessary to allow for the split of Enron's PPA into two PPAs despite one of the fundamental elements of the original PPA model was that the PPAs would be very large and not divisible.  This is important as the whole PPA represents 706 MW and is likely too large for Enron to sell as a whole but a PPA of 303 MW is much more marketable to potential Enron counter parties.  Value to Enron Canada if one-half PPA is sold is projected to be approximately $Cdn 50 million.

3. Alberta PPA - Opposition to Wabamun Water Treatment Plant Expansion 

Government Affairs in conjunction with legal group has achieved "effected person" status in relation to an application by TransAlta (Enron's PPA Owner counterparty) to undertake an expansion to the Wabamun Water Treatment Plant.  The objective is to position Enron to resist future attempts by TransAlta to pass through the cost of this expansion to Enron.  Value to Enron Canada if we succeed is project to be approximately $Cdn 2 million.

4. Alberta - Appointment to Key Government/Industry Committees

Enron Government Affairs staff are presently members of each of the key committees in Alberta responsible for providing advice to Government and/or its appointed agents (Power Pool, TA, AEUB) on electricity market design issues, including: Advisory Committee, Power Pool Operations Committee, AEUB Electric Reliability Task Force, Industry Structure Review Consultant Selection Committee, Retail Issues Committee, IPPSA Board of Directors.  Value to Enron not quantifiable.

5.  Alberta - Enron Direct

Enron Government Affairs provided extensive support to Enron Direct in undertaking media/government launch of Enron Direct in Alberta is presently assisting Enron Direct in determining rules and requirements to expand its service offerings to B.C. natural gas market and AltaGas Utilities service territory in Alberta.  Enron Government affairs is also advocating against discriminatory exit fees proposed by Atco Gas.  Value to Enron not quantifiable.

6. Ontario - Electricity Market Opening - continue to advocate Ontario electricity market opening.

7. Ontario - Enron Direct - support for the establishment of Enron Direct's business in Ontario, including the applicable rules, licensing, and development of business procedures and forms of contract to be used. 

Thanks.

Will do.  P.S.  Mike Florio informs me that the order from the 9th Circuit
requires TURN to file papers with the District Court judge justifying their
request for a permanent stay within 5 days.  Following a hearing at some
unspecified time, the District Court judge will rule on that request.  If,
as expected, he denies the stay, TURN will get one more bit at the apple by
appealing that order to the 9th Circuit.  Needless to say, these
developments could deny Edison certainty regarding their precious settlement
for 2-6 months.  Mike Day

Mike --

You should contact Lisa M. about the SCE meeting arrangements.  I will
be there in spirit only.

Jim

I would probably not sign on directly, but would support the document with the additional thoughts --

1.	I don't understand a 6 month collaborative to work through SMD - this only extends the implementation.
2.	Need to push harder on doing away with the Reserve obligation.
3.	I would argue that the RTO need not run a Day Ahead market.  Also, why does a Day Ahead market provide "sufficient capacity committed in the right places for the next day in order to supply load reliably"?  California has a DA market and people simply did not participate.  The argument that a DA market replaces a Unit Committment process doesn't seem complete?
4.	The position and implications on CM and RT market going in at the same time needs to be made more clear - does this mean that Enron supports delaying all RTO "activity" (e.g., OASIS, single tariff, rates) until CM is complete?
5.	What is a "point-to-point" financial hedge?  Does this imply node-to-node?  Can we include some discussion of market "hubs"?  How could I obtain a hub-to-node hedge?  Also, what about the allocation or auction process for FTRs?  How should existing transmission arrangements be managed?
6.	Do we agree to Incremental pricing vs. Rolled-In?  Will this cause any heartburn for ETS?  What about the cost of expansion to meet the needs of incremental generation?  Should this be borne by the system or the generator?

My thought is that this is a big piece and Enron should probably file its own comments rather than sign on.  Sarah Novosel is working on Enron comments.

Jim

The right document is now attached...

 << File: comments_d2_102901_clean.doc >> 

Attached is a paper from Comed.  It is substantially the same as the paper that they proposed about a month ago.  I will look over it today to determine whether or not we can support.  Appreciate any comments if you have a chance...

regards
Mike

All:

After I sent out the draft late yesterday afternoon, I found out that FERC
had extended the deadline from November 5 to "as soon as reasonably
possible."  Obviously, we would like to provide everyone with sufficient
time to review the draft and get approvals.  We also have a saying in
Chicago - "Vote early and often" and at least with respect to the "vote
early" we think it is important to get comments in early.

Therefore we now suggest that instead of replying by the end of today as to
whether you can sign or not sign and what must be added or deleted for you
to join, we suggest responding by the end of Friday.  This will allow us to
circulate another draft and get comments in by the middle of next week and
have considerable influence on the process.

Thanks for your help under these changing circumstances.

Steve

 <<rm01-12.00b.doc>>
Steven T. Naumann
Transmission Services Vice President
Phone:	312.394.2807
FAX:	312.394.2881
Pager:	312.689.2079  <-- New Pager Number
E-Mail:	steven.naumann@exeloncorp.com <mailto:steven.t.naumann@ucm.com>

 - rm01-12.00b.doc << File: rm01-12.00b.doc >> 

Sarah --

Please pound EPSA into submission on the NE RTO.

Jim

Alan --

I assume that you will lead Enron's response to EPSA's comments?  Should we have a discussion of this filing before the EPSA meeting on Friday?

Pls give me a call.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Erin Perrigo, Manager of Policy

DATE: October 31, 2001

RE: EPSA Leave-Behind on Market-Based Rate Authority
      ?Conference Call on Friday, November 2nd at 11:00 a.m.
       (EST)

Last Friday, we held a conference call to discuss EPSA's position on possible changes to FERC's market-based rate authorization standard and the Commission's recently released staff report outlining several alternatives to the currently used hub-and-spoke method.  Please review the attached draft, which has been extensively revised based on last week's call.  We have scheduled a conference call on Friday, November 2nd at 11:00 a.m. (EST) to discuss this draft and hope to be able to go forward after that call.  To access the call, please dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA Call. If you have any questions, comments or edits before the call, please contact Julie Simon at 202-628-8200 or jsimon@epsa.org.

Attachment

 - MBR leave behind draft 2.doc 

Interesting.  Seems to me that EPSA needs to help AZ do better by its citiz=
ens - it's not just APS that's a "bunch of neanderthals" (to use a Rick Sha=
piro phrase). =20

I don't understand something else - Is Mumaw APS' and EES' counsel in AZ?? =
 How is this possible?

Jim

A vituperative missive from our (and APS's) AZ counsel for your enjoyment.

We have yet to receive a final order.  I would prefer to have it in hand be=
fore a complaint is filed.  There is another year to go on the statute of l=
imitations, and thus aside from the natural desire to get money sooner rath=
er than later (and especially while Commissioner Spitzer is still on the Co=
mmission, which should be through the end of 2002), there is no particular =
rush.  Also, your "coalition" partner in the war on SWG imbalance terrorism=
, Midwest United, has also authorized a complaint, so there is the possibil=
ity to again share the costs of any such proceeding.

I didn't expect the merchant generators to be thrilled with the APS filing,=
 but then I'm sure they wouldn't like a complete repeal of the electric oom=
petition rules, which at least one Commissioner seems to favor, or an order=
 preventing any divestiture of APS generation and any competitive bidding, =
which is another distinct possibility from a Commission that has effectivel=
y lost its faith in competition.  Hopefully the Texas people at least read =
the application this time.  I can also tell you that APS is quietly upset t=
hat the merchant generators say nothing when SRP does far worse things, or =
when Citizens gets a total waiver of the same regulation for which APS seek=
s a partial waiver, or when TEP files their plan (which will happen shortly=
) making APS' look like a wild pro-market experiment.  In other words, APS =
takes a lot of grief not because it is perceived as the most anti-competiti=
ve incumbent (even our worst enemy would privately agree we are probably th=
e best in this state), but simply because it is the most visable.

>>> "Lawner, Leslie" <Leslie.Lawner@ENRON.com> 10/31/01 08:29AM >>>
Has the ACC issued an actual order onthe SW Gas?  I  have not seen
anything.  I have to formal go ahead on filing the complaint for the
refund, so let me know what your strategy is for that.  I assume we
should run the numbers with some accuracy, and I can have the number
crunchers here do that.

Your APS filing is not being too well received in the hinterlands
(Texas) from what I hear.  Expect some noise.

Hope you are enjoying the World's Series.

Understand. 

When you speak of the gas desk, are you talking to Scott Neal and Frank Vickers or Don Black??  We should make sure that both groups recognize our message.

Jim
Follow-up on the RCR for MD gas comments discussed last Monday -
 
The Commission has asked for legal briefs on whether they have the authority to order or authorize a utility to stop providing sales service.  Enron had earlier filed a one paragraph statement (as part of a gas roundtable) that said utilities should obtain default service supply from competitive suppliers.

At this point, Janine and I agreed we should: 
1) file reply comments, not initial comments
2) in reply comments, agree with parties that say the Commission does have the authority (such parties will most likely include BGE and others), but caution that if the Commission were to allow or cause this to happen, they should be careful to structure default supply in a way that does not force marketers to take on unwanted roles, generally does not cause market chaos, and does not simply lock up the total market for a utility affiliate.

(The Commission's real motivation here may be to keep BGE in the role of default supplier.  For now, our gas desk also would like to see them stay in that role.  The likely winner of an eventual bidding process is BGE Home or WGL Energy Services, and they already dominate the competitive market.)

The RCR amount should stay at $2k.

I don't agree Edison's premise -- that "direct access customers contributed=
 just as much to SCE's procurement costs undercollection as bundled service=
 customers." We need to make clear that we don't buy in to their rhetoric.

Here's my reasoning.

DA Customers are completely different from bundled customers. SCE had to bu=
y power to serve the bundled load.  SCE did not buy power for DA customers.=
  SCE's purchases of the power to serve the bundled load coupled with high =
wholesale prices and an inability to raise rates was the direct reason for =
the undercollection. I can make the argument that the undercollection is SO=
LELY related to BUNDLED SERVICE.

There are two big reasons that back me up: AB 1890 and Top-down rates.  I w=
ill explain.  The utilities got what they wanted out of AB 1890 -- payments=
 of $30 plus billion in so-called stranded costs and a real delay in any co=
mpetitive retail market until their costs were paid off.  One of the tradeo=
ffs, however, was that the utilities were at risk FOR HIGH PRICES in the WH=
OLESALE MARKET.  Everyone understood that if there were high gas prices or =
bad hydro years, the utilities would be squeezed and not collect their bill=
ions by the 3/31/01 deadline. That's the risk they agreed to.  Now, they ar=
e claiming that they were ENTITLED to that money and more.  This is in dire=
ct conflict with the statute. I can make the argument that the statute requ=
ires SCE to assume this risk and therefore any undercollection is theirs al=
one -- now the CPUC can bail them out -- but that doesn't make ESPs subject=
 to any presumed "undercollection."

Now to the rates.  At the beginning of DA, the utilities did not want to do=
 a real rate case and separate the costs of the wholesale business and the =
retail busness from T&D. So, they did a "top-down" calculation.  This meant=
 that there had to be a "credit" put on the bills of DA customers to accoun=
t for the costs the utility avoided by having the customers switch to DA. S=
o, the PX Credit structure was a direct result of the utilities unwillingne=
ss to unbundle specific components of the rates.  Next, although bundled cu=
stomers rates were capped, the decisions from the CPUC made it clear that t=
here was no similar cap for DA customers -- their rates and bills would be =
whatever was charged by their ESPs.  However, when the utilities filed thei=
r tariffs with the CPUC, they added a cap for the PX credit that was neithe=
r proposed nor authorized by the Commission.  Enron attacked it, but got no=
where, until WPTF and Enron brought it up in the 1998 RAP Proceeding. Our a=
rgument was that the bundled rates were capped but not the bills of DA cust=
omers -- and the credit was supposed to represent the full costs the utilit=
ies avoided by not serving DA customers.  We argued that anything less is f=
undamentally unfair and anticomeptitive.  The utilities must have thought w=
e had a good case, because they agreed to settle. The settlement was accept=
ed by the Commission in the proceeding. Everyone understood that eliminatin=
g the cap on the PX Credit was primarily to allow the PX Credit to FLOAT AB=
OVE THE CAP when wholesale prices were high. So, we have a legal right to r=
eceive the full PX Credit/Negative CTC which is separate and distinct from =
any undercollection associated with bundled customers. It seems as if we sh=
ould be able to prosecute this legal right. (keeping in mind I am not an at=
torney)=20

In summary, we have leverage and should use it.

Sue

FYI.

Hi Jeff,

Please find below SCE's proposal to settle past Direct Access Credit issues
and determine the Direct Access Credit going forward. Please forward this
to any other Enron participants to review prior to our conference call with
John Fielder, November 1, 2001, 11:00 a.m. PST.

(See attached file: DA Proposal.doc)

Thanks.

Matt Pagano
Account Manager
ESP Services Division
tel-714-895-0222
fax-714-895-0347
Email-Paganomj@SCE.Com

Sue --

I agree with your arguments.  The other problem with SCE's analysis is that=
 they had a DEFINED stranded cost amount and they deserve that money. =20

What California did (my explaination) is that SCE was offered frozen rates =
for 4 years.  All of the margin they "earned" was shareholder's compensatio=
n for moving to direct access.  If the total $$ of margin was $0 or less, t=
his implies simply that SCE had no generation stranded costs. =20

The entire argument that SCE is making forgets the $Billion that they have =
kept from consumers through the fixed rate.

I don't agree Edison's premise -- that "direct access customers contributed=
 just as much to SCE's procurement costs undercollection as bundled service=
 customers." We need to make clear that we don't buy in to their rhetoric.

Here's my reasoning.

DA Customers are completely different from bundled customers. SCE had to bu=
y power to serve the bundled load.  SCE did not buy power for DA customers.=
  SCE's purchases of the power to serve the bundled load coupled with high =
wholesale prices and an inability to raise rates was the direct reason for =
the undercollection. I can make the argument that the undercollection is SO=
LELY related to BUNDLED SERVICE.

There are two big reasons that back me up: AB 1890 and Top-down rates.  I w=
ill explain.  The utilities got what they wanted out of AB 1890 -- payments=
 of $30 plus billion in so-called stranded costs and a real delay in any co=
mpetitive retail market until their costs were paid off.  One of the tradeo=
ffs, however, was that the utilities were at risk FOR HIGH PRICES in the WH=
OLESALE MARKET.  Everyone understood that if there were high gas prices or =
bad hydro years, the utilities would be squeezed and not collect their bill=
ions by the 3/31/01 deadline. That's the risk they agreed to.  Now, they ar=
e claiming that they were ENTITLED to that money and more.  This is in dire=
ct conflict with the statute. I can make the argument that the statute requ=
ires SCE to assume this risk and therefore any undercollection is theirs al=
one -- now the CPUC can bail them out -- but that doesn't make ESPs subject=
 to any presumed "undercollection."

Now to the rates.  At the beginning of DA, the utilities did not want to do=
 a real rate case and separate the costs of the wholesale business and the =
retail busness from T&D. So, they did a "top-down" calculation.  This meant=
 that there had to be a "credit" put on the bills of DA customers to accoun=
t for the costs the utility avoided by having the customers switch to DA. S=
o, the PX Credit structure was a direct result of the utilities unwillingne=
ss to unbundle specific components of the rates.  Next, although bundled cu=
stomers rates were capped, the decisions from the CPUC made it clear that t=
here was no similar cap for DA customers -- their rates and bills would be =
whatever was charged by their ESPs.  However, when the utilities filed thei=
r tariffs with the CPUC, they added a cap for the PX credit that was neithe=
r proposed nor authorized by the Commission.  Enron attacked it, but got no=
where, until WPTF and Enron brought it up in the 1998 RAP Proceeding. Our a=
rgument was that the bundled rates were capped but not the bills of DA cust=
omers -- and the credit was supposed to represent the full costs the utilit=
ies avoided by not serving DA customers.  We argued that anything less is f=
undamentally unfair and anticomeptitive.  The utilities must have thought w=
e had a good case, because they agreed to settle. The settlement was accept=
ed by the Commission in the proceeding. Everyone understood that eliminatin=
g the cap on the PX Credit was primarily to allow the PX Credit to FLOAT AB=
OVE THE CAP when wholesale prices were high. So, we have a legal right to r=
eceive the full PX Credit/Negative CTC which is separate and distinct from =
any undercollection associated with bundled customers. It seems as if we sh=
ould be able to prosecute this legal right. (keeping in mind I am not an at=
torney)=20

In summary, we have leverage and should use it.

Sue

FYI.

Hi Jeff,

Please find below SCE's proposal to settle past Direct Access Credit issues
and determine the Direct Access Credit going forward. Please forward this
to any other Enron participants to review prior to our conference call with
John Fielder, November 1, 2001, 11:00 a.m. PST.

(See attached file: DA Proposal.doc)

Thanks.

Matt Pagano
Account Manager
ESP Services Division
tel-714-895-0222
fax-714-895-0347
Email-Paganomj@SCE.Com

I think one thing that is good is for every California call you make us go through the key bills in some organized outline.

Thanks,

Jim

Jim:

Thanks for the input.  

Other that keeping current a matrix of important legislation are there other ways that would be useful for you (or the group) to have my assistance in tracking legislation? I find it really interesting (if not somewhat perplexing!).  

Jennifer

Jennifer --

SBX2 18 and SBX2 85 are important to follow.

Jim

See SB 85, below.

Best,
Jeff

The Assembly Appropriations Committee is scheduled to meet tomorrow to take
up SBX2 78.  The bill may be taken up by the full Assembly after that,
however, that decision has not been made because several Legislators have
indicated that they may not be in Sacramento tomorrow.

The Assembly Revenue and Taxation Committee is going to meet sometime today
off the floor to take up SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott) which would establish a
windfall profits tax.  Additional amendments will be taken that will make
the tax effective on January 1, 2002, define exempt wholesale generator,
marketer, broker, and aggregator, by referencing their PUC definitions, and
exempt QFs.

The Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee will meet upon
adjournment of session today to take up SBX2 39, which would give the CPUC
regulatory authority over non-IOU generation facilities, for
reconsideration.  The bill failed passage during its prior hearing.

The Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee is scheduled to take
up the following bills on September 4 at 1:30 p.m.:

SBX2 85 (Burton) - This bill would prevent the CPUC, upon termination of the
10 percent rate reduction for residential and small commercial customers set
forth in subdivision (a) of Section
368, from subjecting those residential and small commercial customers to any
rate increases or future rate obligations solely as a result of the
termination of the 10 percent rate reduction.

SBX2 18 (Burton) - This bill would establish a dedicated rate component.

Becky--

I spoke with Don Black.  Please work with Donna Greif to get this done.  She is responsible according to Don.  

Also, if possible so we don't have to rush our IT and pay extra money, what about asking FERC to give us a 15 day delay for filing.  Probably just file to do it and ask for forgiveness.

Thanks,

Jim

FYI.  Note that we even had a meeting which included EES on 9/5 where the responsible party (Kelly Lovvorn) committed to certain tasks, which he obviously did not perform.  (Kelly is a contract employee.)  

Jim - there will be a charge (probably significant, especially for the "emergency" processing) from CSC to produce the required information.  There is some expectation that Government Affairs should be paying for it, especially since it will be a recurring item for several months.  Who should I go to to resolve this?

Unfortunately, no action was ever taken nor followed through on this request originally initiated 8/14/01, which has now 
put EES in a bind.  Suzanne Calcagno and I have decided to take ownership and will coordinate with Brenda Herod 
and CSC.

We're in the process of writing system specifications and will forward an "emergency" request for data to Brenda and CSC
this afternoon.   

Becky Cantrell will submit a request for an extension to FERC as soon as we determine how quickly CSC can produce the
information required.

Please note, no further action from any other group will be required.  Feel free to give me a call if you have any questions.

Thanks,

Donna Corrigan Greif
713/853-9517

Suzanne,

Please be advised that Kelly Lovvorn (x5-8997) will coordinate the FERC data requirements with IT personnel for the EES Systems.
I passed on all the details regarding data specifications and a high level overview of ENAs plan.

The EES data will need to be pulled from all Settlement applications which include HP9000, STAT, and Altra.  Kelly does
have a few programming resources available in house, yet he may need to request the information from CSC.  If that is the
case, there will be costs associated with the data pull and it will be much more difficult to validate the data.  In addition, there
may also be timing issues (????)....

I have asked Kelly to coordinate directly with you as he has questions/concerns.  You may want to check back with him in a few days to
workout target dates for your team to actually receive the information, who he should forward info to, etc...

Thanks,

dg

(note:  Just as an "extra" thought....as long as we Settle out of Altra/HP/Stat, all FERC data 
 requests (involving pricing w/ volumetric actuals) will need to come from those systems.)

Can you please resend the fax to Barbara Hueter about the TN legal bill?

Thanks,

I have not received the fax you talked about yesterday.

FYI.  Use as necessary.

Cornell has published a report of 4 experiments conducted to test market trading behavior and its impact on electricity prices under different price auctions. 

1) uniform price auction
2) uniform price with interruptible loads
3) discriminative auction - generators are paid their actual offers
4) soft-cap auction 

The study is fascinating as real subjects were employed and paid real dollars based on their trading performance.  The findings are consistent with our arguments against price caps - particularly soft caps as installed in California.   I think there is some "empirical" data that can be used in our arguments against price caps.  

More variations of the auctions aimed at testing some assumptions used in these 4 experiments are planned, and industry is invited to participate in the experiments.

You can get the document directly at:
www.pserc.cornell.edu

 

Linda & Sarah --

Please get with Jean to discuss.  I don't think that Enron needs to send this right now with everything else.

Jim

Attached please find a copy of Brian Redmond's letter that he wants to send to Pat Wood...who will handle this?  Thanks, Jean

 << File: PatWood.doc >> 

CA supreme court filing.
 
 

[Steffes, James D.] 
Jim,
 
Will someone in legal want to involved in this filing?  Let me know.  Jeff and I are actively seeking additional sign-ons to this -- especially some customers.
 
Sue
Sue,
 
Attached is a draft of the Petition which can be circulated.
 
I recommend that an Alliance member join the Alliance as a Petitioner to eliminate any issue about standing.  I am assuming that there is at least one willing member who was also a formal party to the proceeding which resulted in the Preferred Policy Decision.  Was the Alliance a formal party to that proceeding?
 
The basic structure of the Petition is complete.  I shall complile the Exhibits and then review same to determine whether the citations and to add any arguments which have been overlooked.
 
I would like to file on November 9.  I think that this Petition and the Commonwealth Petition should be filed on the same day.  If you concur, I will coordinate with Commonwealth's counsel.
 
I look forward to your comments.  EWD

Thanks.

Jim

Jim -- The Michigan PSC just promulgated its electric code of conduct.  Attached is a copy of that code.  It requires that electric utilities and Alternative Energy Suppliers must file information that includes a legal address and party for service, organization chart showing utility affiliation.  For purposes of the Code utility includes providing regulated service and regulated service means that the rates are established by the Michigan PSC.  Thus, it does not appear that we have a conflict with either EPMI or our QF-owning affiliates regarding this code.  In those instances, regulated utilities may be our contractual counterparties but are not our affiliates.  MPSC approval of a QF's PPA should not elevate that agreement to the status of a regulated service.  If Enron bought a utility in Michigan this answer would obviously be different.  
	For reasons similar to those regarding EPMI and the QFs,  EES should not present a problem either.
	As history has shown, it is always good to check!

 << File: MichCODE.PDF >>  

Roy --

What is MI doing on Code of Conduct?  Will we have any issues with EPMI supporting EES' entry?  Will our QF plants create any problems for EPMI and EES doing retail marketing?  

Just checking.

(see attached file:  rt011031.pdf)

Thank you,

Season Hawksley
U.S. Publishing Co.
1-800-486-8201

 - rt011031.pdf << File: rt011031.pdf >> 

Thanks.  Probably also want to talk with Brad Nebergald.

Jim

Will make revisions to incorporate your comments.  We have had a lot of discussions about changing the 400 kw threshhold and EES and EWS are fine with it.  People involved in that discussion included Jeff Merola, Guy Sharfman, Rogers Herndon and others.
Janine

Ok.  Also, don't forget about the Dynegy v. ComEd dispute at FERC.  Important for us in our physical business.  Probably want the letter to be a little more specific on a monthly index v. an hourly.  Also, what about the 400 kw size distinction, is this the right #?  May want to talk with Jim Wood.

Isn't the DST question also important?  The ICC's decision will impact the need for a PPO.

Jim

Thanks Jim!

I will talk with EWS.  Last time I did they were indifferent between Cinergy and ComEd and because of the uncertainty, I thought it better not to commit to something until we get closer to the date and we have a better idea of what we want - also because what we want may change.  It's more important at this point just to get the concept in front of the ICC.

You are right on the parking, but in the event that when customers are off PPO and there is no monthly public index, I wanted to make absolutely sure we had an out.

Good question.  Harvill said that if we wait for a good functioning wholesale market it will take 25 years and they were not going to do that.  I n the meeting I stated that the ICC should put more pressure on COmEd to fix the problems with the RTO, but I emphasized the imbalance issue.  I agree that I could clarify the letter to say fix the imbalance problems and that would be perhaps an acceptable compromise to fixing the whole RTO.  That would let us physically deliver.

Janine  

Janine --

Good job.

On the hourly market price index, until we have LMP dispatch, the best we can do is a public index.  Let's not ask for too much.  Just something we can hedge against.  Can you talk with the EWS folks for the best index option???

Also, if the default is a monthly public index, why do the customer's need any "parking"?  They can move directly to the new option.

What is your definition of "functioning wholesale market"?  Are we stating that unless an RTO is running, we can't get rid of the PPO?  Maybe just resolve the Imbalance issue.  More specifics would be helpful.

Thanks,

Jim

The ICC Energy Committee held a meeting to discuss ComEd's proposal to drop the PPO.  We argued that this should not be allowed until the wholesale market/delivery issues are dealt with because otherwise customers will have no choice but to return to ComEd at the higher bundled rate.  The good news is that a rather lengthy discussion on this issue ensued as a result.  The industrial customer group and Mid American Energy supported our views; however AES New Energy said that this was not a problem for them.

We also commented that once the PPO goes away it should not be resurrected due to the uncertainty it would create in the market.  ComEd responded that under the statute they can not offer to waive the PPO but could negotiate an arrangement on the CTC if approached by the customer.  This would mean that we could negotiate on behalf of all our customers regarding the CTC.  

We have the opportunity to file comments to the Commissioners before the actual filing.  A draft is attached. 

 << File: Commissioner Terry Harvill.doc >> 

If you have any comments, please respond by the end of the week.

CONFIDENTIAL -- DO NOT DISTRIBUTE OUTSIDE THE COMPANY.

Attached is a spreadsheet of how prices may change with the FERC Refund case.  This is still subject to change.  Hope this helps with the Negative CTC calculation and negotiations.

Jim

Attached are files that compare the ISO's calculation of Mitigated Market
Clearing Price (MMCP) against various prices that prevail and are used in
the California market.

The attached tables give monthly values for peak and off peak periods (using
6X16 to define peak).  They show percent changes and absolute dollar values
("Margin").

As you can see, the price reductions (that is original price minus mitigated
price as a percent of original price) amount to 50% in some cases.

The margins and percent reductions vary importantly by time period and the
type of charge involved.

I hope that these are useful.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

 <<mitigation margins.xls>>

Jan Paul Acton
Vice President
Charles River Associates
1201 F St., NW, Suite 700
Washington, DC 20004-1204
Voice: (202) 662 3902
Fax: (202) 662 3910

 - mitigation margins.xls 

1.	Dynegy vs. ComEd at FERC

Dynegy filed a complaint at FERC that tries to disallow Firm LD from being used by marketers under the ComEd Network Service.  IP claims that is losing $ MM because customers are not paying for Capacity.  This will impact our ability to "go physical" starting next year.

2.	MISO vs. ARTO

IP is a member of the ARTO.  EPMI continues to try and establish only one RTO in the region.  I think this is why Dynegy won't state very clearly that 4 RTOs makes sense.  No $ impact, although this decision may impact our ability to "go physical" starting next year in Illinois.

3.	CTC Bet in ComEd

My recollection (talking with Harry K.) is that we pre-sold a CTC roll-off in ComEd that could cost our business around $10 MM if it doesn't happen.  Most talk in Illinois is that CTC should end early for big customers, so not sure if this is an issue.

4.	Delivery Service Tariff Litigation

ComEd and IP have filed to increase their rates on Delivery Service Tariffs (but not on Bundled customers because there is a statutory rate cap).  EES told us originally that this could cost as much as $50MM, but current estimates are closer to $10MM for ComEd and $2MM for IP.

5.	PPO (Power Purchase Option) Termination

ComEd is pushing to end the PPO service.  PPO provides a re-sell service to marketers while sharing the Mitigation Factor with customers.  It is the service we use to "deliver" today in ComEd.  IP will probably terminate this service because their stranded costs are expected to end sooner, hence, not a major issue for IP?

6.	Relative Size of Current EES Book

ComEd	=	7.8 MM Mwh (extends through 2010)
IP	=	1.3 MM Mwh (extends through 2008)

Hope this helps.  Data will improve with more time.

Jim

sounds like the right approach to me

ok

OK.  Haven't heard back from Bob, but we may be able to avoid the call.  Mike Day got in touch with Edison's attorney this morning and here's the end result.

Edison has agreed to tell the judge on the 7th that, with respect to the complaints we've filed, they agree to take them off calendar until and unless parties ask to put them back on calendar.
Edison will  take the view that the proceedings underway at the commission (and presumably attempts to "settle" with parties) will resolve the issues in the complaint.
The assumption from out end is that the status quo remains intact.  That is, we will continue to pay the Commission, not Edison, for T&D charges during the "time out" on our complaints.  
Mike and Jeanne will make sure that this critical piece, i.e., that we continue to place payments in escrow, will remain intact as part of the "time out."  If it turns out there are any doubts about this aspect, we'll likely need regroup and reconsider our options.

If anyone has any questions or concerns please speak up, and/or if folks would still like to have a very brief call to discuss, we can do that and ensure that Bob is kept in the loop and can weigh in when he returns.

Comments/thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

Bob's secretary called to tell me that Bob's at a doctor's appt and will be back in the office around noon Houston time.  We'll shoot for around noon CST to have the call.  I'll conference folks in from my phone.

Best,
Jeff

lower rates first - they still don't get it

FYI.  Note that, in response to Davis' "economic summit," the California Manufacturer's Association included in its top 3 initiatives the need to re-instate DA.
 
Best,
Jeff
Legislative Weekly 
November 2, 2001 
Issue 43, Volume 3 

A weekly publication from the 
California Manufacturers & Technology Association 
detailing legislative and regulatory developments in Sacramento

CMTA PARTICIPATES IN GOVERNOR'S ECONOMIC SUMMIT 
Press Release 

Today at Governor Davis' Economic Summit at Walt Disney Studios in Burbank, California, the California Manufacturers & Technology Association (CMTA) proposed three recommendations to help bring immediate relief to the state's faltering economy. 

"California is in a dramatic economic decline," said CMTA President Jack M. Stewart.  "Manufacturing employment is down 63,000 this year and by more than 10,000 jobs in September alone. The state's unemployment rate has risen steadily for the eight consecutive months, peaking at its present 5.4 percent." 

"It's time for the state to implement new policies that will incent investment sooner rather than later," said Stewart. 

CMTA today will introduce proposals to: 

Implement a Sales Tax Exemption <http://www.cmta.net/press/salestax110201> ( <http://www.cmta.net/press/salestax110201>) on Manufacturing, Processing and Telecommunications Equipment 
Reduce Electricity Rates <http://www.cmta.net/press/electricrates110201> ( <http://www.cmta.net/press/electricrates110201>) and Provide Customer Choice in Energy 
Declare a Moratorium on New and Increased Regulatory Fees <http://www.cmta.net/press/stopfees110201> ( <http://www.cmta.net/press/stopfees110201>) and Taxes 

These initiatives will comprise the association's focus in the coming months, and were a collaborative effort among CMTA members. 

"The costs associated with a battered business community are not only measured by stock-tickers and cable financial networks.  They are the human toll of jobs that are lost, mortgages that fail and families that go with less," added Stewart.  "These measures will restore confidence in every manufacturers' ability to remain productive and allow them to reinvest in the state's workforce." 

California's manufacturing sector currently produces: 

80 percent of state exports 
One sixth of state payroll 
40 percent higher wages than the statewide average 
And for every manufacturing job, an additional 1-3 jobs are produced 

"These proposals are common sense ideas that will send a strong message to the largest and most important sector of our economy that the state will provide the critical relief they need to help themselves and help California through this economic crisis," concluded Stewart. 
  

BAY AREA VENTURE INVESTMENT FALLS 

According to just released data from Venture Economics and  the National Venture Capital Association (NVCA), venture capital investment in the Bay Area during the 3rd quarter dropped 27 percent over the 2nd quarter of this year. Investment has slowed significantly this year and the 3rd quarter investment is 74 percent lower than the $9.3 billion high reached during the 2nd quarter of 2000. 

The Bay Area drop in investment nearly matched the national trend for the 3rd quarter. Venture capitalists invested $7.7 billion nationally during the quarter, down 31 percent from the previous quarter, and 73 percent from the $28.5 billion high of last year. 

"Although these are clearly difficult times for all business sectors, the venture industry will persevere. Veterans in our industry recognize this downturn as part of the long-term venture capital cycle. Real value can be created in down cycles by sticking with committed entrepreneurs with strong business models and the tenacity to see their ideas through," commented Mark Heesen, NVCA President. 
  

CMTA GETS VETO ON BILL RESTRICTING SICK LEAVE 

At the urging of the California Manufacturers and Technology Association (CMTA) and other employer organizations, Governor Gray Davis vetoed SB 1197 by Senator Gloria Romero (D-Los Angeles). The bill would have prohibited an employer to count any sick leave taken by an employee to tend to a sick child, parent or spouse in any absence control program 

Current law permits an employee to use half of their annual accrued sick leave in a calendar year to attend to the illness of a child, parent, or spouse who would not otherwise qualify under the family medical leave act that only applies to serious health conditions.  The provision covers brief illnesses such as colds, high temperature, sore throats etc., that are more likely to be associated with children and is less likely to involve physician or hospital care.  However, employers opposed the bill because many employees take advantage of the easy threshold and use it to avoid workplace sanctions. 

When employees don't show up or show up late for work, it negatively impacts production.  In order to mitigate this problem, employers have implemented absentee control programs that may include counseling, suspension and termination.  After the above provision became law, employers began to see a steady rise in the use and abuse of sick leave under this provision, so employers decided to include sick leave in their employee absence control programs in order to eliminate the abuse.  SB 1197 would have eliminated that option and could have forced employers to take a more drastic action to resolve the problem. 

In addition to insuring that production schedules are met, the main reason for an employer's absence policy is to provide a fair way to identify and deal with those employees who have trouble coming to work as scheduled and/or on time.  Making a decision to sanction an employee under an absence control policy is not taken lightly by employers and must be based on sound reasoning.  For example, if an employee's attendance records were examined and patterns of use involving sick leave were to show unusually high usage on Fridays, Mondays and holiday weekends and the employee were to declare that the absences were for family member sick leave purposes, no disciplinary action could be taken. In other instances, it is used to cover for tardiness that would otherwise be sanctioned under the employer absence control program by calling in just before the shift begins in order to start the shift late. 

SB 1197 would have provided for new lawsuits for violation of the statute where an employer has an absence control policy.  Consider that employers are not required to provide sick leave and the bill would only apply to those employers who voluntarily provide sick leave for their employees.  CMTA discussed with legislators the counter-productive nature of restricting an employer's ability to manage a voluntarily provided benefit. When laws become overly restrictive or very difficult to comply with and the employer is facing sanctions for violations, it provides a strong incentive for the employer to simply eliminate their sick leave program. 

CMTA believes that it would be poor public policy to protect those employees who have trouble getting to work under SB 1197 and could end up eliminating the benefit for all employees.  CMTA applauds Governor Davis's veto of the bill. 
  
  

www.cmta.net <http://www.cmta.net/> 
California Manufacturers & Technology Association 
980 9th Street, Suite 2200 
Sacramento, CA  95814 
(916) 441-5420 phone 
(916) 447-9401 fax 

You are receiving this message today because your company is a valued member of the California Manufacturers & Technology Association (CMTA).  While we'd be pleased to continue to tell you about CMTA's efforts to make California a better place for manufacturing you can unsubscribe by e-mailing a message to members@cmta.net 

Does this process conform w/ regulatory reqts?

Attached is the past due process as approved by The Office of the Chair. We=
 will begin implementing the process effective immediately. Additionally, w=
e will be rolling out a separate process for dispute resolution and for the=
 termination procedures by Service Management. If you have any questions or=
 comments, please call me or Joni Fisher.=20

Mike Krautz
Sr. Director
Accounts Receivable

yes.  just info.  may help to have Sue Landwehr on call to hear your thoughts.

JIm

Jim,

FYI, Ray and I spoke to Ron Carroll today about setting up a brief conference call with Gov Rasacot (sp?) to share with him some points about WestConnect and the fact that it is NOT the savior of the West Wide RTO.

Ron will be trying to set up a call.  Ron was wondering what or how we wanted Gov R. to handle the information.  Both Ray and I felt it was more to give him our perspective so when he was party to discussions relating to WestConnect he would be prepared to refute some of the claims.  Ray and I were both assuming that we were not proposing to have the Gov lobby on our behalf...is that accurate?

I will keep you informed of any other conversations relating to this matter.

Kind Regards,

Dave

Good memo.

Attached is a memo I prepared for Rick Shapiro and Jim Steffes regarding FERC's investigation into potential refunds for Pacific Northwest spot sales.  I'm circulating the memo in anticipation of questions during the conference call tomorrow.  Gary Fergus and/or Dan Watkiss will likely have further observations.   

 << File: PNW update memo.doc >> 

There will be a California Litigation Team conference call on Thursday, September 20, from 2:00 to 3:00 p.m. Central time.  The call in information is:

Domestic Dial In Number:  1-800-713-8600

International Dial In Number:  1-801-983-4017

Passcode:  56871

Host:  Mark Haedicke

Janette Elbertson
Enron Wholesale Services Legal Department
Telephone:  (713) 853-7906
Fax:  (713) 646-2600
e-mail:  janette.elbertson@enron.com

Sue --

Please follow up with Roskow at the CPUC.  I hope that he can get an answer before EOB Monday next week.  Please keep me in the loop on this.

Jim

I'll send it on to Steve Roskow.  Could you please respond to him that neither we nor the COmmission agreed with SCE's arbitrary date and that SCE's approach is in violation of the CPUC's decision on rehearing (D 01-10-036), which required SCE to continue to except DASRs as long as the contract was signed on or before 9-20-01.

Oh, my gosh.  Can you believe this?

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Matt.Pagano@sce.com on 11/02/2001 02:39:09 PM
Diann,

I received your attached customer list dated 11/1/01, however, per the
attached note sent to you on 10/03/01, SCE's deadline to submit a certified
customer list was 10/5/2001. SCE will use the list you submitted on 10/5/01
@ 3:58pm (attached below) as your certified list.

(See attached file: SCE 011005.xls)

Thanks,

Matt Pagano
Account Manager
ESP Services Division
tel-714-895-0222
fax-714-895-0347
Email-Paganomj@SCE.Com
                    Sheila Advani
As a result of input from the Rule 22 Working Group meeting held yesterday,
October 2, 2001 in San Francisco, Southern California Edison is extending
the date by which ESPs should provide the customer list information as
requested in the original SCE communication below.    Please provide a
certified list of customer information not previously submitted to SCE, as
set forth in the original e-mail below, no later than

     5:00 p.m.Pacific Daylight Savings Time, Friday, October 5,  2001

This list should be sent via e-mail to Sheila Advani at
Sheila.Advani@sce.com.

We have attached the template below to use for your convenience.

(See attached file: DA Cust List Template.xls)

If you have any questions, please contact your Account Manager.

Original SCE Communication Sent on September 21, 2001

Pursuant to the California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC) decision
issued yesterday, the right of end-use customers to acquire direct access
service is suspended as September 20, 2001.  Specifically, the CPUC order
states:

     "The execution of any new contracts, or entering into, or verification
of any new arrangements for direct access
             service pursuant to Public Utilities Code Sections 366 or
366.5, after September 20, 2001, is prohibited" (Ordering
             Paragraph No. 4).

             and,

            "PG&E, SCE and SDG&E shall not accept any direct access service
requests [DASRs] for any contracts executed
             or agreements entered into after September 20, 2001."
(Ordering Paragraph No. 7).

In order to comply with the CPUC order please provide Southern California
Edison with a certified list of your direct access customers that have
written contracts or agreements executed on or before September 20, 2001,
for which DASRs have not yet been submitted.  This list may be subject to
verification in the future, therefore, please be prepared to produce
evidence of these contracts or agreements upon request. The following
information must be included for each customer on this list for your DASR
to be eligible for future processing:

Please include the following information for each customer on this list:

     ?    Customer Name
     ?    Service Account Number
     ?    Service Address
     ?    Contract Date

This list should be sent via e-mail to Sheila Advani at
Sheila.Advani@sce.com, no later than
     5:00 p.m. Pacific Daylight Savings Time, Monday, September 24, 2001

For those direct access customers that have certified contracts or verified
agreements executed on or before September 20, 2001, ESPs must submit the
respective "connect" Direct Access Service Requests (DASRs) within 30
calendar days following the effective date of the order.  All "connect"
DASRs submitted for accounts, which are not on the ESP's certified list,
will be rejected or canceled.  SCE will not process any "connect" DASRs
after 5:00 p.m., October 20, 2001.  SCE will continue to accept
"disconnect" and "update" DASRs (for changes to billing and/or metering
options) for existing Direct Access customers.

If you have any questions, please contact your Account Manager.

Sheila Advani
e:mail: Sheila.Advani@sce.com
Electronic Communications Coordinator
Southern California Edison -ESP Services
Westminster
(714)895-0240 or PAX 54240
Fax: (714)895-0347

                    dhuddles@enro
Matt, let me know if you have any questions about the data contained in
this file.  thanks!

(See attached file: SCE Pending DASRs 11-01-01.xls)

 - SCE 011005.xls << File: SCE 011005.xls >> 
 - DA Cust List Template.xls << File: DA Cust List Template.xls >> 
 - SCE Pending DASRs 11-01-01.xls << File: SCE Pending DASRs 11-01-01.xls >> 

Thanks.  Keep up the good work.

Jim

I have started to work with Jim Wilfong in EES who seems a bit more organized and he is mastering the tariff's ins and outs and getting a handle on the gas pricing going forward.  Once a customer returns to sales service, it must stay there for a least one year and must give a year's notice (as I recall) before it can return to transportation.  And until we have a final solution to our delivery problems, I don't think EES will take any customers back.  We are working on that both at FERC and the ACC.

Leslie --

Please let me know what you need to get this issue properly defined by EES.  One option, maybe, would be to take the customers back to sales service.  Would there be any problems with this?  Please let me know.  

Jim

FYI. Apparently we turned back sales customers in Arizona served by Southwest Gas but we are still on the hook for their gas costs.  Altho I was in contact with EES virtually daily since December on about the SW problems, I was told that we were able to terminate their contracts, and was not aware of the lingering exposure issue on pricing until I started getting emails last week.  Needless to say I am not pleased and EES is trying to find a regulatory fix to this problem.  If I had known about it last winter, I would have been able to explain it to them.  I don't think I can get this fixed, and they should have kept the customers, as the delivery problems cleared up in the spring.
On cash-outs, Southwest takes the highest price paid for any incremental volume and applies it to all cash out volumes.  This is the issue we took up at the ACC and argued that it should be based on actual costs, not the single highest price.  BUT this is a different issue than the actual cost of gas for sales purposes.  I would think that the sales gas is based on actual incremental costs.  There is a possibility this can be audited, but we would have to go to the ACC, and as in California, they will not be at all sympathetic to us. They will view this an Enron problem.  I just say that so that you don't think that I can fix this easily (I doubt that I can fix this at all, but let's see what we get from the ACC on the cash out issue, that will be a good indicator.  We were clearly right on that one). 

Leslie-
Is there any way to know what their incremental cost of gas is or how it is calculated?  For example, if SW Gas buys 10,000 MMBtu total for the month at $5.00 and all other purchases were at $3.00, and EES' sales gas for that month was 90,000 MMBtu, can they charge $5.00 for all 90,000?  Are there any audit rights?  Also, I heard that we hired a law firm awhile back to address this issue???  Do you know anything about that or what they did/accomplished?  You may be hearing more about this from Don Black or Jess Hewitt--there is a huge concern about our exposure this winter.  

Under 3.2 of its Transportation Tariff, a SW Gas transportation customer in Arizona who returns to sales will pay the higher of the Gas Commodity Cost (plus any adjustments) or the incremental cost of gas, for a period of 12 months, and then the customer will go back to the PGA.

We are trying to determine the cost of gas for the customers we have turned back to SWG in Arizona.
Thx
Kris S

I assume you found the Southwest Gas Nevada tariff online and checked that rate schedules there?  the commodity cost was $.49390 and there is also a balancing account adjustment.  They file to change their PGA once a year and this year they have proposed no change.

Please include as appropriate.

Jim

Jim - Here is  what I believe to be a "final" for the month of October.  If there are changes you will receive them on Monday as early as possible.  SM
PS - even though there may be changes this still counts as being in early as originally promised!

Steve,
Here's the updated IRTF with your info. included.

 

K

Looks good.  I agree that making arguments about merchant generation "stranded costs" is questionable, better to couch this as "structural impact on market participants".  More importantly, if I bought 50% of generation in one market, and FERC changes their rules, seems like I either (a) sell generation and take the loss or (b) get regulatory risk insurance.  FERC has the right to make markets work.

Finally, on the issue of blanket authority, I think that the CAISO model is a good example of why this may not work for Enron.  In the long-run, as a market-maker, Enron needs workable markets.  A good test case would have been this - under FERC's proposed rules, would FERC have granted market-wide waiver in California?  If FERC is comfortable with the result, than move ahead.

Thanks,

Jim

On today's call:

It is clear this paper's value is as much to get EPSA member's educated as it is to educate FERC staff.  Julie S. was adamant the FERC staff need some input. I trust her judgement so I too support  getting a "leave behind" to them even if EPSA's position is still evolving.

I think we can support Craig Roach's advice, which is in the draft, to go for the Economic Capacity test, which is a simplified Delivered Price Test.   As with any test, the devil is in the  details but everyone on the call seems this test can be kept simple. Craig agreed to send me an example of such a test. 

Most of Jim's issues got raised in the call and will be incorporated in the draft.

The tension/dilemma of trading off 1x, supplier-specific MBR certificate for a blanket MBR certificate to any participant in a properly structured RTO came up several times.  Everyone recognizes that we'll need a replacement for hub-N-spoke before RTO's will obviate the need for certificates altogether.  That being said, I still think we should support such a trade because it keeps a beneif of  RTOs (everone gets MBR) highly visible.

The highlight of the call was Huntoon's/Dynegy's request to raise the stranded costs created by changing the standard for MBR.  Julie said it would not pass the laugh test but he would not back down.  I tend to agree with Julie:  if you built an asset on getting market based rates and because of a change in standards you are forced to cost-of-service, I am hard pressed to agree you have a valid stranded cost claim (i.e., you will still get return of and return on your plant).  I think it is better to focus on the going-forward impact of bad tests (e.g., loss of investors, loss of market participants, etc.)

Finally, all of Chriti's comments were essentially addressed between the 1st and 2nd drafts. 

Because the call got unwieldy, Julie allowed another round of comments, due mid-day Tues, with the hope of getting it out the door next week.

Please review my attached comments by COB Monday.  I would like to forward them onto EPSA late Monday.

Alan
 << File: MBR leave behind draft 2 EPMI.doc >> 

Becky --

I hope that I didn't come across too strongly just now.  Our budget is again under fire by the business groups and I want to try and do everything we can to create value for the businesses.  

I appreciate what you are doing on this.  Thanks for everything.  I understand the bind we are in with timing and the importance of getting this report in to FERC.

Jim

This story appears to be about residential.  

Do we know if C&I has feared so poorly?  What are the problems with entering the market for those customers?  Have these customers been angry or pleased?

Jim

Gas deregulation: unfulfilled promises It was meant to foster competition, lower bills and improve customer service for Georgians. It hasn't. 
MATTHEW C. QUINN 
STAFF 

Nov. 4, 2001 
Atlanta Journal/Atlanta Constitution 
Home 
Page E.1 
(Copyright, The Atlanta Journal and Constitution - 2001) 

Three years after Georgia deregulated natural gas, there's widespread sentiment the landmark law has failed to live up to its promise and needs to be fixed. 

When the state allowed unregulated marketing companies to sell natural gas to 1.5 million homes and businesses, the goal was to drive prices down and improve service. 

Instead, here's what resulted: A relentless wave of billing errors, confusion and customer service complaints. Residential gas prices that remained high even as wholesale prices plunged. Tens of thousands of customers whose service was disconnected for nonpayment of bills dating to last winter's record cold. Marketing companies saddled with millions of dollars in debt resulting from unpaid bills. Three marketers have gone bankrupt, reducing competition. Some survivors appear to be barely hanging on.

The situation is so strained that players on virtually all sides of the debate now agree that deregulation has gone very wrong. No easy fixes are at hand.

"No responsible executive in the world would have ever subjected customers to what they've had to go through," said Paula G. Rosput, chief executive of AGL Resources, parent of Atlanta Gas Light Co., which pushed the Legislature to enact deregulation in 1997 and remains a monopoly distributor of gas sold by marketers.

Rosput, who joined the company in 1998 when deregulation was already under way, now says that deregulating natural gas in Georgia was probably "swimming against the tide."

Georgia's relatively short heating season offers limited opportunity for profit, she said. Rosput faults the Public Service Commission for meddling and the marketers for lacking the expertise to do the job properly.

"There's plenty of blame to go around here," she said, noting that "never in the history of Georgia" has the gap between wholesale and retail prices been so wide.

Gov. Roy Barnes has stepped into the morass. He plans to name a consumer protection task force to come up with solutions before the Legislature convenes in January. Barnes said deregulation has been good for many industrial and business customers, but he has "profound concerns" about the impact on consumers.

Barnes said he's not out to scrap deregulation. That's a problematic option that nonetheless is expected to be discussed by the task force and the Legislature, along with more limited steps to prop up the existing system with consumer protection measures.

The most immediate problem is households without gas as winter cold sets in. According to Atlanta Gas Light, more than 50,000 consumers who were shut off for nonpayment have still not been reconnected.

The top marketers are insisting that balances be paid in full before service is restored, except in certain hardship cases.

The PSC has allocated $10 million to help low-income senior citizens pay their bills, and the federal government has kicked in $15 million for low-income families --- but those measures will help only a small fraction of consumers. 

As a result, social services agencies are overwhelmed with pleas for help from gas customers. The Sullivan Center, a southwest Atlanta nonprofit, is holding weekly classes to help advise people having trouble paying their bills.

Many of them haven't paid since last winter's frigid temperatures sent bills soaring in Georgia and across the country. 

The PSC responded in January by slapping a moratorium on shut- offs --- but that actually may have exacerbated the situation in the long term. When the moratorium expired in April, more than 220,000 customers were targeted for disconnection, and marketers were stuck with a reported $100 million in bad debt. Since then, 142,000 homes and businesses have been shut off; 87,500 of those were reconnected after paying their bills.

Nancy D. Coveny, executive director of Buckhead Christian Ministry, which offers assistance to low-income residents, said deregulation has made it more difficult to help people straighten out their accounts because of the multitude of marketers and policies. Before deregulation, "it was a lot easier" to straighten out problems, Coveny said. "We would call Atlanta Gas Light. We had relationships."

High prices

Jessie Champion, 54, of southwest Atlanta, said she had her gas cut off after failing to pay a $2,081 bill dating back months.

Champion said she had been making budget billing payments to Georgia Natural Gas Services, the state's top marketer and an affiliate of Atlanta Gas Light, and was told by the company that "the computer messed up." She's been using an electric heater for her household, which includes three grandchildren and a disabled son. 

Catherine Land-Waters, vice president/customer service at Georgia Natural Gas, said Champion's service was shut off after she failed to keep up with her payments. She said the company has no record of a disability claimed by Champion but added that the company will work with her to get her service restored.

Denise McGregory of Norcross had her gas shut off two weeks ago after confusion over bills from two marketers for two apartments she briefly had during a move. She said Infinite Energy turned off her gas, even though she sent a check. Service was restored two days later, but only after she "yelled and screamed" and complained to the PSC. "I have to have gas," she said. "I have seven children." 

Dave Benfield, a spokesman for Infinite, said McGregory had been notified that she faced disconnection. The small, Florida-based marketer approved her account for reconnection the same day it received payment.

"If people don't pay us in 45 days, they get a notice," Benfield said. "In most cases they pay."

The PSC has logged more than 12,000 complaints about natural gas service since January over such things as pricing, billing inaccuracies, disconnection notices sent in error and demands for payment of hefty overdue balances. That dwarfs the number of complaints the PSC gets about electricity and telecommunications.

"People aren't being treated right," says PSC member Stan Wise, a supporter of deregulation who wants to save the system. 

Marketers say many billing problems have been straightened out, and complaints to the PSC have tapered off.

What remains a major concern for virtually everyone involved is the price consumers are paying for natural gas. When the wholesale price of gas dropped substantially in recent months, residential prices charged by marketers remained high. Last week, wholesale prices shot up 75 percent in advance of cold weather but are still much lower than last year.

Marketers say prices have remained high in part because of bad debt they are carrying from nonpaying customers. The PSC is expected to launch an inquiry this week into whether bad debt is the reason retail and wholesale prices have been out of synch. 

It's not clear "how much is bad debt and how much is marketers taking advantage of the situation," said state Consumer Utility Counsel Kristy Holley.

Reeling from bad debt

Residential consumers enjoyed rebates and lower prices at the outset of deregulation. Those who locked in fixed prices benefited when prices shot up last winter and their gas costs did not.

But relatively few customers opted for a fixed price, which was not heavily promoted as an option. 

A recent analysis by the PSC staff shows typical monthly residential gas bills between April and September have been higher than those in neighboring states with regulated utilities. The average September bill for customers served by Georgia marketers was $37.12, compared with an average of $27.03 for six regulated utilities in nearby states. Even the lowest Georgia bill was higher than the regulated average.

But the Georgia bill includes marketer charges for natural gas and customer service, plus Atlanta Gas Light's distribution charges. PSC member Robert Baker says AGL's charges, which account for 40 percent of typical bills, may be partly to blame for high bills.

On the basis of a PSC staff finding that the utility has been earning up to $52.5 million a year above what's authorized, the commission has launched an earnings review that could lead to reduced rates. AGL, meanwhile, claims it's entitled to a rate increase of up to $48 million.

With the exception of large industrial customers that had distribution costs slashed and got more leeway to shop for gas from competing wholesale suppliers, it's hard to find anyone who gives deregulation high marks.

Marketers flocked to Georgia with hopes of getting in on the ground floor of an expanding national deregulated business for electricity and natural gas. What was supposed to be Georgia's gradual transition to an exciting new market with lower prices and superior customer service moved faster than anyone predicted. That touched off an array of billing problems and errors. When unusually cold weather hit last winter and prices skyrocketed, many consumers, already angered by the billing problems, blamed deregulation --- and didn't pay their bills. 

While those problems were evolving in Georgia, California had its electricity implosion. Many marketers had based their investment in Georgia on an expectation they'd recoup by expanding into other markets and offer new services, including electricity and telecommunications. But the California debacle dashed hopes for a national deregulated market for natural gas and electricity. "California did for electricity deregulation what Three Mile Island did for nuclear power," said Warren Darby, retired senior vice president of Scana Energy and now a consultant in Columbia, S.C.

When Georgia's moratorium on shut-offs expired in April, marketers found themselves reeling from an estimated $100 million in bad debt. Instead of building market share, they had to focus on disconnecting nonpaying customers.

"You went from an invasion to an occupation mentality," Darby said.

Shell Energy, an affiliate of Shell Oil Co., recently aborted its entry into the newly deregulated electricity market in its home state of Texas. The crash program by Georgia's No. 3 marketer to recoup bad debt by disconnecting nonpaying customers in the state has triggered an outpouring of complaints. Darby said Shell is "circling the wagons."

Shell Energy President Alan Raymond concedes that Georgia "has not been an exciting profit picture for us," but he insists his company has no plans to pull out. He added, however: "Unless things get better, no company can survive this."

Georgia Natural Gas Services, the state's top marketer, has been one big headache for AGL Resources, its parent, which recently took a $13.5 million pretax charge related to accounting discrepancies at the marketing affiliate and is engaged in messy litigation with a minority partner. "It's not been a good business for us," said Rosput of AGL.

No. 2 marketer Scana Energy has reported $4 million in profit from its Georgia operations so far this year, or about $1 per month per customer after accounting for bad debt. The South Carolina-based company had hoped to sell its Georgia customers wireless telephone and home security services but has gotten out of both businesses. The company says it's in for the long term.

New Power Co. made a late and aggressive entry into Georgia's natural gas market this year as part of a national push into deregulated gas and electricity markets. Wall Street didn't like the idea. The company's stock has plunged from $21 a year ago to less than $1. Its top financial backer, Enron Corp., last month wrote down about $270 million of its investment. But New Power President Eugene Lockhart insists Georgia is profitable for the company and that it's not planning to pull out.

Still, there's concern about the impact on competition if Shell or New Power quits. The PSC has designated New Power as emergency backup supplier if another company goes out of business. 

The ranks of marketers has already thinned from 19 three years ago to eight. The top four control 94 percent of the market.

PSC member Baker already sees an "oligopoly" with limited competition. Consumer choice "is supposed to be the hallmark" of deregulation, said Commissioner David Burgess. Instead, he said, "consumers have less and less."

'Re-regulation' calls

So far, no one has come forward with a solution to the deregulation problems. 

Calls for "re-regulation" are expected to grow when the General Assembly convenes in January. Already, a key backer of the 1997 deregulation law has jumped ship.

"We can't let Georgia consumers suffer for another year," said state Sen. Sonny Perdue of Bonaire, who said he will introduce legislation to re-regulate natural gas. Perdue, the main Senate sponsor of the 1997 deregulation law, is expected this week to announce his candidacy for the Republican nomination for governor. He would oppose Barnes. 

State Rep. Jimmy Skipper (D-Americus), the main House sponsor of the '97 law, said he's concerned about gas prices, but he's not sure re-regulation is "doable at this point."

Marketers are pressing for more time to give deregulation a chance. 

"We believe a year from now, weather permitting, that this will be a much calmer market and people will value the choices they have," saId Scana spokeswoman Cathy Love.

Returning to regulated natural gas would present a whole new host of problems, including dilemma No. 1: "If it's re-regulated, who takes the ball?" says PSC Chairman Lauren "Bubba" McDonald Jr.

Returning Atlanta Gas Light to the role of regulated utility would require the very expensive proposition of reconstructing billing and customer service systems for 1.5 million customers, which was turned over to marketers.

Then there's the question of whether marketers would be entitled to a "bailout" to recover their costs if forced from the market Georgia invited them into. 

One option being discussed is to have Atlanta Gas Light --- or even a marketer --- offer a regulated gas service alongside unregulated marketers. That would make Georgia more like other states that have deregulated.

Other measures could include new standards for billing, customer service and meter reading; more authority for the PSC, including emergency power to regulate prices; reducing the sales tax for gas bills; and increasing competition by allowing nonprofit electric cooperatives to become gas marketers.

But there are significant problems associated with every option that has been floated for "fixing" deregulation. In fact, there may be no good fix.

Rosput said she's "prepared to get to a solution," but like everyone else, she doesn't have an answer.

"It is my job to do the best I can to guide this ship," she said, "and there's no safe shore or good place to land." 

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

Jean --

Please take the lead working with Mike D Smith to clarify that we don't have any issues.

Thanks,

Jim

From the legal side, Ed Essandoh and Mike D Smith. 
From the business side, I think Ed Ham owns Texas products.  I would ask Jeremy and Scott who they want from the origination teams in the loop. 

Vicki --

I have heard recently that EES is signing up customers in Texas that "passes thru" congestion.  There may be some billing and settlement issues given ERCOT's systems.  Basically, we will not know based on our bill from ERCOT what each customer's congestion was.  I want to make sure that EES billing can determine how to charge this?

Who should I talk with?

Jim

Sue & Kerry -

Do you know if anyone is going to this?  Should we work with EPSA to publish an EPSA piece that corresponds to this?

Jim

FYI...

November 6, 2001

Dear Interested Parties:

Please find attached the final draft of NARUC's National Electricity Policy. We are providing you with this document as a courtesy. Our goal is to
review and debate the policy at the NARUC Annual Meeting in Philadelphia and to approve a policy that provides members of Congress and other federal policy makers a summary of NARUC's position on federal energy policy and legislation. We look forward to a lively debate in Philadelphia.

Sincerely,
Judy Jones, Co-chair
Edward Garvey, Co-chair
NARUC's National Energy Policy Committee
ATT: NARUC's National Electricity Policy
List of National Energy Policy Committee Members

 - nepfinaldraft.doc 

HERE IS THE NEW FILE.

 

What do you think that about having Kerry take the lead on all MAPP area RTOs while also supporting Roan in MISO/ARTO?  Not top priority but I think this could be a good opportunity.

Jim
Christi/Sarah--you guys are probably aware of this, but just in case you aren't, there was an article in the Minneapolis paper yesterday that Xcel (NSP) had filed on Friday with FERC to transfer it's transmission system to a new company called TransLink Transmission Co.  Joining them are Alliant, Corn Belt Coop (Iowa), Mid AMerican, NPPD, and OPPD.  

I noted that there was a quote in the article that "Xcel estimates that it would cut its overal transmission related fees by more than a thrid through it's participation in Translink.......because there will be less overlap of functions."

Lamar  -

There is alot of noise in the media to find some customers who will state for the public record that they will be harmed by the retroactive suspension of DA.  At one point, you were going to get some customers' names & contact info to pass along to the media.  Any luck?  Karen Denne with PR is getting quite a few phone calls from California media sources.

The strategy has to be to downplay Enron and have the customer pitch "their pain" by this action of the CPUC.  Give me or Karen a call.

Jim

Your call.  I'll support you on whatever you decide.

Jim
Paul,
 
I noted my name on the list of interviewers below then in a later e-mail it was removed from the list.  Given the fact that you still need interviewers for first round and I had volunteered my availability to yourself and Jim Steffes, is there any reason why I would not be on this first round trip?
 
Thanks for letting me know so I can plan accordingly!
 

Sarah-Joy Hunter 
Enron Corporation#(713)-345-6541 
sarah-joy.hunter@enron.com 

 

Hello Team,
 
First of all let me say job well done to the Presentation Team.  We had over 150 students at the Presentation.
 
On to the Next Event:
 
The following is the breakdown for those who are  to interview:
 
Oct 7 & 8 (Reception and 1 st Round) ( 8 Interviewers & 1 Greeter)
Nathan Will (Interviewer)
Kirk Neuner (Interviewer)
Juan Samudio (Interviewer)
Rob Mc Donald (Interviewer)
Scott Griffin (Interviewer)
Brian Wood (Interviewer)
Sarah Joy - Hunter (Interviewer)
Need One More Interviewer
 
Jason Jennaro ( Greeter)
Paul LeBeau (Recruiter)
 
 
Oct 9th (Second Rounds) (4 Interviewers & 1 Greeter)
Jim Steffes (Interviewer)
David Howe (Interviewer)
Denise Furey (Interviewer) 
Need One More Interviewer 
 
Jason Jennaro ( Greeter)
Paul LeBeau (Recruiter)
 
** IF YOU ARE ABLE TO PARTICIPATE AS AN INTERVIEWER (Please let me know ASAP)**  We are lacking Interviewers 1st and 2nd Rounds.
 
If you are listed please reconfirm your participation with me by e-mail and if your schedule doesn't permit please let me know ASAP.
 
I have also just recieved the resume batch.  I will forward it on Friday, Sept 27th, as soon as I return to the office.  We will need to decide on 55 candidates for on invite kist.  This will be 48 slots with 7 alternates.
 
Thanks -=- Paul L.
 

I saw this recently.  It's true AND funny.  This place is amazing.

Jim

You're the only person there who could still get a chuckle out of this -
hope I'm not wrong.

Lee Neathery <lln@pinnacletrust.com> on 11/07/2001 03:14:09 PM
Now  you know how it worked....read on.
Make sure that you read all the way to the end.

FEUDALISM
You have two cows.
Your lord takes some of the milk.

FASCISM
You have two cows.
The government takes both, hires you to take care of them and  sells you
the milk.

PURE COMMUNISM
You have two cows.
Your neighbors help take care of them and you all share the  milk.

APPLIED COMMUNISM
You have two  cows.
You must take care of them, but the government  takes all the milk.

TOTALITARIANISM
You have two  cows.
The government takes them both and denies they  ever existed.
Milk is banned.

PURE DEMOCRACY
You have two cows.
You and your neighbors decide who gets the milk.

REPRESENTATIVE DEMOCRACY
You have two  cows.
Your neighbors pick someone to tell you who gets  the milk.

MEXICAN DEMOCRACY
You have two  cows.
The government takes both and drafts you into the  army.

EUROPEAN DEMOCRACY
You have two  cows.
The EU commission decides which regulations for  feeding and milking
apply.
If  there aren't any, they invent some.
They pay you not to  milk the cows.
They take both cows, shoot one, milk the  other and pour the milk down
the drain.
They then require you to fill out forms accounting for the missing  cows.

AMERICAN DEMOCRACY
The government  promises to give you two cows, if you vote for it.
After  the election, the president is impeached for speculating in cow
futures.
The press dubs the affair "cowgate," but  supports the president.
The cows sue you for breach of  contract.
Your legal bills exceed your annual  income.
You settle out of court and declare  bankruptcy.

CAPITALISM
You have two cows.
You sell one and buy a bull.
Your herd  multiplies, and the economy grows.
You sell them and  retire on the income.

ENRON VENTURE CAPITALISM
You have two  cows.
You sell three of them to your publicly listed  company, using letters of
credit opened by your  brother-in-law at the bank, then execute a debt/
equity  swap with an associated general offer so that you get all four
cows back, with a tax exemption for five cows. The milk rights of  the
six cows are transferred via an intermediary to a  Cayman Island company
secretly owned by the majority  shareholder who sells the rights to all
seven cows back  to your listed company. The annual report says the
company owns eight cows, with an option on one more.

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from the ElPaso
Corporation are confidential and intended solely for the
use of the individual or entity to whom they are  addressed.
If you have received this email in error  please notify the
sender.
******************************************************************

Thanks.  It was a nice dinner.

Jim

Rick, et al:

Thank you so much for such a special evening.  I really enjoyed dinner, and the rare occasion to catch up with all of you.  It meant a lot to me that you were willing to give up an evening with your family to wish me well.  

It has truly been a privilege to work with such talented colleagues (as Amr would say).  I will miss working with you, and I will miss your friendship.  

Thanks again.

Lisa

I don't think that it is one of our top issues.  I'd recommend that we stay out.

Jim

Thanks.  
I concur, but I wanted to get the issues out there for discussion.  What is your view on intervening in the City of Chicago's investigation case?

Janine - my thoughts -

On the rate cases, I don't think we need any change of direction.  For the IP case, our argument is just the legal one of whether they can discriminate.  And there were a lot more parties involved with ComEd than IP, even though the issues are basically the same, so I wouldn't worry there about perception.

The bigger deal may be our protest of Dynergy's protest of Com Ed's treatment of Firm LD for marketers.  The filing has already been made, so we should stay on track.

Given the recent developments with the potential merger between Enron and Dynergy, there are a few policy questions in Illinois for which we would like guidance:

Illinois Power

We have intervened in the delivery service tariff case and are handling it primarily inhouse and solo - no other marketers.  Yesterday, we filed a Reply (greatly toned down - sticking to the facts only) to IP's memo contra our Motion to Dismiss.  URM decided not to do testimony so at this point we contemplate not showing up at the hearing and briefing only.  Recall that the issue is that to raise distribution tariffs for only unbundled customers taking service from an alternative supplier is unlawful and also anticompetitive and discriminatory, etc.  Our book impact could be around $2 million, I believe should IP get the full increase.  Moreover, it would stifle future competition.  

query:  Should our course of action be altered?

ComEd

ComEd parallels IP except that it is going forward first.  We made the same arguments on the Motion to Dismiss, which was denied by the Judge.  Our plan is to seek rehearing with the full Commission and to point out that the ICC filed comments at FERC with respect to increasing only unbundled transmission rates that were fully consistent with our arguments respecting distribution!

The case is currently in hearing and we have an Enron witness testifying.

In a separate move in this case, the City of Chicago and Cook county have filed a separate action requesting an audit and investigation of ComEd's books and records alleging basically that ComEd is seeking double recovery of costs.  If we intervened it might be possible to do so without paying any of the costs, assuming Blackhawk and AES/New Energy agree (we have done this for them in the past).
Upsides are that it would be viewed positively by the City of Chicago and Cook County as supporting them.  Downsides are that this really gets into rate issues that in previous RCR discussions we were told to stay away from and secondly, do we really want to be supporting an audit and investigation of another utility's books and records right now, given Enron's position?  

The last point is whether there is a perception problem in being more aggressive with Com Ed than IP on the rate discrimination issue, should we decide to take that path.

Janine

Janet --

Going forward Govt Affairs will coordinate with Services and Product Development (and other EWS and EES groups as appropriate, e.g. Credit) to ensure compliance with (1) licensing/registration, (2) bonding/security, (3) regulatory reporting, and (4) other.  I have asked Gloria Ogenyi to lead this effort for us.  We will need other groups to appoint a Lead for their teams as soon as possible (I will work with Evan, Legal, and Product Development to find out the appropriate people).

I fully concur with Rogers that within all new Product Development activities there must be a clear analysis of our obligations and appropriate resource allocation to continue supporting the market activity.   As important, just because we don't want to attract new business in a given market doesn't mean that our responsibilities have ended.  We need to ensure that our Product Development activities are accounting for the costs of these obligations over the long-term.  To ensure that we are selling in accordance with applicable regulations, I would recommend that Gloria be on the Product Development sign-off sheet.

In addition, we have already begun reviewing obligations, etc. for our current market activity (both wholesale and retail).  I will talk with Gloria to build the matrix of issues you referenced.  Our goal is to make current all of our market obligations.

I will call you to provide an update on the market review when I have more information.  If you want to talk about this, please call.

Thanks,

Jim

PS - I'll ask Gloria to give you an update on the IL bonding status.

Who should respond to Janet's specific IL request?

We are not managing bonds, etc.  This is a market entry requirement and should be documented by Product Development/Services upon entering new markets.  We had a meeting earlier this week with Vicki Sharp and came to general agreement that this was a Services/Regulatory maintenance requirement.  Will follow up and make sure they are pulling this together.  This is one of the issues I have been hammering on re: new product development/new market entry - I want proof of all data requirements/costs/license requirements/processes before new products are released and markets are entered.  In the past, I believe sign offs have occurred without a complete understanding of the requirements.  I have refused to sign any new products until Product Development can prove the above exists - even for markets where we are already doing business.

Why did this expire without renewal? Who is managing this specific issue and what is the status of the bond renewal? I would like a matrix outlining each state we do business in for gas and power, the requirements/obligations for EES to be a retail seller (gas & power)
 in each of those states, and status of those requirements (i.e.- dates when next action is needed). I'd also like the name of the individuals responsible for ensuring these requirements are met listed beside the states. I'd like to have this pulled together within a week.

Also, Rogers, could you forward to me the status of the bond requirement referred to below- thanks.

 Message-----
Unlike TX, creditworthiness standards for Alternative Retail Electric Suppliers (ARES) in IL is not uniform accross utility lines. The creditworthiness standards vary by utility, and also depends on the billing option chosen by the ARES. However, the single billing option (SBO) has creditworthiness standards that have general application because SBO certification is an ICC responsibility with uniform qualification criteria. All the applicable credit requirements set out below are cumulative.

Enron's Credit Rating of BBB(S&P), and Baa2(Moody's)
General Creditworthiness: Under Section 451.50 Subchapter C of the IL Admin. Code, as part of the qualification as an ARES all applicants must fulfill a general license bond requirement. In IL, EES is licensed to serve nonresidential retail customers with maximum electrical demand of 1MW or more. To secure this license, EES was required to post bond in the sum of $30,000. The bond is valid for one year, and conditioned on the full and faithful performance of all duties and obligations of EES as an ARES. If the license bond is cancelled, modified, expires or is drawn upon, EES must execute and maintain an additional or replacement bond, such that the cumulative value of all outstanding bonds never falls below the required amount. The EES license bond expired on June 2001. EES must issue another bond or provide an extension certificate up to June 2002, and annually thereafter.

Registration Under SubPart B:
EES is registered as an ARES under Subpart B of Section 451.100 - expedited certification for ARES that seek to serve only non-residential customers with maximum demand of  1MW or more. Subpart B has additional financial qualifications
	1. To maintain certification under Subpart B, EES needs to maintain at least one of the following long-term credit ratings of BBB- (S&P), Baa3 (Moody's), BBB- (Duff 	& Phelps), or BBB- (Fitch); or

	2.  Maintain a borrowing agreement with an affiliate that has the above ratings. The amount of credit available to EES under the borrowing agreement shall 
	not be less than $500,000 or 5% of EES' revenue for last fiscal year; or
	
	3. Show that the EES obligations arising from electric energy and fuel purchases are covered by an unconditional guaranty, bond, or LC, in an amount not less than  	$500,000 or 5% of EES's revenue for the last fiscal year; or

	4. Certify that it will reimburse its IL retail customers for additional costs they incur to acquire electricity upon EES' contractual failure. This certification shall be 	covered by an unconditional guaranty, bond, or LC in the sum of 1080 times the maximum MW EES estimates to schedule in the next 12 months, multiplied by the 	average of the 45 highest daily market prices of energy traded in the previous year; or
	
	5. EES maintains a  line of credit or revolving credit agreement in the amount of $500,000 or 5% of its revenue for last fiscal year, from an "A" rated financial 	insitution; or
	
	6. EES earns 12 points on the financial ratios - pre-tax interest coverage, funds from operations interest coverage, funds from operations to total debt, and total debt 	to total capital.

Enron's Credit Rating and downgrades: To satisfy the Subpart B requirements, EES provided an unconditional guaranty from Enron Corp. Given our current credit rating of BBB(S&P) and Baa2 (Moody's), that guaranty is still valid. However, if Enron Corp is downgraded below the required credit level, EES will have to provide any of the above alternative forms of creditworthiness.

IMPACT: The above creditworthiness requirements relate to EES's ability to do business in IL. Failure to maintain the foregoing standards will result in the loss of our IL license. This will trigger contractual default for all our customers, both financial and physical. Please note that, EES is out of compliance on the license bond and needs to post a new bond ASAP.

Single Bill Option:
Pursuant to Section 451.500, Subpart F, any ARES that chooses the Single Bill Option (SBO), must demonstrate ability to establish and maintain sufficient financial resources to satisfy the obligation to remit to the utilities, monies that it collects under the SBO tariff. To satisfy these additional creditworthiness standards, EES must either:
	1. Post and maintain bond in the amount of 15% of its estimated obligation to the utility under the SBO

	2. Provide an irrevocable LC issued by a financial insitution with an "A" rating

	3. Maintain at least the following long term credit ratings, a BBB- (S&P), Baa3 (Moody's), BBB-(duff &Phelps, BBB- (Fitch)
	
	4. Provide an unconditional guaranty from an affiliate with the above ratings.
Enron's Current Rating: EES is currently working to obtain ICC certification under the SBO tariff. This means that EES must maintain the minimum long term credit ratings set out in 3, or provide a guaranty from an affiliate with those ratings. EES is not rated. However, given Enron Corp's current credit rating of BBB and Baa2, a parental guaranty will suffice to meet the qualification under the SBO tariff. 

Further Downgrades: If Enron Corp is down graded below the required minimum ratings, EES will need to provide a bond or LC, or forego the SBO option.

IMPACT: EES will continue to do business in IL as an ARES. Thus EES will maintain its ability to service its customers both financial and physical. However, there could be substantial impact on EES customer service and operation, particularly our ability to meet customer expectations and timely collect outstanding receivables.

Instrument Fund Charges: (akin to stranded costs)
Under the Illinois tariffs, EES can choose annually, one of two remittance timelines for IFC charges. (1) To remit IFC charges within 7 days of receipt of customer payment, or more frequently as required; or (2) within 15 days of utility invoicing, whether or not customer has paid. If EES chooses the 2nd option, it has to provide a security deposit equal to one month's estimated IFC charges for all EES' customers. Deposit amount will be determined based on monthly KW customer usage, and the IFC charge per KWH. If the expected IFC charge for EES' customers is $5,000,000 or more, this deposit amount will be revised monthly.

If EES chooses the 2nd option - remittance of bills within 15 days of utility invoicing, we will be required to provide the deposit.

IMPACT: This deposit requirement for the IFC charges relate to Illinois Power customers and not to ComEd. For ComEd, IFC charges nets out to zero, and customers do not pay those charges. EES is currently doing business as a billing agent in IP's service territory, and is required to execute the Billing Agent Agreement which will implement the deposit requirement. If EES chooses the first remittance option, it will avoid the deposit requirement. However, this may have operational implications.

Can we talk about this and a number of other issues tomorrow?  I'll try and get Linda Noske to arrange a time.

Jim

Jean/Jim:

Jeff Fischer and I in EES Tax have been working with Nancy Hetrick regarding the question of whether REPs will be responsible for administering Texas taxes on T&D services.

As you may have heard, at the request of a number of investor owned utilities, the Texas Comptroller of Public Accounts has initially ruled that REPs will be responsible for administering the taxes.  This conclusion was based upon the assumption that the REPs are purchasing the T&D Services from the TDU and then reselling the services to their customers.

After a number of REPs objected to that ruling, the Comptroller's office agreed to reconsider.  We believe the Comptroller is worried about doing something that will have a serious impact on deregulation in Texas, so she is passing the question off to the Texas PUC by requesting that the PUC determine whether REPs purchase and resell T&D Services.

The New Power Company raised this issue with the PUC recently and at last count TXU and Entergy had filed responses of their own.  A number of tax representatives from several REPs thought it might be good to show the PUC this is a significant issue for all independent REPs.

Attached for your review and comment is a draft of a proposed letter to the PUC regarding this matter.  Nancy suggested we send the letter to you for your comments and to get clearance for EESI to sign the letter.  Thank you for your assistance with this.

Ron

 

Thanks.

It makes sense for Gloria and Rebecca to get together (I am available to talk tomorrow and have asked Gloria to set something up).  

Also, we need to work together to make sure that EES' reports, taxes, and other requirements are filed in a timely fashion (with the right internal groups).

On the IL Bond issue, there must be a disconnect between us and the ICC.  The ICC believes that our Bond isn't current.  Maybe we can figure this out together tomorrow?

Call if anyone has any questions.  

Jim

 

This is a quick recap from the Services Group perspective.  I have asked Rebecca Fite to get with Gloria and try and connect what appears to be a disconnect.

Thanks,

Evan

Evan,

Attached is a matrix that identifies our current State Licenses.  We work directly with EES Legal for license renewals and new registrations.  As Craig has indicated below, our records indicate we are current for both Licensing and Bond Requirements in Illinois at a State Level.

As EES is currently pursuing Supplier Billing Option (SBO) behind Commonwealth Edison, we will have to comply with the credit worthiness requirements outlined by Gloria, but my understanding of her email indicates we currently meet these standards and will only be required to supply funds in the event our credit rating drops further.

 << File: certificationsEESI.ppt >>  << File: certificationsEEMC.ppt >> 

Please feel free to contact either of us with questions.

Regards,
Rebecca
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Craig Shields
11/08/2001 03:48 PM
Evan,

As you know, the license application function was migrated to the Service Desk in August 2001.  This activity was previously maintained by Beth Gooden.  In any case, our records show that EES is current and compliant.  EES was granted a retail license in August 1999.  To maintain the license, EES must submit an annual "Re-certification" and keep a bond current.  A Re-certification application was submitted on 1/31/01 and the  bond was extended through 6/1/02.

I hope this answers your concerns.  Please don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions and/or require further information.

Craig

FYI...

November 6, 2001

Dear Interested Parties:

Please find attached the final draft of NARUC's National Electricity Policy. We are providing you with this document as a courtesy. Our goal is to
review and debate the policy at the NARUC Annual Meeting in Philadelphia and to approve a policy that provides members of Congress and other federal policy makers a summary of NARUC's position on federal energy policy and legislation. We look forward to a lively debate in Philadelphia.

Sincerely,
Judy Jones, Co-chair
Edward Garvey, Co-chair
NARUC's National Energy Policy Committee
ATT: NARUC's National Electricity Policy
List of National Energy Policy Committee Members

 - nepfinaldraft.doc 

Agreed.

Here's one law firm we want to make sure we never use -- it's Baker and McKenzie, not Baker Botts.
Is this ambulance chasing?  Oh how unbecoming and I do believe it's Baker, Botts??  

>  <<...OLE_Obj...>>
> E-Notes provides regular briefings on new developments in global energy
> and public utility law.
>
> October 31, 2001
>
> RISK CONSIDERATIONS FOR ENRON COUNTERPARTIES:
> FAILURE TO EXERCISE RIGHTS MAY CONSTITUTE WAIVER
>
>
>       The reduction by Moody's Investor Service Inc. of Enron Corp.'s
> senior unsecured long-term debt to Baa2 from Baa1 this week may be an
> issue of concern for companies that are counterparts to Enron obligations.
> This downgrade may have immediate consequences under existing transactions
> with Enron given that its current credit rating is now two levels above
> non-investment grade.  Any further downgrade into non-investment grade
> levels could seriously affect relationships between counterparties and
> Enron, and possibly Enron counterparties and their counterparties.
>
>       Enron is the principal in nearly one-quarter of all electricity and
> natural gas trades in the United States.  For Enron's power and gas
> trading counterparties, a credit event such as a downgrade by Moody's may
> precipitate certain obligations under the terms of their trading
> transactions.  For example, any downgrade, not just a downgrade resulting
> in a sub-investment grade rating, may entitle a counterparty to require
> Enron to provide additional credit in support of Enron's purchase
> obligations.  Counterparties should examine all power, gas or other
> commodity purchase and sale documentation to confirm whether they possess
> this right.  The failure to exercise this right may constitute a waiver
> and foreclose access to critical performance and payment assurance,
> threatening to alter the risk assessment and mitigation considerations
> upon which the transactions were originally based.  Furthermore, a failure
> to declare a credit event or default against Enron could cause a default
> on the part of the counterparty itself in collateral or ancillary
> arrangements, such as its financing.  The potential for a domino effect,
> causing defaults or credit events in a series of transactions, is
> considerable.
>
>       It is uncertain whether Enron's efforts to obtain new lines of
> credit will be sufficient to overcome the current difficulties.
> Regardless, it is prudent to review the terms of existing transactions
> with Enron or its affiliates, including any guarantees or other forms of
> corporate credit support.  It is also advisable to examine the terms of
> transactions dependent on, or otherwise ancillary to, transactions with
> Enron or its affiliates to avoid any consequential effects of the Enron
> credit ratings downgrade.
>
>       For further information on how Enron's current financial situation
> could impact your firm's transaction risk profile, please contact Michael
> Zimmer at 202.452.7055 or michael.j.zimmer@bakernet.com, Jonathan W.
> Gottlieb at 202.452.7084 or jonathan.w.gottlieb@bakernet.com or Samir
> Desai at 202.452.7057 or samir.s.desai@bakernet.com .
>
> Michael J. Zimmer
> Jonathan W. Gottlieb
> Samir S. Desai
> 
>
>
>
> __________________________________________________________________________
> __
> E-Notes is a publication of Baker & McKenzie.  It does not constitute
> legal advice or a legal opinion on any specific facts or circumstances.
> The contents are intended as general information only.  You are urged to
> consult your attorney concerning your situation and specific legal
> questions you may have.  For further information on the subjects discussed
> in E-Notes, contact Michael J. Zimmer,
> <mailto:michael.j.zimmer@bakernet.com> or
> Jonathan W. Gottlieb, <mailto:jonathan.w.gottlieb@bakernet.com>.
>
> For more information about BAKER & McKENZIE and our global energy and
> utility practice, click on our electronic business card:
>  <<...OLE_Obj...>>
>
> or visit our website at <http://www.bakerinfo.com/Practice
> Areas/nabfmp/energy/!viewme.htm> .
>
>
>

FYI

Guillermo:  At this time I cannot tell you what is going to happen with your L1 visa, as I have not been instructed to give out any information regarding visas.  Until we know something more, it is a difficult question to answer.

However, in answer to your questions:

1.	You cannot transfer an L1 visa to another company, as it is Enron specific.
2.	You can stay in the US for a short time to pack up and move things.   You cannot stay indefintely, as you will be out of status.
3.	If your wife gets a working visa, then she will be able to stay legally, but I imagine you would then be her dependent.
4.	Alternatively, you can look for a job and get an HIB visa for yourself and and H4 visa for your wife (she still cannot work on an H4 visa). 

Once we know more about what is going on, everyone will have a better understanding of what advice to give to visa holders.

Margaret

I would appreciate if you could tell me what is going to happen with my L1-Visa (and the L2 of my wife), if the worst case scenarios for Enron become true.
In particular:
Could Enron transfer my Visa to other US company?
How long could I stay in the US if Enron terminates my contract?
Could we stay in the country if my wife gets a legal job as a teacher?
Do I have any other alternative?

Thank you very much.
Guillermo

Please get this to Fundamentals.

Thanks,

Jim

FYI.  There's some interesting data here.

Samantha

Samantha M. Slater
Manager of State & Regional Affairs
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 New York Avenue, N.W.
11th Floor
Washington, D.C.  20005
Phone: 202-628-8200
Fax: 202-628-8260
E-mail: sslater@epsa.org

 - New Coal Plants 07-30-01.ppt 

Janine --

What does this do to our current book of customers on MSG?  Will our $$ margin evaporate?  Is there some other "solution" on how to restructure the FE retail market?  What wholesale issues does FE need to change to help the EWS desk?

Jim

FirstEnergy has made a filing with regard to the shopping credit for next year.  In that filing they are claiming that they have reached 20% switching and therefore do not need to increase the percentage spread between the price we buy the MSG at and the shopping credit.  I have been working with Scott Reneicke and Nicole Schwartz and am planning to file an intervention on behalf of Enron and contest the calculation of the 20% (which includes affiliate transactions) and the argument to not increase the percentage spread and any other arguments Scott may identify. 

Given circumstances, I am assuming that since this is something I can handle, I should do so as opposed to involving outside counsel.

Unless I hear otherwise, I will proceed.

Janine

Lisa --

You should also attend.

Jim

Jim Keller will be setting up a meeting to discuss. 
 
EveraertN@sullcrom.com on 09/28/2001 12:23:58 PM
Please find attached a revised draft of the Request for No-Action Letter.
We have also attached a redline showing the revisions made to the previous
draft.

Sincerely,

Natalie Everaert

 <<No-Action Request - CFTC(v8).DOC>>  <<Redline 09-28 No-Action Request -
CFTC.rtf>>

This e-mail is sent by a law firm and contains information
that may be privileged and confidential. If you are not the
intended recipient, please delete the e-mail and notify us
immediately.

 - No-Action Request - CFTC(v8).DOC 
 - Redline 09-28 No-Action Request - CFTC.rtf 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Ok.  But if this case ends up in Settlement, we should have our priorities outlined before the case.

Jim

Jim.

Our margin will not evaporate.  I am trying to determine if it will take a modest hit since I do not know whether they based their assumptions on the higher or more moderate shopping credit that we could get in subsequent years.  When I have an answer to that, I will let you know.  There is no other solution to restructure the retail martket at this time since this is the result of the settlement and to date, FE has more activity than any other service territory - the issue in my mind is what percent is affiliate.  Moreover, my expectation level that the PUCO will do anything of value for the market is rather low.  Because the value proposition without the MSG is pretty poor and there is no more MSG, FE is a low priority for further action and EWS is not focusing their time there.  If it were higher on the list, the same issues of imbalance risk would apply.

Janine

Janine --

What does this do to our current book of customers on MSG?  Will our $$ margin evaporate?  Is there some other "solution" on how to restructure the FE retail market?  What wholesale issues does FE need to change to help the EWS desk?

Jim

FirstEnergy has made a filing with regard to the shopping credit for next year.  In that filing they are claiming that they have reached 20% switching and therefore do not need to increase the percentage spread between the price we buy the MSG at and the shopping credit.  I have been working with Scott Reneicke and Nicole Schwartz and am planning to file an intervention on behalf of Enron and contest the calculation of the 20% (which includes affiliate transactions) and the argument to not increase the percentage spread and any other arguments Scott may identify. 

Given circumstances, I am assuming that since this is something I can handle, I should do so as opposed to involving outside counsel.

Unless I hear otherwise, I will proceed.

Janine

Attached please find the Nov GA report.  Please call with any questions.

Jim

 

Mike --

I'm guessing that Sue and/or Jeff have responded.  The short answer is that there are going to be a number of legal tests before we are "completely" in the clear.

Jim

I heard that the CPUC and/or the utilities have taken the position that any amendment to a contract after 9/20, like a pricing amendment, is a new contract entered after 9/20 and therefore invalid.  Is this true?  Does this hold any water?

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Erin Perrigo, Manager of Policy

DATE: October 31, 2001

RE: EPSA Leave-Behind on Market-Based Rate Authority
      ?Conference Call on Friday, November 2nd at 11:00 a.m.
       (EST)

Last Friday, we held a conference call to discuss EPSA's position on possible changes to FERC's market-based rate authorization standard and the Commission's recently released staff report outlining several alternatives to the currently used hub-and-spoke method.  Please review the attached draft, which has been extensively revised based on last week's call.  We have scheduled a conference call on Friday, November 2nd at 11:00 a.m. (EST) to discuss this draft and hope to be able to go forward after that call.  To access the call, please dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA Call. If you have any questions, comments or edits before the call, please contact Julie Simon at 202-628-8200 or jsimon@epsa.org.

Attachment

 - MBR leave behind draft 2.doc 

Thanks.  

Let's get together (just you and I) and figure out how we can make sure our teams are working together.  I am sure that you don't want to worry about this stuff any more than I do.  How about for 15 minutes after the EES Op Comm on Monday?

Jim
Looks like we are OK.

Evan,

I copy of the Bond Extension Certification was sent to the ICC (Donnal Caton) today.  Again, this certificate was orginally sent on 5/11/01.

Have A Good Weekend!

Craig

fyi -- please assist Gloria with this request.

Thanks,

Evan

Evan, If EES Services Group has the EES Illinois bond expiring June 2002, please send a copy to the Illinois Commerce Commission for Enron's files.

Thanks,
Gloria

This is a quick recap from the Services Group perspective.  I have asked Rebecca Fite to get with Gloria and try and connect what appears to be a disconnect.

Thanks,

Evan

Evan,

Attached is a matrix that identifies our current State Licenses.  We work directly with EES Legal for license renewals and new registrations.  As Craig has indicated below, our records indicate we are current for both Licensing and Bond Requirements in Illinois at a State Level.

As EES is currently pursuing Supplier Billing Option (SBO) behind Commonwealth Edison, we will have to comply with the credit worthiness requirements outlined by Gloria, but my understanding of her email indicates we currently meet these standards and will only be required to supply funds in the event our credit rating drops further.

 << File: certificationsEESI.ppt >>  << File: certificationsEEMC.ppt >> 

Please feel free to contact either of us with questions.

Regards,
Rebecca
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Craig Shields
11/08/2001 03:48 PM
Evan,

As you know, the license application function was migrated to the Service Desk in August 2001.  This activity was previously maintained by Beth Gooden.  In any case, our records show that EES is current and compliant.  EES was granted a retail license in August 1999.  To maintain the license, EES must submit an annual "Re-certification" and keep a bond current.  A Re-certification application was submitted on 1/31/01 and the  bond was extended through 6/1/02.

I hope this answers your concerns.  Please don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions and/or require further information.

Craig

Had a call from Tribolet.  He agrees (as does Lisa M.) that we need to rationalize our California legal support.  Can we outline our key cases?  Also, my opinion is to continue to use Mike Day but have YOU as the only "point of contact" for approval of work.  Let's talk today.  We will need to talk with Vicki.

Jim

Documents developed for NARUC by Janel, etal.

Jim
 
For the NARUC Conference next week...
 
 

Glenn Thomas was the chief guy in the Gov office during PECO but was relatively quiet.  He is now the Chair of the PaPUC.  He will probably just discuss how wonderful a job PA is doing.  I don't think that he'll want to pick on Calif.  If you want to talk with him prior to the meeting, I can give him a call or Steve Montovano can arrange something.

Jim

Did governor Jessie eliminate the role in Minnesota?  I believe that it's the equivalent of a state historian.  Thanks for the feedback.

Best,
Jeff

Jeff--so what is a state librarian?  Must be a west coast kind of specialty!!

With regard to Glen Thomas, I believe that he is the newly appointed chair who was previously Governor Tom Ridge's policy guy in the governor's office. I think he is pretty young (early thirties) and that he still has strong ties in that office and should be vocal on markets working and political leadership (the right kind!) being neccesary.  Steffes might be able to give you more insight, but if my recollection is right, he wasn't involved in the early PECO fights--I think he came on the scene a little later. 
On October 4th, I'll be trying to fill Rob Bradley's rather large shoes at the Cal State University Center for California Studies' 13th annual envisioning California conference, "Our Year of Disconnect:  The Politics of Power in California."

I'll be participating in a Roundtable at the plenary session entitled: "Lessons Learned, Unlearned & To Be Learned:  A Roundtable on California's Utility Deregulation."

The Roundtable will be moderated by the State Librarian, Kevin Starr.  The other roundtable-ists include:

Chuck Cicchetti (Edison plant?  Anyone know what he's up to these days?)
Bob Foster--Edison
Nettie Hoge--head of TURN
Glen Thomas--Chair of the Pennsylvania PUC (any info on Chair Thomas is appreciated)
State Senator Debra Bowen
David Freeman--Self-appointed emporer
Dr. Joseph Pratt--History prof., University of Houston (any info on the professor is also appreciated)

Each of us will have two minutes to open and then Dr. Starr will moderate the ensuing mud-slinging.

Attached are some draft talking points that I threw together for your review.  All comments, suggestions, guffaws, etc. are welcome and appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

 << File: CSU Rountable draft talking points 0927.doc >> 

FYI

FYI

        Erin,=20
        Thanks for the advance copy of the paper.  While there are a number=
 of very good points made in the paper, Williams has a fundamental problem =
with EPSA endorsing a new market power test that is more stringent than we =
think is necessary.  We would recommend that EPSA support the Limited Compe=
ting Supplier Test, or perhaps simply take the position in option 5 (no tes=
t for bid-based markets operated by an ISO or RTO).  We simply believe that=
 EPSA should not be "negotiating with itself" at this juncture.  That is, w=
e should not assume that the majority of the Commissioners are with Massey.=
  We should use this paper to argue to the other Commissioners and staff th=
at if they move off Hub and Spoke, they only need to move incrementally, no=
t dramatically.  In making this recommendation we recognize that this may n=
ot be enough for FERC and we may not like what we end up with.  But William=
s is simply not prepared to support a position we really don't agree with i=
n the hope that we can avoid an even worse result.  I particularly recall L=
inda Breathitt's reservations about these issues (voiced at the meeting a m=
onth ago) and am hopeful that we can influence Wood and Brownell in this re=
gard.

        The language that reiterates EPSA's position that FERC's primary fo=
cus should be on getting market design right is very well done.  Also the a=
rguments on why it would be disastrous to condition our market based rate a=
uthority is well done and timely.

        We recognize that EPSA has been working on this issue for weeks now=
, but this is not a simple issue and we have needed this time to think it t=
hrough.  We appreciate your efforts and believe this is an important issue =
for EPSA.   Thanks, Judy Neason

Attached is the last draft of the MBR paper from Boston Pacific.  We are no=
t sending it to the entire group at this point - but would like provide tho=
se who have been most active an opportunity to see it one more time.  We'd =
like to have all comments by tomorrow, COB.

-Erin=20

Erin N. Perrigo=20
Manager of Policy=20
Electric Power Supply Association=20
1401 New York Ave., NW=20
11th Floor=20
Washington, DC  20005=20
p)  202.628.8200=20
f)   202.628.8260=20
eperrigo@epsa.org

That's good.

Jim

Contrary to what we expected, Enron's Billing Dispute Complaint against SCE
has been assigned to Commissioner Duque and ALJ Timothy Sullivan.  Although
the complaint against PG&E has not been officially assigned, I would expect
it to follow suit.  Both SCE's and PG&E's answers to the complaints are due
on October 17th.

Jeanne Bennett   

Agreed.
 
 

Seems that, at a minimum, ARM should join, if it doesn't already plan to.  And we should also consider joining ourselves, since it is low cost to do so, and pretty cost issue for our book.  Thoughts?

FYI
ALJ Pulsifer  --  Pursuant to your instructions at today's PHC, this is to
inform you and the parties that CLECA will file a Motion to Strike portions
of the testimony of TURN witness Marcus and PG&E witness Kuga that address
the creation of specific fees or charges on direct access customers.  That
issue is specifically before Comm. Wood and ALJ Barnett in A.98-07-003 and
it is not appropriately part of the inter-utility allocation of DWR costs
that is the subject of this proceeding.  I believe that other customer
groups will join CLECA in that filing, which we plan to make on Tuesday when
the Commission opens for business.  William Booth

Did we want to get off the Creditors Comm.

Enron has been replaced by Reliant Energy Services, Inc.

 

Stephen L. Johnson
Attorney
United States Department of Justice
Office of the U.S. Trustee
250 Montgomery Street, Suite 1000
San Francisco, CA 94104 

415-705-3333 tel.
415-705-3379 fax
stephen.johnson2@usdoj.gov

Your thoughts??

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
      Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
           John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
           Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
           Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE: 11/9/2001

RE: EPSA Draft Comments on Pipeline Capacity Recall
      NOPR
?			Comments due November 19th
?	Conference Call November 14th
?
As discussed on the last Gas Issues Working Group conference call, attached are draft EPSA comments on FERC's Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NOPR) on pipeline capacity recall.  EPSA opposes the NOPR because it (a) will reduce competition in the secondary market for transportation services and (b) may reduce the pipeline operational flexibility needed by electric generators.   Thus, EPSA urges the Commission not to impose a broad based recall requirement throughout the natural gas industry but rather gain experience with this difficult issue in individual Order No. 637 proceedings.

Please review the draft and forward any comments or proposed changes to the draft to Jack Cashin at EPSA at jcashin@epsa.org by noon on Thursday, November 15th so that we can make a timely filing by Monday, November 19th.  EPSA will hold a conference call on Wednesday, November 14th, at 1:00 P.M. (EST) to discuss the draft.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.

Attachment

 - GasDayaheadRechallNOPR DRAFT.DOC 

Here is the note.

FYI.  The Harvard Electricity Policy Group maintains a web page with recent
papers on "Standard Market Design" for restructured electricity
markets.  You can reach this page at:

http://ksgwww.harvard.edu/hepg/standard_mkt_dsgn.htm

The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission has announced plans for a
rulemaking proceeding on a standard market design.  You may find these
papers of use.

If you have or know of other papers or links that might be included, please
let us know.

Bill Hogan

William W. Hogan
John F. Kennedy School of Government
Harvard University
79 John F. Kennedy Street
Cambridge, MA 02138
617-495-1317 (o)
617-495-1635 (f)
william_hogan@harvard.edu
www.whogan.com
or
http://www.ksg.harvard.edu/whogan

Any issues for the P/Ls or for Tim Belden in the West?

Jim

I received a call this evening from our V&E regulatory counsel (Adam Wenner) who received a call from Dynegy's regulatory attorney, Dan King, about the need for both companies to making filings at FERC to notify FERC of the proposed acquisition and to state that, during the pendency of the acquisition, both companies will treat each other as if the two were already merged (i.e., the standards of conduct and affilate rules will apply).  

Under FERC's regulations, as of the date of the agreement, Enron and Dynegy must conduct themselves as if they are already merged.  Therefore, Enron can no longer enter into transactions with Illinois Power to buy or sell power absent FERC approval under section 205 of the Federal Power Act, and Dynegy cannot enter into transactions with Portland General absent prior FERC approval.  With regard to the sale and purchase of non-power goods and services, all non-power goods and services provided by Illinois Power to Enron must be priced at the higher of cost or market. Any non-power goods or services provided by Enron to IP must be priced at a level that does not exceed market price.

We will work with the attorneys to make these filings, but we wanted you to know as soon as possible that we need to stop power sales and purchases with Illinois Power (if we were doing any) and can only enter into transactions with them with prior FERC approval.

We will send a draft of the FERC filing to you for review.  Please let us know if this restriction causes problems for you (e.g., you have existing or forward contracts with IP that are in effect or are scheduled to go into effect during the pendency of the acquisition).

Let us know if you have any questions.

Sarah

FYI. 
 
Also, does the same obligation present itself in Illinois?  Are there any restricitions or obligations on EES as a marketer in IP territory?

Jim
I received a call this evening from our V&E regulatory counsel (Adam Wenner) who received a call from Dynegy's regulatory attorney, Dan King, about the need for both companies to making filings at FERC to notify FERC of the proposed acquisition and to state that, during the pendency of the acquisition, both companies will treat each other as if the two were already merged (i.e., the standards of conduct and affilate rules will apply).  

Under FERC's regulations, as of the date of the agreement, Enron and Dynegy must conduct themselves as if they are already merged.  Therefore, Enron can no longer enter into transactions with Illinois Power to buy or sell power absent FERC approval under section 205 of the Federal Power Act, and Dynegy cannot enter into transactions with Portland General absent prior FERC approval.  With regard to the sale and purchase of non-power goods and services, all non-power goods and services provided by Illinois Power to Enron must be priced at the higher of cost or market. Any non-power goods or services provided by Enron to IP must be priced at a level that does not exceed market price.

We will work with the attorneys to make these filings, but we wanted you to know as soon as possible that we need to stop power sales and purchases with Illinois Power (if we were doing any) and can only enter into transactions with them with prior FERC approval.

We will send a draft of the FERC filing to you for review.  Please let us know if this restriction causes problems for you (e.g., you have existing or forward contracts with IP that are in effect or are scheduled to go into effect during the pendency of the acquisition).

Let us know if you have any questions.

Sarah

FYI.

Jim

PennFuture's E-cubed is a commentary biweekly email publication concerning the current themes and trends in the energy market.
Straight to the Source

Last year when PECO Energy and Unicom merged to form Exelon it was big news. Importantly, the merger settlement provided $32 million to fund the development of renewable energy in Pennsylvania.

This year, the company's wholesale trading and marketing unit, Power Team, presented renewable energy advocates with a big surprise - signing long-term contracts to purchase the output of three new wind farms in Pennsylvania. These contracts were not required as part of the merger settlement, and are not included in the $32 million earmarked for renewable energy funding.

Now a key force in renewable energy development in the East, the Power Team contracts are essential to bringing 78 MW of generation online from these new wind farms, two of which will be operational next month. The 15 MW Mill Run wind farm is scheduled to being operation next week, and the 9 MW Somerset wind farm is scheduled to begin commercial operation the following week.

Mike Freeman, the Power Team trader who made the burgeoning wind energy business in Pennsylvania possible, gave us some insight into Exelon's renewable energy commitment as well as how wind energy can be integrated into America's power grids.
All of the wind is Green-e certifiable as "new" resources. All of the landfill methane is qualified under Green-e, but only 10 MW is new generation. Of the hydro, all of the generation is in larger projects that have been or are eligible for certification under the low-impact hydro standards. The MSW and tire projects are not qualified under Green-e, but the biomass plant is.

Why is Power Team developing a renewable portfolio?
There were two principal reasons: a perceived demand for renewable energy products in the wholesale marketplace, and a desire to diversify our portfolio from the perspectives of fuel, emissions, and cost.

Was there internal resistance or other issues to overcome?
I think the initial reaction was that renewable projects would be a very minor sidelight to our overall business. I don't think many people paid attention to the implications of renewable portfolio standards or external corporate mandates for renewable purchases. Part of the hands-off approach was due to, I believe, a sense that renewable products only meant the re-packaging of existing generation, not changing the power system in any way.

Over time I think many people got comfortable with the idea that the creation of products potentially could initiate new projects that would change the power system. For me that's the most important part of our participation - to help encourage new development. I also think that management began to get comfortable with the idea that renewable energy products could be profitable, and that demand for these products could be sustaining.

Will this encourage new development?
Generators get a creditworthy counter-party that is not only willing to buy all of the energy at the generator location, but is also willing to talk about additional new projects. Over time, other market intermediaries such as power marketers and retail suppliers may become interested in doing the same. If this chain of events occurs, I think we may even see renewable credits traded over the counter, just like other energy products now.

How do renewables fit into Power Team's overall business strategy?
We are a growth company and are constantly in search of ways to sensibly increase our overall generating portfolio. So bringing on new renewable generation into our supply mix really is part of that overall strategy. More specifically, we believe there is sustainable demand for renewable energy, not only because of mandates such as renewable portfolio standards, but also because of natural demand. The average person may not think of it this way, but in supporting the idea of paying a premium for renewable energy I think that people implicitly are accepting the notion that renewable energy is an essential component of how we as a country intend to manage our future energy requirements.

Why Wind?
There's no question that the momentum for wind projects began to build as a result of the PECO restructuring and merger settlements, under which PECO provided funds for new wind projects. A second reason is that the forward electric markets began a steep upward climb beginning in 1998, and especially the off-peak power market beginning in 2000 and continuing into this year. A third reason was the rapid increase in electric demand in the last five years, and a realization that we need to develop a wide-ranging set of answers to meeting the demand, including supply-side and demand-side solutions. We felt that wind generation could play a role on the supply side while meeting what seems to be a growing demand for renewable sources.

What are the primary financial considerations for a wind deal?
The first is probably the need for a long-term contract. Wind generators typically want to enter into fixed-price, long-term agreements to make it easier and cheaper to borrow money and to provide a stable revenue source over a long period. We don't have a problem with long-term deals per se, although we do want to emphasize diversity in our contracting as well. We don't want to hold multiple long-term agreements and nothing else.

In my discussions with generators so far, there has been some flexibility on contract length. In fact, our willingness to enter into a long-term contract is perhaps the key ingredient to getting a wind project financed and built. Beyond the long-term contract, the wind developers want to do business with a creditworthy company that has an investment-grade rating. Exelon Generation is rated A- by S&P so we are a natural counter-party for project financing. Right now, there are not very many long term buyers out there with the kind of credit-worthiness that we have.

Will that always will be the case?
No. If we're right about long-lasting demand, I think other large companies, including distribution companies, will participate in the purchase of energy from these projects. We've teamed up with a retail marketer, Community Energy, to stimulate demand and market wind energy in ways that will move companies to buy it. In the development of conventional generation, it is not always necessary to enter into 20-year agreements for a project to get built. For example, a developer may want to hedge off a portion of the output on a long-term basis but will be willing to sell the rest of the output for shorter periods. And in some cases, the financing source may be comfortable with a shorter-term agreement for the whole thing.

Is there a financial advantage for wind?
If one's view is that the future value of energy is higher than the present value, a generation source with no fuel risk obviously is good to have. Wind has one key advantage over other resources - perpetual availability without any fuel costs or price volatility. This helps mitigate the other risks that wind does present.

It is of course difficult to predict what will happen even in the near term. But I am a believer in broad trends or cycles that are relatively easier to project, outside of significant advances in technology. Over a long period of time, 15 or 20 years, I think the probability of fixed-price wind energy riding out the low cycles while providing a greater amount of benefits in the high cycles is higher than the opposite.

I do believe that the demand for wind generation will be sustained at a moderate premium over generic electricity prices for the next 15 to 20 years.

Is it difficult to integrate wind into your portfolio?
With conventional generation and firm transmission paths, a power marketing entity such as Power Team can bring its resources to the highest markets, whether they are hourly, daily, monthly, or longer. Such transactions are supported by a complex communications network that notifies transmission providers of the timing, amount and ultimate sink of expected output.

The contracts that we enter into on conventional generators depend to a great extent on economic structures that ensure as much as possible that the generator will fulfill our dispatch schedule as close to 100% of the time as possible, so we can avoid the punitive imbalance fees that transmission providers impose when delivered energy doesn't match scheduled energy. The approach we take on wind generation must be quite different, because wind plants provide intermittent output that is difficult to predict within reasonable boundaries of accuracy.

I think the serious wind developers know we are serious about incorporating wind energy into our portfolio. We're one of the biggest physical movers of power in the country and have a significant amount of assets - that must count for something in terms of our ability to more easily integrate a 50 MW wind project into our overall mix.

How does intermittent generation add complexity?
A wind farm generates electricity when the wind blows, not when you flip the switch on. It takes a lot more than I expected to accommodate intermittency, even for an experienced organization like ours, because the transmission system and the operational rules and procedures were not developed with wind generation in mind. You don't have the ability to give transmission providers real-time information for purposes of regulating the system between supply and demand.

In PJM, where generators can offer increments of generation on a day-ahead or real-time basis, and receive (or pay) market-clearing prices depending on actual generation, wind energy can be offered into the system in one of several different ways without experiencing significant imbalance penalties. An obstacle, and we're working with PJM on this right now, is that PJM as the transmission provider typically requires no shorter than 20-minute notice when self-scheduled or must-run generators expect to produce electricity or expect to stop producing electricity. For purposes of regulating the system, PJM then has the ability to tell the self-scheduled generator to go ahead and generate, or to hold off until the energy is needed as a result of the real-time balance of supply and demand.

This will not be practical with wind generation. We'd literally have to assign a trader to the task of monitoring highly suspect expected output from our wind plants and then calling PJM every hour to determine what to do. In the must-run scenario, we'd still have to notify PJM of expected output so PJM can regulate the system with other generators. Either way, we'd have to predict output, which is a dicey
proposition.

Does that make wind generation unreliable?
Not at all. We've got excellent modeling to predict the output from wind generation over a longer period of time, such as a full year. Those predictions underlie our contracts. But it's another thing to tell the wind when to blow. The wind energy industry is working on this from the perspective of improved wind forecasting and a more automated approach than what I've described. In PJM, a 54,000 MW system, this may not seem to be a problem when there is only about 25 MW of wind generation in the system right now, but PJM wants to institute market rules that will be appropriate for a larger amount of wind generation when it arrives. A certain magnitude of wind generation will cause PJM to change the way it now regulates the system.

The complexity cannot be underestimated and we will be part of the solution.

How can scheduling and other rules  better accommodate intermittent resources like wind?
An alternative is for the transmission provider to model the output from a wind plant as "negative" load instead of generation. Which is to say, when the plant is generating electricity, the system load will be reduced by the amount the plant is generating. When the plant is not generating, the load will increase. A tradeoff of that approach is that load typically pays ancillary services expenses such as regulation and spinning reserve. In this unique circumstance, which of the ancillary services apply to negative load, and at what level? We're working with PJM on these questions.

I'm uncertain whether a significant amount of so-called negative load will require any kind of real-time notice to the transmission provider. Of course the transmission systems are operated to react to the unpredictability of load, and one can view the unpredictability of wind generation in the same way. Other countries, and the western U.S. transmission systems, have figured out how to handle large amounts of wind generation, and so can we.

Are you working on other approaches?
Another possibility is to dynamically schedule the output from a wind plant that is situated in a control area without a real-time energy market, to a control area that does have such a market. The output signal from the plant would be available to the transmission provider in the second control area on an automated basis.  The output then becomes part of available supply from moment to moment. However, notice requirements would not be sidestepped with this approach.

Will PJM resolve these problems?
Yes. PJM is progressive and innovative, and has indicated to us that they are willing to work with us to find solutions to the scheduling/imbalance issue. It's hard now because we're breaking new ground. I expect that it will be much easier for the next projects developed.

How big might your renewable portfolio get? Will you keep signing more contracts for new projects?
As long as we continue to see demand for renewable energy, we'll continue to look at projects where there are energy markets whose long-term forward economics support the purchase of energy. I'd like to aggregate a significant amount of wind generation in a single market, such as PJM, to be able to provide PJM with a more diversified supply curve - with multiple projects it may be possible to smooth the output.

We need to do business with companies that have the financing and the organizational will to get these projects completed. We are looking to form relationships with companies that we can build on. If we execute a contract successfully, we'd like to apply the same concepts to additional projects with the same company. Examples of that are Atlantic Renewable Energy Corp. and National Wind Power.

What are some key developments to make the industry grow faster?
We need technological efficiencies to drive down the cost of the equipment, standardized approaches to the transmission of wind generation, financial innovations to allow more risk-sharing, and hybrid approaches such as wind and energy storage.

Perhaps most importantly, we need consumers to buy the wind energy!

PennFuture (www.pennfuture.org), with offices in Harrisburg, Philadelphia and Pittsburgh, is a statewide public interest membership organization, which advances policies to protect and improve the state's environment and economy. PennFuture's activities include litigating cases before regulatory bodies and in local, state and federal courts, advocating and advancing legislative action on a state and federal level, public education and assisting citizens in public advocacy.

To unsubscribe, simply reply to this email with "unsubscribe" in the subject.

 - vol3no18_92601.doc 

A couple of thoughts --

1.=09NG is trying to schedule a meeting in Columbus either Dec 4 or Dec 5.

2.=09I did speak with Ashley.  He indicated that NG has no specific inclina=
tion to avoid LMP in the real-time.  He did not, however, confirm that NG w=
as indifferent.

3.=09I am very concerned with the implication that Mike highlights in his p=
oint #1.  NG may simply have misstated its intentions.  But clearly this po=
sition makes it difficult for NG to join MISO under Appendix I (they would =
be giving up too much).

4.=09I agree that what NG is really saying is a for-profit RTO with ownersh=
ip of some (but not necessarily all) transmission plant in its footprint.

5.=09Let's try and coordinate our discussions with Paul Dawson in the Londo=
n office to gather his thoughts on NG in the UK market.

Luiz -  Can you please develop some questions / talking points based on the=
 attached comments that we can transmit to Ashley Brown prior to the meetin=
g?

Thanks

Just been through the paper and have the following thoughts or concerns dep=
ending on your viewpoint:

1.  The model is inconsistent with the approach taken by FERC.  NG propose =
that every transco. sets its own rates, runs its own OASIS and manages cong=
estion....how can this ensure 'seamless practices' within each RTO footprin=
t?  I suggest the opposite will occur, that is balkanization.  For example,=
 Transco's can join MISO under Appendix I, and a number are proposing to do=
 so.  Based on NG's proposed split of functions each transco. could join MI=
SO with its own tx rates, OASIS platform and congestion protocol regardless=
 of whether they are consistent.  Under this scenario transmission rates an=
d markets would remain balkanized and vary depending on transmission compan=
y geographic reach (similar to today).
2.  NG state that the benefit of a 'for profit' entity is that it can and w=
ill manage risk commercially, i agree!  However NG miss the point here....I=
f an RTO/ISO is a non profit organisation, it will only provide services su=
ch as tariff admin., OASIS and congestion management (such an RTO will not =
own tx. assets...the tx. companies that it provides services on behalf of w=
ill continue to do so!).  In providing these services the RTO/ISO only mana=
ges risk associated with non provision of service, not the underlying trans=
mission delivery risk.  The transmission companies, for whom the RTO provid=
es services, will continue to be 'for profit entities' and will continue to=
 manage risks commercially (RTO benefits result primarily from aggregation =
of services not from more appropriate commercial risk management...there is=
 nothing to stop tx. owners from managing risk more effectively regardless =
of proposed RTO structure.  For example NG as a transco., Translink or Cine=
rgy transmission could propose liquidated damage clauses for overselling fi=
rm transmission under the non profit RTO structure.  Likewise NG as transco=
 and RTO could make the same proposal).  Commercial form is a second order =
issue!
3.  NG should have concentrated on supporting FERC policy (4 RTO's) rather =
than stating one parties view on separation of RTO functions between profit=
/non profit entities.  FERC policy suggests that the key structural issues =
are; increasing market size (4 regional markets) and third party access ('l=
evel playing field').  This was the basis for the CGM proposal that came ou=
t of the SE mediation.  Separating CM and OATT admin. from planning and sec=
urity coord. improves third party access to real time information which in =
turn will facilitate market based investment decision making (being investm=
ent in transmission, generation or DSM).  Suggesting that transmission inve=
stment is necessary to resolve existing transmission constraints either sho=
ws ignorance or more likely the conflict that NG has...i suggest that inves=
tment in generation or DSM could resolve the problems just as adequately.
4.  The model seems to be based on the assumption that transmission charges=
 will continue to be based on 'contract path' (congestion managed through r=
edispatch).  I assume that NG, and other transmission companies, prefer thi=
s approach as it allows them to both maximise cash returns (above appropria=
te regulated rates) and control information that facilitates new investment=
 (retain monopoly).  I agree with Jim that this suggests a physical approac=
h to congestion management.  NG's concept that third parties can 'energy ma=
rkets' is consistent with the ARTO approach (i.e. allowing an APX to provid=
e day ahead market functions for example).  I would propose that a transco.=
 should not care what tx. charging methodology was in place as long as it i=
s perceived to be reasonable by customers and receives its aggregate regula=
ted revenue requirement.  Thus CM and OATT administration are not core tran=
sco. functions at all...

In summary, I suggest that NG actually propose the paper to reflect a 'for =
profit' RTO but they do not state this anywhere (even if true, they do not =
state anywhere that a transco. should have consistent OATT and CM protocols=
 if the assets they own are non contiguous or the transco. has a number of =
owners). I agree with Luiz that in this form it is a hard sell and does not=
 resolve Enron's ongoing concerns...

regards
Mike
 =20
Jim

As per your request, I examined the attached doc (Response of National Grid=
 US to Questions posed by the  Com << File: National Grid Transco White Pap=
er.doc >> m ission)

My initial reaction is:

1) The simple answer to your question is: yes, I think the proposed governa=
nce and organization structure can live with an LMP model. I am not familia=
r with other MISO CM model, but at least in terms of LMP, my feeling is tha=
t those are not mutually exclusive. It may be worth asking Ashley Brown

2) National Grid and other proponents of For-Profit-Transcos may have other=
 ideas on how to manage congestions (e.g. different reliability level produ=
cts by customer segment). However, the attached paper makes no allusion to =
avoid LMP and to introduce other congestion management models. The paper do=
es not imply a physical model either. Your feeling may be right, but it doe=
s not surface from the paper per se.

3) National Grid proposal is, in fact, an expanded version of the Southeast=
 Model proposed at the Mediation. It reinforces the role of the Transco Com=
pany, preempting, to some extent, the role of the System Admininstrator. Th=
is was a very controversial topic in the mediation: the System Adminstrator=
 was in charge of some functions to avoid potential bias.  (particularly fr=
om transmission companies who are not willing/able to transfer their T asse=
ts)

4) National Grid will face a lot of resistance when selling this idea; Your=
 concerns on generation redispatch and long term transmission planning are =
"surfaced" in the paper, by creating a concept of "core vs. additional" fun=
ctions and a chinese wall, if necessary.  But the perception of potential b=
ias does exist. National Grid will probably face a lot of difficulty in " s=
elling"  this idea. Particularly when we get to the details

LM

FYI.  If we were to ask NG, could they live with the MISO CM/market model??

Thanks.

NG proposal for "splitting" work between Transco and other parties.  Don't =
think they do a great job of managing the key fears - (1) generation redisp=
atch and (2) long-term transmission plant over generation investments. =20

As I read this document, I get the strange feeling that NG is a physical-ri=
ght player.  Meaning, NG needs to build a model based on physical flows so =
they can control (a) TTC/ATC and (b) use of non-firm transmission. =20

While the NG letter states that the "functions related to energy markets ca=
n be performed by a disinterested third-party", NG specifically reserves as=
 a Core Function the "Ability to propose congestion pricing methodology".  =
Sure APX could go in and operate the balancing and CM system, but NG has th=
e right to design subject to FERC procedures.

Not sure what you guys think? =20

I will probably get back to Ashley Brown later this week.

Jim

Attached please find a copy of the paper entitled "Response of National Gri=
d USA to Questions Posed by the Commission" for your review.

=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidenti=
al and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e=
-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended t=
o be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an inten=
ded recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify=
 me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of =
this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D
 - National Grid Transco White Paper.doc << File: National Grid Transco Whi=
te Paper.doc >>

Jackie --

Pls send me a copy of the report.

Thx.

We will be holding a conference call on Friday, November 16th at 1:00 p.m. EST to discuss the proposal from Boston Pacific for a cost-benefit study of a southeastern RTO.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA call.  If you need another copy of the proposal, please contact Jackie Gallagher at 202-628-8200.

Mike --

EPMI is the QSE.  As long as our customers don't mind that we are deciding their congestion charges internally, then this should work.  My concern was that our customers would balk at Enron deciding how much of our costs they should pay?

Jim

Jim--when you get back I'd like to make sure this analysis fits your understanding of congestion in TX.  Thanks.  MDS
We should have no problem with the pass through of congestion in Texas.  The QSE receives a charge for our entire load and then allocates it to our load of a pro rata basis.  We then pass through these costs to the customer.  This is the same way we do things in the NE and the only way we can pass through intrazonal congestion.  If you would like to discuss this further, please give me a call at 33143. Thanks.

-Joe

Guys --

I understand the differences.  Becky is going to get on the EPSA call tomorrow and tell them that we are ok with the NOPR (and will file as such) and that EPSA should make sure to not blow up the NOPR (or try).  Becky if EPSA wants complete agreement, then they shouldn't file.  Grab me if you want to talk.

Jim

Jim -- Leslie responded that ENA's comments are in favor of the NOPR, as long as the shipper and released-to-customer agree on the terms and subject to legitimate pipeline operational (accounting/balancing) concerns (which accommodate the pipelines' concerns).  Therefore, ENA is taking a different position than EPSA.  Furthermore, EPSA's comments include Dynegy comments against the NOPR.

I agree with ENA's position.  Is this something that EPSA would want agreement of all members to file?  Also, it seems that ENA's approach is consistent with being allowed to make something you purchased into a product that your customer wants.

FYI.  

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
      Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
           John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
           Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
           Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE: 11/9/2001

RE: EPSA Draft Comments on Pipeline Capacity Recall    
      NOPR 
?			Comments due November 19th
?	Conference Call November 14th
?	
As discussed on the last Gas Issues Working Group conference call, attached are draft EPSA comments on FERC's Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NOPR) on pipeline capacity recall.  EPSA opposes the NOPR because it (a) will reduce competition in the secondary market for transportation services and (b) may reduce the pipeline operational flexibility needed by electric generators.   Thus, EPSA urges the Commission not to impose a broad based recall requirement throughout the natural gas industry but rather gain experience with this difficult issue in individual Order No. 637 proceedings. 

Please review the draft and forward any comments or proposed changes to the draft to Jack Cashin at EPSA at jcashin@epsa.org by noon on Thursday, November 15th so that we can make a timely filing by Monday, November 19th.  EPSA will hold a conference call on Wednesday, November 14th, at 1:00 P.M. (EST) to discuss the draft.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  

Attachment

My initial take is to keep engaged through Perrino.  I'll try and make the call this Thursday.

Jim

Attached is a work plan for a 3-RTO working group (known as SSG-WI) to develop a market monitoring plan for CAISO, RTO West, and WestConnect.  It is turning into the (western) United Nations of Market Monitoring.  According to the attached plan, "This work plan is structured to first agree on the MME's authority and responsibilities, and then focus on the best structure to effectuate the agreement.  "  

We need to quickly decide our level of participation.  Dave participated in a meeting last week and it got them to not send out biased meeting notes. To actually steer the BPA-CAISO train into something we live with, however, will take a lot of work.  I suggest that we bring this up on our next "Western" call.  That being said, I will be on a plane on Thurs morning.  (Ray, could we have the Thursday call at 8:30/10:30/11:30 PST/CDT/EST??)

Alan

Hi --

Here's the revised work plan that incorporates Steve's comments.  (I've added a meeting and moved forward some of our "resolution"
dates.  I've also inserted a meeting location rotation.)  I've attached both a red-line and clean version of the work plan.

I think this is ready to go, although everyone might want to take one last look (especially as it sets out an aggressive schedule).
Steve, I assume you'll take care of forwarding the meeting notes and the work plan to SSG-WI.  Let me know if there is anything else
I can do to help.

Thanks!  Kristi

"Greenleaf, Steve" wrote:

> Ollie and others,
>
> As shown in the attached, I have accepted your (ollie's) changes and just
> added the reference to FERC's "State-Federal Panels".  With that, I think
> we're good to go.  I'll wait and hear from Kristi on the work plan, then I
> think we can pass this info along to SSG-WI.  Sound reasonable?
>

Donna --

I'd say that it is a commercial matter.  Try and push the bill back.  I know that Paul says his RC is closed but someone above him has to have some $$.

Jim

Jean --

Why not ask Marianne Carroll to draft a short note on the current status of the docket and likely outcomes/timing?  Thanks.

There have been settlement discussions at the PUCT, however, since we have not been a party I have not participated in any of the discussions.  Jean would be in the best location to get details since Marianne Carroll has been representing Dynegy and others.

Texas folks:  The East desk originators would like to know the current status of QFs with PURPA put contracts in Texas and how QSEs can provide scheduling services to these entities.  They said that customers have told them that this issue is being discussed in ERCOT now.

I am aware of the FERC decision last year that precluded the TX PUC from basically abrogating the PURPA contracts.  We circulated that decision to the originators and traders at that time. 

Thanks.

My number is 713-853-7673.

See you Tuesday.

Sounds good.  Shoot me your number and I will call you that morning.  My
direct is 713-844-6403 and my cell is 713-826-7516.  See you next Tuesday.

How about Tuesday the 20th?  Should be relatively slow.

Jim

>  -----Original Message-----

Nancy --

1.	Are we able to vote?
2.	If yes to #1, what is your recommendation for our vote?

Thanks,

Jim
FYI!  This is a note that was sent out to the UBP membership for vote.

As discussed during Friday's conference call, we're sending out the overall
governance documents asap for an email vote of affirmation by August 31st.
Scott has provided the revised documents.

Does the following statement to our membership do the job??   If you have
any changes / suggestions, please provide them by Wednesday, as I will send
out this email by the end of Wednesday.

The risk of asking for this is:  What if we don't get an affirmative vote??
The risk of not asking for this may be worse.
I don't expect a unanimous affirmation based upon recent events.

Charlie
_______________________________________________________________________

Members of UBP-RSB,

The attached documents represent the basis of organizational design
development for a Retail Standards Board per the original charge of this
organization.  The versions of the documents attached here reflect the
changes identified in discussions during our Baltimore meeting on July 23rd.
Your Governance Committee needs you to confirm that these documents now
state our intentions and the design needs of a Retail Standards Board before
we can reasonably proceed with detail organizational design efforts.

As the Governance Committee's work proceeds, the organizational design may
evolve slightly as the high level view of these documents does not contain
every design requirement or anticipate every contingency.  There may be
issues that arise in developing an inclusive organization that need your
further attention.  As, or if, such issues arise, the GC will seek your
input.

For now, please provide an email response which indicates either that

a)  your company agrees with and supports the Statement of Structure and the
membership's revisions to Strawman 2 as described in the attached documents,

     or

b)  your company cannot support the Statement of Structure and the
membership's revisions to Strawman 2 as described in the attached documents.

Please provide your response no later than August 31, 2001.

UBP voting rules will be applied in this instance.

Charles L. Driggs
Chair, Governance Committee

Manager, Gas Operations & Planning
Conectiv Power Delivery -- Gas
630 MLK Boulevard
mail stop 88MK62
Wilmington, Delaware  19899-0231

office   (302) 429-3194    cell phone  (302) 229-4515    fax  (302) 429-3207

 

We need to discuss the economics of this on our book (assuming that these costs hit our pocket and not our customers).

Jim

Talked to John Fielder (SVP at the utility) this morning in an attempt to determine if Edison will come around and pay us the PX credit they owe us.

Summary of our offer:
Edison pays us 90% of what they owe us as of 01.17.01.
Payment structure: Edison pays us 10% immediately, with an agreed to (speedy) payment schedule for the remaining 90%.
In return, we drop our complaint against Edison at the PUC.
In return, we agree to a bottoms-up approach retroactive to March 1 to replace the current PX Credit/Residual CTC framework.

Fielder said that he didn't see any show-stoppers in our proposal, but had to check back on his end.  However, there were three additional issues that he wanted to add to any deal:
Some agreement regarding payment of Edison's undercollection (this would cover any of our DA customers who were bundled services customers pre-January 17). We agreed that this would only be an issue to the extent that the Legislature and/or the PUC agreed that Edison should get authority to recoup its undercollection in rates.
Some agreement on DWR stranded costs.  John expressed the view that DWR bought power under the assumption that the customers who've recently gone DA would be there to take the power, and now that they've left, they should contribute in some way to any stranded costs. I told John that this issue is a hornet's nest, that we were better off leaving it out, but we'd consider his proposals.
Some agreement on forebearance.  I told John that if Edison agrees to pay us, it didn't seem that forebearance would be off the table.

We agreed to touch base at the same time Wednesday morning.  The idea is that he'll get back to me with Edison's reaction to our proposal; and we'd get back to him on Edison's proposals.

Might be useful to determine whether we want to continue the discussions.  While John seemed very inclined to work something out, all signals are that the Legislature isn't inclinded to bail Edison out next week.  In which case, Edison could be in bankruptcy in a couple of weeks, which would presumably nullify any agreement we might reach with them. On the other hand, if the Legislature pulls a rabbit out of a hat, an agreement might have real value.

Any comments folks have on 1) Edison's proposals and 2) whether it makes sense to continue discussions on Wednesday are appreciated.  Seems that, at a minimum, if we agree to consider Edison's proposals, then our payment should go from 90 cents to 100 cents on the dollar.

Best,
Jeff

Denise --

Do you have a listing of all bonds that EES (and its affiliates) has in place for retail marketing, including wholesale ISOs? Speaking with Gloria, we don't keep this information in Govt Affairs.  Rebecca Fite keeps bond information required in the State licensing processing.  The place that I think that is missing is Wholesale Service providers (e.g., ISOs).

I think that we need to expand this idea of Bonding to "Financial Guarantees" including with Utilities, States, and Wholesale Service Providers.

Maybe the best way to start is to work backwards from EES active markets and determine what is needed in each locale?

Thanks,

Jim

Please be sure to copy Jim Wood on all correspondence relating to bonds- from a product management standpoint, I think Jim needs to be aware of these issues as failure to maintain bonds will significantly impact our business. .  I still think that  we would want to have a single person responsible for reporting all potential situations that may cause a default /bad pr situation and  notify the EES office of the chairman  in a manner that would allow plenty of opportunity to cure ( i.e., before it is a crisis).  Gloria and Denise, will you take that on?

 

Gloria -

Could you please help us gather the facts on what the $12 MM Surety Bond currently being requested (#6131506) is for - is this PG&E?.  Mary informed me that funds ($36,000) may not be available, is this correct?  

It is my understanding that Credit, Services and Regulatory will be monitoring and processing bond requirements.  As such, I would like to know how this would impact EES' business and definitely want to be aware of any default situation prior to reading about it in the press.  

Thanks, 
Rogers

Andy --

I was speaking yesterday with Chuck Ward.  He indicated that we continue to have (or may have soon) litigation surrounding our ownership interest in Cornhusker.  

This is important primarily because the Texas Public Utility Code requires that the PUC approve any merger of generators that will have a combined ownership of over 1% - which Dynegy and Enron will have.  

I want to make sure that we represent our ownership interest to the PUC appropriately given the current dispute.  If you have any specifics, please let me know or give me a call.

Thanks,

Jim

thanks.

Jim - 

We do indeed have litigation -- arbitration, actually -- with Brazos Electric Cooperative surrounding our ownership interest in Cornhusker.  I am going to forward a copy of the original petition and our answer to you so you will have a little more information about the dispute.  Then I would be happy to discuss.

Andy

Andy --

I was speaking yesterday with Chuck Ward.  He indicated that we continue to have (or may have soon) litigation surrounding our ownership interest in Cornhusker.  

This is important primarily because the Texas Public Utility Code requires that the PUC approve any merger of generators that will have a combined ownership of over 1% - which Dynegy and Enron will have.  

I want to make sure that we represent our ownership interest to the PUC appropriately given the current dispute.  If you have any specifics, please let me know or give me a call.

Thanks,

Jim

Why does Edison care about DWR stranded costs?  Are these the costs of the bonds or the above market long-term contracts?

Jim

In terms of our proposal, went over it with Wanda and Michael last week, and they, I believe, ran it by Swain.  The real issue is what (if anything) we do about Edison's desire to lock down undercollection and DWR stranded costs as part of the deal (which they likely view as a pretty good hedge, since it's looking less than 50-50 that the Legislature isn't going to pull it off).

Best,
Jeff

We need to discuss the economics of this on our book (assuming that these costs hit our pocket and not our customers).

Jim

Talked to John Fielder (SVP at the utility) this morning in an attempt to determine if Edison will come around and pay us the PX credit they owe us.

Summary of our offer:
Edison pays us 90% of what they owe us as of 01.17.01.
Payment structure: Edison pays us 10% immediately, with an agreed to (speedy) payment schedule for the remaining 90%.
In return, we drop our complaint against Edison at the PUC.
In return, we agree to a bottoms-up approach retroactive to March 1 to replace the current PX Credit/Residual CTC framework.

Fielder said that he didn't see any show-stoppers in our proposal, but had to check back on his end.  However, there were three additional issues that he wanted to add to any deal:
Some agreement regarding payment of Edison's undercollection (this would cover any of our DA customers who were bundled services customers pre-January 17). We agreed that this would only be an issue to the extent that the Legislature and/or the PUC agreed that Edison should get authority to recoup its undercollection in rates.
Some agreement on DWR stranded costs.  John expressed the view that DWR bought power under the assumption that the customers who've recently gone DA would be there to take the power, and now that they've left, they should contribute in some way to any stranded costs. I told John that this issue is a hornet's nest, that we were better off leaving it out, but we'd consider his proposals.
Some agreement on forebearance.  I told John that if Edison agrees to pay us, it didn't seem that forebearance would be off the table.

We agreed to touch base at the same time Wednesday morning.  The idea is that he'll get back to me with Edison's reaction to our proposal; and we'd get back to him on Edison's proposals.

Might be useful to determine whether we want to continue the discussions.  While John seemed very inclined to work something out, all signals are that the Legislature isn't inclinded to bail Edison out next week.  In which case, Edison could be in bankruptcy in a couple of weeks, which would presumably nullify any agreement we might reach with them. On the other hand, if the Legislature pulls a rabbit out of a hat, an agreement might have real value.

Any comments folks have on 1) Edison's proposals and 2) whether it makes sense to continue discussions on Wednesday are appreciated.  Seems that, at a minimum, if we agree to consider Edison's proposals, then our payment should go from 90 cents to 100 cents on the dollar.

Best,
Jeff

I assume we are happier with this message?

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
      Gas Issues Working Group

FROM:	Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE:	11/15/2001
RE: EPSA Second Draft Comments on Pipeline Capacity
      Recall  NOPR
?			Comments due November 19th
?
As discussed on Wednesday's Conference Call attached are second draft EPSA comments on FERC's Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NOPR) on pipeline capacity recall.  This draft reflects the changes suggested during the conference call. The following are the major changes from the earlier draft:

1. The word "Opposing" has been removed from the filing.  Rather the filing retains the same arguments but indicates that EPSA has "concerns".

2. We added footnote 1 to stress that in no event should the Commission mandate that such recall provisions be included in a recall notice.  Rather consistent with the NOPR, such recalls should only be permitted, with the ultimate determination being subject to negotiation between the releasing and replacement shipper.

3. We added footnote 3 to recognize that this filing reflects the views of EPSA as an organization, not the views of individual members.

4. We added the footnotes missing from the earlier draft.

5. We did some minor editing to page 3, the first full paragraph.  The sentence starting with "This service will be of less value to potential purchasers than any firm service the pipeline could offer...." and well as the next sentence are slightly different than the earlier draft.

Please review the draft and forward any comments or proposed changes to the draft to Jack Cashin at EPSA at jcashin@epsa.org by close of business on Friday, November 16th so that we can make a timely filing on Monday, November 19th.

Attachment

 - Gas Day Ahead RecallNOPRComments2.DOC 

Rick --

Please find attached the asset report in Texas.  Enron's ownership depends on what day the filing is made (for instance, Indian Mesa won't be active until Dec and may be sold immediately).

Also, there is an on-going arbitration with Cornhusker about our ownership right.  Andy Edison has the lead from EWS legal.

Jim

 

Rick --

Here is the information on staffing and outside services.  Call if you need anything else.

Jim

 

ok

Jim:  fyi.  i would love to help with our comments, but understand if you have too many cooks in the kitchen.

My notes from the Standards of Conduct NOPR discussion:

Draft NOPR would:
adopt one set of standards to apply to gas and electric transmission owners;
broaden the definition to include all affiliates of transmission companies (including affiliates engaged in financial transactions)+
NOT apply to RTOs

The Commissioners were presented with 2 options:
Option A would maintain the status quo with respect to native load;
Option B would require separation of transmission function from bundled retail load.

It appears that there are 3 votes for Option B.   Breathitt was the hold out, expressing concern with respect to timing given that the FERC is trying to build a strong relationship with state commissions.    Pat said he was "surprised" to learn that bundled retail sales were excluded.  Massey sees this as an "opportunity for discrimination to end."   

NOTE:   Pat sent a message that, if he doesn't hear from "people" that this is the right way to go, he will back down.  He will be looking for factual evidence that on the costs and benefits associated with unbundling.   Massey asked staff if there are "operational reasons why this change shouldn't be made."  We may want to comment on this.

Lisa

With the announcement of Enron's acquisition by Dynegy behind us, and with =
the initial severance process completed, it seemed an appropriate time to e=
ffect some organizational changes so that we as a group are better prepared=
 to meet the challenges of the future.  Before I turn to the organizational=
 changes, I would like to say a few words about those who will be leaving t=
he company as a result of the initial severance (you'll know who they are b=
y their absence on the organizational chart): Leading and being a part of t=
his group has been a privilege?I am thankful for every day that I have had =
that responsibility and thankful for however long I continue to have the re=
sponsibility.  This sense of privilege and thankfulness is primarily driven=
 by having had the opportunity to get to know and care about such a dedicat=
ed group of professionals and support staff and who, to a person, are also =
very decent and good people.  To say good-bye to some of our colleagues is =
not easy.  I want to, on behalf of all of us, thank them for their hard wor=
k, their integrity, their decency, and the good times and laughter that we =
shared.  I trust that many of us will find ways to sustain friendships that=
 have been and will continue to be very special.  Thanks to each of you who=
 are leaving for all you have done.

As to the organizational structure, it has become increasingly apparent to =
me that the existing organization, with a mix of groups organized along fun=
ctional and regional lines (particularly within the U.S.), has impeded our =
ability to get things done in the most efficient fashion at times.  The nee=
d to rationalize the organizational structure, in order to consolidate all =
U.S. energy functions, is a strong need from my perspective.  As a result, =
Jim Steffes will lead the U.S. Energy group along with Sue Nord, who will j=
ointly report to Jim and myself.  Sue will assist Jim in the leadership of =
the group and take on project management responsibilities as warranted to h=
elp Jim shoulder a significant burden.  Also reporting to Jim will be a lea=
dership group for U.S. Energy that will be as follows:  Wholesale Electrici=
ty will be led by Christi Nicolay; Retail Electricity and Natural Gas will =
be led by Harry Kingerski; Wholesale Gas will be led by Leslie Lawner.   La=
st, but not least, Jeff Dasovich and Sue Mara, who will continue to focus o=
n California energy issues, will report to Jim. (Sue Mara will also be part=
 of the Wholesale electricity team).

Steve Montovano, who will continue to report to me, will lead a commercial =
development effort along with Dan Allegretti.

With the elimination of the regional groups, I also recognize that there is=
 a need to continue to focus on how we as a group address our political/leg=
islative needs across the U.S.  Paul Kaufman will lead a small group that w=
ill address that need and that will focus on state political support.  Paul=
 will also take the lead for Government Affairs in support of corporate dev=
elopment efforts across the U.S.

Much of the rest of the group remains the same.  Linda Robertson will conti=
nue to lead the Washington group with Sarah Novosel, who reports to Linda, =
taking the lead role in our coordination of activities at FERC.  Amr Ibrahi=
m will continue to lead the support of the Global Assets group and also con=
tinue to manage the Risk Analytics function.  Maggy Huson will take over su=
pport of the non-energy business units, which are as follows: Global Market=
s, Industrial Markets, Networks, and Broadband.  Rob Hemstock will continue=
 to lead the support of Enron Canada.  Paul Dawson, who heads up government=
 affairs for Europe; Sergio Assad, who heads up government affairs for Sout=
h America; and Mike Grimes and Mark Crowther, who head up our Asian efforts=
, will continue to jointly report to the business units and myself.

I am also forming a North American leadership group for Government Affairs =
to provide policy guidance for the larger group and the company.  That Comm=
ittee will consist of Rob Hemstock, Maggy Huson, Amr Ibrahim, Paul Kaufman,=
 Harry Kingerski, Leslie Lawner, Steve Montovano, Christi Nicolay, Sue Nord=
, Sarah Novosel, Linda Robertson, Jim Steffes and myself.  We will also con=
tinue to have an RCR Committee that will consist of Maggy Huson, Harry King=
erski, Sue Nord, Linda Robertson, Jim Steffes & myself.  Finally, I am form=
ing a Dynegy/Enron regulatory approvals working group that will consist of =
Jose Bestard, Paul Dawson, Paul Kaufman, Sue Nord, Sarah Novosel and myself=
.

No organizational structure or set of organizational changes is either perf=
ect or permanent.  I believe these changes will make us better and more pre=
pared for the future.  However, we must be prepared to further adjust as th=
e future unfolds for the company.

One final note: I am deeply sorry that each of you has had to live through =
this uncertain and troubled period for the company.  We are all saddened by=
 the recognition that we are in the midst of changes that will leave our gr=
oup fundamentally altered, but we must resolve to do our best for each othe=
r and ourselves during this period of change to ensure that what emerges, f=
or those of us who do remain a part of the new Dynegy, reflects the excelle=
nce and integrity that has characterized our group.  Personally, I will do =
all I can, for as long as I can, to steer the group through this to the ver=
y best place possible.  Your continued dedication and support is very much =
appreciated.  Hang in there and thanks.

This means that the DST proceeding moves forward - right?

How about a phone call at 3pm HOUSTON TIME to catch up on all matters?

Jim

...has been denied unfortunately.
We have been informed that at this morning's status hearing, without
substantive discussion, the ALJ in the Illinois Power proceeding denied
Enron's motion to strike.  Please feel free to call if you would like to
discuss.  Thank you.

> Christopher J. Townsend
> Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
> 203 N. LaSalle Street
> Chicago, IL 60601
> (312) 368-4039 (direct line)
> (312) 630-6300 (direct fax)
> christopher.townsend@piperrudnick.com
>
>
>
For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com

Lunch works.  I thin 11:45 is best.

Jim

Jim, does lunch still work for you today @ Cafe Express?  Did we say 11:30
or 11:45am?

Thanks,
Dick.

Great.  I briefly looked at your papers - the idea is very promising if you
can find the agency/government.

Jim

    -----Original Message-----
   Jim, thanks for the lead on Governing Magazine.  Their online website is
   a
   great tool and source of info...already found some competitve info that
   helps underscore the market relevance of this solution.

   I'll look forward to meeting you Monday.

   Dick.

Attached is the most recent statement from the California Utilities that implements the DA Suspension (filed Friday). Comments are due Nov 28 (Wed) from parties.  

The Utilities continue push for a "hard" deadline of DA.  They also offer an option where Suppliers would be required to submit a Affidavit for incremental DASRs and potentially have the CPUC review the specific contract language.  Of course, in no event do they believe that any customer should be allowed to have DA service if the customer's name was not on our Oct 5 Customer List.

Jeff and I will be talking with Mike Smith (and anyone else who wants to participate) to work through our response to these comments.

Jim

	

Attached is the joint proposal of the UDCs. We must file comments on
November 28th 

Not sure yet.  We will be talking with AReM and will want your input.  We may have to file but not sure.

Jim

Jim, Sue Mara said that Dan Douglas would be making the response to this  and asked me to review since she is on vacation.   Did Enron decide to file separate comments?

Attached is the most recent statement from the California Utilities that implements the DA Suspension (filed Friday). Comments are due Nov 28 (Wed) from parties.  

The Utilities continue push for a "hard" deadline of DA.  They also offer an option where Suppliers would be required to submit a Affidavit for incremental DASRs and potentially have the CPUC review the specific contract language.  Of course, in no event do they believe that any customer should be allowed to have DA service if the customer's name was not on our Oct 5 Customer List.

Jeff and I will be talking with Mike Smith (and anyone else who wants to participate) to work through our response to these comments.

Jim

	

Attached is the joint proposal of the UDCs. We must file comments on
November 28th 

Linda & Sarah --

I intend to come to DC tomorrow night and attend the EPMI v. FERC hearing (if I still have a seat).  I'm planning on attending the GENI meeting Wed pm and Thurs.

Thanks,

Jim

I know that was the plan and we do intend to work with AReM, but we may have to file if our needs aren't met.

Jim

She indicated that Dan Douglas is the attorney for AReM and that Enron would make comments to his responses.

Not sure yet.  We will be talking with AReM and will want your input.  We may have to file but not sure.

Jim

Jim, Sue Mara said that Dan Douglas would be making the response to this  and asked me to review since she is on vacation.   Did Enron decide to file separate comments?

Attached is the most recent statement from the California Utilities that implements the DA Suspension (filed Friday). Comments are due Nov 28 (Wed) from parties.  

The Utilities continue push for a "hard" deadline of DA.  They also offer an option where Suppliers would be required to submit a Affidavit for incremental DASRs and potentially have the CPUC review the specific contract language.  Of course, in no event do they believe that any customer should be allowed to have DA service if the customer's name was not on our Oct 5 Customer List.

Jeff and I will be talking with Mike Smith (and anyone else who wants to participate) to work through our response to these comments.

Jim

	

Attached is the joint proposal of the UDCs. We must file comments on
November 28th 

Thanks for the invite but I'll think the DC team should brief Greg on the beltway politics and energy policy.  I'll join you guys at the Supreme Court invitation window.

Jim

Great.  Do you want to join us Wednesday morning for breakfast?  We are briefing Greg Whalley on energy issues.  Guess it is a good thing I didn't raffle off your seat at the Supreme Court, huh?

Linda & Sarah --

I intend to come to DC tomorrow night and attend the EPMI v. FERC hearing (if I still have a seat).  I'm planning on attending the GENI meeting Wed pm and Thurs.

Thanks,

Jim

Gloria --

Where are we on a matrix of Utility agreements?

Jim

Gloria, Jim and Harry;

Thanks for pulling us all together on Monday. We look forward to working with your group on merging the State Licensing and Utility Agreements into a common area, in order to keep the organization informed and up to date.

I wanted to re-cap just a bit.  The Services Group has state licensing responsibility for Gas and Power for EESI and EEMC. We handle new licensing and renewals.  We are on an "auto-reminder" distribution from EES legal, Heather Mathis for renewals/reporting.  We physically house all documentation relating to licensing on our floor. We currently publish and distribute as needed State License status report which identifies where we are licensed and what our license # is.  The Services Group works directly with Gloria for utility agreements, as we are one of many groups who she obtains sign-off from and/or information in order to execute agreements and State Licensing information is critical to her processes.

Gloria and I met yesterday to discuss next steps.  We are working together to provide the following.

1) Matrix of Executed Agreements which includes: State, License #, UDC, Agreement Type, Signatory, Date Issued, Expiration/Renewal, Security Requirements. (2 Weeks)
2) Backfill each groups need for documentation - provide copies of State Licenses and/or UDC agreements. (2 Weeks)
3) Identify the EES/ENE contacts sent to the State/UDC, update as needed, internally and externally. (2 - 3 Weeks)
4) Provide Summary information regarding State/UDC that can be placed on EES Market Central (2-3 Weeks?)
5) Ensure information is updated, published, organized and accessible to all interested parties. - Gloria has initiated creating binders that will be housed on the 47th floor - we will encompass State information with the executed UDC agreements. 

Gloria, please feel free to add anything I have overlooked.  I've attached the contact list currently used when obtaining State Licenses. This should help identify other stakeholders who you may want to speak with.

 

Regards,
Rebecca

Attached for your initial review are Enron Corp. comments on the Marketing Affiliate NOPR (RM01-10).   As you will see, this is an incomplete, bare bones version and we can enhance the arguments once it is clear we all agree with them.  Leslie has struggled mightily with this in light of the constant changes that have been going on and we are sure more changes will be necessary.

Comments must be filed at FERC by December 20.  In order to allow adequate time for a couple of redrafts and the concomitant reviews along with the other things that are going on, please advise me or Leslie of any suggestions, concerns or comments you have by COB MONDAY, NOVEMBER 26th.  

 

How about heading off campus - less likely to run into Enron people.  Let's meet in the parking lot entrance (right where the little store is on the way to the Met) at 11:30.

If anything comes up, call me on my cell at 713-851-2499.

Jim

Hi Jim,

How about NY Pizzeria for lunch?  Another preference?  We could go to
Teala's on Dallas.  Let me know what time is most suited to your schedule.
See you in a little while.

Shane

My number is 713-853-7673.

See you Tuesday.

    -----Original Message-----
   Sounds good.  Shoot me your number and I will call you that morning.  My
   direct is 713-844-6403 and my cell is 713-826-7516.  See you next
   Tuesday.

   -----Original Message-----
   How about Tuesday the 20th?  Should be relatively slow.

   Jim

   >  -----Original Message-----
   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

I would like to take something to Dan Leff by end of business tomorrow.  Whatever we have.

Thanks,

Jim

We have developed a matrix and are populating it. I should have something to you soon.

Gloria

Gloria --

Where are we on a matrix of Utility agreements?

Jim

Gloria, Jim and Harry;

Thanks for pulling us all together on Monday. We look forward to working with your group on merging the State Licensing and Utility Agreements into a common area, in order to keep the organization informed and up to date.

I wanted to re-cap just a bit.  The Services Group has state licensing responsibility for Gas and Power for EESI and EEMC. We handle new licensing and renewals.  We are on an "auto-reminder" distribution from EES legal, Heather Mathis for renewals/reporting.  We physically house all documentation relating to licensing on our floor. We currently publish and distribute as needed State License status report which identifies where we are licensed and what our license # is.  The Services Group works directly with Gloria for utility agreements, as we are one of many groups who she obtains sign-off from and/or information in order to execute agreements and State Licensing information is critical to her processes.

Gloria and I met yesterday to discuss next steps.  We are working together to provide the following.

1) Matrix of Executed Agreements which includes: State, License #, UDC, Agreement Type, Signatory, Date Issued, Expiration/Renewal, Security Requirements. (2 Weeks)
2) Backfill each groups need for documentation - provide copies of State Licenses and/or UDC agreements. (2 Weeks)
3) Identify the EES/ENE contacts sent to the State/UDC, update as needed, internally and externally. (2 - 3 Weeks)
4) Provide Summary information regarding State/UDC that can be placed on EES Market Central (2-3 Weeks?)
5) Ensure information is updated, published, organized and accessible to all interested parties. - Gloria has initiated creating binders that will be housed on the 47th floor - we will encompass State information with the executed UDC agreements. 

Gloria, please feel free to add anything I have overlooked.  I've attached the contact list currently used when obtaining State Licenses. This should help identify other stakeholders who you may want to speak with.

 << File: List of Contacts.doc >> 

Regards,
Rebecca

See attached.  Crazy Commissioner (Carl Wood) at the PUC is now trying to require folks to submit their DA contracts to the PUC (everyone refused the first time he "asked").  Customers are going to get very cranky about this.  Likely to be a pretty pitched battle.  I'm contacting the large customers to see what they intend to do.  Can't see them going down without a fight. We should plan on discussing with Mike Day first thing on Wednesday morning, if folks are available. Please forward to anyone else who needs it.
Best,
Jeff

Jim --

How about breakfast on Wednesday this week?  I'm coming in tomorrow night and could do breakfast on Wed.

Jim

Jim:

Since I was just called in to the FERC last Friday to talk about RTO
benefits, I was thinking about what we were going to discuss a couple of
Thursdays ago.

Is market power and regional market analysis something that you all talk
about a lot?  I don't know very much about how you are organized, or how
something like this might fit with your agenda.

I'd be happy to talk with you at your convenience, just enough to learn
a little bit more about your thinking.  Perhaps a small group of
like-minded firms could use a piece like this to put in front of the
Commission together.  They like external parties to come in with
concrete proposals, especially if they are already thinking along the
same lines.

--Jim T.

Draft.

Is this a final order or draft order at this point?

See attached.  Crazy Commissioner (Carl Wood) at the PUC is now trying to require folks to submit their DA contracts to the PUC (everyone refused the first time he "asked").  Customers are going to get very cranky about this.  Likely to be a pretty pitched battle.  I'm contacting the large customers to see what they intend to do.  Can't see them going down without a fight. We should plan on discussing with Mike Day first thing on Wednesday morning, if folks are available. Please forward to anyone else who needs it.
Best,
Jeff

After talking with Dan, I intend to set up a meeting to provide complete matrices on licensing and utility contracts sometime early during the week beginning Dec 3.  

Also, just to make sure everyone is clear, Harry, Gloria, and Rebecca are on point during the next few weeks to ensure that that EES and/or EPMI responds timely to any request for info, additional security, or other utility matters.  This, of course, will continue to require help from legal, credit, and operations.

If anyone has any other questions, please give me a call.

Thanks.

when can we discuss this?

thanks

Dan --

I will get with Evan and his team and pull this together.  Of course, much of the activity with Utilities is driven by their requirements and judgements (which change over time).

Jim

Jim / Evan - 

As you are probably aware, the performance and surety bond market is difficult for us to navigate in and around in our current situation.  As an example, EFS has been shut out of getting access to new bid and performance / payments bonds for its business that requires these.  We are addressing this with the bonding companies now.  All of their existing bonds are in place and in force.

In light of this, I wanted to make sure that we are absolutely current in all aspects of all bonding requirements with UDC's and LDC's.

Please send me the most current copy of your matrix that illustrates where we have existing bonds in place, what drives the capacity requirements, status, renewal / expiration date, current payment status, etc.  I would like to make sure that we are all clear on how these work, what triggers increases / decreases in capacity, and other issues impacting our ability to continue to flow electricity and natural gas to our clients.

Thanks - Dan

EES does not sell power except potential if it overschedules to their retail load and "sells" balancing energy to IP.  I'm not even sure if we are delivering any energy to any customers in the market.  I'll send to Rogers Herndon.
 
Jim

Jim:
 
The same prohibition applies to EES, although I did not notify anyone specifically about the prohibition.  Harry, is there someone we need to talk to?  Is EES selling power to IP?

FYI. 
 
Also, does the same obligation present itself in Illinois?  Are there any restricitions or obligations on EES as a marketer in IP territory?

Jim
I received a call this evening from our V&E regulatory counsel (Adam Wenner) who received a call from Dynegy's regulatory attorney, Dan King, about the need for both companies to making filings at FERC to notify FERC of the proposed acquisition and to state that, during the pendency of the acquisition, both companies will treat each other as if the two were already merged (i.e., the standards of conduct and affilate rules will apply).  

Under FERC's regulations, as of the date of the agreement, Enron and Dynegy must conduct themselves as if they are already merged.  Therefore, Enron can no longer enter into transactions with Illinois Power to buy or sell power absent FERC approval under section 205 of the Federal Power Act, and Dynegy cannot enter into transactions with Portland General absent prior FERC approval.  With regard to the sale and purchase of non-power goods and services, all non-power goods and services provided by Illinois Power to Enron must be priced at the higher of cost or market. Any non-power goods or services provided by Enron to IP must be priced at a level that does not exceed market price.

We will work with the attorneys to make these filings, but we wanted you to know as soon as possible that we need to stop power sales and purchases with Illinois Power (if we were doing any) and can only enter into transactions with them with prior FERC approval.

We will send a draft of the FERC filing to you for review.  Please let us know if this restriction causes problems for you (e.g., you have existing or forward contracts with IP that are in effect or are scheduled to go into effect during the pendency of the acquisition).

Let us know if you have any questions.

Sarah

Thanks.

I will work on an Enron protest of this MISO filing, if necessary, for this issue (question of how "source and sink" would affect reservations and hinder EES in reserving network (similar to Dynegy v. ComEd arguments).

Christi:

I have read the MISO filing and have the same concerns you have with respect
to the granularity of the source.  I have passed the filing onto others in
Exelon and should know in a few days whether we will intervene (it looks
like we have until Nov. 29).

Steve

Steven T. Naumann
Transmission Services Vice President
Phone:  312.394.2807
FAX:    312.394.2881
Pager:  312.689.2079  <-- New Pager Number
E-Mail: steven.naumann@exeloncorp.com < <mailto:steven.t.naumann@ucm.com>>

Jean --

Is the PUC going to agree on AEP's motion (please see below)?  What are we =
doing to stop this movement?  AEP is ready to go in Ohio with the same noti=
ce but just haven't done anything in TX.

Jim

Florida
Bobbie McCartney, an Administrative Law Judge for the Federal Energy Regula=
tory Commission, has recommended that Florida join its transmission lines t=
o those of nine other states. Under the plan, Florida Power and Light Compa=
ny (FPL) would turn over its transmission lines to the Regional Transmissio=
n Organization (RTO) or keep the lines and have the RTO manage them. The st=
ate's three major electric utilities, FPL, Florida Power Corporation, and T=
ampa Electric, have already formed a statewide RTO called GridFlorida. Howe=
ver, GridFlorida is on hold because the state is uncertain if a state RTO w=
ould increase customer rates. FPL spokesman Mike Haggerty noted, "We will s=
ee what direction the PSC (Public Service Commission) takes before committi=
ng to any alternative." PSC assistant director Bob Trapp said that agency s=
taff would prefer an RTO for Florida alone, but no formal position has been=
 taken by the commissioners.
The Palm Beach Post, September 25, 2001=20
Texas
American Electric Power (AEP), owner of Southwestern Electric Power Company=
 and West Texas Utilities Company, is supporting a delay in deregulation in=
 East Texas from January 1 to March 31, 2003. David Carpenter, director of =
Texas regulatory services for AEP, said in a statement, "We are asking that=
 retail competition...be delayed to permit adequate time to assure that inf=
rastructure, processes and procedures are in place to allow fair competitio=
n to proceed while reliable service continues." However, Entergy is arguing=
 that restructuring should move ahead even though no retail providers are m=
aking offers in that part of the state. Entergy spokeswoman Patty Riddlebar=
ger said, "That doesn't mean that they are not interested. Ten retail power=
 providers have either begun or completed testing and certification in the =
Entergy service area." She added that the testing and certification process=
 is rather lengthy and companies would not be participating in them if they=
 were not interested. Last month, Public Utility Commission staff asked com=
missioners to delay deregulation in that part of the state, which encompass=
es 60 counties and 434,000 households. AEP spokesman Larry Jones stated, "T=
here are a number of milestones that need to be achieved, and a delay until=
 2003 will allow those milestones to be achieved." Three commission members=
 will meet on October 5 and 6 to determine how ready the state is to begin =
electric competition in January.
The Beaumont Enterprise, and The Dallas Morning News, September 27, 2001=20

713-853-9287=20
888-703-0309

During the merger, transactions between a regulated company of one of the partners (IP / PGE) should not do business with the other.  
 
If EES or EPMI is buying or selling from IP, please let me know.  Also, if we are delivering to retail load behind the IP market, we may need to make sure that our actions are with the code of conduct.  I don't think that we have to worry much with PGE side because EPMI and EES are already acting within the code of conduct.
 
Jim
Jim:
 
The same prohibition applies to EES, although I did not notify anyone specifically about the prohibition.  Harry, is there someone we need to talk to?  Is EES selling power to IP?

FYI. 
 
Also, does the same obligation present itself in Illinois?  Are there any restricitions or obligations on EES as a marketer in IP territory?

Jim
I received a call this evening from our V&E regulatory counsel (Adam Wenner) who received a call from Dynegy's regulatory attorney, Dan King, about the need for both companies to making filings at FERC to notify FERC of the proposed acquisition and to state that, during the pendency of the acquisition, both companies will treat each other as if the two were already merged (i.e., the standards of conduct and affilate rules will apply).  

Under FERC's regulations, as of the date of the agreement, Enron and Dynegy must conduct themselves as if they are already merged.  Therefore, Enron can no longer enter into transactions with Illinois Power to buy or sell power absent FERC approval under section 205 of the Federal Power Act, and Dynegy cannot enter into transactions with Portland General absent prior FERC approval.  With regard to the sale and purchase of non-power goods and services, all non-power goods and services provided by Illinois Power to Enron must be priced at the higher of cost or market. Any non-power goods or services provided by Enron to IP must be priced at a level that does not exceed market price.

We will work with the attorneys to make these filings, but we wanted you to know as soon as possible that we need to stop power sales and purchases with Illinois Power (if we were doing any) and can only enter into transactions with them with prior FERC approval.

We will send a draft of the FERC filing to you for review.  Please let us know if this restriction causes problems for you (e.g., you have existing or forward contracts with IP that are in effect or are scheduled to go into effect during the pendency of the acquisition).

Let us know if you have any questions.

Sarah

Molly --

Please let either Gloria or Harry know if you need our assistance.

Jim

When is this due?  What is our gas exposure in NIMO's service territory?  Who is on point?

Thanks - Dan

EES received a margin call for $4.3MM on Nov 19th from Niagara Mohawk for EES gas business to cover settlement and imbalance risk for NIMO's "Supplier Select" Program.  The Enron Corp. gaurantee is no longer acceptable at our current rating.  Legal has confirmed NIMO's rights under its gas tariff.  

Regards
Molly

Molly - Would you please add the request you are now working on from Niagara Mohawk.  Thanks, Teresa

One more.

- Washington Gas: EES has parental guaranty. Due to current financial status, Washington Gas has requested Bond instead. RAC contact indicated no bond available - EES has 30 days to respond.

A note on the Con-Ed - Services/Operations has a work around for the few Mid-market deals origination is closing which will prevent us from increasing our security (Straight Dual Billing). Mass Market volume increase will drive any security increase in this market.

Thanks,
Rebecca

... and just to be clear, here are the recent or current issues I am aware of and their status:

Con Ed, request for $1 million security in lieu of parental guaranty:  complete.  $1 million sent prior to 11/14 deadline.  Request for additional security likely to come when Con Ed sees our increasing load.
SoCal Gas, request for margin sharing agreement in lieu of parental guaranty:  complete.  New contract signed and delivered 11/16.  Retail and wholesale gas desks to work together to avoid occurence of margin call for credit over $5 million daily.
Peoples Gas of IL, request for letter of credit for $40k in lieu of parental guaranty:  deferred.  Peoples agreed to suspend demand for l/c if further downgrade does not occur.
Virginia license for EES gas:  complete, for now.  Services served copy of application to other parties.  Their comments due back to VA SCC by Dec 7.
Maryland license for EEMC gas:  scheduled to be approved on provisional basis today.  MD PSC will be reviewing generic requirement that parental guarantees be unconditional, unlimited, and unrestricted.
Pennsylvania, request for update to EES and EPMI bonds and request for increase in EES bond from $250k to $3.8m:  Under review.  New bond language has been sent to Mary Grisaffi.  Trying to whittle down (or eliminate) increase.
CG&E, request for deposit associated with Transmission Service Agreement:  being processed.  Service request reduced from 100 MW to 25 MW to reduce cash outlay.
First Energy, requested new security in lieu of parental guaranty.  deferred.  First Energy agreed to continue accepting parental guaranty in absence of further downgrade.

If there are others we should know about, please let me know.

After talking with Dan, I intend to set up a meeting to provide complete matrices on licensing and utility contracts sometime early during the week beginning Dec 3.  

Also, just to make sure everyone is clear, Harry, Gloria, and Rebecca are on point during the next few weeks to ensure that that EES and/or EPMI responds timely to any request for info, additional security, or other utility matters.  This, of course, will continue to require help from legal, credit, and operations.

If anyone has any other questions, please give me a call.

Thanks.

when can we discuss this?

thanks

Dan --

I will get with Evan and his team and pull this together.  Of course, much of the activity with Utilities is driven by their requirements and judgements (which change over time).

Jim

Jim / Evan - 

As you are probably aware, the performance and surety bond market is difficult for us to navigate in and around in our current situation.  As an example, EFS has been shut out of getting access to new bid and performance / payments bonds for its business that requires these.  We are addressing this with the bonding companies now.  All of their existing bonds are in place and in force.

In light of this, I wanted to make sure that we are absolutely current in all aspects of all bonding requirements with UDC's and LDC's.

Please send me the most current copy of your matrix that illustrates where we have existing bonds in place, what drives the capacity requirements, status, renewal / expiration date, current payment status, etc.  I would like to make sure that we are all clear on how these work, what triggers increases / decreases in capacity, and other issues impacting our ability to continue to flow electricity and natural gas to our clients.

Thanks - Dan

Thanks.

And the winner is .............. "me" to coordinate.  I have been leading with Legal and Trading.  Legal confirmed their right under the gas tariff (due to our downgrade).   Don's team, myself and the credit contact at NIMO reviewed the exposure calculation and believe it to be accurate at first review.  I am inquiring to a lock box to reduce the requirement by 50%.  Deadline to deliver is next Thursday, Nov 29th.

Harry/Gloria - could you please review their requirement?  NIMO is asking for collateral in effect to cover EES base load for the Supplier Select program, assuming EES does not deliver for 30 days and assuming the coldest day (in the past 30 years) which in effect mutiplies our load by a factor of 3.  However, NIMO has agreed to use forward Jan price in lieu of the past 12 months as stipulated in their tariff.

Regards
Molly

Molly --

Please let either Gloria or Harry know if you need our assistance.

Jim

When is this due?  What is our gas exposure in NIMO's service territory?  Who is on point?

Thanks - Dan

EES received a margin call for $4.3MM on Nov 19th from Niagara Mohawk for EES gas business to cover settlement and imbalance risk for NIMO's "Supplier Select" Program.  The Enron Corp. gaurantee is no longer acceptable at our current rating.  Legal has confirmed NIMO's rights under its gas tariff.  

Regards
Molly

 

Thanks for keeping Wes and Mary Lynne informed.  I give this chance a very low probability right now, but we'll see.

Jim

Wes,
 
FYI.  

Jeff Dasovich met with SCE to discuss settlement of  Enron's PX claims.  Nothing was agreed to, but I wanted to make certain you were aware of this meeting.  It is interesting that all of SCE's comments dealt with their under collection and the DWR costs.  I have not continued to monitor current tariff assumptions.  However, I do not believe estimates for the resolution of these issues are currently included.   As I understand things, it remains anybody's guess as to what will be required of direct access customers, much less how much of the under collection SCE will be allowed to recover.  Regulatory Affairs is working closely with the desk to completely understand the impact of future regulatory decisions and work to obtain the best result for Enron.  

I will make sure you and Mary Lynne stay informed re these discussions.   If you would like to discuss, just call. 

Wanda

Talked to John Fielder (SVP at the utility) this morning in an attempt to determine if Edison will come around and pay us the PX credit they owe us.

Summary of our offer:
Edison pays us 90% of what they owe us as of 01.17.01.
Payment structure: Edison pays us 10% immediately, with an agreed to (speedy) payment schedule for the remaining 90%.
In return, we drop our complaint against Edison at the PUC.
In return, we agree to a bottoms-up approach retroactive to March 1 to replace the current PX Credit/Residual CTC framework.

Fielder said that he didn't see any show-stoppers in our proposal, but had to check back on his end.  However, there were three additional issues that he wanted to add to any deal:
Some agreement regarding payment of Edison's undercollection (this would cover any of our DA customers who were bundled services customers pre-January 17). We agreed that this would only be an issue to the extent that the Legislature and/or the PUC agreed that Edison should get authority to recoup its undercollection in rates.
Some agreement on DWR stranded costs.  John expressed the view that DWR bought power under the assumption that the customers who've recently gone DA would be there to take the power, and now that they've left, they should contribute in some way to any stranded costs. I told John that this issue is a hornet's nest, that we were better off leaving it out, but we'd consider his proposals.
Some agreement on forebearance.  I told John that if Edison agrees to pay us, it didn't seem that forebearance would be off the table.

We agreed to touch base at the same time Wednesday morning.  The idea is that he'll get back to me with Edison's reaction to our proposal; and we'd get back to him on Edison's proposals.

Might be useful to determine whether we want to continue the discussions.  While John seemed very inclined to work something out, all signals are that the Legislature isn't inclinded to bail Edison out next week.  In which case, Edison could be in bankruptcy in a couple of weeks, which would presumably nullify any agreement we might reach with them. On the other hand, if the Legislature pulls a rabbit out of a hat, an agreement might have real value.

Any comments folks have on 1) Edison's proposals and 2) whether it makes sense to continue discussions on Wednesday are appreciated.  Seems that, at a minimum, if we agree to consider Edison's proposals, then our payment should go from 90 cents to 100 cents on the dollar.

Best,
Jeff

Can we change the project lead on the RTO NOPR on Standards of Conduct to be both Lisa Yoho and Leslie Lawner?

Also, can you call the project leads before the memo goes out to make sure that they are aware of their responsibilities - just a heads up?

In paragraph 2, your language is that this is addressed only to the people on the chart.  I think that Rick intends to send out to everyone in GA.  Maybe we want to change to indicate that people are welcome to be included in teams if they were not mentioned.

Thanks,

Jim

Here is a proposed memo and revised chart.  The memo is rather lengthly but there was a lot to cover.  Please let me know if you need me to do anything else on this.  I am working on the talking points that Christi drafted last night.

Sarah

	 << File: M E M O R A N D U M[1].doc >> 		 << File: Coverage of Upcoming FERC Proceedings.doc >> 		

Jim --

Just trying to follow-up on the next meeting?  Any news?

Alan & Paul --

See John Shelk's e-mail below.  Alan, you may want to coordinate.

Jim

Carin attended today's CFA press conference in which Mark Cooper released an electricity report.  Below is Carin's very helpful and well done summary of the report together with links to the CFA press release and the full report.  While we will sharply disagree with their comments on restructuring results in the states, we should be able to make use of their latest comments on the critical need to separate transmission from generation to avoid discrimination.  We should recruit them for our RTO legislative coalition.

 

Press Release:
http://www.consumerfed.org/erspring_pr.pdf

The report:
http://www.consumerfed.org/erspring.pdf

Carin Nersesian
Legislative Coordinator
Enron Corp.
202-466-9144 
202-828-3372 (fax)

Harry & Nancy --

I am somewhat concerned that the implications of having to act as tax collector is creating a push to change the way REPs work with the T&D company.  In Enron's advocacy throughout my years, we have always asked the PUCs to make the marketer the "customer of record" - better limits the Utility control over the market.  Now it appears that this good decision of the PUCT has tax implications and means that we have to process the taxes.  I don't see that trying to support a change is a good thing from our long-run business.   Moreover, if we are paying Gross Receipts taxes and didn't include them into our customer costs than we made a mistake.  This is a cost of our business.  

Let's talk.

Jim
In my opinion this is not beneficial to EES at all.  We have been following this issue through our Retail Market Subcommittee and all REPS are not happy with this process.  We are now required to calculate, collect and remit all taxes related to T&D charges.  We also take a hit on Gross receipts tax.  Jim, you should call and talk to Ron Adzgery.  Thanks.

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Ron and Jeff. 

I spoke briefly with Jim Steffes this morning. Please do not proceed with any further efforts in this regard until we hear from Jim, Nancy or someone from their team.  It may be the Comptroller's position is beneficial to EES's business and we don't want to support or pursue a contrary position.  

beth 

Jean/Jim:

Jeff Fischer and I in EES Tax have been working with Nancy Hetrick regarding the question of whether REPs will be responsible for administering Texas taxes on T&D services.

As you may have heard, at the request of a number of investor owned utilities, the Texas Comptroller of Public Accounts has initially ruled that REPs will be responsible for administering the taxes.  This conclusion was based upon the assumption that the REPs are purchasing the T&D Services from the TDU and then reselling the services to their customers.

After a number of REPs objected to that ruling, the Comptroller's office agreed to reconsider.  We believe the Comptroller is worried about doing something that will have a serious impact on deregulation in Texas, so she is passing the question off to the Texas PUC by requesting that the PUC determine whether REPs purchase and resell T&D Services.

The New Power Company raised this issue with the PUC recently and at last count TXU and Entergy had filed responses of their own.  A number of tax representatives from several REPs thought it might be good to show the PUC this is a significant issue for all independent REPs.

Attached for your review and comment is a draft of a proposed letter to the PUC regarding this matter.  Nancy suggested we send the letter to you for your comments and to get clearance for EESI to sign the letter.  Thank you for your assistance with this.

Ron

 << File: Texas PUC tax response - revised.doc >> 

Jo Ann --

Do you know if Dan Staines has an active Employment Contract?

JIm

haven't checked voice mail at home - in DC. have time to talk right now on phone?

Jim

 

Jeff --

How about a call tomorrow to discuss?

Jim
According to the Stipulation we entered with SCE and approved by the ALJ:

"If the MOU is implemented and the PE Advice Letter adopted, SCE will commit to pay the energy credit to the Enron ESPs . . . using the methodology it employed up to January 5, 2001 for energy provided to direct access customers of those ESPs through and including January 18, 2001."

Mike Day, are we in a position now to send a letter to Edison demanding immediate payment? 

FYI.  The first memo.

This is Leslie's memorandum.  
 

Guys -- 

We need to quickly put together some talking points on how to respond to AEP's request for delay until 2003.  My understanding is that AEP in Texas is wholly outside of ERCOT (if wrong - please inform). 

AEP needs only to file a good amendment to the FERC OATT (or SPP needs to do it for them) ASAP.  My basic model for provisioning of energy for retail competition in non-ERCOT Texas is that delivery to the border of the OATT provider (for instance delivering a into-Entergy product into Arkansas and paying for losses would be sufficient for delivery into the Woodlands).

Jean was going to call Luiz to get this issue on the burner. 

Thanks 

Paul --

What happens if BPA doesn't join?

Jim

FYI.  The following language mirrors that which was used in the Sierra/PGE transaction.  Recall that FERC approved the transaction in an order issued last January/February.  

In short, we don't have an RTO/loss of market-based ratemaking authority issue.  

(1)	PGE/NNG will make an RTO commitment; and 
(2) 	In any event, FERC counsel informs us that FERC is unlikely to declare that we are an affiliate. 

Paul, per my voicemail, OK to use RTO language like this:

NW Natural affirms PGE's comittment to a regional transmission organization
(RTO) as soon as it is formed with BPA as a member.  NW Natural and PGE's
preference is for the RTO to be a "for profit" entity.  

Call if you have questions

Pls come by at 11am.

Thx.

Jim -- the comments are due today.  Am attaching the latest draft.  There is a conference call going on right now (8 to 10); join if you like.
Number:  800-711-8000
Passcode: 6349#

Susan --

Can we sit down tomorrow or Monday for 30 minutes to discuss.  Maybe at 11am Friday.  Want to get an idea of the timing and our position.

Thanks,

Jim

See pages 2 and 3 of the attached draft; includes overview section drafted by Sam Behrends.

I am not certain that Sam Behrend's attachment went through to you all last night.  Attached is a copy of the current version of the document (it includes Sam's overview).

Thanks,

Cathy

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Agreed.  In fact, my understanding is that the ERCOT protocols state that if congestion is greater than $20 MM / year the model would change.  The market has reached $100 MM.

Jim

This is just a rumor we're hearing, but we heard that FERC wants someone who knows ERCOT congestion management on the congestion management panel for RTO Week  because FERC (presumably Pat Wood) wants to use the ERCOT congestion management system as the standard CMS throughout the country.  From what I know about ERCOT (which isn't much and I have a call in to Thane to get an update), this wouldn't be a good thing for us.  We'll keep you posted.

Dave --

Can you please send to Rick Shapiro the agenda for next Wednesday's meeting?  Thanks,

Jim

Steve --

I will be traveling back from CA tomorrow so I can't make the call.  Some things to be aware of --

1.	EES/EEMC v. SCE Complaint

We filed Aug 30 before the CPUC asking the CPUC to re-instate our customer net bill amounts.  Jeff Dasovich will call John Fielder to try and see if there is anything that we can do without litigating the case (or at least delay until after legislative session).  If complaint moves forward, SCE will probably consolidate the complaint with earlier disputes.  Enron is preparing similar filing for PG&E, although we need to seek Relief from the Stay.  

2.	California Legislation

SCE MOU bill (that includes DA issues) moved Aug 29 through Assembly Energy Committee.  Needs to go to Assembly Appropriation and full Assembly.  Hertzberg is trying to get out by weekend or early next week.  By removing the conservation easements, the bill has lost some liberal Democrats.  Governor Davis is asking Business to find 15+ Republicans to move the bill.  Trying to modify (1) surcharge effective date to Sept 1+ and (2) get more comfort that SCE will pay our Negative CTC if $$ exists.

Also, the Windfall Profits bill has moved through Assembly Committee.  It has to go through Assembly Appropriation and full Assembly.  Jennifer Thome has prepared a synopsis that is attached.

 

3.	AG Subpeona / Sen Dunn Subpeona

Litigation about both Subpeonas was heard this week in SF and Sacramento.  Mike Kirby believes that he may have swayed the Court in the Sen Dunn to provide a protective order.  A final decision may be issued next week.

4.	FERC Refund Case

Enron presented its "ripple" claim earlier this week.  Range of refunds (non-netted) is very large (please see Bob Frank for exact $$).  I have also attached a calendar of both cases prepared by Alan Comnes.  Oral testimony is being prepared in PNW case for next week.

 

5.	NE RTO Mediation / SE RTO Mediation

Both proceedings come to a close this week with an expectation that the ALJ issues a recommendation next week (or soon thereafter).  Looks like the best date that a large number of parties can agree to for a single NE RTO energy market is Nov 03 (PJM thinks it can happen by May 03 but wants some cushion).  Sarah Novosel is trying to best position us vis-a-vis the other stakeholders to drive it earlier.  Also, ICAP and control area consolidation is not considered at this time.  Christi Nicolay believes that the ALJ will recommend moving toward a PJM model.

6.	CPUC Decision to Suspend DA Retroactive

Sue Mara continues to push the CPUC to remove the retroactive date in the current Proposed Decision.  Some rumors that the CPUC will again delay a decision until Sept 13 (confirming so please keep close).  

HERE ARE THE FINAL SLIDES.

 

Wade --

Home 281-759-8270
Cell 713-851-2499

We should also make sure that Paul Kaufman and Pat Keene attend.

Thanks

Jim,

Sounds good, I will setup the meeting.

Cheryl,

Please setup a meeting with myself, Jim, Woody, Ken,and Dennis

Thanks

Jay -
 
We should talk about what is going on with Nevada.  Probably want to include Ken & Jim.
 
Jim

Great.  Thanks.  

	 -----Original Message----- 
	Probably want to talk with Jay Lewis and other product leads?  I'll get some names. 

	Jim 

	 -----Original Message----- 
	Met with Jake Thomas (Origination) and Paul Choi (Mid-market).   It looks like we have concurrence on the ENA side of the house.   How do we run the traps on the EES side (i.e., Guy Devault, Jeff Ader, and whoever??)?  

	I'd like to go to Nevada next week (thursday,friday time frame) and start meeting with the Commission and OCA.    

Thanks for the info. I'll leave in your and Leslie's capable hands.
 
Jim

Jim, Jane Tholt is the primary contact for Leslie and me on this filing.  Although I wouldn't have any problem changing the order of the arguments, Jane is pushing the pooling issue very hard and she wants to see it up front.  She has actually tried to make even more arguments on pooling, but Leslie and I have so far convinced her that doing so would not be helpful.  We went over the draft with Barry, Janie and Stephanie last Thursday, and he did not raise any concerns with the order of the arguments.  Leslie -- could you work in an "executive summary" up front with bullet points?
 
Pooling is actually a very important issue for the day to day business on El Paso, and this is our only opportunity to make these arguments.  It's a major concern because increasing the number of pools was a key component of El Paso's proposal that is the basis for this proceeding, and we don't think FERC staff fully appreciates the consequences of increasing the number of pools.  In addition, a few of the shippers, including SoCal Gas, have indicated that they would like to have a system with receipt point rights all the way back to the wellheads, which the West Desk is totally opposed to, and unfortunately, FERC Staff data request questions seemed to indicate they might be seriously considering it as an option. 
 
Thanks for your input.  So far, I haven't had any comments from anyone else.  

Becky -- 

My only question is one of emphasis.  Are points 3&4 the key for Barry T.?  If so, should we move them up higher?  Also, why the very lenghthy discussion of pooling points?  The length makes the points after that discussion hard to appreciate.  Maybe a list of bullet points up front?

Jim 

Please review the attached filing and provide any comments you may have by COB Friday, 10/5.  

The filing is ENA's comments on El Paso's proposal for receipt point allocation, focusing on discussions at the two technical conferences in the proceeding.  Also, it may be that, based on further discussion with certain other shippers, we will modify our statement in Item No. 1 to to support a different version of the method for allocating receipt point rights, but only if there is strong opposition to our method.  We don't want FERC to select the method that El Paso proposed originally.

   << File: RP00-336-002 Conf Comments Drft8.doc >> 

Sarah --

Should we try and lobby any of these witnesses prior to next week?  I was thinking about John Meyer and Peter Cramton specifically.

Jim

In case you could not open the notice in Word Perfect, here it is in Word.  Sorry for the problems.

 << File: Notice on Panels.doc >> 

 << File: Notice on Panels.WPD >> 

I'd have Susan Lindberg and Charles take on this.
 
Jim

I have been following Form EIA-417 - Emergency Incident and Distrubance Report
 
I am not familiar with the changes on these other forms. Should I follow up on these as well?  
 

Form EIA-411, "Coordinated Bulk Power Supply Program Report," 
Form EIA-412, "Annual Electric Industry Financial Report," 
Form EIA-423, "Cost and Quality of Fuels for Electric Plants," 
Form EIA-767, "Steam-Electric Plant Operation and Design Report," 
Form EIA-826, "Monthly Electric Sales and Revenue Report with State Distributions," 
Form EIA-860, "Annual Electric Generator Report" (combined Forms EIA-860A and EIA-860B), 
Form EIA-861, "Annual Electric Power Industry Report," and, 
Form EIA-906, "Power Plant Report." 

Since I have no former experience with these reports, it would be a great help if those familiar with these reports take a look at at them first and porvide me any comments. 

[Yeung, Charles]  -----Original Message-----
I thought Susan and Charles were leading EIA reporting issues?

Jim

Do any of you know anything about these proposed changes to EIA forms?  Please let me know eiter way.
 
Thanks
 
Sarah

Dear CELT Respondent:
Attached below are several documents concerning the upcoming changes the
Energy Information Administration (EIA) of the U.S. Department of Energy
(DOE) submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) on September
11th, regarding changes to the  EIA 860 and 411 Forms.
 <<Proposed EIA-860.pdf>>  <<Proposed EIA-411.pdf>>
In particular, you may want to review the sections concerning
confidentiality and transmission data.  A short summary of the changes can
be found in the "Summary of Form Changes to the March 13, 2001 Proposal",
located at:
<http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/electricity/elec2002/forms_page.html>
< <http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/electricity/elec2002/forms_page.html>>
The "OMB Support Statement" located on the same page provides more detailed
explanations of the changes.
DATES:  Comments must be filed on or before October 11, 2001. If you
anticipate that you will be submitting comments but find it difficult to do
so within that period, you should contact the OMB Desk Officer for DOE
listed below as soon as possible.

Office of Management and Budget
726 Jackson Place NW.
Washington, DC 20503.

The OMB Desk Officer may be telephoned at (202) 395- 7318. (A copy of your
comments should also be provided to EIA's Statistics and Methods Group).
Please see the attached Federal Register Notice (below) regarding important
information for filing your comments.
 <<fedreg.pdf>>
Please forward a courtesy copy (cc) of your comments to me at:
ISO New England Inc.
One Sullivan Road, Holyoke, MA  01040-2841
(413) 540-4203   FAX
e-mail:  kcondon@iso-ne.com < <mailto:kcondon@iso-ne.com>>

Thanks
Kathy Condon
(413) 535-4134

The information in this message is privileged and confidential and is
intended solely for the addressee(s) listed above.  If you have received
this transmission in error, please notify us immediately by e-mail and
delete the original message.

John --

On this bill, I would think that as far as our competitive businesses go, we should work through EPSA.  Better to have the industry speaking with one voice.  To that end, do we know where EPSA is on this - Reliant and Mirant will have a much larger impact.  Finally, we probably will need this ability for our Control Area operators.

Jim

Senator Schumer's office sent over a copy of the Chairman's Mark that will form the basis for a hearing tomorrow and a mark up Wednesday in the Senate Energy and Natural Resources Committee on energy infrastructure security legislation.  Pat is working with the pipeline group on how it affects them since it clearly applies to natural gas pipelines.

It would also clearly apply to PGE and to physical power plant assets we operate.  The main impact here would be in the area of criminal background checks, including fingerprinting, for employees in categories to be determined in DOE implementing regulations.  The background check data would be shared with law enforcement.  The legislative language says that the background check regulations will "enable entities" operating "critical energy infrastructure facilities" to have these background checks.  "Enable" is an odd choice of language because it could mean "authorize" only or it could mean "require."  We should assume that the background checks will be mandatory despite this odd language.

The definition of "critical energy infrastructure facilities" would NOT appear to pick up our trading and other energy services businesses beyond pipelines, power plants and PGE.  The definition is "a facility for the generation or transmission of electrical energy, or the production, refining, transportation, or storage of petroleum, natural gas, or petroleum product, the incapacity or destruction of which would have a debilitating impact on the defense or economic security of the United States."

If there is some reason why we would want other facilities included in the definition in order to obtain authorization for background checks, please let me know.  It should be pointed out that the current draft does not contain explicit legal immunity for employers who provide information about employees to authorities.

John

I think that Kerry Stroup is handling non-MISO/ARTO midwest matters.

Donna/Sarah--I got together with Audrey Zibelman from Xcel on Friday afternoon to catch up and she wanted to talk about the petition that Xcel and the other midwest utilities had filed on transferring their assets into a for profit transco, Translink.  In my discussions with Audrey, she expressed a hope that Enron would be able to support the filing and that she'd like to open a dialogue on how to get our support.  I indicated that there were at least 2 issues that would be of concern for us---support for one RTO and support for one tariff within that RTO.  Although she was open and probably even supportive of one RTO in the midwest, there is a separate tariff for any delivery within the Translink system within her proposal.  SHe described that tariff as being different than the Detroit Edison case that you guys filed against.  I confirmed that the publics who are in the transco (NPPD, OPPD, Cornbelt) would not agree to be in the transco without the separate tariff.

I have sent via overnight a copy of materials on the transco to both of you.  I told her that Donna was that lead on the Midwest team, and that you'd be willing to talk/meet with her.  If practical, it would be good if you could call her in the next few days for a number of reasons---1.) I am sure that Xcel is planning a similiar transco for the west and if you can get a better sense of whether we are on any of the same pages, it would be good to have that input for our western discussion on Wednesday in Houston  2.) she is one of the panelists for RTO week, so you might be able to set up a time in D.C. that you could meet in person  3.) you might be able to get a sense of what she will be talking about at RTO week on her panel.

Here is her info:  		Audrey Zibelman
				VIce President
				Xcel Energy
				Independent Transmission COmpany
				414 Nicollet Mall  6th FLoor
				Minneapolis, MN  55401

				audrey.a.zibelman@xcelenergy.com

				#612-330-7713

John --
 
I'm heading up tomorrow.  Do we need a call today to make sure that my ducks are still in a row?  I don't have the Barton draft handy.
 
Jim

 

FYI, attached are comments that NERC sent yesterday to Chairman Barton
and Mr. Boucher on Barton's 9-21 discussion draft.

David Cook
NERC General Counsel
Office:  609-452-8060
Cell:  609-915-3063
david.cook@nerc.net

 <<Gent to Barton 100201with comments.pdf>>

Shirleen --

Can you please send me the most recent version?  Thanks.

 << File: EES Board 3Q r10 Blue steffes.ppt >> 

Vicki --

FYI.  This bill continues to move.  Jennifer Thome prepared this synopsis.  Please let me know if you need anything else.  I'll ask Jennifer to keep you updated on any changes and status.

Jim

 

Pls get with Susan to make sure coverage is appropriate.
 
Jim
I am running this by the relevant folks here on 31 -- have not heard from them but I will follow up.

Do any of you know anything about these proposed changes to EIA forms?  Please let me know eiter way.
 
Thanks
 
Sarah

Dear CELT Respondent:
Attached below are several documents concerning the upcoming changes the
Energy Information Administration (EIA) of the U.S. Department of Energy
(DOE) submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) on September
11th, regarding changes to the  EIA 860 and 411 Forms.
 <<Proposed EIA-860.pdf>>  <<Proposed EIA-411.pdf>>
In particular, you may want to review the sections concerning
confidentiality and transmission data.  A short summary of the changes can
be found in the "Summary of Form Changes to the March 13, 2001 Proposal",
located at:
<http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/electricity/elec2002/forms_page.html>
< <http://www.eia.doe.gov/cneaf/electricity/elec2002/forms_page.html>>
The "OMB Support Statement" located on the same page provides more detailed
explanations of the changes.
DATES:  Comments must be filed on or before October 11, 2001. If you
anticipate that you will be submitting comments but find it difficult to do
so within that period, you should contact the OMB Desk Officer for DOE
listed below as soon as possible.

Office of Management and Budget
726 Jackson Place NW.
Washington, DC 20503.

The OMB Desk Officer may be telephoned at (202) 395- 7318. (A copy of your
comments should also be provided to EIA's Statistics and Methods Group).
Please see the attached Federal Register Notice (below) regarding important
information for filing your comments.
 <<fedreg.pdf>>
Please forward a courtesy copy (cc) of your comments to me at:
ISO New England Inc.
One Sullivan Road, Holyoke, MA  01040-2841
(413) 540-4203   FAX
e-mail:  kcondon@iso-ne.com < <mailto:kcondon@iso-ne.com>>

Thanks
Kathy Condon
(413) 535-4134

The information in this message is privileged and confidential and is
intended solely for the addressee(s) listed above.  If you have received
this transmission in error, please notify us immediately by e-mail and
delete the original message.

Sounds good to me.  I'm out on Wednesday but in the rest of the week.
 
Jim

Guillermo- why don't you schedule with Ginger and Linda( Jim's assistant)?

Whenever you are available I would like to have a private conversation with one or both of you regarding what tasks I am doing, what I am not doing and how to move forward.

Thanks.

Guillermo

 

 

My comments --

I assume that in the Enron filing we will make a stronger argument for sticking with the 12-15-02 date?  Also, critical to highlight that the FERC should have one "major" change date, not multiple given the liquidity problems with significant regulatory change.

Finally, break out competitive retailers in the list of the ONE RTO Coalition. Every state inside this region (except VT) has competitive retail access.  Furthering this effort with further the policy directions of the states by lowering wholesale prices and making business "easier" for companies like EES.  We should play this up.  We are really pushing hard on the physical retail gen side in NYC and Boston and taking another look at PA and MD - this is the real benefit - that consumers' bills go down.  I didn't see that language on consumer benefits.

Jim

Rick, Jim and Susan:

Enclosed is the One RTO draft comments on the Northeast Mediation.  We would like to include Enron as a signatory party to the comments, so please read them to make sure that you are okay with us signing on.  Although the date issue is somewhat amorphous (we support PJM (with a Nov 2003 date but we also urge implementation as soon as possible -- Dec 2002 if possible).  

This was the best we could get the Coalition to agree to -- there are many parties who strenuously opposed advocating any date early than Nov 2003 and I had to threaten to take our name off the comments if we didn't say something about an earlier date.  We have not given final signoff, but they would like to hear from us by the end of the day (comments are due tomorrow).

Susan, please show the comments to Kevin, Dana, Paul (and anyone else who would like to see them).  We are also writing our own comments, which we will circulate by COB today for filing tomorrow.  They do not need to read the affidavits -- just the comments to make sure we're not saying anything they disagree with.

Also attached is the Henning affidavit that supports the Mirant study.  Although Mirant probably did not make the best choice in using an internal regulatory person to do the study presentation at FERC, everyone who I have talked to thinks that FERC staff reacted favorably to the study's findings.  One person overheard FERC staff say that they expected $440 million in savings per year, and they weren't questioning these savings, but wondered if these were enough savings to justify a movement to one RTO.  It seems to me that $440 million is significant savings, but who knows.  Anyway, we need to discuss whether we want to join in the Mirant Midwest study.  Provided that a similar study can be conducted in the midwest (since there are no ISOs there), with a similar good outcome, I think we should consider supporting the Mirant effort.

Please let me know what you think.  Thanks

Sarah

 << File: Draft One RTO.DOC >>  << File: Henning Aff Draft.DOC >>  << File: Shanker Aff Draft.DOC >> 

Thanks for the info.  Please stay closely linked with the RTO Week activities to try and read Wood's questions.

Also, John Meyer from Reliant is testifying.  What will be his position?  Should we talk with him this week to coordinate and try and move him the right way?  Wasn't he the head of Congestion Management in ERCOT originally?  I think this is Wood trying to ask him how ERCOT works.  What will he say?

Thanks,

Jim

Here are a couple of clarifying points:
 

The congestion charges that have been incurred are 55.6 million or 137 million depending on the methodology used to calculate the charge.  If you look purely at the scheduled MWs then it is 137 MM based upong the ERCOT protocols.  The actual cost to redispach and clear congestion as of Sept. 22, 2001 was 55.6 MM.  Both obviously are very high considering it is for one month of operation. 
When the 20 MM trigger was hit August 14, 2001, ERCOT has 6 month by Protocol and reaffirmed in the commission order to implement the full zonal model.  This means that there will no longer be an uplift of interzonal congestion, rather a direct assignment of the charge.  The charge may be partially offset by the TCR that will be auctioned.  The PUCT has indicated an interest to move to direct assignment prior to the development and implementation of a TCR instrument as a hedge.  I am chairing the congestion management working group that is deciding the TCR issue and will be dealing with the local congestion issues when that trigger has been hit. 
It would be difficult to know if Pat Wood will try to push the ERCOT congestion management model as the model of choice.  The staff and Brett Pearman have been in favor of a movement to an LMP model as a fall back position initially, but have been more concerned with retail acess as of late rather than the ERCOT congestion.

Thane --

Based on Wood's statements while at the PUCT, what issues will most likely drive his choice of a congestion management model?  My understanding is that Shumel Oren is on the panel at FERC, has he said anything recently that would argue that ERCOT may not be effective?  
 
Finally, what are the minor changes to the ERCOT protocols to overcome the current obstacles so that if adopted we could use across the country?
 
Jim

Jim

Pat Profeta of Northridge Assoc. (Entergy's congestion management consultants) told me this too and said that Michael Schnitzer of Northridge has been asked to be on the congestion management panel for RTO week.  Michael is a strong advocate of the "SPP cornerstones" that are largely the basis of the "LMP/financial congestion hedge" model (initial model!) advocated in the SE RTO mediation report.  They are going to contact Thane to get more information about ERCOT -- they recognize that ERCOT has some problems.

Agreed.  In fact, my understanding is that the ERCOT protocols state that if congestion is greater than $20 MM / year the model would change.  The market has reached $100 MM.

Jim 

This is just a rumor we're hearing, but we heard that FERC wants someone who knows ERCOT congestion management on the congestion management panel for RTO Week  because FERC (presumably Pat Wood) wants to use the ERCOT congestion management system as the standard CMS throughout the country.  From what I know about ERCOT (which isn't much and I have a call in to Thane to get an update), this wouldn't be a good thing for us.  We'll keep you posted.

Sarah --

Pls coordinate with Kerry Stroup.  He is the Mike Roan of the Upper Midwest.

Jim

Jim-- I talked with Sarah Novosel on Friday and she thought that Donna/she were the best point people to have an initial conversation with Audrey.  We had apparently intervened at FERC on the Detroit Edison transco proposal a few weeks ago and that intervention is what sparked Audrey's thoughts on trying to get us as an ally rather than enemy.  I will be sure that Donna shares her thoughts with the midwest group (we have weekly calls and one is scheduled I believe for Wenesday of this week).

I think that Kerry Stroup is handling non-MISO/ARTO midwest matters.

Donna/Sarah--I got together with Audrey Zibelman from Xcel on Friday afternoon to catch up and she wanted to talk about the petition that Xcel and the other midwest utilities had filed on transferring their assets into a for profit transco, Translink.  In my discussions with Audrey, she expressed a hope that Enron would be able to support the filing and that she'd like to open a dialogue on how to get our support.  I indicated that there were at least 2 issues that would be of concern for us---support for one RTO and support for one tariff within that RTO.  Although she was open and probably even supportive of one RTO in the midwest, there is a separate tariff for any delivery within the Translink system within her proposal.  SHe described that tariff as being different than the Detroit Edison case that you guys filed against.  I confirmed that the publics who are in the transco (NPPD, OPPD, Cornbelt) would not agree to be in the transco without the separate tariff.

I have sent via overnight a copy of materials on the transco to both of you.  I told her that Donna was that lead on the Midwest team, and that you'd be willing to talk/meet with her.  If practical, it would be good if you could call her in the next few days for a number of reasons---1.) I am sure that Xcel is planning a similiar transco for the west and if you can get a better sense of whether we are on any of the same pages, it would be good to have that input for our western discussion on Wednesday in Houston  2.) she is one of the panelists for RTO week, so you might be able to set up a time in D.C. that you could meet in person  3.) you might be able to get a sense of what she will be talking about at RTO week on her panel.

Here is her info:  		Audrey Zibelman
				VIce President
				Xcel Energy
				Independent Transmission COmpany
				414 Nicollet Mall  6th FLoor
				Minneapolis, MN  55401

				audrey.a.zibelman@xcelenergy.com

				#612-330-7713

FYI

Thanks Jim.  When we have finalized our list, I'll send and we can discuss
further.

Have a nice weekend,
Mary

Mary --

As we discussed, please find a list of our project team leads on
on-going wholesale matters.

Thanks,

Jim
713-853-7673

 <<Enron FERC Project Leads.doc>>

 - Enron FERC Project Leads.doc 

Is this moving forward?

Jim

Whoops!  Forgot you.  Must have been that vacation....
Filing by New West Energy seeking settlement on PX Credit with SCE -- filed in the RAP case -- somewhat in response to the SCE Pet to Modify seeking an end to payment of the credit while they are having financial difficulties.

 <<9-24-01 Motion - NWEFinal.doc>> 
Thank you, 
Janie Mollon
Manager
Legislative and Regulatory Affairs
Office: 602-629-7758
FAX 602-629-7773
Cell:  602-625-3892

Sue and Jeff --

I am having a meeting with Vicki and Janet Dietrich on Thursday to discuss our view on the ability to extend our current contracts in CA (for customers already on DA).  Can we discuss this today or soon thereafter.

My take is that the UDCs will be indifferent to this (maybe?) and our #1 priority is to work to get the PG&E model adopted across the state.  Any news on how SCE and SDG&E will move forward?

Thanks.

Janine --

I have not yet talked to Kerry about this but the Translink is moving forward.  Will you do it today?

Jim

I think he would do a good job.  
Jim, Do you want to talk to him about it?
Janine

I agree.

What do you think that about having Kerry take the lead on all MAPP area RTOs while also supporting Roan in MISO/ARTO?  Not top priority but I think this could be a good opportunity.

Jim
Christi/Sarah--you guys are probably aware of this, but just in case you aren't, there was an article in the Minneapolis paper yesterday that Xcel (NSP) had filed on Friday with FERC to transfer it's transmission system to a new company called TransLink Transmission Co.  Joining them are Alliant, Corn Belt Coop (Iowa), Mid AMerican, NPPD, and OPPD.  

I noted that there was a quote in the article that "Xcel estimates that it would cut its overal transmission related fees by more than a thrid through it's participation in Translink.......because there will be less overlap of functions."

FYI

Unfortunately, I need to be in Toronto on the 11th, but Jim will handle quite capably. Thanks.

	
you are on at 1:30 on thursday, oct. 11 for 45 minutes in the woodlands.
you will be the first speakers after mark haedicke.
we will be distributing presentations by email only that week on monday the 8th.
dorie hitchcock will get you directions and coordinate with  you about any needs you have re your presentation. 
please get  your presentation to both dorie and to me.
thanks. you are good people to agree to do this.

Sounds like flying Sunday night.

Jim

Jim, Steve, Jose and Dick

I checked the meeting calendar and the NERC hospitality and dinner is during the time we agreed to meet over dinner.  I suggesting changing our plans for a dinner meeting on Monday evening, Oct 15 to that morning instead.

I think if you check on flights from Houston to Vancouver, it will be tricky to get to Vancouver from Houston the morning of Oct 15 to make it in time to the Stakeholder meeting which starts at 1:00 pm.   It may be better to fly in Sunday night from Houston anyway.

What do you all think?  Lets coordinate so we can get the flights right.
Charles 713-853-0348

Please do.

Jim

We should resurrect Mike Smith's note and get him on the call in the attempt to avoid recreating the wheel on this one.  I can dig it up if you'd like.

Sue and Jeff --

I am having a meeting with Vicki and Janet Dietrich on Thursday to discuss our view on the ability to extend our current contracts in CA (for customers already on DA).  Can we discuss this today or soon thereafter.

My take is that the UDCs will be indifferent to this (maybe?) and our #1 priority is to work to get the PG&E model adopted across the state.  Any news on how SCE and SDG&E will move forward?

Thanks.

Howard --

If the ONE RTO doesn't have a day-ahead market, what happens?

Jim

Howard,

Since this will be a financial deal initially that could be physical in the=
 future, I have only included the value of the day-ahead program in our mod=
el.  Thus if we elect to become the physical provider during the 36 months,=
 we will have an incremental benefit.  However, if we never become the phys=
ical provider, I need to know that I will be paid in the Day Ahead program =
for reducing load.

Three key regulatory issues:

1.  NYISO has an Hour-Ahead market that load needs to be allowed to partici=
pate in.  This would  clearly increase the value of the MG deal and our NY =
products in general.
2.  The Day-Ahead Demand Response Program needs to remain in-tact.  This al=
lows EES to realize the value of our call options, whether we are financial=
 or physical. =20
3.  The baseline calculation for load reduction does not work.  This summer=
, one of IBM's sites reduced load by 2 MW's, which is clear when reviewing =
this usage curves on the day of curtailment.  However, when comparing to th=
eir CBL (as currently defined) there was no reduction and therefore no paym=
ent for IBM or EES.  As we have discussed, NY should look at ISO-New Englan=
d's baseline calculations.  This is a much better approach for Enron and ou=
r customers.

Thanks - Jeff

Jim: I have participated in a number of calls with Jeff and his team over t=
he past few weeks regarding this deal, goving over the details of how NY's =
demand response programs work, reviewing draft contracts, and putting him i=
n touch with appropriate ISO staff when even more detailed followup was nee=
ded. I see little likelihood of NY's demand response programs being elimina=
ted over the next few years given the increasingly tight supply situation t=
he state faces and the long lead time for permitting and bulding new genera=
tion, and the great success these programs achieved this past summer. (Most=
 folks credit the 600 MW produced by NY's day-ahead and emergency demand re=
sponse programs with keeping the lights on in the northeast during the earl=
y August heat wave.) Only the day-ahead incentive program has a risk of not=
 being continued beyond October 2003, it's current expiration date. However=
, even there, there is likely to be pressure to extend it for an additional=
 year or two. With respect to potential RTO impacts, in our discussions wit=
h PJM, they have stated that at a minimum they would allow NY to continue i=
ts demand response programs in the new Northeast market on day 1, even if t=
hey differed from the rest of the region.Further, PJM would even consider m=
aking the NY programs applicable throughout the region on day 1 if that was=
 what the market participants in the region wanted to do.=20

Howard -

Have you and Jeff Brown talked about the MG deal?  I want to make sure that=
 you understand fully and appreciate any issues / concerns.

Thanks.

Thanks.

 

If you need anything else, please let me know.

Jim

Thanks Jim, it's just what we need.

Talk with John Shelk in our DC office.

Jim

Jim,

Last week some time I had been on the distribution of a paper published by the CBO entitled, "Causes and Lessons of the CA Electricity Crisis".  In reviewing this paper several things struck me.  The paper is not particularly accurate, they make unsubstantiated claims of market power abuse, they ignore the lack of implementation of demand-side response programs that were supposed to be a integral part of the AB1890 and they use inappropriate terms, such as "Idle" when describing plants that were unavailable because of maintenance or repair.

My reason for writing is to ask you, how politically influential is a paper like this?  Are papers published by the CBO looked at as the authority on problems, especially with those associated with the problems experienced in CA?  And if so, because of some of the mis-representations it contains, do we want to develop a fact sheet for our folks in DC to use to refute some of the claims made in this paper?

Thanks,

Dave

David F. Perrino
Director, Government Affairs
Enron Corporation
101 California Street, Suite 1950
San Francisco, CA  94111
Phone: 415.782.7801
Fax: 415.782.7854
Mobile: 415.794.8740

Ban --

Sorry to take so long to reply.  Family is fine post NYC attacks.

Not sure if we have any needs right now.  I'll keep you in mind as the Budget / Staffing moves forward.

Take care, 

Jim
Jim,

Its been a long time and I hope post the New York incident everything is fine your end.

You must have had a feel of how things are evolving in our Indian office, from Amr. We are appearing to win some Court cases, but the case is dragging on. However with the Tata's (An Indian private company) showing interest in our project, things might hasten a bit. The most preferable solution from our standpoint is a buyout and we are hoping for it.

Meanwhile I understand there are a lot of changes happening in the department in Houston. I would strongly like to be a part of the group in Houston. With things in India heading towards a close, I really do not know how long my services would be required here. Going by the last months severances one is expecting another month, at max two before I too am on laid off.

The severance package is the attractive part (6 months + 2 months notice period - the latter part might be optional), but any day a continuation in Enron is always preferable. Having worked for you and Amr, I am always looking forward to continuing my association with you both if that be possible.

If you have something in mind wherein I can chip in and contribute I would be very happy to do so. I can contact Linda and seek an appointment for you in that case. It would be a pleasure for me if I can start working for you once again.

I look forward to hearing from you
Warm Regards
Ban

**I suggest you send a brief message to Jim and copy Amr.  In the message I would say that you understand that there is a lot of change going on in the department, but that you want to reiterate your strong interest in working with the group from Houston.  Perhaps then you suggest that you contact Linda (his assistant) to schedule a time to talk in more detail (assuming this is possible in spite of the time difference). 

**In addition to this, have you considered moving yourself and family to the U.S. and then finding a job?  If you do get a severence package then you could use the money for that.

Jennifer

thanks a ton jennifer. but thanks to the portland fiasco relations between me and Amr are not the same again. In short I have lost faith in people. He did mention about this fundamentals group, but did not mention that he was heading it or that he is looking to hire people.

lets hope for the best and see how things evolve. however the best part of the houston trip, apart from the value additions professionally, was that I got to meet good people like Jim, Rick and you. I am pretty contended with that. This however does in no way mean that i would not try for any opening in houston. i am doubly or should i say triply motivated now (post the arrival of the kid) to seek all options that would lead me to the US.

How are things your end. has the house been sold off or are you still struggling to find a buyer? where would you be this christmas - portland i presume appears the most likely place. how is steve, convey my regards to him.

regards
ban

You probably already talked to Amr about this, but it was just announced that he is going to be informally putting together a "fundamentals" group within this department.  It seems to me that this is something you would be interested in.  If you haven't already, I would ask him about it.  Also, he is probably a lot better able than I to give you a good idea about where this group is headed and whether he foresees any openings.
 
Jennifer 

Looks fine.  Thanks for everything.

Jim
Jim, Bob-
Attached is the regulatory affairs committee tab of this quarter's briefing book.  Please send us any edits/comments by Wednesday, October 10th at noon.  Please note that additional reporting on ISO-NE will be added next week.

Jackie

 - ChairReportOct01.doc << File: ChairReportOct01.doc >> 
 - FERC Update Oct 01.doc << File: FERC Update Oct 01.doc >> 
 - RTO Update Oct 01.doc << File: RTO Update Oct 01.doc >> 

Thane --
 
Pls work with Christi and Sarah to find a time to call John.
 
Jim

The conventional wisdom around ERCOT is once direct assignment of the CSC congestion costs takes place, then flowing across the CSC does have a cost and those who schedule across will be more judicious.  The second assumption is that the stakeholders chose the wrong limiting element to be the monitored constraint.  90% of the congestion charges can be attributed to that wrong "element".  If direct assignmnet of the congestion and/or designating the correct limiting element are not feasible and ERCOT continues to see very large congestion it will move to an LMP model.  John Meyer, Shmuel Oren and most parties would agree with that.  This year will be very telling.
 
It would be worthwhile the coordinate with John prior to RTO week.  
 
 

Thanks for the info.  Please stay closely linked with the RTO Week activities to try and read Wood's questions.

Also, John Meyer from Reliant is testifying.  What will be his position?  Should we talk with him this week to coordinate and try and move him the right way?  Wasn't he the head of Congestion Management in ERCOT originally?  I think this is Wood trying to ask him how ERCOT works.  What will he say?

Thanks,

Jim

Here are a couple of clarifying points:
 

The congestion charges that have been incurred are 55.6 million or 137 million depending on the methodology used to calculate the charge.  If you look purely at the scheduled MWs then it is 137 MM based upong the ERCOT protocols.  The actual cost to redispach and clear congestion as of Sept. 22, 2001 was 55.6 MM.  Both obviously are very high considering it is for one month of operation. 
When the 20 MM trigger was hit August 14, 2001, ERCOT has 6 month by Protocol and reaffirmed in the commission order to implement the full zonal model.  This means that there will no longer be an uplift of interzonal congestion, rather a direct assignment of the charge.  The charge may be partially offset by the TCR that will be auctioned.  The PUCT has indicated an interest to move to direct assignment prior to the development and implementation of a TCR instrument as a hedge.  I am chairing the congestion management working group that is deciding the TCR issue and will be dealing with the local congestion issues when that trigger has been hit. 
It would be difficult to know if Pat Wood will try to push the ERCOT congestion management model as the model of choice.  The staff and Brett Pearman have been in favor of a movement to an LMP model as a fall back position initially, but have been more concerned with retail acess as of late rather than the ERCOT congestion.

Thane --

Based on Wood's statements while at the PUCT, what issues will most likely drive his choice of a congestion management model?  My understanding is that Shumel Oren is on the panel at FERC, has he said anything recently that would argue that ERCOT may not be effective?  
 
Finally, what are the minor changes to the ERCOT protocols to overcome the current obstacles so that if adopted we could use across the country?
 
Jim

Jim

Pat Profeta of Northridge Assoc. (Entergy's congestion management consultants) told me this too and said that Michael Schnitzer of Northridge has been asked to be on the congestion management panel for RTO week.  Michael is a strong advocate of the "SPP cornerstones" that are largely the basis of the "LMP/financial congestion hedge" model (initial model!) advocated in the SE RTO mediation report.  They are going to contact Thane to get more information about ERCOT -- they recognize that ERCOT has some problems.

Agreed.  In fact, my understanding is that the ERCOT protocols state that if congestion is greater than $20 MM / year the model would change.  The market has reached $100 MM.

Jim 

This is just a rumor we're hearing, but we heard that FERC wants someone who knows ERCOT congestion management on the congestion management panel for RTO Week  because FERC (presumably Pat Wood) wants to use the ERCOT congestion management system as the standard CMS throughout the country.  From what I know about ERCOT (which isn't much and I have a call in to Thane to get an update), this wouldn't be a good thing for us.  We'll keep you posted.

Dasovich this is in your court.
 
Jim

Yes, I have known her for quite some time.  She is the one who recommended me to Korn Ferry for the job that I have at Enron.  I will be happy to make the introduction.  Shall I make arrangements for a meeting in Pebble Beach???  
 
I'll give her a call when you say the word...Jean

Jean --
 
Laura Doll has been appointed head of the CA Power Authority.  Do you know her?  It would be good to have an introduction for Jeff Dasovich.
 
Jim

I looked at it today on the plane.  I don't see any issues although we are in the middle of budget process and will see if this impacts this request.

Jim

Jim,

Have you had any chance to look at the information I sent to you regarding my attending classes to complete my degree?  I am about halfway through my first class, and want to make sure Enron is onboard with me doing so.

Thanks,

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Charles --

If the RTO has the Interchange function, what else is needed for "virtual" consolidation?

Jim

Hello  SE RTO folks

I know you all have a ton and half things going on - but I would like for you to look over the attached proposal that will be a waiver for existing control areas to assign certain control area functions over to a central RTO operator.  This waiver was originally intended for Grid South but since has expanded to include Alliance, SPP, MISO.  The purpose of the waiver is to allow for the continued existence of individual utility based control areas within an RTO AND to fulfill the FERC Order 2000 requirement that the RTO to implement Interchange Schedules.  This may become a direct conflict with our position for consolidation of control areas.

If you don't read anything else, I advise you to at least read - Sec 2.2 Rationale - 5 brief paragraphs which outlines what the RTOs want to do.   

Since I am chairman of the NERC Subcommittee that oversees Policy 3, Enron is associated with facilitating this process.  I want those working at the settlement conferences to be aware that this is coming.  Grid South's original intent was to change sections of Policy 3 to fit their new RTO structure.  I successfully argued against doing this on the basis that NERC policy should not prescribe the Grid South scheduling process and control area structure as reliability policy - hence the waiver.

Charles Yeung
713-853-0348
 
>  RTO Scheduling Group,
>
> Attached is the latest draft of the RTO Scheduling Waiver sent to the
> group by Paul Sorenson on Friday, August 24.  Please provide comments
> to Gordon Scott by 12 noon EDT tomorrow on the document and any items
> for the agenda.  I will combine the comments, including those from
> NERC staff, and send the combined comments to the group for Thursday's
> meeting.  An agenda will also be attached.  The meeting announcement
> is attached.  If you plan to attend, and have not let me or Barbara
> Bogenrief know, please do so.
>
> Thanks, Gordon.
> 		 <<Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc>>
>  <<RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc>>
> 		
 - Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc << File: Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc >> 
 - RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc << File: RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc >> 

Need to also include the moneys owed to Enron and its affiliates related to the wholesale power transactions.  We should also seek to clarify the language about us supporting the PE Advice Letter proposal on going-forward. 

Jim

Please see the attached draft.  The purpose of this document would be to get management approval for a settlement along the lines indicated.

       
         << File: SCE Settlement 10-9-01--2.doc >> 
     

The EWS West Power URM desk will need to determine the $$ at stake and help us manage our financial exposure and the appropriate policy response.  It's their $$.  So far, my understanding from the desk is that our current policy recommendations (as outlined in the Mike Smith memo) are the "preferred" outcome - I'll reconfirm.

Jim

We could not do that.  On the other hand, if we advocate that it should only apply to those who directly benefitted, and the CPUC adopts that reasoning, we would be shooting our tax argument in the foot.  I think you are right that we need to understand the implications, both financially and contractually, of the options before the Commission.  

Thanks.  One other question, which seems like a legal question.  Assume that Enron openly advocates for the PUC to apply the charges to all customers, including ours, understanding that our customers neither benefited from or caused the charges.  If the PUC does it, and we go back to our customers and claim that an indirect tax has been applied, are we in any kind of bind for having pushed for it?  I'm hoping that the answer is no.  Thanks for the info.

Best,
Jeff

a legal memo follows

A typical clause reads as follows:

" 'Taxes' means any and all new or existing governmental or quasi-governmental taxes, assessments, levies, duties, fees, charges and withholdings of any kind or nature whatsoever and howsoever described, including gross receipts, franchise, sales, use , property, excise, capital, stamp, transfer, employment, occupation, generatiion, privilege, Utility Taxes [separately defined to include "any and all franchise, utility, regulatory, BTU or energy, gross receipts, administrative services, municipality, and utility user taxes and similar taxes and energy resource and municipal land use surcharges and other similar surcharges"], regulatory, BTU, energy, consumption, lease, transaction, license, filing, recording, and activity taxes, levies, duties, fees, charges and withholdings, together with any and all penalties, fines, interest, and additions thereto, but excluding any taxes on the net income of EESI or any affilitates."

Under the contracts the Buyer is usually responsible for taxes "applicable to Power at or after the Delivery Point" (the meter); the Seller is usually responsible for taxes "applicable prior to the Delivery Point."  The surcharge would seem to be applicable "at the Delivery Point."

Support for the argument that the surcharge is not a "tax" under the contracts:

     1.  The CPUC refers to it as a "rate increase"

     2.  It was not imposed by a governmental body (such as a state, county, or municipality)

     3.  When first implemented, all proceeds went to the utilities

     4.  It appears that a portion of the proceeds may continue to go to the utilities

Support for the argument that the surcharge is a "tax" under the contracts:

     1.  Since the "frozen tariff" remains in place it is disingenuous to refer to it as a "rate increase"

     2.  It now appears that the proceeds will go to a governmental entity, the DWR

     3.  The definition of "taxes" under the contract is broad and includes surcharges of all types

     4.  To the extent the $.01 surcharge is to pay for generation for bundled customers, those on direct access receive, if anything, only an indirect benefit, which is similar in effect to a tax and not to a rate increase

Rick --

This is the spreadsheet.

Jim

 

Louise --

Here is the analysis on how many Govt Affairs' FTEs work on Enron Americas matters.  

The bottom line = 67 Professionals in group / 29 FTEs on Enron Americas.  Call if you want additional information.

Also, I am trying to arrange a meeting for this Friday to discuss our next Monthly Update (which I am finishing hopefully tomorrow).

Thanks,

Jim

 

perfect.

Jim -- Is this what you want for your executive update?

CURRENT FERC INITIATIVES:

RTO Meetings and Comments to NOPR:   The RTO meetings will be held in Washington from October 15-19, and Steve Walton from Enron will make a presentation on transmission planning and expansion.  Comments will be submitted to FERC in mid-November regarding the appropriate market design for RTOs.  In addition, the Commission stated that RTOs would not be required to begin on the Order No. 2000 start date of December 15, 2001; however, all public utilities are now required to commit by December 15, 2001 to join a FERC-approved RTO or lose their market based rate authority.

Standards of Conduct NOPR:  Several issues are raised in this proceeding, including a proposal to apply the standards of conduct to a utility's marketing affiliate buying and selling power to serve native load.  This is a significant action for FERC and we will strongly encourage the Commission to adopt this bold proposal.  Comments are due late November.

ICAP Inquiry:  Chairman Wood has indicated that he is not very familiar with capacity and reserve requirements, whether they are needed, and what impact such requirements have on the market.  Enron has been a strong opponent of ICAP for many years, and we plan to show FERC that ICAP requirements are not needed.  We will submit expert testimony on this issue.  Comments are due October 17.
California Audit and West wide Price Cap Mitigation:  Commissioner Brownell is leading a FERC audit of the California ISO.  Although we do not have details of what the audit is intended to cover or how expansive it will be, we need to carefully monitor this proceeding and have input into the audit process where possible.  Furthermore, a request for rehearing is pending before the Commission regarding the current price cap mitigation measures.  The Commission implemented these caps in an effort to limit price spikes in California.  California's summer peaking season is over, but the Pacific Northwest's winter peaking season will be starting soon, and the mitigation measures currently in effect could discourage power sellers from selling power to the Northwest, where it will be needed this winter.
Transmission Constraint and Energy Infrastructure Issues:  FERC staff is studying two significant transmission constraints - California's Path 15 and the Central East Interface in New York  -- and plans to have the study completed later this year.  The Commission plans to forward the study to DOE.  The Commission stated that this is a high priority for it.  In a relating proceeding, the Commission has stated that it will hold four open meetings in different regions of the country to identify energy infrastructure issues.  
Revised Public Utility Filing Requirements:  The Commission has issued a NOPR proposing to require market participants to provide more information than is currently required, including at least seven additional data points per transaction.  This will have a significant administrative burden on Enron and will require the disclosure of commercially sensitive information.  Enron filed comments on October 5.
California Refund Proceeding:  The Commission has ordered power sellers to pay refunds for sales made to the California ISO from October 2, 2000 through June 20, 2001, and has established a hearing proceeding to resolve issues of material fact.  Hearing will be held in mid-December.
Pacific Northwest Refund Proceeding:  The Judge in this proceeding issued an initial decision recently finding that refunds are not warranted in the Pacific Northwest.  We expect a Commission order shortly.  
Midwest/Alliance RTO Proceeding:  Various filings are pending before the Commission regarding establishment of two RTOs in the Midwest - the Alliance RTO and the Midwest RTO.  Enron is advocating, consistent with the Commission's recent pronouncements, one single RTO in the Midwest.  The Commission is expected to act on these filings by the end of October.  
Northeast RTO Proceeding:  Mediation to create a single Northeast RTO has concluded and the Judge's report is pending before the Commission.  Enron filed comments advocating a NE RTO based on the PJM congestion management system with a proposed start date of December 15, 2002 (PJM has proposed an implementation date of November 2003).  Commission action is expected on or before October 31.  
Southeast RTO Proceeding:  Mediation to create a single Southeast RTO has concluded and the Judge's report is pending before the Commission (advocating an independent transco structure for the RTO and an LMP/financial transmission rights congestion model).  Enron filed comments in support (and advocating a December 2002 start date).  Commission action is expected on or before October 31.  
West -wide RTO Proceedings:  The Commission stated that it wants the proposed Desert Star RTO and RTO West to "marry up" into one RTO.  It appears that the Commission will treat California separately.  The Desert Star RTO has collapsed and the transmission owners are now proposing a "transco" structure.  Commission action is expected later this year.
Interconnection proceeding:     The Commission is expected to address interconnection issues (with standardized procedures and agreements likely) at its meeting on October 11.  Enron has strongly advocated standardized procedures and will participate in the proceeding.
Market Based Rate Authorization:  The Commission is expected to address procedures for qualifying to sell power at market based rates, which may include an assessment of localized generation in a particular region ("supply margin assessment").   The Commission is also considering adding tariff language that could make market based rates subject to refund upon date of a complaint or finding by FERC of market abuse.

Pat --

I received your voice mail.  Will be testifying this morning.  I will try and call later today.

Thanks,

Jim

Fine.  I still think that any obligation is a mistake.  Just improving a bad market is not going to help.  
 
Make sure that Dan Allegretti is in the loop.  NEPOOL is putting something like this together.
 
Jim

I know.  Anyway, the single most important issue from the perspective of Retail seems to be "daily granularity".  We need to be able to adjust our daily obligation based on customer switching patterns.  These can occur at any time.  So any thing that locks in our capacity requirement for a long period of time (months to a year or more) can be a killer.  
 
A specific model we discussed was "operating capacity".  This takes the operating reserves concept and blows it up to a full capacity market equivalent.  ISO administers the market.  Generators commit capacity to energy market or reserve market, but not both.  Long term deals possible as well as real time market.  Lots has to be flushed out but it seems like a viable approach. 
 
Will discuss more on Wednesday.  Have talked briefly with Luiz about this.

Harry --

Enron can never take the position that ICAP is good!  I don't know why Stoness is trying to undertake more analysis.  His reasoning that ICAP is "complicated" and we do well at complications is crazy given the EES business model - Enron Direct.  
 
Let me know how it is going.  
 
Jim

[Kingerski, Harry]  We can meet today at 2 pm in room 4746 to discuss more about Retail's view of ICAP and related issues.   

  
  

Scott Stoness' summary of our meeting yesterday with Dale Furrow, his regional leads, and Narsimha Misra: 

The gist of the meetings was: 

1) Pro ICAP was: 

Pragmatically, high energy costs are bad because they delay competition.  ICAP is therefore good because it reduces the high price periods with market intervention. 
Pragmatically, ICAP is complicated, and complicated translucent rules favor the bright (Enron). 
Mathematically, 2 separate markets - Capacity and Energy - should result in the same outcome.  ie. Energy costs should reduce to exactly offset the increase in demand charges. 
Theorectically, if the market expects the government to intervene in the event of high power costs, suppliers will build less capacity than needed.  Given that this is inevitable (government intervention), we might as well intervene now as later. 
Theorectically, market failure is probable because small customers are not able to internalize the costs of not hedging, causing them to take more risk than they should.  Given that the customers are not making the right societal decision, we should make it for them 

2) Pro Not ICAP was: 

Any artificial price determination will distort the market causing inefficiencies.  ie. a fixed ICAP for 12 months will favor a technology available all year round. ie2. ICAP could cause environmental damage by causing CT's to be built instead of Combined Cycle. 
ICAP, with market, is complicated which will decrease market efficiencies 
Market prices, with financial firm obligations, will result in a continuous balance of supply and demand 
Market prices, will result in much more efficiency because they cause more demand side response. 

Conclusion: 

There was no consensus.  There seemed to be more people on the no ICAP side than the ICAP side.  Basically comes down to i) economics suggests ICAP is inefficient, vs ii) lack of ICAP will damage competition. 
We agreed that if ICAP is inevitable, we should advocate, market determined ICAP's 
We agreed that, given that this issue is controversial, and that Narshima has the largest interests.  He should head up our response. 

Scott 

On point #1 - I think that at the end of the day, FERC will not deal with the Negative CTC directly.  All they will do is reset prices.  The Utilities and the CPUC will then have to decide the legality and the equity of modifying the PX Credit and hence the Negative CTC.  We have tried in the CA Refund process to highlight the fact that much of the "high" prices were due to inappropriate policy and actions of the CPUC, Governor, and Utilities.  The core problem with this line of argument is that the Refund process didn't ask the first question - what or who is to blame.  It simply took dysfunction and ran.  We are trying in the context of the Rehearing case to ask FERC to restart with the right question.  Also, remember that we aren't going to have a solution in the FERC case until sometime next year, probably after SCE gets its money.  Finally, I think that the right policy decision is not to "re-bill" Negative CTC but rather to prospectively recover the costs.

On point #2 - See point above.  I doubt, however, that all "high" prices can be seen as just a result of underscheduling.

Jim

Two questions:

    1.  How do we fight the notion that a FERC retroactive determination of "just and reasonable rates" should be re-injected into the calculation of negative CTCs?  It seems to me that there are at least equitable arguments against that.  Will this be a CPUC or FERC issue?

    2.  Can we use the utilities' underscheduling to push them back on this, legally or in negotiations?   Since they contributed to the market disfunction, shouldn't they have to live with the consequences?

FYI.

Privileged and Confidential=20

Lisa and Michael,

I  talked with two representatives from PG&E today, Robert Orbeta and Fong =
Wan, regarding the reconciliation of amounts included in Enron's Proof Of C=
laim, which total almost $404 million dollars,  to the books and records of=
 PG&E.  Both Robert and Fong agree that 1) no significant differences have =
been found, 2) the total variance, including IBM,  is approximately $2 mill=
ion dollars, and 3) the reconciliation is substantially complete and theref=
ore, the results should not change materially.  Diann Huddleson will call h=
er counterpart, Mike Alexander,  this afternoon to request a schedule, by a=
ccount, of these variances.  As you know, Enron's Proof of Claim is a compi=
lation of charges/credits reflected on PG&E invoices, and therefore, the on=
ly differences should have been the result of omissions, duplications, or o=
ther query failures.  All things being equal, the reconciliation should hav=
e been a simple comparison, but at an account level.  The sheer number of a=
ccounts for several months of activity,  made this reconciliation a challen=
ge.=20

Both Robert and Fong made remarks regarding Enron's claim for the IBM dual =
bill accounts.  Mr.  Fong also commented that another outstanding item, in =
his opinion, was the "FERC refund case".   I suggested that these items be =
included on the agenda for the settlement discussions scheduled for next we=
ek.=20

Let me know if you need anything further.=20

Thanks,
Wanda

Fair points.  My dogma machine is running at high today.  Don't disagree with your thoughts.  Let's get the answer that works for the business for the long-term.
 
Jim

Trust me, I believe a single energy price is best for the market.  But I still don't get why our espousing the platitudes of spot market pricing automatically make it right.  I think a theoretically sound argument can be made around separate energy and capacity pricing where the capacity price is more stable but over time achieves exactly the same result for generators as a spot price would.  But we do nothing to refute this other model other than call on Thor to curse the icap gods.   Admittedly, part of my reaction is my own ignorance of our needs and history but I wonder how much of our view is religion and how much is commercially motivated, especially when at least from the retail view there are solutions which preserve some semblance of "icap" but yet make it workable for retail competition.

Fine.  I still think that any obligation is a mistake.  Just improving a bad market is not going to help.  
 
Make sure that Dan Allegretti is in the loop.  NEPOOL is putting something like this together.
 
Jim

I know.  Anyway, the single most important issue from the perspective of Retail seems to be "daily granularity".  We need to be able to adjust our daily obligation based on customer switching patterns.  These can occur at any time.  So any thing that locks in our capacity requirement for a long period of time (months to a year or more) can be a killer.  
 
A specific model we discussed was "operating capacity".  This takes the operating reserves concept and blows it up to a full capacity market equivalent.  ISO administers the market.  Generators commit capacity to energy market or reserve market, but not both.  Long term deals possible as well as real time market.  Lots has to be flushed out but it seems like a viable approach. 
 
Will discuss more on Wednesday.  Have talked briefly with Luiz about this.

Harry --

Enron can never take the position that ICAP is good!  I don't know why Stoness is trying to undertake more analysis.  His reasoning that ICAP is "complicated" and we do well at complications is crazy given the EES business model - Enron Direct.  
 
Let me know how it is going.  
 
Jim

[Kingerski, Harry]  We can meet today at 2 pm in room 4746 to discuss more about Retail's view of ICAP and related issues.   

  
  

Scott Stoness' summary of our meeting yesterday with Dale Furrow, his regional leads, and Narsimha Misra: 

The gist of the meetings was: 

1) Pro ICAP was: 

Pragmatically, high energy costs are bad because they delay competition.  ICAP is therefore good because it reduces the high price periods with market intervention. 
Pragmatically, ICAP is complicated, and complicated translucent rules favor the bright (Enron). 
Mathematically, 2 separate markets - Capacity and Energy - should result in the same outcome.  ie. Energy costs should reduce to exactly offset the increase in demand charges. 
Theorectically, if the market expects the government to intervene in the event of high power costs, suppliers will build less capacity than needed.  Given that this is inevitable (government intervention), we might as well intervene now as later. 
Theorectically, market failure is probable because small customers are not able to internalize the costs of not hedging, causing them to take more risk than they should.  Given that the customers are not making the right societal decision, we should make it for them 

2) Pro Not ICAP was: 

Any artificial price determination will distort the market causing inefficiencies.  ie. a fixed ICAP for 12 months will favor a technology available all year round. ie2. ICAP could cause environmental damage by causing CT's to be built instead of Combined Cycle. 
ICAP, with market, is complicated which will decrease market efficiencies 
Market prices, with financial firm obligations, will result in a continuous balance of supply and demand 
Market prices, will result in much more efficiency because they cause more demand side response. 

Conclusion: 

There was no consensus.  There seemed to be more people on the no ICAP side than the ICAP side.  Basically comes down to i) economics suggests ICAP is inefficient, vs ii) lack of ICAP will damage competition. 
We agreed that if ICAP is inevitable, we should advocate, market determined ICAP's 
We agreed that, given that this issue is controversial, and that Narshima has the largest interests.  He should head up our response. 

Scott 

Not too sure how important, but wanted everyone to see the discussion from Jamie Wimberley at CAEM.  

Jim
Jim:

Thank you for your thoughtful response.  Even if Enron is a "hot button"
these days, we remain big fans of yours.

In regard to your comments on the letter, I disagree with some of the
assertions.

First, I am fairly confident that no major piece of energy legislation
will be passed this year.  As you can see from the attached
congressional update for the DE Task Force prepared by Bev Jones (former
VP for Consolidated Natural Gas), Jimmy Hayes (former Member of
Congress, and Nancy Etkin (former head of Natural Gas Vehicle
Coalition), there is every indication that legislation is going to get
bottled up in the Senate.  I agree with the assessment.

Moreover, the legislation that is being considered has almost nothing in
it of direct relevance to "getting it right" in regard to restructuring.
Without pressure, I expect no federal leadership on restructuring
issues.  While I do agree that commissions are usually a stalling
tactic, both Ken and I are dismayed at the lack of focus, resources
(i.e., DOE has devoted almost nothing of any sort to restructuring) and
lack of qualified personnel directed at promoting more competition in
the energy market.  While you and I may have some idea of what is
necessary (and that is a stretch for me -- given the complexity of the
challenges), I can safely say the vast majority of folks have no idea
what to do -- especially about the tricky jurisdictional questions
involved.

I personally think one way to craft a "new federalism" on restructuring
is to bribe the states into more action.  The federal government does
this with education, housing, etc.  Why not with restructuring?  A
carrot for those states which are moving forward, linked to definite
metrics of progress and openness.

I also strongly believed that state PUCS and federal agencies like FERC
are being pushed to the limit about what they can accomplish given
declining budgets and personnel.  I further think that this slows the
whole process down.  Think about it -- telephone deregulation, a growing
crisis in regard to water, record levels of mergers and acquisitions,
historic changes in regard to natural gas and electric regulation -- all
piled on top of each other for these folks.

Good catch on the numbering of the recommendations cited in the letter.
This has been corrected.

I look forward to seeing you in September at the Board meeting.

Jamie

P.S.   Speaking of the DE Task Force, have you and Bob Frank made a
decision yet to participate?  I hope you do, but I need to know as soon
as possible.

Jamie --

Thank you for keeping me in the loop on your activities.  While I am
always supportive of more public statements pushing competition, neither
I nor Enron can sign on to the letter.

First, I am concerned that having Enron sign on will distract from your
messages.  Enron is a "hot button" in DC and will change the proper
focus.

In addition, I would argue that the recommendation for a national
commission is out of place with the current timing of FERC and
Congressional action -- which is imminent -- while a commission would
delay action on the Hill and at FERC, thus supporting the forces against
competition.  Let's not study this too much - we know what to do.  Move
away from the commission.

Also, I'm not sure how providing federal grant money only to states that
promote competition supports our efforts.  Making GA pay for PA is a
distraction from the main fights at FERC and on the Hill.

Finally, I would guess that more funds to FERC and other agencies will
only be used to increase enforcement against those in the industry.
While Enron wants markets that work well, the core problem is that we
haven't deregulated enough - not that markets aren't working.

Also, I don't know where the recommendation numbers from the Bush/Cheney
plan came from -- I think it was an earlier document -- there are no
such numbers in the final printed version of the report that I have.

If you want to talk, please let me know.

Thanks,

Jim

 - DE leg update Aug 27.doc 

Diann --

I agree with Bob.  Please let us know as soon as possible if SCE is willing to discuss this fairly.  

Jeanne -- 

I guess that we would update our Complaint if need be?

Thanks,

Jim

Diann, would you start the dialogue with your contacts and see if it gets fixed?  Thanks.

Bob, how should we handle this?  Should Sue Mara, Jeane or I contact SCE concerning the late fees?

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
JBennett <JBennett@GMSSR.com> on 10/10/2001 02:53:12 PM
Diann -- properly disputed charges are not suppose to be subject to late
fees.

Jeane, I have evidence on some DA bills where SCE has assessed late fees on
disputed bills.  I haven't been able to do a thorough analysis, but knowing
the amount we have disputed so far, the charges could be substantial.

I understood that, until the CPUC makes a decision, the UDC can not charge
late fees on disputed bills.  Correct?

Steve --

We did originally file that the replacement for the PX Credit should be the DJ Index.  My recollection is that we did withdraw this argument, however I've include Sue Mara on this to double check.  If we haven't, I'd guess that is no longer URM's position?

Jim

I spoke with Mary Lynne today, and she said that once upon a time (after the PX expired) we filed something asking the CPUC to make the DJ index a substitute for the PX credit.  Does this ring a bell?  And the more important question -- did we ever withdraw that request?  Thanks.

 10  October, 2001
Response:
 
Intellibridge estimates the following peak demand and installed capacity  figures for each of the four proposed FERC RTO regions based on the most recent  complete data available.  Peak load  data sets that were deemed complete and reliable are for 1999. Installed  capacity information is from forecasts made by NERC for 2001.
 
[IMAGE]
 
 In response to FERC  Order 2000 of 6 January  2000, utilities throughout  the United  Statessubmitted proposals to  form Regional Transmission Organizations (RTOs) for coordinating and controlling  electric power grid systems in their area.   FERC responded to these proposals on 12 July 2001, in a series of orders  that made clear the Commission's vision of four large, regional RTOs making up  U.S. bulk power markets.  FERC said  in these orders, "We favor the development of one RTO for the Northeast, one RTO  for the Midwest, one RTO for the Southeast, and one RTO for the  West."
 
Though the eventual shape and scope of the regional RTOs remains in  question, estimates of capacity and peak demand can be made based on groupings  of North American Electricity Reliability Council (NERC) regional councils or  regional ISOs and bulk power markets.   For the purposes of estimating installed capacity and peak load in these  regions, the following groupings of NERC regional councils and ISOs were assumed  to correspond to the four RTOs proposed by  FERC:
 
Northeast:
?         PJM
?         ISO-New England
?         New York ISO
 
Southeast:
?         Southeastern Electric Reliability Council  (SERC)
?         Florida Reliability Coordinating Council  (FRCC)
 
Midwest:
?         Mid-Continent Area Power Pool (MAPP)
?         Mid-American Interconnected Network, Inc.  (MAIN)
?         Southwest Power Pool (SPP)
?         Eastern Central Area Reliability Coordination Agreement  (ECAR)
 
West
?         Western Systems Coordinating Council  (WSCC)
 
Peak Load  Data:
FERC  Form 714 hourly load data were used to calculate coincidental peak load for the  Midwest and Southeast RTOs.  FERC's  most recent, complete set of Form 714 data are for year 1999; FERC is still  collecting data for year 2000.  Year  1999 data were consequently used throughout for the sake of consistency.  Peak demand for the Western RTO was  taken as the 1999 annual peak reported by NERC for the WSCC in its year 2000  "Summer Assessment".  Coincidental  peak demand for the Northeastern RTO was calculated from 1999 hourly load data  available on the PJM, ISO-New England, and New York ISO web sites.
 
Installed  Capacity Data:
NERC  Electricity Supply & Demand for 2001. While some sets of this data for 2001  are estimates, it can be assumed that the Summer 2001 installed capacity data is  reasonably current. Other estimates can be made available. 
 
Sources:
 FERC NERC ISO-New England PJM New York  ISO 
 
For  more information, you may contact David Givens, senior managing analyst, at  202-298-6300, ext. 243, or dgivens@intellibridge.com 
 - clip_image002.gif 
 - Forum Expert Link Capacity and Peaks.doc 

FYI.  Probably too early for you guys.

Jim

A California meeting is scheduled for Thursday, October 11 at 9 a.m.  For those who need to dial in, the no. is as follows:

	1-800-991-9019; passcode: 7827970

EB872 is reserved for this meeting.

Jim Steffes - if there is anyone else who you feel needs to be in this meeting, please feel free to invite.

Attendees:
Dave Delainey
Janet Dietrich
Vicki Sharp
Mike Smith
Andy Wu
Bob Williams
Jeremy Blachman
Lamar Frazier
Sean Holmes
Jim Steffes

Not that I know?

Jim

Jim:  Is Chris talking about Peter Esposito?  Lisa

Today at a hearing a Dynegy lobbyist was grossing about Enron's FERC filing on an LNG issue.  He was not happy.  Steffes asked him to call you.  Head's up!

David --
 
My thoughts.
 
I would change the section "Reliability" to "Operations".  The Current framework is Non-standardized;  Poor Seams Interface
 
Under Access to Transmission I would change it to say that "Not all Users on the System take service in a non-discriminatory manner."  Utilities can't discriminate versus like users.
 
Under Generation - I would change "optional" to Optimal.
 
I don't also understand the 99%.  Easier to say 100%*   * - Public Power recipricoity issues.
 
Thanks,
 
Jim

David, some suggestions (I cannot write directly on your presentation for some reason, so please call me at 713-301-3421 if you have questions.)
 
Add "real time" price
Add costs and "risk premiums"
Add Generation "and Transmission"
Add lack of "valid" grid information
Change the benefits to "Better ability for customers to utilize numerous energy products, including forward hedging tools and demand side management."  [[Which Enron sells!]]
 
Change Market to "Wholesale Market"  open
 
Also, why do you say 99% open after RTOs?  Is this due to publics that don't participate?  If so, then maybe say "100% open to the extent that non-jurisdictional entities, such as federal power agencies and state power authorities, participate"  or name some examples, such as TVA and BPA.  

 

 

 

 

Please find the latest draft of the RTO slide for inclusion in next week's 3Q Analyst Conference Pitchbook. Greg Whalley will be presenting the Wholesale Section which will include a brief RTO's discussion.

Please take a minute and review and let me know if you have any comments/concerns with the wording. 

Kind Regards. 

Untitled Attachment 

David T. Leboe 
Director, Investor Relations 
Enron Corp. 

Office  713.853.4785 
Cell  713.562.2160 
Fax   713.646.3002 
Pager  877.237.7732 
david.leboe@enron.com 

thanks.

Jim,

If I heard you right yesterday, you said that Phil Harris was exasperated a=
nd couldn't understand why NYISO was so resistant to joining a Northeast RT=
O. =20

From my NY expereince I can tell you a perfect example of the NY attitude t=
oward the merger, if you recall Charleton Heston at an NRA meeting last yea=
r, expressed the sentiment, "not unitl you pry it from my cold dead hand!",=
 I am sure this is the same feeling the folks in NY have toward their joini=
ng PJM... For years, we in NY felt that we where far ahead of PJM as far as=
 technology and operating policies.  Now that PJM has a customer centric ma=
nagement, much improved technology and is the darling of FERC, I'm sure the=
 NYISO staff is struggling with understanding why.  If things were reversed=
, PJM encouraged to join the NYISO, I'm sure NY would be very pleased...and=
 maybe Phil Harris would be happy (but somehow I doubt that).  Recently I s=
poke to a friend of mine from NY who said they had a staff meeting where Bi=
ll Muesler told the staff, that the only reason that the market participant=
s like the PJM model, is because they can game it and make money, while sta=
ting that NY will not give up the effort (to remain independent).  I think =
this illustrates the general attitude of the NY management and the struggle=
 PJM is in for, unless of course FERC Orders the merger, which I think is t=
he only way this can be accomplished.

I'm sure you most likely know most of this, but just thought I'd pass this =
along.

Kind Regards,

Dave

Today after the Hearing I attended lunch with John Anderson and Phil Harris=
.  One of the primary points of discussion involved what to do to respond t=
o the NERC legislative efforts?

Basically we agreed that a straightforward delegation of authority over rel=
iability to FERC made sense for all of the groups.  Agreeing to that, the i=
dea is to review the Bingaman language and see if our groups could agree to=
 that language.  =20

I think that internally Enron is already there???  John Shelk, if you could=
 pls send out the language to everyone on this e-mail to get agreement that=
 would be very helpful.

I'll let you know how we next proceed.  If anyone has any problems, please =
let me know. =20

Thanks.

Ok.  Thanks.  I hope that Lora can send a copy.

Jim

How did it go in La-La Land yesterday?   Could you forward me a copy of your statement made at the Senate hearing yesterday?  Thanks. 

Yes.  Peter is the one who I spoke with.  My testimony went fine.  Me too.

Jim

peter didn't talk to you about our LNG filing?   how did your testimony go?  i'm glad you made it home safely.

Not that I know?

Jim

Jim:  Is Chris talking about Peter Esposito?  Lisa

Today at a hearing a Dynegy lobbyist was grossing about Enron's FERC filing on an LNG issue.  He was not happy.  Steffes asked him to call you.  Head's up!

Steve --

Got a note from EES that there was a Energy Summit in MA to discuss next steps of restructuring today.  The meeting is today.  

Are you going?  Did anyone go?

Thanks

Thanks for the info.  While there may be some differences in presentation, there don't appear to be any basic differences in the analysis.  All of the discussions of the legislation need to be aware that the passage is highly uncertain.

I agree with the analysis that if you have never been DA and sign up today there is a very large possibility that you will pay a surcharge (assuming the legislation passes).  

Let me know if there is anything else.

Jim

Gary Odland
08/29/2001 01:38 PM
Attached is a CA DA brief that Frank received from Les Spahn.  Les has opinions that are different from what we have been advising Frank and EOP.  I need your opinion on how to address these differences.  Thanks.
Frank_Frankini@equityoffice.com on 08/29/2001 11:55:15 AM
Gary, I need Enron's comments on this ASAP.
                    "Les Spahnn"
All:
A lot of runors are swirling around.  There is legislation pending right
now as I write this e-mail.  The outcome is uncertain.  But here is what I
know and what I have been working on for BOMA.
First, the CPUC continues to threaten that it will suspend DA on September
6th, including any DA contract signed since last January.  The PUC has
threatened this several times and has deferred action several times pending
action on the issue by the legislature.  Even if the PUC were to act, the
legislature could override their action with a statute.  But I anticipate
that they will not act as long as the legislature is actively considering
the matter and does something before recessing for the year on September
14th.
The real action is in the legislature.  There is a comprehensive bill -- SB
78XX, the centerpiece of which is a bailout of Southern California Edison.
For DA or anyhting else in the energy arena to happen, the Governor and the
Assembly Democratic leadership insist on having a bailout of Edison.  Here
are the details of the bailout and DA which is linked to it:

1) The state would securitize $2.9 billion in bonds to help SCE pay its
debts.  Those bonds would be repaid by Edison customers who use 20kW or
more in peak daily demand.  That would translate to about 0.06 (as in
6/100ths) of a penny per kW.  The original proposal was to place the
bailout burden only on SCE customers who use 500kW peak demand, which would
have been maybe 1.5 cents per kW (since the base would have been much
smaller), but  we beat that back to the current proposal of 20kW.

2) The Edison surcharge would be non-bypassable.  That means that Edison
customers are going to pay it whether you get your juice through Edison or
from a DA contractor.  If anyone is telling you that you can avoid the
Edison bailout surchage by going DA they are lying!

3) The bill would permit DA going forward if there is demand (load) which
exceeds supply as calculated as follows: DWR contracts + IOU retained
generation + IOU long term contracts.  If this delta, or headroom exists as
of 1/1/03, then, per PUC regs,which are yet to be devloped, the Calif.
Energy Commission would periodically permit DA contracts up to the amount
of headroom, without the customer having to pay the state an exit fee.  (An
exit fee is a fee which would otherwise have to be paid to the state by a
customer for the customer's proportional share of the state's stranded
costs which accrue from power contracts bought by DWR, but for which there
is no market.)  If no headroom exists, a customer still could go DA, but
pay the exit fee to do so.

4) A major issue is what DA would be permitted and what would be suspended.
Right now the proposal is to permit all DA contracts that existed prior to
1/17/01 to continue without penalty.  It looks like contracts signed
between January and June would also be permitted to remain without penalty,
but that date is not definite.  Contracts signed between June and August
24th would also be permitted, but may have to pay some sort of retroactive
exit fee, on a sliding scale, depending on the date they were signed.  All
DA contracts after August 24th would be subject to the 1/1/03 schedule
described in #3 above.

In addition to an Edison surcharge for Edison customers, and exit fees for
DA customers when no headroom exists, there will be another surcharge for
all non-municipal customers who have bought power through an IUO since
January 17th.  That surcharge would be to payoff $13 billiion in state
revenue bonds which would be to repay the state General Fund for power DWR
bought since January.

Where does BOMA, and the rest of the business community stand on these
issues?

1) BOMA has been O.K. with the bond surcharge because every IOU electric
customer has been paying subsidized rates for electricity since Jan. 17,
when the IOUs became uncreditworthy and DWR started buying spot market
power.

2) While BOMA and others are not happy with the price and amount of DWR
long term contracts, we understand the state is CURRENTLY on the hook for
them, and wants to be held harmless for their costs.  BOMA and other
business groups are pushing to have as many of those contracts renegotiated
or abandoned where possible to make more headroom available for DA without
exit fees.

3) BOMA supports another provision of the bill which would rebate any
surplus electricity revenues after the first $500 million to ratepayers
based on each customers proportional share of consumption and electric rate
payments.  This provision is designed to soften the rate increases on
customers who have experienced rate increases greater than 50% in the last
few months.

4) Finally, BOMA is not happy with a ratepayer bailout of Edison.  But the
Governor seems to want it more than breath and he is strong arming everyone
he can see, including all business groups, to help get it enacted.  In that
light, BOMA supported a position that all ratepayers, residential as well
as business pay the debt.  The legislature, however, did not want to pass
this cost on to residential customers, so then it became a fight over where
the consumer threshold would be.  As stated above, we have suceeded in
getting it as low as 20kW peak demand.  (NOTE:  There are those that feel
it is worth bailing Edison out and getting them creditworthy in order to
get the state out of the energy business.  You can decide for yourselves.)

5) It should also be noted that the Edison, bond and DWR surcharges may all
be covered in the existing rates you are now paying.  That is to say that
there may be no need to raise rates again to meet these obligations since
the market price for power has come down substantially.  But this remains
to be seen.

There is more to this package and moer to come i9n terms of changes.  The
committee is going back in at 6:30 this evening and we will see what
happens.  I hope tis helps you in understanding the situation.

Les Spahnn

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
                   * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
  The information contained in this communication may be confidential, is
intended only for the use of the recipient named above, and may be legally
 privileged.  If the reader of this message is not the intended recipient,
you are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution, or copying of
this communication, or any of its contents, is strictly prohibited. If you
      have received this communication in error, please re-send this
communication to the sender and delete the original message and any copy of
                 it from your computer system. Thank you.
* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
                   * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

Jamie --

Thanks for the external view on legislation.  I agree that most of the bills don't "get it right" - the hope is that the FERC can do that without too much legislative guidance (which of course would be wrong).  Not sure that setting up a new federalism on this will ever work - not enough $$ to states to get them to overcome the political power of the utilities.

Jim

Jim:

Thank you for your thoughtful response.  Even if Enron is a "hot button"
these days, we remain big fans of yours.

In regard to your comments on the letter, I disagree with some of the
assertions.

First, I am fairly confident that no major piece of energy legislation
will be passed this year.  As you can see from the attached
congressional update for the DE Task Force prepared by Bev Jones (former
VP for Consolidated Natural Gas), Jimmy Hayes (former Member of
Congress, and Nancy Etkin (former head of Natural Gas Vehicle
Coalition), there is every indication that legislation is going to get
bottled up in the Senate.  I agree with the assessment.

Moreover, the legislation that is being considered has almost nothing in
it of direct relevance to "getting it right" in regard to restructuring.
Without pressure, I expect no federal leadership on restructuring
issues.  While I do agree that commissions are usually a stalling
tactic, both Ken and I are dismayed at the lack of focus, resources
(i.e., DOE has devoted almost nothing of any sort to restructuring) and
lack of qualified personnel directed at promoting more competition in
the energy market.  While you and I may have some idea of what is
necessary (and that is a stretch for me -- given the complexity of the
challenges), I can safely say the vast majority of folks have no idea
what to do -- especially about the tricky jurisdictional questions
involved.

I personally think one way to craft a "new federalism" on restructuring
is to bribe the states into more action.  The federal government does
this with education, housing, etc.  Why not with restructuring?  A
carrot for those states which are moving forward, linked to definite
metrics of progress and openness.

I also strongly believed that state PUCS and federal agencies like FERC
are being pushed to the limit about what they can accomplish given
declining budgets and personnel.  I further think that this slows the
whole process down.  Think about it -- telephone deregulation, a growing
crisis in regard to water, record levels of mergers and acquisitions,
historic changes in regard to natural gas and electric regulation -- all
piled on top of each other for these folks.

Good catch on the numbering of the recommendations cited in the letter.
This has been corrected.

I look forward to seeing you in September at the Board meeting.

Jamie

P.S.   Speaking of the DE Task Force, have you and Bob Frank made a
decision yet to participate?  I hope you do, but I need to know as soon
as possible.

Jamie --

Thank you for keeping me in the loop on your activities.  While I am
always supportive of more public statements pushing competition, neither
I nor Enron can sign on to the letter.

First, I am concerned that having Enron sign on will distract from your
messages.  Enron is a "hot button" in DC and will change the proper
focus.

In addition, I would argue that the recommendation for a national
commission is out of place with the current timing of FERC and
Congressional action -- which is imminent -- while a commission would
delay action on the Hill and at FERC, thus supporting the forces against
competition.  Let's not study this too much - we know what to do.  Move
away from the commission.

Also, I'm not sure how providing federal grant money only to states that
promote competition supports our efforts.  Making GA pay for PA is a
distraction from the main fights at FERC and on the Hill.

Finally, I would guess that more funds to FERC and other agencies will
only be used to increase enforcement against those in the industry.
While Enron wants markets that work well, the core problem is that we
haven't deregulated enough - not that markets aren't working.

Also, I don't know where the recommendation numbers from the Bush/Cheney
plan came from -- I think it was an earlier document -- there are no
such numbers in the final printed version of the report that I have.

If you want to talk, please let me know.

Thanks,

Jim

 - DE leg update Aug 27.doc << File: DE leg update Aug 27.doc >> 

thanks.

Talked with Kerry.  He is ready to go at it!

Janine --

I have not yet talked to Kerry about this but the Translink is moving forward.  Will you do it today?

Jim

I think he would do a good job.  
Jim, Do you want to talk to him about it?
Janine

I agree.

What do you think that about having Kerry take the lead on all MAPP area RTOs while also supporting Roan in MISO/ARTO?  Not top priority but I think this could be a good opportunity.

Jim
Christi/Sarah--you guys are probably aware of this, but just in case you aren't, there was an article in the Minneapolis paper yesterday that Xcel (NSP) had filed on Friday with FERC to transfer it's transmission system to a new company called TransLink Transmission Co.  Joining them are Alliant, Corn Belt Coop (Iowa), Mid AMerican, NPPD, and OPPD.  

I noted that there was a quote in the article that "Xcel estimates that it would cut its overal transmission related fees by more than a thrid through it's participation in Translink.......because there will be less overlap of functions."

Thanks Janine.  Also, please keep Paul Kaufman and Jean Ryall in the loop. =
 We need to make sure that we do this nationally. =20

Thanks.

Jim

I met with Jim Woods to discuss reviewing the states that are open and taki=
ng a targeted approach to most efficiently leverage our resources towards t=
earing down barriers in states where we have a significant market opportuni=
ty with a value proposition.

Steve, to your question the other day as to how much market opportunity the=
re is, what I gleaned from the meeting is that there are a number of opport=
unities that could take us through 2002, but after that it starts to dwindl=
e unless we can mine deeper in states where we have been active.  However, =
the other interesting point is that EES does not have resources to necessar=
ily determine where the value proposition is and is looking to us to presen=
t to them what we think might be markets that will work for them.  Thus, th=
ere may very well be more opportunities than they are currently focused on.=
  As preliminary step, Steve Montovano and I had talked about getting a doc=
ument together that gives the high level summary of each state as a startin=
g point.  Lynette Barnes has worked on such a document and Kathleen Sulliva=
n is going to work with her further and get a draft to Steve and I for revi=
ew and distribution to EES.  Jim was very interested in seeing such a docum=
ent.  Jim also noted that a state that has opportunities in the first year,=
 may not in the second, but could reemerge in the third.

Jim, Jim Wood also mentioned that he had talked to you about a more coordin=
ated approach to EES and government affairs working together.  Jim and I ar=
e going to exchange lists of who is assigned to which states and then put t=
ogether teams.  Steve Montovano and I will work on identifying the governme=
nt affairs people for each state in our regions to give to Jim Woods.

It was agreed that over the next few weeks, I will put together a document =
that will try to preliminarily identify the states and more specifically th=
e utilities where there may be opportunities for EES based on a number of i=
ssues.  The plan is to then share that with Jim Wood and then have a higher=
 level meeting within EES to target where government affairs puts in its gr=
eatest efforts.  Once I have a draft, I will share it internally for commen=
t before sending it on to Jim Woods.

Areas of interest to Jim were all of New England, Pennsylvania, New York an=
d Ohio.  Illinois is emerging as one of their best markets and they are als=
o interested in looking real hard at Michigan. =20

With respect to Michigan, I met with the Michigan EES team and it appears t=
hat from a product development standpoint, they will be ready to go at the =
beginning of 2002, but the commodity desk is saying 2004 due to uncertainty=
 on the RTO front, although they conceded that if progress is made, we coul=
d move the date up.  There was also a discussion of doing financial deals i=
n Michigan for the first years until we are comfortable going physical.

I will keep you posted as this progresses, but I am optimistic that this co=
operative effort will lead to greater opportunities for EES.

Janine  

FYI
Steve --

We did originally file that the replacement for the PX Credit should be the DJ Index.  My recollection is that we did withdraw this argument, however I've include Sue Mara on this to double check.  If we haven't, I'd guess that is no longer URM's position?

Jim

I spoke with Mary Lynne today, and she said that once upon a time (after the PX expired) we filed something asking the CPUC to make the DJ index a substitute for the PX credit.  Does this ring a bell?  And the more important question -- did we ever withdraw that request?  Thanks.

This is especially problematic given that EES and ENA can not comply with the reqts as defined.

Jim

The Commission denied the requests for rehearing (including Enron's) of the Commission's July 25 order on reporting requirements for California natural gas transactions.  The Commission finds that the information is necessary for FERC to better understand how the California natural gas market operates so the Commission can determine whether anything else is needed to be done to protect consumers.  Also, FERC states that the information is necessary for the Commission to advise Congress on whether Congress needs to change the regulatory framework that FERC works under.

A more detailed summary will be provided shortly.  Please let us know if you have any questions.

Sarah

Agree.  In fact this was John Anderson's only problem.  My position would be to simplify Bingaman's language to not define any organization.

Jim

It is important to point out that under the Bingaman reliability language, FERC has total discretion as to whether to adopt a NERC standard.  Charles does make a good point about the deference language.  As written, FERC has discretion to defer to NERC or an RTO to monitor and enforce compliance.  At a minimum, that language should be expanded to include another entity like an EISB.  Similarly, the language should probably be tweaked to allow FERC to adopt standards of an organization other than NERC.

I understand that the NERC needs to be recognized for political reasons - but this shuts out the possibility of a EISB.  Since it recognizes RTOs, it should alos leave open the possibility of yet another entity to perform the reliability standards setting function,  at least allow for the RTOs to work through a central standards setting organization other than NERC.

Per Jim's request, below is the text of the simple Bingaman reliability language for everyone's review.

SEC. 410.   ELECTRIC RELIABILITY STANDARDS.
Part II of the Federal Power Act is further amended by adding at the end the following:
ASEC. 215. ELECTRIC RELIABILITY STANDARDS.
A(a) DUTY OF THE COMMISSION.B The Commission shall establish and enforce a system of mandatory electric reliability standards to ensure the reliable operation of the interstate transmission system, which shall be applicable toB 
A(1) any entity that sells, purchases, or transmits, electric energy using the interstate transmission system, and
A(2) any entity that owns, operates, or maintains facilities that are a part of the interstate transmission system.
A(b) USE OF NORTH AMERICAN ELECTRIC RELIABILITY COUNCIL STANDARDS.B   In carrying out its responsibilities under subsection (a), the Commission may adopt and enforce, in whole or in part, a standard proposed or adopted by the North American Electric Reliability Council.
A(c) MONITORING COMPLIANCE.B In carrying out its responsibilities under subsection (a), the Commission may defer to the North American Electric Reliability Council or a regional transmission organization to ensure the reliable operation of the interstate transmission system and to monitor and enforce compliance of the members of the North American Electric Reliability Council or a regional transmission organization with electric reliability standards of the Commission.
A(c) DEFINITIONS .B   For purposes of this section:
A(1) The term >interstate transmission system= means facilities used for the transmission of electric energy in interstate commerce.
A(2) The term >reliability= means the ability of the interstate transmission system to supply the aggregate electric demand and energy requirements of electricity consumers at all times and the ability of the system to withstand sudden disturbances.@.

Thanks.

Bev Hanson's firm is planning an event in Palm Springs with a number of legislators on November 4, 5, and 6.  The notion is to connect  legislator's directly with the firm's clients in an informal setting (with lots of golf and dinners).  We've been asked to participate.  

Bev notified me of this a short while ago, and has promised more details.  I told Bev we would be interested in participating.  

More details to follow ... .

Janine --

I want to make sure that our comments allow both a retail option and a wholesale option.  Let's also focus the PUCO on the fact that bidding leading to negotiations is the best solution, allows for creativity.

Jim

At the conclusion of the meeting on competitive bidding, parties were encouraged to file comments at the PUCO.  Below is a draft that reflects the subjects discussed and where I think we ought to land, based on our meeting earlier this week.  I would like to file these soon, so please get back to me.

In the meeting there was a lot of discussion on the RFP process.  Of course the utilities wanted to be able to draft the RFP, choose the winning bidder, have their affiliates participate in the process and have very scanty PUCO oversight, all of which I fought vigourously.  I was asked however if Enron could provide info on what should and should not be in an RFP.  On the should part, I said we could probably provide some insights, but that the should not category would probably be a "I know it when I see it" call.  Having said that, any input on this question would be appreciated.

Janine

 << File: Bid.Oh.doc >> 

Please coordinate on this.

Jim

As a result of last Monday's gas meeting, today I attended a meeting with Barry Vanderhorst (EES), Paul Tate (EES) and Matthew Fleming (EWS) about the problems we are facing to supply New York State customers.
According to what they explained these problems have two main reasons:
1.	The PUC requirement that marketers should sign an affidavit stating that they have firm transportation to provide firm customers at city gate during winter. 
2.	The LDCs requirement that marketers must supply customers using a transmission mix (60%/40%, 70%/30%, etc) from different pipelines. This requirement prevents marketers from purchasing capacity only from the cheapest pipeline. Marketers are forced to purchase some capacity from expensive pipelines.

We agreed that there are two different cases:
1.	When Enron must use the LDC firm transportation capacity to comply with the PUC requirement. In this case the LDC could argue that they must allocate the FT capacity to free and captive customers with the same mix they have contracted with the different pipelines. If they allocated the cheap capacity to free customers, captive customers could have to pay a higher price, and this could be resisted by the PUC. The validity of this argument depends on the features of the pass through mechanism that is in place in every case.
Unless you know of (or we find out) other reasons, we considered that in these cases we should send a letter to the LDC (eventually with copy to the PUC) asking how was determined the required percentage mix.

2.	When we do not need to use the LDC firm transportation capacity to comply with the PUC requirement. In this case we did not find a clear reason for the LDC to require the marketer to purchase a transportation mix. The marketer is not using the LDC's capacity and should be allowed to reach the city gate from every possible pipeline.
Unless there is a valid reason, in these cases we considered that we should send a letter to the LDC, asking why do they make that requirement, which are their legal foundations, and how was determined the required percentage mix.

They will send me a mail with the mix requirement of every LDC, explaining in which cases we would have to use the LDC capacity.

We also discussed the case of Rochester Gas & Electric. This LDC has a deregulation program that only allocates 10% of their capacity to marketers.  Besides whenever there is an unbalance, part of it is considered as an injection to storage, but the rest is subject to the pipeline's penalties. They considered we need a higher injection right to storage. We agreed to discuss the issue after analyzing the rate schedule involved (SC5).

Melinda and I will look at the PUC regulations to try to find the answers to the above questions before preparing the letters.

Please let me know if this plan is OK with you.
Regards
Guillermo

Here is my testimony.  I have one attachment that is being sent via fax.

Thanks,

Jim

 

Attached is the testimony that I filed today asking thh PUC of Texas to open the retail markets in the SPP territory.

Thanks,

Jim

 

thanks.  

I haven't asked yet, but the attorney is in Phoenix, so there are travel expenses as well.  I would think $5000 would cover it, but I could possibly do it myself, and maybe have someone from my group (Pat or Harry or Robert) be the witness.  Let me contact the attorney and see what he thinks, and if I am able to represent Enron in Nevada, not being a member of their bar. 

Leslie --

What would it cost for outside counsel to do the hearing?  Maybe running an RCR through with the biggest $$ allows Shapiro, etal to discuss next Tuesday?

Jim

I think we should be represented.  Nevada is a big market, so if it gets screwed up, it should be with our participation.

You may remember that Southwest Gas filed a tariff revision in Nevada that would keep a transportation customer who returns to sales on sales for a term of 5 years.  They modified that request to grandfather customers who returned as a result of this past winter's fiasco.  We filed an opposition to this tariff change back in April (I think it was).  Anyway, the PUC of Nevada has scheduled a hearing on the SW filing for Sept. 24 and I need to know if this is an issue you want to pursue.  I can attend, or I can have outside counsel attend, or we can skip it and rely on our written comments. IF we want to file testimony, it would be due 9/17.  Please let me know what you would like me to do on this.  Thanks.

The best outcome is that there is an obligation to dispose of load through this but the mechanism is negotiated.

Jim

It's really an "either - or" situation in that either the bid is set up to request wholesale power with the utility retaining the customer or as a retail transaction in which we bid for the customers.  The only way to have both is if we allow the utilities to decide this issue themselves, in which case, FE, DPL and Allegheny will go the wholesale route and AEP and Cinergy will go the retail route.  The problem is also giving too much control to the utilities to game the outcomes in favor of their perceived business interests and those of their affiliates.  EES obviously wants it to be retail.  And from an ENA perspective, the wholesale power delivered under the utilities' proposals would have to be load-shaped, which may not interest ENA as much.  We are in the EES vs. ENA question, but under my reading of the statute, it requires a retail bid as my comments indicate. 

Janine --

I want to make sure that our comments allow both a retail option and a wholesale option.  Let's also focus the PUCO on the fact that bidding leading to negotiations is the best solution, allows for creativity.

Jim

At the conclusion of the meeting on competitive bidding, parties were encouraged to file comments at the PUCO.  Below is a draft that reflects the subjects discussed and where I think we ought to land, based on our meeting earlier this week.  I would like to file these soon, so please get back to me.

In the meeting there was a lot of discussion on the RFP process.  Of course the utilities wanted to be able to draft the RFP, choose the winning bidder, have their affiliates participate in the process and have very scanty PUCO oversight, all of which I fought vigourously.  I was asked however if Enron could provide info on what should and should not be in an RFP.  On the should part, I said we could probably provide some insights, but that the should not category would probably be a "I know it when I see it" call.  Having said that, any input on this question would be appreciated.

Janine

 << File: Bid.Oh.doc >> 

I read the same.  It was crazy.  Their solution is to tell us to do what we said didn't make sense.  We won't give the FERC made up information.

Jim

This is not intended to be summary of the FERC rehearing just issued on the Monthly Marketers' Report of Gas Sales to California, but just a heads-up on one issue.  We argued that since we manage our business on an aggregated basis, we cannot report the sales, purchases and transportation on the back-to-back basis contemplated in the rule.  FERC's response was that did not relieve us of the need to report and that since everything is aggregated, then all purchases and transportation should be allocated pro rate to the sales made into CA.  This interpretation is as arbitrary and meaningless as the after-the-fact allocations of supply and transport to specific sales woud have been, that we argued against.  And it is probably just as labor intensive.  When Becky gets back we will look into the burden of compliance, but we have the option to seek further rehearing on this issue.

Thanks for the draft.  Will circulate internally and respond.

Jim

Enclosed is my draft of possible revisions to the above-referenced reliability provision, taking into
account suggestions by Craig. I have enclosed a redline version and a clean one. The revision does
the following:
1.By adding"without hindering reliable, non-discriminatory, and efficiently priced transmission service"
it uses words of art from FERC Order No. 2000 and shows the intertwined nature of security and commercial practices.
2.By adding the reference to section 201(f), it specifically includes  Federal and State entities.
3.There is no named reference for any particular industry  standards body---thus no attempt to either
provide an advantage or disadvantage to any existing body.
4.The FERC could take into consideration recommendations of enties with technical expertise regarding reliability standards---such as WECC , Regional Advisory Bodies, and the States.
5. FERC could assign enforcement responsibility in a given area to any appropriate entity---such as WECC or RTOs.
6.It puts in a definition of reliability standards that is limited to security and, by not including adequacy, is
not as intrusive on prerogatives of States.
7.I bracketed the possibility of a States savings provision for further consideration. Of course, the
narrower the scope---i.e. no consideration of generation adequacy---the less need there is for such
a provision.
Please give me any feedback.
Bobby

 - SEC 410 redline.doc << File: SEC 410 redline.doc >> 
 - SEC 410 clean3.doc << File: SEC 410 clean3.doc >> 

Here is PJM's attempt at NERC language.  I think it makes sense for us to support this.

Jim

Enclosed is my draft of possible revisions to the above-referenced reliability provision, taking into
account suggestions by Craig. I have enclosed a redline version and a clean one. The revision does
the following:
1.By adding"without hindering reliable, non-discriminatory, and efficiently priced transmission service"
it uses words of art from FERC Order No. 2000 and shows the intertwined nature of security and commercial practices.
2.By adding the reference to section 201(f), it specifically includes  Federal and State entities.
3.There is no named reference for any particular industry  standards body---thus no attempt to either
provide an advantage or disadvantage to any existing body.
4.The FERC could take into consideration recommendations of enties with technical expertise regarding reliability standards---such as WECC , Regional Advisory Bodies, and the States.
5. FERC could assign enforcement responsibility in a given area to any appropriate entity---such as WECC or RTOs.
6.It puts in a definition of reliability standards that is limited to security and, by not including adequacy, is
not as intrusive on prerogatives of States.
7.I bracketed the possibility of a States savings provision for further consideration. Of course, the
narrower the scope---i.e. no consideration of generation adequacy---the less need there is for such
a provision.
Please give me any feedback.
Bobby

 - SEC 410 redline.doc 
 - SEC 410 clean3.doc 

My understanding is that we are going to work Ark.  

Jim
Jim, While covering SE-RTO issues I learned more about the situation in Arkansas.  I wanted to also bring it to your attention b/c there could be large ramifications -- for other open markets and states that might consider retail competition. 
 << File: RTO Morning Update 101001.doc >> 

Please see first article. 

Sue and Janine - I think we need to talk about this apart from the RTO effort and as part of rebuilding momentum for restructuring.  If Arkansas repeals we could face an even more uphill battle in states like Missouri, Lousianna and other states.  The Governor has stated that repeal is ' "a real possibility" unles it's demonstrated that Ark. will see benefits."  From the joint mw/ne staff meeting last week I understand that no decision had yet been made on whether or not Enron would intervene.  The next hearing at the commission is next Thursday the 18th.

Gentelmen, Yesterday's Power Daily reported on filings make in Arkansas regarding delaying restructuring. In preparation for any upcoming meeting with the Commission, we should at least familiarize ourselves w/ various stakeholders and commissioners takes on restructuring.

Following is a brief description of the article:

Entergy Arkansas  - state should take wait and see approach and decide later if it should pusch back the current '05 deadline

AG Pryor - push back beyond '05 - referenced Southwesterns and Entergy's difficulties in being ready for Texas '02 - states law should not be repealed but strengthened w/ consumer protections

SWEPCO (AEP) - starting choice in Oct. '03 might still be possible -- opposes any changes to current law

OK G&E - favors delaying beyond '05

Ark. Elec Coop - favors repeal

Mary Lynne -

Do you need anything on this?

Jim

Before we carry this much further, let me explain some more why I raised the question in the first place.

We currently assume that our exposure to CTC going forward is zero.  Arthur Andersen was questioning this assumption, as market prices in general are lower than embedded gen now (unless you include DWR costs), which implies that if we were under the old CTC regime we could be paying some positive CTC.  AA was wondering why we weren't holding some reserves for this eventuality.

Mary Lynne and I told them we weren't reserving b/c we just have no clear idea what will happen in the coming months re:CTC, but that in all likelihood zero is the best guess b/c no one can agree on what PX credit ("market" price) is now that there is no PX.  Besides, though SCE and PG&E are arguing for different methods (the so-called "top-down" and "bottom-up"), in the end the result will be about the same (CTC=0), especially now that PG&E has supposedly stopped "adjusting" the PX credit to recover past undercollections.  And of course, the DWR contracts muddy the waters, since if one includes them in the calculation of utility gen costs, then you could easily get to a negative CTC situation.  Bottom line: we think things are so screwed up that everyone will prefer just to ignore CTC for the few months remaining that it has to run.

In light of all this we thought we might further quell AA's skepticism if we could show that although we had once argued that DJI should be used as a substitute for PX credit, we were now simply arguing that DA should pay T&D only, and that CTC should become a relic of the past.

I think by now it may be a dead issue -- I believe AA has accepted our arguments w/o this extra bit of persuasion, else I would have heard more from Mary Lynne.  Thanks for all the background and input from everyone, and please let me know if you have any more relevant comments given this context.

>  -----Original Message-----

How about Wednesday Oct 17 next week at 9am?

Jim

Thanks for taking the time to meet with us the other day.  Jim,  I wanted to see when you might have some time to get back together with more members of our group to dig deeper into the regulatory issues facing our power market?  

Please let me know and we'll set something up.

Steven  

Thanks.  No major issues.

Jim

Jim,

You saw this already in yesterday's Restructuring Today, right?  I think this doesn't impact our desires to gain support, but wanted to make sure this wasn't news to anybody else.  If you want, I will forward to others, unless it is already common knowledge.

BINGAMAN HALTS ENERGY
LEGISLATION FOR NOW

But Strange Wording Leads to Questions
About Senate Plan

As Chairman Jeff Bingaman, D-NM,
tells it, Senate Majority Leader Tom
Daschle urged him to suspend Energy
& Natural Resources Committee's
effort to mark up "of energy legislation
for this session of Congress."
"Instead, the chairman will propose
comprehensive and balanced energy
legislation that can be added by the
majority leader to the Senate calendar
for potential action prior to
adjournment."
Before the Senate adjourns in the
next few weeks or at the end of the
year?
We got the news at 6:03 pm
yesterday and were unable to get a
clarification. For Bingaman it's
"increasingly clear to the majority
leader and to me that much of what we
are doing in our committee is starting to
encroach on the jurisdictions of many
other committees...
"With the few weeks remaining in
this session, it is now obvious to all
how difficult it is going to be for these
various committees to finish their work
on energy-related provisions.
"Finally, and perhaps most
importantly, the Senate's leadership
sincerely wants to avoid quarrelsome,
divisive votes in committee.
"At a time when Americans all over
the world are pulling together with a
sense of oneness and purpose,
Congress has an obligation at the
moment to avoid those contentious
issues that divide, rather than unite,
us."
Bingaman will build consensus with
members of his committee with other
committee chairs and with other
senators as he readies a proposal to
present to the majority leader.
The message doesn't seem to rule
out getting a package to the majority
leader that could be put into a
conference report at some opportune
time, thus avoiding committee
arguments over drilling versus
comprehensive electricity reform. We
suspect because of Bingaman's views
at the Enron dinner last week that he's
thinking of Senate action next year.
Joe Barton, R-Tex, is going ahead
today with hearings on RTOs, reliability
and the need for comprehensive
electricity legislation.

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Today after the Hearing I attended lunch with John Anderson and Phil Harris.  One of the primary points of discussion involved what to do to respond to the NERC legislative efforts?

Basically we agreed that a straightforward delegation of authority over reliability to FERC made sense for all of the groups.  Agreeing to that, the idea is to review the Bingaman language and see if our groups could agree to that language.   

I think that internally Enron is already there???  John Shelk, if you could pls send out the language to everyone on this e-mail to get agreement that would be very helpful.

I'll let you know how we next proceed.  If anyone has any problems, please let me know.  

Thanks.

Thanks but my group has an all day budget meeting.  Maybe some other time.

Jim

Jim,

Judah Rose, who directs ICF's wholesale energy analysis group, is in
Houston on Monday the 15th and asked me if he should meet with you.
What do you think?

He is quite interesting to talk to if that makes any difference-- a man
of strong opinions.  His bio is in the quals package I sent you.

--Jim T.

Yes.  Her name is Linda Noske.

I think a few people in our group who should attend have a conflict at that time.  Can I have my ass't, Marcy, work with your ass't to figure something out?

Steven

How about Wednesday Oct 17 next week at 9am?

Jim

Thanks for taking the time to meet with us the other day.  Jim,  I wanted to see when you might have some time to get back together with more members of our group to dig deeper into the regulatory issues facing our power market?  

Please let me know and we'll set something up.

Steven  

Susan --

When we get to a point to make comments, please let me know.

Jim

Jim, I will be participating in this.  Elizabeth, do you want to be on the call also?

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: August 28, 2001

RE: Conference Call on FERC NOPR on Revised Public Utility 
      Filing Requirements
      ?Friday, September 7th at 2:30 p.m.

On July 26th, FERC issued a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NOPR) proposing to replace its current filing requirements for short- and long-term service agreements with an electronically-filed Index of Customers, among other changes.  Comments are due to FERC on or before October 5th.  On August 8th, EPSA sent out a memo briefly summarizing the Order and identifying some possible issues of concern.  If you have any additional issues, please forward them to Jackie Gallagher at jgallagher@epsa.org.

We will hold a conference call on Friday, September 7th at 2:30 p.m. to discuss issues for possible comments on the NOPR.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA call.  In the meantime, if you have any questions or comments, please contact Jackie Gallagher at 202-628-8200.

What does this mean??

Jim

The attached statistics were filed with under Project 22834 -Retail Pilot for EES.  Please share with others who might be interested.  Thanks  
 << File: 10032001PilotStatus.xls >>   

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Harry & Christi --

We need to be coordinating on this.  You both met with these people at different times.  I don't want to be creating work or stepping on each other.  I don't think there is any problem, but let's sit down and coordinate.

Thanks,

Jim

I met with Rogers, Dale, Narsimha, and Berney earlier this week to determine how to ensure that EES is getting timely information on FERC filings that may impact the EES regulated positions.  They asked that Govt Affairs provide them with the basic information on FERC filings (filing date, protest date and brief description of the proposed tariff change), especially for changes that impact rates, retail standards, imbalances, non-negotiable agreements, and icap.  

In order to facilitate this, Susan Lindberg will email FERC filing notices to Rogers, Dale, Narsimha, Berney and Don (with copies to the state GA person, such as Janine in the Midwest, and with a copy to Harry).  Dale said that his group should be able to actually make the analysis of the filing and determine if EES should protest/comment/intervene.  Dale will send us a copy of EES top 40 priority companies to watch.  Govt Affairs folks should also watch for non-FERC filings that may impact this list, as well.

Also, EES is doing physical delivery in ComEd, ERCOT, Cinergy, Columbus Southern (AEP), California, Nevada, NY, PJM, and NEPOOL, so we need to make sure that they have notice of tariff changes and other issues in these regions.  Thanks.

Alan Comnes --

Please let me know what we're doing on this?  You are the Project Lead.  Go get 'em.

Jim

Attached is a FERC Notice of a Technical Conference on West-Wide Price Mitigation for October 29, 2001.  This technical conference will address possible modifications to the current West-wide price mitigation methodology for the winter season.

 - EL01-68.00A.doc 

Sarah --

You're call on working with EPSA.  Get everything you can.  I don't understand how "new services" is moving fast enough.

Jim

Jim and Christi:

Here is language I proposed to EPSA to be included in "Standardized Tariffs:"

FERC must eliminate the distinction between network and point to point transmission service and create a new "Network Plus" service that is the only firm transmission service offered and is available to all transmission customers.

Julie questions if this is what we really want (we being all of EPSA, including the generators).  Julie is nervous about proposing to eliminate point to point service all together.  She thinks the problem with network is that utilities are preventing generators from getting the service.  I told her that is not our issue, and just changing the rules so that network service is available to generators does not help us.  

Julie suggested language that said something like "FERC should explore new transmission services for customers."  I told her that doesn't work -- we need to address this issue head on.  She is concerned that we're going to have dissention within the membership.

How would you all feel about retaining point to point service but making network available to everyone, with a much less restrictive sign up period (e.g. 1 month term rather than 1 year term), etc.  I think its cleaner to eliminate the two types of services and create a new "Network Plus" service that's available to everyone -- that would be the "firm" service and "nonfirm" would continue to exist.  Do you all think we would want to retain point to point service?  Even if we don't, if some EPSA members want to retain point to point service, we may need to think of ways to make network more user-friendly without eliminating point to point.

Let me know what you think

Sarah

Sorry.  I'll be in Austin testifying.

Jim

Please join the Georgetown Class of 2001 Associates
for a Hosted Lunch

Thursday, October 18
Noon - 1:00 p.m.

EB 1701
Lunch courtesy of Enron Associate/Analyst Program

Agenda: meet & greet; overview of Fall recruiting season; overview of planning for and opportunities to participate in 2002 Georgetown@Enron initiatives.

Please RSVP to Kirk Neuner so that we know how much food to order, Kirk.Neuner@enron.com.  Join us!

good luck

Thanks Jim.  I will push EPSA as much as I can.  I too don't see how this helps us.  I'm a little annoyed because I think Julie's focus has been primarily on getting better access for generators, and I know she heard the annoyance in my voice when I told her that better generator access is useless for us.  We've been pushing this issue for some time, and we have a lot of marketers in the group, so hopefully we will come to some sort of position that gets us all what we need.

Sarah --

You're call on working with EPSA.  Get everything you can.  I don't understand how "new services" is moving fast enough.

Jim

Jim and Christi:

Here is language I proposed to EPSA to be included in "Standardized Tariffs:"

FERC must eliminate the distinction between network and point to point transmission service and create a new "Network Plus" service that is the only firm transmission service offered and is available to all transmission customers.

Julie questions if this is what we really want (we being all of EPSA, including the generators).  Julie is nervous about proposing to eliminate point to point service all together.  She thinks the problem with network is that utilities are preventing generators from getting the service.  I told her that is not our issue, and just changing the rules so that network service is available to generators does not help us.  

Julie suggested language that said something like "FERC should explore new transmission services for customers."  I told her that doesn't work -- we need to address this issue head on.  She is concerned that we're going to have dissention within the membership.

How would you all feel about retaining point to point service but making network available to everyone, with a much less restrictive sign up period (e.g. 1 month term rather than 1 year term), etc.  I think its cleaner to eliminate the two types of services and create a new "Network Plus" service that's available to everyone -- that would be the "firm" service and "nonfirm" would continue to exist.  Do you all think we would want to retain point to point service?  Even if we don't, if some EPSA members want to retain point to point service, we may need to think of ways to make network more user-friendly without eliminating point to point.

Let me know what you think

Sarah

Guillermo -

Before you send any letters, please make sure that Steve Montovano is the in loop.  He manages that region.

Jim

As a result of last Monday's gas meeting, today I attended a meeting with Barry Vanderhorst (EES), Paul Tate (EES) and Matthew Fleming (EWS) about the problems we are facing to supply New York State customers.
According to what they explained these problems have two main reasons:
1.	The PUC requirement that marketers should sign an affidavit stating that they have firm transportation to provide firm customers at city gate during winter. 
2.	The LDCs requirement that marketers must supply customers using a transmission mix (60%/40%, 70%/30%, etc) from different pipelines. This requirement prevents marketers from purchasing capacity only from the cheapest pipeline. Marketers are forced to purchase some capacity from expensive pipelines.

We agreed that there are two different cases:
1.	When Enron must use the LDC firm transportation capacity to comply with the PUC requirement. In this case the LDC could argue that they must allocate the FT capacity to free and captive customers with the same mix they have contracted with the different pipelines. If they allocated the cheap capacity to free customers, captive customers could have to pay a higher price, and this could be resisted by the PUC. The validity of this argument depends on the features of the pass through mechanism that is in place in every case.
Unless you know of (or we find out) other reasons, we considered that in these cases we should send a letter to the LDC (eventually with copy to the PUC) asking how was determined the required percentage mix.

2.	When we do not need to use the LDC firm transportation capacity to comply with the PUC requirement. In this case we did not find a clear reason for the LDC to require the marketer to purchase a transportation mix. The marketer is not using the LDC's capacity and should be allowed to reach the city gate from every possible pipeline.
Unless there is a valid reason, in these cases we considered that we should send a letter to the LDC, asking why do they make that requirement, which are their legal foundations, and how was determined the required percentage mix.

They will send me a mail with the mix requirement of every LDC, explaining in which cases we would have to use the LDC capacity.

We also discussed the case of Rochester Gas & Electric. This LDC has a deregulation program that only allocates 10% of their capacity to marketers.  Besides whenever there is an unbalance, part of it is considered as an injection to storage, but the rest is subject to the pipeline's penalties. They considered we need a higher injection right to storage. We agreed to discuss the issue after analyzing the rate schedule involved (SC5).

Melinda and I will look at the PUC regulations to try to find the answers to the above questions before preparing the letters.

Please let me know if this plan is OK with you.
Regards
Guillermo

Change the language on Operations to include ...Coordination of Service and Planning for Transmission ...

Thanks,

Jim
Thanks for last week's feedback on the RTO slide.  We would like to go with the following slide assuming you are OK with content.

Please let me know if you are OK with the slide.

Thanks.

 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> 

David T. Leboe
Director, Investor Relations
Enron Corp. 

Office  713.853.4785
Cell  713.562.2160
Fax   713.646.3002
Pager  877.237.7732
david.leboe@enron.com

No.  Although the lack of a concrete decision is a "decision" - just not one we like.  Our goal is to get this dealt with by end of November.

Jim

I believe we are ok for now.  Do we have any indication of when the CPUC will make some decisions on the CTC methodology?  

Mary Lynne -

Do you need anything on this?

Jim

Before we carry this much further, let me explain some more why I raised the question in the first place.

We currently assume that our exposure to CTC going forward is zero.  Arthur Andersen was questioning this assumption, as market prices in general are lower than embedded gen now (unless you include DWR costs), which implies that if we were under the old CTC regime we could be paying some positive CTC.  AA was wondering why we weren't holding some reserves for this eventuality.

Mary Lynne and I told them we weren't reserving b/c we just have no clear idea what will happen in the coming months re:CTC, but that in all likelihood zero is the best guess b/c no one can agree on what PX credit ("market" price) is now that there is no PX.  Besides, though SCE and PG&E are arguing for different methods (the so-called "top-down" and "bottom-up"), in the end the result will be about the same (CTC=0), especially now that PG&E has supposedly stopped "adjusting" the PX credit to recover past undercollections.  And of course, the DWR contracts muddy the waters, since if one includes them in the calculation of utility gen costs, then you could easily get to a negative CTC situation.  Bottom line: we think things are so screwed up that everyone will prefer just to ignore CTC for the few months remaining that it has to run.

In light of all this we thought we might further quell AA's skepticism if we could show that although we had once argued that DJI should be used as a substitute for PX credit, we were now simply arguing that DA should pay T&D only, and that CTC should become a relic of the past.

I think by now it may be a dead issue -- I believe AA has accepted our arguments w/o this extra bit of persuasion, else I would have heard more from Mary Lynne.  Thanks for all the background and input from everyone, and please let me know if you have any more relevant comments given this context.

>  -----Original Message-----

Christi --

Some interesting language for the ICAP team.  Please forward along.

Jim

For over two years, PennFuture Facts has been informing you, and maybe even=
 entertaining you, about important energy and environment issues in Pennsyl=
vania.

But PennFuture works hard not only to inform you about our state's energy a=
nd environment issues and problems, we work to solve them. If you haven't a=
lready, please visit our website at www.pennfuture.org to learn more about =
PennFuture, and support our work by becoming a member online. $25 a year is=
 all it takes to help us make Pennsylvania a better place to live, work and=
 visit!

PennFuture's E-cubed is a commentary biweekly email publication concerning =
the current themes and trends in the energy market.

The $45 Million Rip Off

Running back Ricky Walters, a native of Harrisburg, once responded to a que=
stion about why he did not lay his body on the line to catch a ball over th=
e middle by saying, "For who? For what?" Residential and business customers=
 in the Duquesne Light service territory should also cry, "For who? For wha=
t?" to the news that, starting in January 2002 when Duquesne Light joins PJ=
M West, they will be charged $45 million per year to meet PJM West's new ca=
pacity requirement called ACAP, the close relative of the rogue PJM ICAP ru=
le.

Actually, in this instance, "for who" is clear. PJM and Orion are the parti=
es for whom customers will pony up $45 million, or $32.40 per year for a 60=
0 kWh monthly customer. Orion is charging $44 per MW-day for capacity, the =
equivalent of 0.45 cents per kWh. The cash goes into Orion's pocket and is =
a windfall for a "product" that typically has a marginal cost of zero (see =
the affidavit of Professor Peter Cramton, filed with FERC on behalf of the =
New England Independent System Operator, who properly concluded that ICAP s=
hould be scrapped). But the windfall to Orion is delivered courtesy of the =
PJM Independent System Operator that stubbornly clings to its failed ICAP m=
arket and won't  replace it with forward operating reserve markets and requ=
irements.

The real mystery is, "for what" will customers be paying $45 million? Has a=
nyone shown that Duquesne's reliability record has been unsatisfactory? Has=
 PJM demonstrated that the $45 million would reduce Duquesne's loss of load=
 probability? There are no good answers to those questions. ICAP/ACAP remai=
n the biggest consumer rip-off in the wholesale market. It's past time for =
FERC, public utility commissions, and especially the offices of consumer ad=
vocate to insist on their abolition and replacement.

A few things must be remembered about ICAP:

Along with the huge ECAR region, an area twice the size of PJM, the Duquesn=
e Light Control Area prior to January 2002 had no ACAP or ICAP rules. And y=
et for the last 30 years the lights have stayed on in Pittsburgh as well as=
 or better than in PJM. Even when PJM had rolling blackouts on January 19, =
1994, the Duquesne control area continued to provide reliable power.

So what will the $45 million buy consumers? More reliability? No. ACAP won'=
t increase the Duquesne control area's historic level of reliability. And e=
ven if it would, why is it necessary? Reliability in the Duquesne control a=
rea has been excellent. In fact, Duquesne and the rest of the ECAR area ens=
ure reliability through different, equally effective but lower-cost reliabi=
lity rules.

The Current ECAR Model
The ECAR model could be summarized by the phrase "pay only for what you nee=
d." The current reliability mechanism is met through purchasing 4 percent o=
perating reserves. These are made up of Load and Frequency Regulating (Spin=
ning) Reserves (1 percent) and Contingency Reserves of 3 percent divided in=
to 1.5 percent of contingency Spinning Reserves and 1.5 percent of Continge=
ncy Supplemental Reserves. These reserves margins have served western Penns=
ylvanians well, resulting in reliable service equal to - and in some cases =
exceeding - PJM.

Reserve payments compensate only those units that are not operating at the =
time but have the capability of generating in less than 10 minutes. The cos=
t for these reserves is not easily calculated due to lack of a transparent =
market. Yet they appear to be approximately less than $2/MW-day during on-p=
eak periods and often less than $1/MW-day. This would result in costs of le=
ss than $1.15/MW-day based on the Allegheny Power peak load. The cost for a=
 typical residential customer would be .012 cents per kWh.

The Current PJM Model
The PJM model could similarly be described as, "pay for everything and stil=
l pay extra for what you need." Generators receive three payments, the rese=
rve payments mentioned above, a capacity payment, and an energy payment. PJ=
M, like ECAR, has a need for operating reserves and purchases these in orde=
r to maintain reliability. Additionally, the PJM model provides an Unforced=
 Capacity payment to all generators based on their historical performance. =
Generators receive this payment whether or not they are able to operate on =
a particular day or are already being compensated for providing electricity=
. PJM currently compensates generators based on a 19 percent reserve margin=
. The overall cost of ICAP has varied considerably over the three years of =
competition. The average since 1999 has been $78.74/MW-day. This results in=
 overall costs of over $1.6 billion per year. Residential customers have ex=
perienced ICAP costs ranging from about 0.4 to 1.8 cents per kWh. Moreover,=
 on top of ICAP, a PJM customer must purchase additional spinning reserves =
costing approximately the same as the reserves in ECAR.

Ending the Rip-off
PJM should move to a reserve-based reliability methodology similar to ECAR.=
 An Operating Reserve-based methodology used in tandem with PJM's competiti=
ve electricity market will furnish the same level of reliability but at gre=
atly reduced prices. This methodology should pay for those products that ar=
e really needed - excess reserves to be used during peak demand periods. A =
strong forward energy and operating reserve market can send the right price=
 signals to build new generation - a fact that is readily apparent as we lo=
ok to the Mid-west where thousands of megawatts of new generation have been=
 built in response to clear price signals over the past few years.

All this tells us that ICAP has its self-interested defenders but no justif=
ication for raiding consumers' wallets.

PennFuture (www.pennfuture.org), with offices in Harrisburg, Philadelphia a=
nd Pittsburgh, is a statewide public interest membership organization, whic=
h advances policies to protect and improve the state's environment and econ=
omy. PennFuture's activities include litigating cases before regulatory bod=
ies and in local, state and federal courts, advocating and advancing legisl=
ative action on a state and federal level, public education and assisting c=
itizens in public advocacy.

To unsubscribe, simply reply to this email with "unsubscribe" in the subjec=
t.

 - vol3no19_101501.doc

No.  Just wanted your thoughts.  Thanks.

This vote was for UBP members only.  I cast a vote for Option A on behalf of Enron.  We still a small group of suppliers that are a holdover from the CUBR days and we keep in close contact through this process.  It appears from the email votes that I have seen that most members are choosing Option A - even some of the "harder to convince" utilities.  Any thoughts?

Nancy --

1.	Are we able to vote?
2.	If yes to #1, what is your recommendation for our vote?

Thanks,

Jim
FYI!  This is a note that was sent out to the UBP membership for vote.

As discussed during Friday's conference call, we're sending out the overall
governance documents asap for an email vote of affirmation by August 31st.
Scott has provided the revised documents.

Does the following statement to our membership do the job??   If you have
any changes / suggestions, please provide them by Wednesday, as I will send
out this email by the end of Wednesday.

The risk of asking for this is:  What if we don't get an affirmative vote??
The risk of not asking for this may be worse.
I don't expect a unanimous affirmation based upon recent events.

Charlie
_______________________________________________________________________

Members of UBP-RSB,

The attached documents represent the basis of organizational design
development for a Retail Standards Board per the original charge of this
organization.  The versions of the documents attached here reflect the
changes identified in discussions during our Baltimore meeting on July 23rd.
Your Governance Committee needs you to confirm that these documents now
state our intentions and the design needs of a Retail Standards Board before
we can reasonably proceed with detail organizational design efforts.

As the Governance Committee's work proceeds, the organizational design may
evolve slightly as the high level view of these documents does not contain
every design requirement or anticipate every contingency.  There may be
issues that arise in developing an inclusive organization that need your
further attention.  As, or if, such issues arise, the GC will seek your
input.

For now, please provide an email response which indicates either that

a)  your company agrees with and supports the Statement of Structure and the
membership's revisions to Strawman 2 as described in the attached documents,

     or

b)  your company cannot support the Statement of Structure and the
membership's revisions to Strawman 2 as described in the attached documents.

Please provide your response no later than August 31, 2001.

UBP voting rules will be applied in this instance.

Charles L. Driggs
Chair, Governance Committee

Manager, Gas Operations & Planning
Conectiv Power Delivery -- Gas
630 MLK Boulevard
mail stop 88MK62
Wilmington, Delaware  19899-0231

office   (302) 429-3194    cell phone  (302) 229-4515    fax  (302) 429-3207

 

Jeff --

In a budget meeting, will call this afternoon unless something critical.  Thanks,

Jim

Were you on call this morning?  It was pretty interesting.  If you weren't on, I'd like to discuss a couple of topics that came up.

Best,
Jeff

No.  Although the lack of a concrete decision is a "decision" - just not one we like.  Our goal is to get this dealt with by end of November.

Jim

I believe we are ok for now.  Do we have any indication of when the CPUC will make some decisions on the CTC methodology?  

Mary Lynne -

Do you need anything on this?

Jim

Before we carry this much further, let me explain some more why I raised the question in the first place.

We currently assume that our exposure to CTC going forward is zero.  Arthur Andersen was questioning this assumption, as market prices in general are lower than embedded gen now (unless you include DWR costs), which implies that if we were under the old CTC regime we could be paying some positive CTC.  AA was wondering why we weren't holding some reserves for this eventuality.

Mary Lynne and I told them we weren't reserving b/c we just have no clear idea what will happen in the coming months re:CTC, but that in all likelihood zero is the best guess b/c no one can agree on what PX credit ("market" price) is now that there is no PX.  Besides, though SCE and PG&E are arguing for different methods (the so-called "top-down" and "bottom-up"), in the end the result will be about the same (CTC=0), especially now that PG&E has supposedly stopped "adjusting" the PX credit to recover past undercollections.  And of course, the DWR contracts muddy the waters, since if one includes them in the calculation of utility gen costs, then you could easily get to a negative CTC situation.  Bottom line: we think things are so screwed up that everyone will prefer just to ignore CTC for the few months remaining that it has to run.

In light of all this we thought we might further quell AA's skepticism if we could show that although we had once argued that DJI should be used as a substitute for PX credit, we were now simply arguing that DA should pay T&D only, and that CTC should become a relic of the past.

I think by now it may be a dead issue -- I believe AA has accepted our arguments w/o this extra bit of persuasion, else I would have heard more from Mary Lynne.  Thanks for all the background and input from everyone, and please let me know if you have any more relevant comments given this context.

>  -----Original Message-----

Sorry that I didn't get to you sooner.  The head of the group is Tim Battaglia who is the best person to work with.

Jim

Hey, Jim! 
  Thanks for your note back!  Glad to hear that you all are well and hope you had a nice vacation.  In the meanwhile, Roger has actually had a chance to go in and interview with Enron.  He was there for half a day last Saturday talking with the steel group.  It seemed to go really well, and he will be going in to talk to them again on Thursday.  Roger is pretty excited about what they are doing - so hopefully something will work out! 
   Well, I'll keep you posted, and once we make it back to Houston, we'll have to get together some time!  Take care!  Lisa

Not really.  I tried to get to talk to her but never could get an opportunity.
 
Jim

Jim--Arnetta McRae, a commisioner from Delaware, will be on the RtO panel on Thursday.  We don't have any relationships with her, but I know that she was at the GENIE event in D.C. last week.  Did you get any sense of where she is on the RTO issues, other than she felt slighted that FERC didn't pay attention to her and the other commissions?

Didn't get invited.  Are you going?  I don't plan on sending anything - do you think we should even though we didn't get any invitations?

Jim

Jim--did you get invited to Harvill's wedding or the cocktail reception?  (wedding is NOv 3 and reception is Nov 8).  Just in case you did or were thinking of sending him something, you will see that I have asked our local lobbyist to review reporting requirements. 

Molly--one of the Illinois COmmerce Commissioners, Terry Harvill, is getting married early next month and I would like to send him a small gift.  Am I correct  that I am able to do so without any reporting requirement?  As I recall, the only individual's at the ICC that we have to track are the Chairman and the Exectutive Director?

I'll play the cheap course.

Jim

I'm still in for golf if you are.  I'll bring some knitting in case you decide to bail...

There are several changes to the Direct Report meeting in November.  

First, the meeting will now conclude by 12:00 (noon) on Friday, November 9.  

Second, the activities portion of the trip will not be sponsored by Enron....each individual will be responsible (personally) for payment of activity of choice.  Most individuals either chose golf or horseback riding.....below is an estimate as to how much these activities will cost.

Golf:
Green Fees	(East/West Course)	$155.00/18 holes (Includes golf cart, use of practice balls, club care & storage)	
		(East/West Course)	$85.00/9 holes	(includes - same as above)	

		(Mountain Course)	$95.00/18 holes  (includes - same as above)
		(Mountain Course)	$50.00/9 holes	 (includes - same as above)		
Rentals:
Golf clubs with sleeve of balls	$55.00
Golf Shoes			$20.00

Horseback riding:		1hour		$25.00/person
				1hour pkg	$35.00/person (pkg includes shuttle ride to stables)
				2hour		$40.00/person
				2hour pkg	$50.00/person (pkg includes shuttle ride to stables)

				mini ride	(group only) $15.00/approximately 20 minutes
				

If you have an interest in the spa services that are available, please let me know and I will fax the spa list to you.

Please let me know ASAP which activity you choose so I can make the necessary arrangements. 

Thanks and please call me if you have any questions.

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Ray --

Looks very good.  We need to stress the points on what we need FERC to do -- fix their mistakes in the Rehearing.  One other point, maybe we should stress that FERC could open these proceedings and not delay the decision because the Cal ISO is taking so long.  Also, don't be shy about describing how the process is going so slowly and the "abuses" of the Cal ISO and its lack of independence.

Jim

All, attached is the first draft of talking points which Jim asked me to draft for use in a possible lobbying effort regarding rehearing of FERC's July 25 Order.  The "message" is that the scope of the California "refund hearing" should be expanded to address the question of whether refunds are appropriate in the first place, and that the parties to the California hearing should be granted the same due process opportunities which were afforded the parties in the Pacific Northwest hearing.  Please let me have your comments and recommendations.  Ray

 << File: Talking Points- July 25 Order.doc >>   

Jose & Charles --

Thanks for the update.  I am concerned that "customers" are talking about h=
aving NERC deal with commercial matters without first agreeing to FERC's co=
ntrol over everything? =20

We should discuss the Goulding Report when you return.

Jim

To add to Charles memo..

1) The Trustees were all present to listen the debate at the stakeholders c=
ommittee. That was very positive.

2) The agenda order was changed to allow ample time to discuss the issues.=
=20

3) Time and time again it was stated that NERC was running out of time to m=
ake the required transition. If not alternatives would be pursued; example =
EISB

4) Time and time it was stated that the Goulding task force Recommendations=
 should be taken as a package, as a necessary first step.  These include:

1. Committee Representation . The Task Force recommends that the NERC Board=
 direct the standing committees to modify the standing committees represent=
ation and voting to reflect the Task Force's attached "Initial Sectors and =
Criteria Model." This Model is based on the Task Force's preference for rep=
resentation by "sector," and incorporates the Task Force's general recognit=
ion that an RTO sector should be included. The Task Force recognizes that s=
ome work remains to be done to refine the definitions of each sector and th=
e criteria for belonging, but believes that the Initial Sectors and Criteri=
a Model is an appropriate next step and should be taken immediately. Assumi=
ng that it may take some months to put in place the details of the new Mode=
l, including the new weighted voting procedures, the Task Force recommends =
that two ISO/RTO representatives be added immediately to each of the existi=
ng standing committees to provide formal representation and a voting role f=
or ISOs/RTOs until the Initial Sectors and Criteria Model has been implemen=
ted.

2. Committee Participation and Voting . The Task Force recommends open part=
icipation in each sector, subject to certain criteria and qualifications. T=
he Task Force has evaluated the qualification criteria and voting procedure=
s used in several Regions (ERCOT and MAAC), and has incorporated features o=
f those procedures into the recommended participation and voting procedures=
. Specifically, the Task Force recommends weighted voting by and within eac=
h sector, similar to what is done in MAAC.

3. Due Process . The new Organization Standards Process, which will be pres=
ented to the Board in October, addresses most due process issues and concer=
ns. The Task Force recommends implementing this new process immediately.

4. One-Stop Shop . The Task Force favors having a single organization for d=
eveloping Reliability Standards, Market Interface Practices, and Commercial=
 Practices. The Task Force believes that NERC has an opportunity to reinven=
t itself to become this organization, and should take definitive steps in t=
hat direction at its October 2001 Board and Stakeholders Committee meetings=
.

5. Funding . The Task Force recommends that steps be taken immediately to d=
ecouple the funding of NERC from the Regional Reliability Councils. The Fun=
ding Task Group recommendations, adopted by the Board in February 2001, sho=
uld be pursued.

6. MIC Role in Standards Approval . The Task Force recommends, as an immedi=
ate step to address concerns with the current NERC Standards Approval Proce=
ss, and to provide a "bridge" until the new Organization Standards process =
is implemented, requiring the MIC to vote on all new/proposed NERC Operatin=
g Policies and Planning Standards and report results to the Board, includin=
g consideration of any minority positions.

5) Lots of discussion about EISB and how NERC may interface with it as a po=
ssible alternative.

6) Silence on the issue of "self regulating organization" . No one advocati=
ng that position.

7) Good opportunity to speak with Trustees one-on-one at dinner.

Jose=20

Here are some bullet points of what transpired at the NERC meeting in Vanco=
uver this Monday.

The customers met for almost 2 hours before the start of the SHC meeting.  =
Reps from Enron, Mirant, Dynegy, DENA, APPA and ELCON were present.

All agreed that a unified voice is needed to show strong direction from the=
 customer side.  This may mean putting aside some internal positions.  Cust=
omers need to show support of the Goulding Task Force recommendations which=
 offers a package deal to move NERC forward as a single standards setting o=
rganization for both reliability and commercial issues. The Goulding Task F=
orce recommendations do fall short of asking for NERC action.

Agenda Item 5 - Scope of NERC over Commercial Issues
To ensure unity in appearance, customers agreed to maintain discussions in =
front of the Independents at a higher policy level.   Many details are need=
ed to get individual entities "on board" however, such details should not i=
mpede on the ability for customers to show strong support on principles, i.=
e.-one-stop-shop, balance of membership, etc.  Therefore, all agreed to kee=
p details out of the discussion, i.e.-funding, seats, charter, etc.

The actual SHC discussion was constructive, and persons articulated the nee=
d for a package deal to the room. The debate brough the expected concerns o=
f the transmission providers to the surface.  TVA (Terry Boston) was most v=
ocal about keeping NERC out of the commercial side.   Dominion Resources (G=
lenn Ross) supported the customers' position.  PJM (Phil Harris was also su=
pportive). =20

Agenda Item 6 - Independence of Security Coordinators
Comments made that this is a long standing stalemate at NERC and that NERC =
does not have the authourity to require corporate independence. Suggestions=
 made to perform better and more audits.  Dave Penn brought up the memo fro=
m Roy Thilly.  Need to ask the Board to bring this issue to FERC for resolu=
tion.  Good arguments made by customers on need for independence in a new c=
ompetitive market structure.  FRCC (Wiley) made arguments that the NERC sho=
uld not revamp policies to police the few bad apples.  Should deal directly=
 and specifically with the problem.=20

A straw poll was taken of the persons in the room over recommending actions=
:
1) NERC should require corporate indepdence and ask FERC to address it.
2) NERC should focus in on the problem Security Coordinators and take speci=
fic actions to safeguard independent judgement (audits)

The vote was 21/24.  There were strong comments that this vote was not inte=
nded to be an industry representative vote, only to show how split the indu=
stry is over this issue.

The meeting adjourned for lunch and the Independents left after the meeting=
 reconvened.
The SHC agreed to ask the BOT the following:

?=09Establish a goal/vision to become the one stop shop for development of =
wholesale electric industry standards. =20
?=09Add words that "we need to go forward from where we are.
?=09Take immediate action to adopt the initial recommendations contained in=
 new Board agenda item 22.
?=09Actively solicit cooperation collaboration and support from Canadian an=
d US government entities.
?=09Facilitate - jointly with interested trade associations; federal, state=
 and provincial regulators, and other stakeholder organizations - an open a=
nd inclusive process to achieve consensus on the definitions and attributes=
 of the functions necessary for the development of wholesale electric indus=
try standards and practices, an on a course of action to institute such cap=
abilities.
?=09Interface with state and provincial regulators to address retail operat=
ion issues as they affect wholesale operations.

Agenda Item 9 -Transmission Expansion
Reference to "incentive rates", and "accelerated amortization", should be r=
emoved, not a reliability policy need.=20
The reference to these expansion solutions are intended to be tutorial and =
does not assume NERC will begin to undertake rate issues.  APPA - public pe=
rception will be different.  Must remove this language.  Glen Ross will pre=
sent this report to the Independents outlining the strong opinions on both =
sides.

Let me know about how you intend to move forward.  Probably the same team as the CA reporting.

Also, what did AGA do with its Storage Figure Report?  I heard that they cancelled the publication.
 
Jim
FYI - It looks like this is something that EES for sure and maybe ENA will have to comply with.  It is an EIA report required for all natural gas marketers with residential and/or commercial customers in the states of GA, MD, NY, OH, and PA; neither Leslie nor I received any notice of the potential requirement.  The OMB notice was published in the Federal Register in March, but since we don't typically monitor that publication, we did not see it, and I couldn't find any press reports on it.  Based on this correspondence, the first we heard about it was when EES got a copy of the form last week.
 
So that you don't have to plow through the attachment, here are the data elements that are to be reported for sales in each of the above states:
 
4. To how many end-use customers did you sell natural gas? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
5. How much natural gas did you sell to these customers? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
6. What was the revenue received for the natural gas commodity you sold to these
customers? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
7. Were there any receipts for distribution charges or taxes associated with the sale
of natural gas? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
_ Yes - Continue to Question #8
_ No - Skip to Question #9
8. How much were these receipts? . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
9. Please use this space for any explanation that may be essential in understanding your reported data.
10. Enter the name, telephone number, fax number, and e-mail address of the person to contact concerning the information on this report.
 
At this point, we don't think there is anything we can do about this procedurally .  Any other ideas?  I will find out from Donna Greif how much of a problem, if any, they will have compiling the information.
 
 
I found the attached information on the EIA website.  (I copied the screens and pasted them to the word document, so the format is a little off.)  Note that the report is required for all natural gas marketers with residential and/or commercial customers in the states of GA, MD, NY, OH, and PA.  It appears that EIA received OMB approval for the reporting requirement in late May of this year for a three-year period.  The actual form is available on EIA's website, as explained in paragraph 5, but the data elements are shown on page 4 of the attachment.  Note also the last two pages of the document, where EIA plans for further reporting are discussed.
 
 
 
My line will be busy for the the next 10 minutes or so, so try the fax at about 11:10 your time. thanks.
Thanks,
Becky
 
I have one at my desk....shall I fax it to you....or do you have someone who can swing down and pick it up...
 
dg
Jess

Sure.

I got an invite to the cocktail reception on the 8th.  It is being thrown by Ed Hurley, one of the commissioners at the Chicago CLub.  I have to be in Nevada that day and cannot go, but I think I am going to send something small.  Would you like me to put your name on it too?  

Didn't get invited.  Are you going?  I don't plan on sending anything - do you think we should even though we didn't get any invitations?

Jim

Jim--did you get invited to Harvill's wedding or the cocktail reception?  (wedding is NOv 3 and reception is Nov 8).  Just in case you did or were thinking of sending him something, you will see that I have asked our local lobbyist to review reporting requirements. 

Molly--one of the Illinois COmmerce Commissioners, Terry Harvill, is getting married early next month and I would like to send him a small gift.  Am I correct  that I am able to do so without any reporting requirement?  As I recall, the only individual's at the ICC that we have to track are the Chairman and the Exectutive Director?

Thanks.  We will discuss in context of State review.

Jim

Jim - here is Frank's take on summit in Mass.  Looks like we will have opportunity for change in Mass. I iwll be putting together a more comprehensive plan shortly. SM

Steve - 

See attached  article.  The Energy Summit turned out to be quite worthwhile and well timed, as I was able to get a better perspective of what opportunities we may have to make changes next year.  Also, had a chance to chat briefly with Chairman Connelly, Commissioner Vasington and Commissioner Keating, and others. The most telling part of the article is the last paragraph where Speaker Finneran says, "We'll be doing some adjustments" in legislation next year, "Some of them may be vary large adjustments, but they will be adjustments. We're trying to formulate the phase of deregulation, an enhanced deregulation, if you will."  My sense is that competitive Default service may be a possibility, supplier consolidated billing may also require a change to the legislation. Clearly, it is a time to try to hone in on what EES and ENA's wish list is for Mass

I met with DeTore Thursday night as well, and would like to reschedule a meeting with you and him within the next couple of weeks if possible.  

Let's discuss.

Frank

 << File: Article on MA Energy Summit.doc >> 

I'd say we want tariff language before any investigation.  I don't typicall=
y like investigations.  I like complaints.  My thought is to pre-sell tarif=
f changes to FERC with a broad coalition and then get the Ohio PUC to ask F=
ERC the question.

Jim

Then I will pursue getting an investigation and if we get one, we can devel=
op the model to push in that case.  I am assuming by model tha you are refe=
rrring to a mechanism that works for the midwest apart from or in conjuncti=
on with the ISO.  I will be with Mike and Jeff Merola tomorrow and will get=
 started on working on this with them.

We need a model for the entire Midwest independent of the ability to change=
.

Jim

At this point we dont have draft language and we dont have a settlement wit=
h language that allows us to push the way we can in Ohio.  My thought was t=
o push for an investigation and see within that context how far we could go=
.  At a minimum, if a hearing were to be granted, I think we could end up i=
mproving the balancing rules for IP, CILCO, etc.  Com Ed has the most favor=
able provisions and could end up being the model.  In my discussions with J=
eff Merola and Rogers Herndon, they can work with this however it is not op=
timal.  They need to do a transaction in order to figure out where the bugs=
 are.

Janine --

If we have draft tariff language, I'd push pretty hard.

Jim

On Friday, I participated in ICC Chairman Mathias' Roundtable on the state =
of competition in Illinois.  One of the questions he asked was what the ICC=
 could do to improve competition in Illinois.  I commented that the ICC cou=
ld commence an investigation on the balancing rules of the various utilitie=
s, having pointed out the problem's with ComEd's and the fact that the othe=
r utilities are even worse.  He expressed concern over ICC jurisdiction and=
 opined that to the extent that it impacts retail transactions and adversel=
y affects retail competition, the ICC is within its jurisdiction to order t=
he utilities to file an amended OATT before FERC for FERC's approval.  I pl=
an to follow-up with a letter to him and all the Commissioners and would li=
ke feedback as to how hard I should push on this.  Should the ICC look into=
 balancing (to which I give a less than 50% probability) we would have to b=
e prepared to participate.  I think it would be highly worth the effort, es=
pecially as far as Illinois Power is concerned, however, I would like some =
feedback as to your views in order to guage how hard to push this.

Thanks,
Janine

FYI.

Call Jeff if you have more questions.

Jim

FYI - This is for NY, we am starting on NE and PJM next.

Jeff
 
EES Product Announcement
10/16/2001 10:29 AM
Sent by:	Kathleen Pope-Sance
 

Introducing a product that lets New York customers turn their 
energy load flexibility into a revenue opportunity.

Enron can turn energy usage flexibility into revenue for our customers. When a customer chooses Enron's product, 
they receive monthly payments in exchange for reducing their energy usage at Enron's request. Requests are made 
when energy market prices are high, so the energy the customer doesn't use can be sold on the market at a premium. 
Bad time for the customer? No problem--they can choose not to reduce usage, and pay a 
"buy through price" to Enron instead. Want to learn more? Click here .

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Does this make sense?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Erin Perrigo, Manager of Policy

DATE: 10/16/01

RE: EPSA Draft Comments on NYISO and Con Ed Requests to
      Extend AMP and LMM
      ? Filings Due on Friday, October 19th

The New York Independent System Operator, Inc. (NYISO) and Con Ed have again made requests to extend both the Automated Mitigation Procedures (AMP) and the revised localized market-power mitigation measures  (LMM) until October 31, 2002.  Once again, EPSA has drafted a protest, arguing that the use of price correction mechanisms result in unintended, yet harmful, consequences on the market such as limiting market entry, slowing the development of risk mitigation tools, and undermining demand-side response.  EPSA's also stresses that yet another extension of the provisions, intended to address flaws in the start-up of the market two years ago, is unwarranted.

Please review the draft and forward any comments or suggestions to Erin Perrigo at EPSA at 202-628-8200 or eperrigo@epsa.org by noon on Thursday, October 18th so that we can make a timely filing by Friday.

 - Con Ed and AMP Extension Protest.doc 

I'll go to the Houston meeting.

Jim

Interested, or do you want to send anyone?

Ms. Elizabeth C. Linnell
Manager
Enron Corp.

Dear Elizabeth:

We are fast approaching our Fall Roundtables for members of the Retail
Energy Advisory Service.  These events are an important element of your
membership in the Retail Energy service and provide a terrific
opportunity to hear CERA's latest thinking on the current and future
state of Retail Energy markets.

We will be holding two Roundtables this Fall:

* San Francisco, CA, November 14, 12:00-4:30PM PST
* Houston, TX, November 16, 12:30-5:30PM CST

Each of these half-day events will feature presentations by CERA experts
on the current and future state of retail energy markets.  Among the
timely issues being addressed this Fall will be:

* The Retail Market Outlook
* The Wholesale Outlook and its Influence on Retail Markets
* Lessons from European Retail Gas & Power Markets
* Retail Billing: Regulatory Challenges, Technology Solutions

In addition to insightful presentations and discussions, these
Roundtables will also offer many opportunities for networking with CERA
staff, members of CERA's Retail Energy Advisory Service, and other
invited guests.

To review the most up-to-date program details, and for registration and
logistics information, please check back to the CERA website often at
http://www.cera.com/event.

I sincerely hope you will be able to join us, in either San Francisco on
November 14th or in Houston on November 16th. If you have any questions
or would like additional information, please contact me directly.  To
register, please complete the enrollment form on the CERA website, and
return to CERA Registration - by FAX at +1 617 498 9176 or by email at
register@cera.com.

Best regards,

David Gibbons
Commercial Director - Retail Energy
Tel: +1 617 441 1319
dgibbons@cera.com

************************************************************
Our relationship with you is very important to us.  Should you
prefer not to receive e-mail notifications from CERA, please send
a reply to this message with "DoNotEmail" as the subject line of
your message. ( mailto:info@cera.com?subject=DoNotEmail )
************************************************************

Should this go into Janine's efforts on Markets?

Jim

Jim - here is Frank's take on summit in Mass.  Looks like we will have opportunity for change in Mass. I iwll be putting together a more comprehensive plan shortly. SM

Steve - 

See attached  article.  The Energy Summit turned out to be quite worthwhile and well timed, as I was able to get a better perspective of what opportunities we may have to make changes next year.  Also, had a chance to chat briefly with Chairman Connelly, Commissioner Vasington and Commissioner Keating, and others. The most telling part of the article is the last paragraph where Speaker Finneran says, "We'll be doing some adjustments" in legislation next year, "Some of them may be vary large adjustments, but they will be adjustments. We're trying to formulate the phase of deregulation, an enhanced deregulation, if you will."  My sense is that competitive Default service may be a possibility, supplier consolidated billing may also require a change to the legislation. Clearly, it is a time to try to hone in on what EES and ENA's wish list is for Mass

I met with DeTore Thursday night as well, and would like to reschedule a meeting with you and him within the next couple of weeks if possible.  

Let's discuss.

Frank

 << File: Article on MA Energy Summit.doc >> 

Thanks.  I want to talk about this on the "Consultants" call with Linda Robertson.  Should we push this argument or leave the FERC with its infirmities?  I believe that we can work away at many of our concerns in the "should refunds be reqd" phase.

Jim

Jim,  I added a couple of bullets to incorporate your suggestions.  See especially the second to last bullet.  Ray

 << File: Talking Points- July 25 Order.doc >> 

Ray --

Looks very good.  We need to stress the points on what we need FERC to do -- fix their mistakes in the Rehearing.  One other point, maybe we should stress that FERC could open these proceedings and not delay the decision because the Cal ISO is taking so long.  Also, don't be shy about describing how the process is going so slowly and the "abuses" of the Cal ISO and its lack of independence.

Jim

All, attached is the first draft of talking points which Jim asked me to draft for use in a possible lobbying effort regarding rehearing of FERC's July 25 Order.  The "message" is that the scope of the California "refund hearing" should be expanded to address the question of whether refunds are appropriate in the first place, and that the parties to the California hearing should be granted the same due process opportunities which were afforded the parties in the Pacific Northwest hearing.  Please let me have your comments and recommendations.  Ray

 << File: Talking Points- July 25 Order.doc >>   

Jeff --

Look at the letter.  I see no issues.  Call me with your thoughts.

Jim

please see the redlined letter below.  I am also forwarding to Jim Steffes for comments. 

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Thanks for the information.  At this time, I don't think that I am interest=
ed in any reports.

Jim

Dear Jim,=20
=20
Sometime within the past week you may have received a catalogue that  descr=
ibes Xenergy's Multi-Client Research offerings for 2001. In case it  did no=
t reach you, I have attached a pdf version for your convenience. The  catal=
ogue gives an overview of the various core and companion studies that  Xene=
rgy is currently working on. The REM 2001 program is described on page  2. =
I have attached a REM 2001 powerpoint presentation to better  explain our w=
ork.  The slides go into more depth about the current status  of retail ene=
rgy markets (slides 1-22), and then where things stand with  the research t=
hat is underway.  Do let me know if you'd like more  information about the =
REM 2001 study and I will be happy to arrange a conference  call with Taff =
Tschamler, one of the key people involved with this  project.  The final me=
eting for sponsors will be held Feb 25 -27, 2002 at  the Four Seasons Hotel=
 in Austin Texas.  Aside from hearing about the final  study results, this =
meeting is an excellent opportunity to meet informally  with all of our Ret=
ail Energy Market sponsors.=20
=20
I will check back with you in a week or so to see if you have  questions. =
=20
Thanks very much for your time.
=20
Laura Colburn, Xenergy, Inc.
(781) 273-5700, ext. 505ldcolburn@mediaone.net << File: file://C:\Program F=
iles\Common Files\Microsoft Shared\Stationery">
<STYLE>BODY {
=09BACKGROUND-POSITION: left top; MARGIN-TOP: 25px; FONT-SIZE: 10pt; MARGIN=
-LEFT: 25px; COLOR: #000080; BACKGROUND-REPEAT: no-repeat; FONT-FAMILY: Ari=
al
}
</STYLE>

<META >>=20
=20
=20
 - Laura Colburn.vcf << File: Laura Colburn.vcf >>=20
 - Multi Client Catalog.pdf << File: Multi Client Catalog.pdf >>=20
 - REM 2001Status of Retail Mkts. .ppt << File: REM 2001Status of Retail Mk=
ts. .ppt >>

Please put in swepco file for thurs.

Thx,
Here is AEP's settlement offer, Jim.  As you can see, it dates from Oct. 4
or so.  I understand that discussions with the parties to further develop
this offer were not fruitful, and it has not gone anywhere.

Here is a draft settlement document which reflects the changes from yesterday's conference call.  AEP has not received management approval of this proposal. However, we to expedite the review process we are sending the proposal out as a discussion document. Accordingly, this draft is not an offer of settlement from AEP and AEP reserves the right to suggest changes to the draft upon further review. 

 - Docket 24468 Settlement 10-3.doc 

Pls put in SWEPCO file.

Jim

FYI.  Cities' response to the AEP settlement offer I forwarded  earlier.
 

Linda --

Pls include in the file.

Jim

Attached is the most recent "settlement" document being circulated in the  SWEPCO delay case.  Rex is the attorney for TIEC.
 
Date:          10/16/2001  04:20:28 PM 
Date:         10/16/2001 04:05:14 PM  
Date:         10/16/2001 01:39:14 PM  
 - Statement of Position D. 24468.doc 

Jean --

You may want to call Jeff and find out where he is going with this talk?  We still need to meet with a detailed plan on Texas.  Maybe next week or soon thereafter.

Jim

Jeff -- Can you also keep Leslie, Becky and Jean (Austin office) in the loop on your TX intrastate issue (so we can keep our reg/advocacy issues coordinated).  Thanks.

Pls put in my SWEPCO folder.

 
Date:         10/16/2001 01:39:14 PM 

FYI

In the press releases I saw that NSTAR filed yesterday (10/15) with the DTE to decrease rates.  I have checked both the DTE and NSSTAR website but they are not posted yet.  I would like to get a copy of the NSTAR filing as soon as possible.  Enron Direct is anxious to determine the level of decrease so we can assess our product viability.

In addition, have you heard anything regarding WMECO making a filing to lower their rates.

Thanks,

Chris

I think that this is a good step but we need to remember that NERC in the commercial sector may not prove to be the end all.  Also, while RTOs may enforce the standards or set the standards, not sure if we want one organization doing both.

Jim

This is a direct result of the recent actions from GISB to get involved in the wholesale electric standards.   We and EPSA have made positive statements about the GISB process.  NERC has been forced to change to accomodate what many in the industry are looking for.  There are still many "ifs" at GISB at this time, much of it around how much the big utilitites would be willing to support it.  Our position has been - whoever provided the best deal first, that is where the industry will take its business.

Kevin's preferences for RTO standards is not out of the question.   FERC will utlimately decide how much standards setting authority the RTOs will have.   NERC will certainly foucs - at least - on inter-RTO standards, something RTOs will not do well, if at all.  Howvever, NERC must not impede on internal RTO market structures and rules - a "commercial standard"  - this is why NERC recognizing commercial interests is such a big step.

Some of the traders saw this announcement yesterday and wanted to know our reaction.  Comments?

FYI
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
"Dave Nevius" <Dave.Nevius@nerc.net>@nerc.com on 10/16/2001 04:14:46 PM
Sent by:	owner-shcnominees@nerc.com
NERC Roster

The NERC Board, at its meeting today in Vancouver, took bold steps to
expand its role for developing standards for the wholesale electric
industry in North America, to ensure the independence of actions by its
21 Security Coordinators from any wholesale or retail merchant
functions, and agreed to revamp the composition and voting structure of
its standing committees.

Attached are the relevant resolutions and policy statements approved by
the Board.

A press release concerning these actions is available on the NERC web
site.

Dave Nevius

  <<Board Resolutions on Items 20, 21, 22.doc>>  <<FINAL SCRTF Initial
Sectors and Criteria 092701.doc>>  <<FINAL SCRTF Report to SHC and BOT
092701 .doc>> 
 - Board Resolutions on Items 20, 21, 22.doc << File: Board Resolutions on Items 20, 21, 22.doc >> 
 - FINAL SCRTF Initial Sectors and Criteria 092701.doc << File: FINAL SCRTF Initial Sectors and Criteria 092701.doc >> 
 - FINAL SCRTF Report to SHC and BOT 092701 .doc << File: FINAL SCRTF Report to SHC and BOT 092701 .doc >> 

Any time you want to you should feel free.

Jim

If it is OK with you I would like to listen in on the conference call today if I have the time.

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketing Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: October 12, 2001

RE: October 17th Power Marketing Conference Call
      ? Wednesday, 3:30 p.m. (EDT)

Our weekly Power Marketers Working Group conference call will be held on Wednesday, October 17th, at 3:30 P.M. (EDT).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

October 17, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

? RTO Week

? Market-Based Rate Review

? Interconnection Issues

? California/West

? New York

? New England

? Alliance

Did we decide not to join with anyone else?

Jim

RE: Docket EL01-68-000  Investigation of Wholesale Rates of Public Utility Sellers of Energy and Ancillary Services in the Western Systems Coordinating Council.
 
Dear Mr. Boergers: 
 
Enron Power Marketing Inc. (EPMI) respectfully requests the opportunity to make a statement during the October 29, 2001 technical conference in the above-referenced proceeding.  EPMI would appreciate the opportunity to allow the following representative to make a statement on its behalf:

G. Alan Comnes, 
Director, Government Affairs 
Enron Corp. 
121 SW Salmon Street 
Portland, OR 97204 
email: AComnes@enron.com 
telephone: 503-464-8129 

EPMI operates as a marketer of electric power and natural gas in markets throughout the Western Systems Coordinating Council (WSCC).  EPMI has been an active participant in this and related dockets and has submitted written comments pertaining to Westwide price mitigation on both May 7, 2001and August 20, 2001. In addition to identifying problems created by continued price mitigation in the WSCC, EPMI will identify problems that will be created if the Commission were to inconsistently apply price mitigation in the WSCC or make rule changes that create further uncertainty in the marketplace.   Because of EPMI's unique position as a power marketer that operates throughout the WSCC, it has a unique perspective to provide the Commission and workshop participants.

A letter making the same request, along with Mr. Comnes' credentials, will be filed with the Commission tomorrow.  If you have any questions regarding this matter, please contact me at 713-853-3180.  

Sincerely, 

Robert J. Frank

 

 

 

HERE IS THE REPORT.

Jim

 

Great idea.  

My key points would be that (a) FERC needs to push ahead with its "right sized" RTOs and (b) focus on standardizing the tariff and market design [no more collaborative efforts].  Two simple, easy to understand thoughts.  

Also, I think that it's a mistake to use the term "large RTOs".  We don't want large RTOs.  We want RTOs that cover natural markets and benefit consumers.

Jim

In the aftermath of RTO week and following up on Rick's successful pre-briefings, we should be out spinning on the back end as well.  Perhaps Sarah, Meredith and I can come up with some thoughts on message points and send them around for comment.  Sound OK?

Looks good.  Is there a timeline on when FERC may act (or at least when the Audit) will be final?  Is this information confidential?  Should we be working the trade press?

Thanks,

Jim

A conference call was held today with FERC staffers to discuss items of interest or concern to us.  Participating for FERC were Bob Pease (enforcement att'y), Stuart Fisher (economist) and Bruce Poole (engineer).  Alan Comnes, Dave Perrino and I weighed in for Enron.  The laundry list of topics discussed is attached.  We expressed the sentiment that the root cause of all these issues and concerns is the current composition (and non-independence) of the ISO board, and suggested that the ISO board situation should be the subject of the upcoming FERC audit of ISO.  We went on to discuss the audit further and the fact that there is no established or formal comment process.  However, we were invited to file written comments with the Commission on what we thought should be audited, and Alan is taking the lead on this.  We will try to get others to sign on to the comments.  Some of the discussion items that the staff was highly interested in included:

	ISO request for a bid from us to prop up the price (staff requested a copy of the transcript).
	Any unexplained decreases in ATC (staff asked to be advised in real time).
	Information related to ISO OOM purchases (and whether they were declining).

All in all, it was a successful, informal call lasting about 40 minutes.  Staff was receptive to and agreed to receive periodic calls from us in the future.  This allows them to keep up with what is going on industry, and of course gives us an opportunity to educate and alert them on issues of interest to us.  Ray

 << File: audit points.doc >> 

 

If FERC agrees, does this hurt our retail business and the implementation of our retail gen product next year?

Jim

On October 17, 2001, Dynegy Midwest Generation, Inc. and Dynegy Power Marketing, Inc. (Dynegy)
tendered for filing a Complaint against Commonwealth Edison Company.  In its complaint, Dynegy alleges 
that ComEd has failed to properly enforce the network resource designation provisions of its Open 
Access Transmission Tariff (OATT).  Dynegy further alleges that ComEd's actions jeopardize reliability, 
deprive Dynegy of revenues for capacity sales, and permits the improper prioritization of network transmission 
service for bumping and curtailment. Interventions are due October 26.

Please contact me if you would like further information.  

John --

To your point #3Burr --

Probably want to bring in Steve Montovano on the NC PUC question -- we have worked with a local lawyer in the past (I think her name is Allison Duncan) that could help with this question and demonstrate that having an RTO does NOT make a state deal with retail competition any sooner than it wants to deal with the question.  Steve Montovano could probably be of assistance here.  Maybe bring in Allison to DC to deal directly with the staff?

Jim

I had two interesting meetings yesterday afternoon with staff to key members of the House Energy and Air Quality Subcommittee: Rep. Richard Burr (R-NC) and Rep. Chip Pickering (R-MS).  Terry Allen, one of our consultants, accompanied me.

In both meetings, I used to great effect the broad coalition that had filed with us in the Southeast RTO case against the North Carolina PUC stay request.  If you didn't see it -- there is a long article on the coalition and the filing in yesterday's Energy Daily, which I used with the staff to show the many groups that support what we need in the Southeast.  I am going to send them the filing itself as a follow up.

Burr is very important because he is the lead cosponor of the Sawyer-Burr bill that has voluntary RTO language and effectively a prohibition on mandatory RTOs.  Key points--

	1,	We had heard from a friend of Carin's in the Burr office that Burr and/or the staff did not have favorable view of Enron.  I checked with the head of the Duke office -- a personal friend of mine -- who said the staffer has friends who work for Southern.  However, at the meeting, the staffer said that Burr's office had had difficulties with prior Enron lobbyists no longer with the company and that they looked forward to a fresh start.

	2.	Burr's main interest is transmission legislation that provides incentives for more investment so Wall Street will look favorably on transmission.  His main interest is in the incentive pricing section.  He said the bill was put in as they left so could stake out an opening position before Barton releases a draft in September.  (This confirms Pat's observation that Burr likes to be a player.)

	3.	Staff said Burr has done interviews in which he said that a handful of RTOs are inevitable and desirable -- the question is how to get there.  To date, he has been most influenced by the NC PUC -- (Commissioner Ervin, son or grandson of the late Senator, is a family friend of the Burr staffer).  The PUC says that the FERC RTO plans for the SE would force NC to act on retail competition before 2006 -- which it is not in a position to do.  (We need to respond to this argument.)

	4.	Burr staff acknowledged that the final subcommittee-approved bill (if there is one), would move far in the direction of the FERC plan.  He said that the draft to be sent out from committee staff next week will be a staff draft and that it may not even address the tough issues like RTOs -- leaving those decisions to Members.  (I will check with Andy Black -- who told me a few weeks ago that it would either affirm FERC's authority or make RTOs mandatory.)

	5.	Burr would be very interested in meeting with Ken Lay (per the request letter we had faxed earlier yesterday).

Pickering is important for the added reason that he is the primary House sponsor of PUHCA repeal.  His staff confirmed many of the details about process in the House that we had heard elsewhere.  The staff draft will be out next week -- may not cover all issues yet.  There will be 2-3 hearings in September.  That will be followed by a Barton draft that would be formally introduced (reflecting additions and changes from the staff draft.)

	1.	On PUHCA -- I raised our concerns about the recordkeeping provisions and gave him the clarifying language from V&E included in our draft package of language we gave DOE.  He said he has spoken to Kelliher (whose advice he respects) and that Joe said the recordkeeping language needed to be clarified.  Joe referred him to the version in H.R. 2944 in the last Congress (which I will check to see if that solves our problem.)  Staffer is willing to look at our language.

	2.	On RTOs -- Pickering's office has not too much.  The staffer is under the impression that Entergy might actually like them in the way FERC has proposed.  He said Southern has raised concerns about FERC's plans with Pickering's office, but the staffer gets the impression that Southern thinks they are inevitable -- it is all a matter of timing.  The disturbing thing is the staffer said something about perhaps staging the RTO process so there would be more of them of smaller scope now on a pre-set path to 4-5 later.  I said this was a bad idea -- wasted resources to form the interm steps and likely that the final 4-5 would then never happen.  Instead, Congress needs to follow FERC's lead that 4-5 make sense based on natural trading markets, power flows, etc.

I was encouraged by these meetings in terms of not encountering stiff resistance -- but coming away knowing we need to fully implement our aggressive campaign plans to keep the legislative process from becoming a hindrance to achieving our RTO goals.

Steve --

What's up with GA PSA Wise wanting to open marketers books?  Saw this in Gas Daily today.  Any info is helpful.

Jim

There are some Commodity meetings.  One with Jim Wood and one with Greg Sharp.  Harry, can you please call and get on these meeting schedules?

Also, Guillermo Canovas and Melinda Pharms are going to the EES gas meeting weekly.  

Jim

I am going to start periodically attending the SE power origination weekly meetings.  Mike attends the Midwest origination meetings and I have gotten very positive feedback from the originators.  I'll find out what the Services group and Northeast origination has in the form of regular meetings.  Are there any that we should attend for EES?  Let me know if I should ask them.

Damon --

Good idea.  I'm out early next week. How about next Thursday?

Jim

Jim,

Hope all is well with you. I was wondering when would be a good time to get on your busy schedule to do lunch. I just wanted to touch base and let you know some of the projects I've been working on since I left your group.

Anytime the rest of this week is good for me and next week (save Monday). 

Damon Harvey
Enron Global Markets
713-345-7645

Seems reasonable to me that we tell NERC they can't "make a land grab".  How about EPSA and ELCON signing a letter together to the Chairman of NERC Board?

Jim

Oops - sorry Darla.  I hit enter when I should have hit down arrow.

Jim, my apologies.

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Charles, Jose, Jim, and Rick, 

I would like to send the letter below out to the ESC.  Before I do so, do you have any objections?  I would like to put some fire under this issue, as the "new sector weighted voting model" seems to be yet another way to preserve the power of the traditional utility.  However, I don't know if we will compromise any of our other positions by stirring this particular pot.  Thoughts?

Andy

Gordon,

When did the ESC vote to adopt the  "new sector weighted voting model?"  Has the ESC been absorbed into NERC, and is the NERC Board ordering them to use this new model?  If so, is the ESC a new standing committee?  Do they report directly to the board? Just where would the ESC fit in NERC?

Unless the ESC votes to change their charter to say they are a group under NERCs control, I don't see how this can move forward as written.  The ESC has never been a NERC group, but instead a industry collaborative which NERC has assisted with administrative matters (facilitation, meeting schedules, etc...).  If I recall correctly, there was a significant number of people that specifically did not _want_ the ESC to be a NERC group, (APPA, ELCON, EPSA, and a few others, if I remember correctly).  This was why the NERC ESTF became the non-NERC ESC.  I expect several entities will have comments to make before just handing the keys to NERC.  

Of course, those comments may have already been made at the Board, and may have been addressed there.  But I seriously don't think NERC can just "annex" the ESC without the ESC voting to be annexed.  

Other members of the ESC - do you share this concern?

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Dear ESC,

Attached are two documents from the recent NERC BOT meeting: 1.  Board
Resolutions; 2. Initial Voting Sectors and Criteria Model.

In the Board Resolution document please note items 7, 8, and 9 as they
deal directly with the ESC.

Thanks, Gordon.

		 <<Board Resolutions on Items 20 21 22.doc>> 	 <<FINAL
SCRTF Initial Sectors and Criteria 092701.doc>> 

Christi --

DQE provides some level of audit capability to ensure that the costs are fair and apppropriate.  PGE may not have a resource specific system lambda but AW may be able to explain how they would implement something like this.  I know AW from some other issues so if things don't go well  let me know.  

Also, please keep Alan Comnes in the loop.

Thanks,

Jim 

FYI, from West desk trader John Malowney that is working on wholesale and retail physical.  I am having a 3:00 conf call this afternoon with AW Turner and Joe.  As you may have seen, PGE's first proposal was rejected.  (I can tell you the problems there if you haven't seen the order.)  In any event, I would welcome your thoughts on John's message.  Thanks.

Not bad... it's difficult to identify what the Transmission Holders debits and or credits (cost exposure) would be as it does not reference a recognized indices such as the Mid-Columbia, it's settled after the fact, and the Transmission Holder is at the mercy of the LDC's incremental cost of their various generation units.  John 

John -- This is what Duquense uses, which seems to be preferred when serving retail load.  What do you think about PGE using something like this?  Thanks.

SCHEDULE 4
	Energy Imbalance Service

Energy Imbalance Service is provided when a difference occurs between the scheduled and the actual delivery of energy to a load located within a Control Area over a single hour.  The Transmission Provider must offer this service when the transmission service is used to serve load within its Control Area.  The Transmission Customer must either purchase this service from the Transmission Provider or make alternative comparable arrangements to satisfy its Energy Imbalance Service obligation. 	

The charges for Energy Imbalance Service, for which there is no deadband or return of energy in kind, are as follows:

C	Schedules insufficient to meet load ?? For each hour in which the Transmission Customer schedules insufficient energy to meet its load in that hour, the Transmission Provider will charge the Transmission Customer the Incremen? tal Cost (as defined below) that the Transmis? sion Provider incurs to meet the load of the Transmission Customer in that hour.

C	Schedules in excess of load ?? For each hour in which the Transmission Customer schedules en? ergy in excess of its load for that hour, the Transmission Provider will reimburse the Trans? mission Customer the Decremental Cost (as de? fined below) that the Transmission Provider incurs to meet the load of the Transmission Customer in that hour. 

 
Incremental Cost to provide energy imbalance service shall be defined as the Transmission Provider's System Lambda (the out?of?pocket costs, measured in dollars per megawatt?hour, associated with producing the last MWH of energy on the Transmission Provider's system in a given hour, whether that energy is produced by owned generation or the purchase of power from a third party) to compen? 
 
sate for the under?delivery of electricity by the Trans? mission Customer for that hour.  

Decremental Cost to provide energy imbalance service shall be defined as the Transmission Provider's System Lambda (the out?of?pocket costs, measured in dollars per megawatt?hour, associated with producing the last MWH of energy on the Transmission Provider's system in a given hour, whether that energy is produced by owned generation or the purchase of power from a third party) to compen? sate for the over?delivery of electricity by the Trans? mission Customer for that hour.  

 

Christi;  The proposed settlement procedure does not seem to be that clear... usually LDC's allow participants either a percentage of pre-schedule or set MW volumes deviation which is cleared at the appropriate Index (Mid-C, COB etc.) and then any MW volumes outside the predetermined bandwidth would be settled at a percentage of the selected Index.  Montana Power Company (MPC) has an excellent working example.  John

Thanks Chris.

EES and EPMI services folk -- We would like your comments on this imbalance proposal by Portland General (FYI--to the extent that FERC accepts Portland's proposal, it could be used as precedent for other utilities): 

PGE proposed a price to clear imbalances that was rejected by the FERC.  FERC told PGE to look to the Exelon order for guidance.  After an extension, the compliance filing is due Monday.  They have sought your reaction/comments.
 
 
 They had a discussion with FERC staff on how to comply.  
 
1.  Staff agreed that, under the Order, PGE could use the average spot price (excluding long term purchases) of purchases and sales in the hour before to clear imbalances (Schedule 4).
 
2. The PGE situation does not fit the Exelon model, because PGE does not have purchases and sales in every hour (apparently Exelon did).  FERC staff agreed the situation was different, but had no suggested solutions.  Staff requested that PGE propose "something" and the FERC would react.
 
3.  The something is -- A variant of the proposal recently approved for Pacific Corp (?):
 
PGE would use Mid C prices, but use PGE's actual daily load shape. [Apparently, Pacific Corp. proposed Mid C prices, but would use the load shape from California.  This load shape is quite different then PGE's and could lead to arbitrage opportunities against PGE by third-parties.]
 
4.  Right now PGE's traders and outside counsel disagree on the best approach.  The traders want to just propose/use the Mid C price proposal for all hours.  Outside counsel believes they should propose/use the average spot price proposal when PGE does make purchases and/or sales in the hour before and the Mid C proposal in other hours.
 
Do you have a preference?
 

Sarah,  This is what A.W. sent me.  Joe
Sorry I was delayed with an other hot item.  Bill didn't like tying anything to prices derived in a different market (day ahead).  I'm leaning toward just using the shaped Dow Jones Non-Firm MC Index as published after the fact in the Wall street Journal.  Shaped hourly using our actual system load with the corresponding Index Price.  Attached is a spread sheet detailing the calculation with an example and a scan of how it is published.  Let me know what you think.

>>> MICHELE FARRELL 10/03/01 05:01PM >>>
Any new thoughts on what we should be proposing to FERC?   I think you were going to look at a method of shaping the Mid-C index and I was wondering how that was coming.

Thanks.

Jim,

The answer to your timing question is yes, the audit is supposed to be completed by mid-Jan 2002, auditing the period 10/00-10/01.

Dave

Dave, per your request: 

Here are some bullets briefly describing the FERC audit high points.  I think the scope is "right on the money" and the timing is reasonably good also.  The text of the audit solicitation follows the bullets.  I've made contact with Andy Sakallaris, head of FERC procurement, to attend the pre-bid conference next Tuesday (assuming it is held, since expressions of interest thus far have been from CA based firms unwilling to make the trip to DC).  Ray

Audit description-  FERC seeks to take all appropriate steps for prospective improvements in California markets; accordingly, an independent operational audit of the CAISO will be performed to determine any areas in which the CAISO could enhance its effectiveness in fulfilling its responsibilities in operating the transmission system under its control and administering real-time energy markets.

Scope- Provide a comparison of the CAISO's actual operations and its FERC tariff and determine whether the CAISO's operations are adequately transparent to market participants.

Audit period- 10/1/00-10/1/01

Deliverables timing- Draft report due on January 9, 2002; final report due January 16, 2002.

Audit schedule-  Begins on November 1, 2001, and ends no later than January 4, 2002.

Pre-proposal conference- A conference is scheduled for prospective offerors at FERC next Tuesday; FERC will give a brief explanation of the requirements and clarify any questions asked.   

PART: U.S. GOVERNMENT PROCUREMENTS
SUBPART: SERVICES
CLASSCOD: R--Professional, Administrative and Management Support
  Services
OFFADD: Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC), 888 First
  Street, NE, Washington, DC 20426
SUBJECT: R--OPERATIONAL AUDIT OF CALIFORNIA INDEPENDENT SYSTEM
  OPERATIOR. INC. CAISO
SOL FERC02RMT22071
DUE 102601
POC Charlotte Handley, 202-219-1156 or Andrew Sakallaris,202-219-1150
DESC: This is a combined synopsis/solicitation for commercial
  items prepared in accordance with the format in Subpart 12.6,
  as supplemented with additional information included in this
  notice. This announcement constitutes the only solicitation;
  proposals are being requested and a written solicitation will
  not be issued. FERC02RMT22071 is issued as a request for proposal
  and all provisions/clauses are those in effect through FAC
  97-27. This solicitation is unrestricted under NAICS number
  561. Statement of Work: I. BACKGROUND. The California electricity
  market has experienced great stress from Summer 2000 to Summer
  2001, with demand outstripping supply, wholesale prices rising
  dramatically, and key market participants becoming financially
  unstable. As a result, the California Independent System Operator,
  Inc. (CAISO), which operates the electricity transmission grid
  throughout most of California, was forced to adapt to rapidly
  changing circumstances. During all of this, the CAISO worked
  hard to ensure system reliability. Under the Federal Energy
  Regulatory Commission's market mitigation plan, wholesale prices
  stabilized in California in Summer 2001. The Commission seeks
  to take all appropriate steps for prospective improvements
  in California markets, including improvements to help the CAISO
  in effectively performing its increasing responsibilities.
  Accordingly, an independent operational audit of the CAISO
  will be performed to determine the areas, if any, in which
  the CAISO could enhance its effectiveness in fulfilling its
  responsibilities in operating the transmission system under
  its control and administering certain real-time energy markets.
  II. SCOPE OF WORK. The Independent Public Accounting (Contractor)
  firm shall perform an operational audit of the CAISO processes,
  practices, and procedures in accordance with Generally Accepted
  Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS). The Contractor shall
  provide a comparison of the CAISO's actual operations and its
  Commission tariff (procedures and tariff can be found at www.caiso.com).
  The Contractor shall ascertain whether the CAISO's operations
  are adequately transparent to market participants. To the extent
  possible, the Contractor shall also ascertain whether the CAISO's
  procedures and operations are consistent with the most effective
  business practice. III. AUDIT PERIOD. The audit of the CAISO
  shall cover the period commencing October 1, 2000, through
  October 1, 2001. IV. DELIVERABLES. The contractor must provide
  the Contracting Officer's Representative (COR) with a draft
  and final report detailing the findings, operating deficiencies
  and/or major observations and recommendations. These reports
  and other deliverables must be provided to the COR by the close
  of business on the following dates: 1) Draft Report - January
  9, 2002 2) Final Report - January 16, 2002. V. SCHEDULE. The
  operational audit will commence on November 1, 2001, and it
  must be completed no later than January 4, 2002. The contractor
  shall meet with the COR to discuss the audit no later than
  November 6, 2001. The contractor must provide the Commission
  with an operational audit plan no later than November 14, 2001.
  A detailed operational audit plan will be submitted to the
  COR for review, feedback, and approval. The COR or designated
  representative will review the plan. VI. Working Papers. The
  contractor shall prepare and provide a copy of work papers
  in accordance with GAGAS. All work papers shall include the
  purpose, sources of information, the procedures performed,
  results thereof, and conclusions as appropriate for the planning,
  internal control, compliance, and substantive testing phases.
  For all findings, work papers shall clearly show the condition
  or problem, criteria, cause, effect, and recommendation for
  improvement. All working papers shall be cross-referenced to
  audit programs, summaries, and final audit report. These documents
  will become the property of the Commission. During the course
  of the audit or upon completion of the audit work, the Contractor's
  audit report and work papers shall be subject to access and
  review by the Commission. A preproposal conference is scheduled
  for prospective offerors at FERC on Tuesday, October 16, 2001,
  at 10:00 am at 888 First Street, NE, Washington, DC 20426,
  Room 3M-3. FERC will give a brief explanation of the requirements
  and clarify any questions asked. Questions submitted in advance
  to A. Sakallaris (andrew.sakallaris@ferc.fed.us) is appreciated
  and preferable. Contractual, technical, and legal representatives
  will be on hand to answer any questions. Bring no more than
  three representatives and E-mail or phone A. Sakallaris, 202-219-1150
  to indicate the number and names of individuals attending.
  If unable to attend, E-Mail A. Sakallaris and provide the point
  of contact's mailing and E-mail address and FERC will arrange
  to deliver any additional information that may become available
  as a result of the pre-proposal conference. All offerors and
  subcontractors will complete and submit with their proposals,
  either the Organizational Conflicts of Interest (OCI) representation
  or the OCI disclosure (not both). Complete and submit the OCI
  Questionnaire. Request OCI information from A. Sakallaris.
  See DOE clauses 952.209-8 OCI-Disclosure and 952.209-72 OCI.
  Same/similar language will be incorporated into the resultant
  contract. Period of Performance: From approximately November
  1, 2001 to January 16, 2002. FAR Provision 52.212-1, Instructions
  to Offerors-Commercial (Oct 2000), applies. Addendum to FAR
  52.212-1 SUBPARAGRAPH (b) Reply by e- mail the proposal to
  FERC, ATTN: C. Handley, Division of Procurement, FA-12, 888
  First St, NE, Wash DC 20426, e-mail: charlotte.handley@ferc.fed.us.
  It is our intent to evaluate based on initial proposals. Offerors
  shall submit five copies of their price and technical proposal,
  signed by an official authorized to bind the offeror, at the
  above address no later than 2:00 PM local time, Friday, October
  26, 2001. Price Proposal: Addendum to FAR 52.212-1 SUBPARAGRAPH
  (b)(6): The price proposal shall be completely separate from
  the technical proposal. Offerors must breakout pricing by month
  and provide (1) labor categories (2) corresponding firm-fixed-price,
  fully loaded labor rates (3) proposed number of hours estimated
  for each labor category (4) Other Direct Costs as applicable
  (subcontractor and travel). Supporting details shall also be
  provided as appropriate (e.g., travel destinations, number
  of trips, computer time, discounts offered (excluding prompt
  payment)). Addendum to FAR 52.212-1 SUBPARAGRAPH (c) The offeror
  agrees to hold the prices in its offer firm for 120 calendar
  days. Provision 52.212-2, Evaluation-Commercial Items (Jan
  1999), applies. Addendum to FAR 52.212-2 SUBPARAGRAPH, (a)
  Technical Proposal: Past Performance (30 points). Ensure that
  the company names, points of contact and phone numbers are
  current. The Offeror and each subcontractor proposed must each
  select three references to complete a "Contractor Past-Performance
  Evaluation." All areas of the sheet must be filled in. If an
  answer to a specific question is not provided, the applicable
  area must be annotated with the reason why (e.g. "Reference
  failed to provide an answer"). Higher scores will be assigned
  for contracts that are at least similar in size and complexity.
  FERC may obtain and evaluate information from sources other
  than those provided by the offeror. FAR 15.305(a)(2)(iv) states
  "In the case of an offeror without a record of relevant past
  performance or for whom information on past performance is
  not available, the offeror may not be evaluated favorably or
  unfavorably on past performance." For the purposes of this
  evaluation not being evaluated favorably or unfavorably means
  the offeror will receive a rating of "good or acceptable" on
  company past performance. To obtain a copy of the past performance
  form to be completed by the Offeror's references, request from
  A. Sakallaris by email. The Offeror will be responsible and
  ensure that the references submit or reply by e-mail their
  completed response to C. Handley, located at the above address
  by 2:00 PM local time, October 26, 2001. Offerors should also
  notify the references that FERC may be contacting them regarding
  the past performance information. Prior Audit Experience (25
  points). The offeror must cover in its proposal the extent
  of prior related experience in electric bulk power markets,
  and the ability to effectively and efficiently conduct this
  operational audit in accordance with GAGAS. The proposal must
  include previous and/or current experience, within the last
  3 years, where the offeror has performed audits similar in
  terms of size and complexity of this requirement. Higher scores
  will be assigned to those offerors who have demonstrated successful
  experience in electric bulk power markets within the last three
  years. To be acceptable, the services must have been satisfactorily
  performed and at least similar in terms of size and complexity
  to the work required under this contract. Understanding the
  Statement of Work (20 points). The proposal must clearly demonstrate
  in sufficient and precise detail the offeror's expertise in
  understanding and analyzing independent system operator tariffs,
  market operations and services, and transmission issues. The
  offeror must describe its ability to perform a comprehensive
  and thorough analysis of the electric bulk power market operated
  by the CAISO. Higher scores will be assigned to those offerors
  who demonstrate an understanding and greater knowledge of independent
  system operator tariffs, market operations and services, and
  transmission issues. Higher scores will also be assigned to
  offerors who demonstrate a comprehensive understanding of bulk
  power markets like those operated by the CAISO. Audit Methodology
  and Quality Control (15 points). The technical proposal must
  include the audit methodology and must address each phase of
  the audit. The proposal must identify specific aspects of each
  phase and explain how each phase/aspect is related. The offeror
  must include estimated completion times for each phase of the
  audit and address critical completion dates. The technical
  proposal must describe the audit approach to documenting systems
  and internal controls, and effective procedures, including
  consideration of risk and materiality, to determine the extent
  of audit testing. Quality control is an important part of the
  technical proposal. The proposal must demonstrate the offeror's
  internal quality control procedures. The proposal must include
  a copy of the firm's latest peer review report, comments, and
  the response to the peer review report. Higher scores will
  be assigned to those offerors who demonstrate and offer a sound,
  valid, effective, and innovative audit methodology that reflects
  an understanding of the statement of work. "Valid" entails
  the use of techniques that are known to be feasible with respect
  to the area addressed; "Effective" refers to the workability
  and appropriateness of the methodology. "Innovative" means
  the development and application of a novel, yet valid technique
  that will increase the effectiveness of the approach. Higher
  scores will be assigned to offerors who demonstrate sound and
  effective internal quality control procedures. Professional
  Qualifications (10 points). The offeror must describe in its
  proposal: 1) the professional qualifications of the staff that
  will be assigned to this contract and 2) demonstrate that it
  has sufficient resources to perform the audit and qualified
  staff to perform critical tasks necessary to support the audit.
  The written response must also include the following information
  for all staff participating on the audit: Labor Category (i.e.,
  Partner, Manager, etc.); CPA certification date (if applicable);
  Other applicable certification(s); Total years of audit and/or
  other experience; Advance degree(s) obtained; and Total years
  employed by the offeror. Higher scores will be based on offeror's
  educational background, recent work experience, and certifications
  obtain by their staff. In particular, higher scores will be
  given to those who offer recent experience with independent
  system operator tariffs, market operations and services, transmission
  issues, and bulk power markets like those operated by the CAISO.
  Addendum to FAR 52.212-2 SUBPARAGRAPH (a). Technical and past
  performance, when combined, are more important than price.
  However, award shall be made to the offeror whose proposal
  is determined to best meet the needs of the Government after
  consideration of all factors i.e., provides the "best value."
  "Best value," for the purpose of the contract is defined as
  the procurement process that results in the most advantageous
  acquisition decision for the Government and is performed through
  an integrated assessment and trade-off analysis between technical
  and price factors. Include a completed copy of Provision at
  52.212.3, Offeror Representations and Certifications-Commercial
  Items (May 2001) with offer. Clause 52.212-4, Contract Terms
  and Conditions-Commercial Items (May 2001), applies. Addendum
  to FAR 52.212-4: 1. 52.252-2 Clauses Incorporated By Reference
  (FEB 1998). This contract incorporates one or more clauses
  by reference, with the same force and effect as if they were
  given in full text. Upon request, the Contracting Officer will
  make their full text available. Clauses are as follows: 52.217-8
  and 52.217-9. Clause 52.212-5, Contract Terms and Conditions
  Required To Implement Statutes or Executive Orders-Commercial
  Items (May 2001) applies. Addendum to FAR 52.212-5: The following
  clauses are incorporated by reference: 52.203-6 with A1; 52.219-4;
  52.219-8; 52.222-21; 52.222-26; 52.222-35; 52-222-36; 52.222-37;
  52.225-13; 52.225-15; 52.225-16; 52.232-33; 52.239-1. E-mail
  questions to C. Handley at charlotte.handley@ferc.fed.us. no
  later than October 19, 2001. E-Mail C. Handley of your intent
  to submit a proposal no later than October 19, 2001.   
LINKURL: andrew.sakallaris@ferc.fed.us
LINKDESC: Click here to request copies of OCI questionnaire and <andrew.sakallaris@ferc.fed.us>
  the past performance form
EMAILADD: charlotte.handley@ferc.fed.us
EMAILDESC: charlotte.handley@ferc.fed.us <mailto:charlotte.handley@ferc.fed.us>
CITE: (W-282 SN5102V8)

Nancy, etal --

With the discussions at NERC recently to broaden their role, I think that we need to be very coordinated on our EISB message and begin to figure out how we get AGA to work with the Retail Gas and EEI/UBR to work with the Retail Power quadrants.  Let's think about a NARUC message to drive this very quickly (maybe at the next meeting).

Having one body begin to coordinate all of these matters will greatly expand our policy reach.

Thanks,

Jim

Are these papers consistent with Enron's positions?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: DISCO of the Future Participants
FR: Hope Duncan, Director of Administration
RE: Meeting Materials
DT: October 18, 2001

Please find attached the agenda for next week's DISCO meeting.  I also
have attached the materials for the meeting -- the regulatory white
paper and the POLR paper.

Please address all questions and/or comments regarding the
aforementioned materials during the meeting.

 - DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc 
 - DISCO POLR Revised.doc 
 - DISCO October Agenda.doc 

No.

Jim Steffes

MEMORANDUM

REPLY REQUESTED

As a last step in securing liability insurance for CAEM's officers and
directors, the insurer requires all officers and directors to answer the
following questions. Our General Counsel has advised me that a simple
reply to this e-mail stating the answer to all questions is no will be
sufficient.

Thanks for your attention to this necessary administrative detail. If
you have any questions or concerns, please don't hesitate to contact me

Jeff Mangold
Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets
www.caem.org
jmangold@caem.org
Voice: 703-729-2710
Fax: 703-783-8720

Questions for officers and directors. If an answer to any of the
questions would be yes, we need the details.

1. There has not been nor is there now pending any claim(s) against any
person proposed for insurance in his or her capacity of either director
or officer of [CAEM].

2. No director or officer has knowledge or information of any act, error
or omission which might give rise to a claim(s) under the proposed
policy.

3. Has any officer or director:

a. Been involved in any antitrust copyright or patent litigation?

b. Been charged in any civil or criminal action or administrative
proceeding with a violation of any federal or state antitrust or fair
trade law?

c. Been charged in any civil or criminal action or administrative
proceeding with a violation of any federal or state securities law or
regulation?

d. Been involved in any representative actions, class actions, or
derivative suits?

What do you think??

Jim

fyi...We may want to consider going in and talking with ComEd again soon, assuming we know what are needs are from a physical delivery standpoint.
Janine

Attached is an article that appeared in the Chicago Tribune this morning
regarding Edison's presentation to yesterday's ICC Electric Policy Committee
Meeting that we thought you would find to be of interest.

From the Chicago Tribune
ComEd wants to limit power purchase option
By Melita Marie Garza
Tribune staff reporter

October 17, 2001

Commonwealth Edison Co. on Tuesday proposed weaning its largest commercial
and industrial customers from a power purchase plan that the company asserts
stifles competition in the state's emerging market for electricity.

Under the proposal, the utility would differentiate between industrial
customers that use less than 400 kilowatts of electricity at any given
moment and those that use more, Pamela Strobel, ComEd's chairman, told the
Illinois Commerce Commission. A standard Jewel or Dominick's grocery store
uses about 400 kilowatts of electricity at a given moment, Strobel said.

Under deregulation, corporate customers have three options: Stay with
ComEd's standard regulated electricity service based on rates set in 1996,
pick an alternative supplier or opt for ComEd's so-called Power Purchase
Option.

Customers who pick the last option get ComEd's market rate but are allowed
to choose ComEd competitors as their primary power suppliers.

ComEd's proposal would bar its largest customers from that option, which the
utility says has stymied deregulation because it allows competing suppliers
to merely resell the power that ComEd produced.

"So long as the utility is providing this option, real competitive markets
won't work," said Arlene Juracek, ComEd's vice president for regulatory and
strategic services. "Some suppliers have taken the easy way out by telling
their customers to sign up for the plan."

Terry Harvill, an ICC member, agreed. "There was an unintended problem ...
rather than alternative suppliers coming into Illinois with diverse sources
of energy, essentially you have them just taking power from ComEd and
reselling it to customers," Harvill said.

Specifically, ComEd proposes to limit the Power Purchase Option to
non-residential customers paying competitive transition charges, effective
June 2002. The transition charges cover costs incurred by the utility prior
to deregulation.

"I think it's a step in the right direction, but the details remain to be
worked out," Harvill said. He noted that companies still would have the
option to fall back on ComEd's traditional regulated plan.

But Marty Cohen, executive director of the Citizens Utility Board, was
skeptical.

"There are certain inherent conflicts in the way that Edison sees the world
because they are a subsidiary of a much larger company--Exelon--which is, in
fact, the largest producer and seller of electricity in this market," Cohen
said.

"So you have ComEd on the one hand being the largest buyer of electricity,
and you have Exelon, its parent company, being the largest seller of
electricity. This proposal doesn't address that issue."

David I. Fein
Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
203 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1500
Chicago, Illinois  60601
phone:  312-368-3462
fax:  312-630-7418
e-mail:  david.fein@piperrudnick.com

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com

thanks

I have not seen the assessment -- but let me reach out to our team and get back with you.

Evan

Vicki & Evan --

Please see the e-mail trail below.  The PAPUC has assessed EES $147,000 for its costs.  We intend to protest.  Do you have any idea of who this bill would go to?

Jim

I will talk with Kevin on Tuesday (we have traded phone calls) and get this done.  I may need some help in identifying who in EES might have the assessment and fax it to Kevin.  I will keep you informed.

Tom/Steve -- Janet Moore (the ENA attorney) is on vacation, so cannot handle.  I do not know if Enron has received the assessment, but in an abundance of caution, this objection probably needs to be filed on Tues. 9/4 (per Kevin Moody).  Please call me if one of you knows about this and can take care of it, otherwise I'll get it done on Tues.

Jim --do you know who at EES may have gotten this.  MAIN THING IS THAT THE VERIFICATION NEEDS TO BE DONE--CURRENTLY IN TOM HOATSON'S NAME.  (Also, may need an RCR)
Thanks.  Christi wk 713-853-7007   home 713-853-7007

Christie, below is the message I sent to Tom. Attached are the objections. I'll call you Tuesday morning to see where things stand on this.
____________________________________

Tom, the PaPUC has recently assessed gas marketers for the regulatory expenses for the PUC, the OCA and the OSBA. Enron Energy Services' assessment for all three is $147,277.

Unless you tell us to the contrary, we assume that you want us to file objections to the assessments. Attached are objections that we have prepared. Can you please fax us a copy of the assessment notice Enron received? We believe the assesments may have been received around 8/19-8/21.

Objections must be filed within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the assessment notice.  The 15-day objection period begins on the date the certified mail return receipt is signed.  If the 15th day falls on a weekend or a legal holiday, the last date for filing is extended to the next business day.

The statutes require the assessments to be paid within 30 days of receipt, even though objections are filed.  The payments must be made "under protest" in order to be refunded under the statutory procedure, which we believe is inadequate.

We are attempting to avoid the payment obligation thru a preliminary injunction request in Commonwealth Court, but we have no assurance that the court will act before the 30th day for payment.  If not, the assessment must be paid under protest.  If necessary, we will provide a cover letter for the protest payment to the PUC.

Please call me if you have any questions or comments. Thanks.

Kevin J. Moody, Esq.
Wolf, Block, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP
212 Locust Street, Suite 300
Harrisburg, PA  17101
(717) 237-7187
(717) 237-7161 (fax)

This electronic message contains information from the law firm of Wolf, Block, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP that may be privileged and confidential.  The information is intended to be for the use of the addressee only.  If you are not the addressee, note that any disclosure, copy, distribution, or use of the contents of this message is prohibited.

Jean --

The PUCT voted to delay for SPP markets.  Not sure about Entergy.  Any news?  Can you send out something to the business people?

Jim

Your thoughts?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Erin Perrigo, Manager of Policy

DATE: October 19, 2001

RE: EPSA Leave-Behind on Market-Based Rate Authority
      ?Conference Call on Friday, October 26th at 11:00 a.m.
      (EDT)

On September 14th, EPSA held a meeting at our office to discuss possible changes in the Commission's approach to granting market-based rate authority.  On October 2nd, the Commission staff released a white paper on market-based rate issues.  The Commission has also discussed the issue at recent meetings, but it was struck from the last Commission agenda and is not listed on the agenda for the October 24th Commission meeting.

Based on our conversations, attached is a draft leave-behind addressing market-based rate authorization and FERC's recently released staff report outlining several alternatives to the currently used hub-and-spoke method.  The draft puts the issue of market-based rate authority into the bigger context of both the Commission's goals of creating workably competitive markets and the array of tools available to deal with market power abuses.  We criticize the proposed supply margin assessment approach, but are less clear on what alternative we would prefer if hub-and-spoke is no longer viable.

We have scheduled a conference call on Friday, October 26th at 11:00 a.m. (EDT) to discuss the draft leave-behind and our strategy for moving forward on this issue.  We have to very clear on what message we want to leave with the Commissioners and FERC staff.  Are we recommending a less rigorous test for market-based rate authority with market mitigation and intervention after the fact?  Under what circumstances is market mitigation appropriate and how should it be done?  If the hub-and-spoke methodology is flawed, is it worth leaving it in place to get maximum market entry?  Are there alternative tests that better meet the Commission (and our) goals?

If you have any questions or comments before the call, please contact Erin Perrigo at 202-628-8200 or eperrigo@epsa.org.

Attachment

 - MBR Leave Behind.doc 

It is critical to win this case.  Sounds to me that Dynegy wants ICAP in the Midwest.

Jim

As I mentioned in my previous e-mail, on October 17 Dynegy filed a complaint against ComEd.  This proceeding may be of particular interest to Enron given EES's plans to offer physical delivery in Illinois in early 2002.  I've outlined Dynegy's principal arguments below.  Dynegy requested fast-track processing, so any intervention and comments we file are due Friday, Oct. 26.  In order to file a timely intervention (and meaningful comments, if we decide to comment), I need to know your thoughts on this as soon as possible.  Elizabeth and Harlan, I'm copying you because I would especially like to know what you think of Dynegy's characterization of the Firm LD product.

Main argument:
Dynegy challenges ComEd's published Business Practice that allows "marketer firm" (Firm LD) contracts to be designated as Network Resources.  Dynegy argues that this practice conflicts with the OATT provisions that 1) Network Resources are generation "owned, purchased or leased by the Network Customer designated to serve Network Load," and 2) a Network Customer "must demonstrate that it owns or has committed to purchase generation pursuant to an executed contract" in order to designate a Network Resource.

Dynegy's theory on why Firm LD should not be a Network Resource:

	- permits designation of network resources that are committed for sale to others, creating reliability problems
	- Firm LD under the EEI contract is not capacity-backed, nor is it a commitment to purchase generation
	- allows transmission customers to get the advantage of generation capacity without actually paying the cost of that capacity
	- since retail providers are allowed to rely on "over-the-counter" firm instead of securing long-term contracts, adequate reserves are not being carried to serve retail load
	
Dynegy claims that ComEd's practice has deprived DMG of payments for capacity and the ability to earn revenues for capacity properly designated as network resources.  It cites specific instances in which ComEd has accepted transmission reservation requests from New Energy and Cilco in which these parties designated Illinois Power as a network resource, when only a Firm LD contracts were in place with IP.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

Sounds reasonable.  Would the same be true about the DST case?  If we lose, without the PPO what do we have?

Jim

First, I think the gig may soon be over since at least one commissioner is catching on to our chirade.  Second, since that's not a particularly helpful observation, I think we ought to be very blunt that the reason we had to play the chirade is that the PPO price is far and away better than anything we can match and that it is a subsidized price because it does not explicitly recognize ancillary service, imbalance, and retailer costs except for the pittances we got added in the case a year ago.  
So we can ask that the same subsidies be maintained for customers wo have chosen thusfar (grandfathered, in other words).  Going forward, it seems that elimination of the PPO would be helpful to market development so it's hard to argue against that.  So maybe we offer a trade - support for elimination of PPO in exchange for grandfathered treatment of existing contracts we have on PPO.

What do you think??

Jim

fyi...We may want to consider going in and talking with ComEd again soon, assuming we know what are needs are from a physical delivery standpoint.
Janine

Attached is an article that appeared in the Chicago Tribune this morning
regarding Edison's presentation to yesterday's ICC Electric Policy Committee
Meeting that we thought you would find to be of interest.

From the Chicago Tribune
ComEd wants to limit power purchase option
By Melita Marie Garza
Tribune staff reporter

October 17, 2001

Commonwealth Edison Co. on Tuesday proposed weaning its largest commercial
and industrial customers from a power purchase plan that the company asserts
stifles competition in the state's emerging market for electricity.

Under the proposal, the utility would differentiate between industrial
customers that use less than 400 kilowatts of electricity at any given
moment and those that use more, Pamela Strobel, ComEd's chairman, told the
Illinois Commerce Commission. A standard Jewel or Dominick's grocery store
uses about 400 kilowatts of electricity at a given moment, Strobel said.

Under deregulation, corporate customers have three options: Stay with
ComEd's standard regulated electricity service based on rates set in 1996,
pick an alternative supplier or opt for ComEd's so-called Power Purchase
Option.

Customers who pick the last option get ComEd's market rate but are allowed
to choose ComEd competitors as their primary power suppliers.

ComEd's proposal would bar its largest customers from that option, which the
utility says has stymied deregulation because it allows competing suppliers
to merely resell the power that ComEd produced.

"So long as the utility is providing this option, real competitive markets
won't work," said Arlene Juracek, ComEd's vice president for regulatory and
strategic services. "Some suppliers have taken the easy way out by telling
their customers to sign up for the plan."

Terry Harvill, an ICC member, agreed. "There was an unintended problem ...
rather than alternative suppliers coming into Illinois with diverse sources
of energy, essentially you have them just taking power from ComEd and
reselling it to customers," Harvill said.

Specifically, ComEd proposes to limit the Power Purchase Option to
non-residential customers paying competitive transition charges, effective
June 2002. The transition charges cover costs incurred by the utility prior
to deregulation.

"I think it's a step in the right direction, but the details remain to be
worked out," Harvill said. He noted that companies still would have the
option to fall back on ComEd's traditional regulated plan.

But Marty Cohen, executive director of the Citizens Utility Board, was
skeptical.

"There are certain inherent conflicts in the way that Edison sees the world
because they are a subsidiary of a much larger company--Exelon--which is, in
fact, the largest producer and seller of electricity in this market," Cohen
said.

"So you have ComEd on the one hand being the largest buyer of electricity,
and you have Exelon, its parent company, being the largest seller of
electricity. This proposal doesn't address that issue."

David I. Fein
Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
203 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1500
Chicago, Illinois  60601
phone:  312-368-3462
fax:  312-630-7418
e-mail:  david.fein@piperrudnick.com

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com

Pls call Steve.

Jim

I will check on the case.  We were not aware or in this case. Could be an administrative filing however I will check and edvise.

????

Our EES folks want to know if anyone within Enron was involved in Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania Tariff changes.
Please let me know what should I answer.
Thanks
Guillermo

Can you determine if anyone within Enron was involved in these proceedings? This tariff change could be significant and this is the first we've hard of it.
Please let me know.
BV
3-3317

Janine:  Was anyone in regulatory involved with this?  We found out this was coming last week at the CPA Shipper meeting.  This is going to cause a curve shift which could have been minimized had we known it was coming.  Thanks!  mde

Josh,

Please make sure you are on Shirley's mailing list, I didn't see your name listed.

Thanks

The following notice was posted on the Nominations Electronic Bulletin
Board today:

On October 12, 2001 the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission approved
Columbia's tariff filing to become effective on October 22, 2001, subject
to an Administrative Law Judge Recommendation.  This tariff filing includes
several changes that may be important to suppliers, such as changes in
Columbia's banking and balancing service, introduction of a new Flow Order
Management Service, and a new Imbalance Trading Service.

The full text of Columbia's original tariff proposals, as filed with the PA
Public Utility Commission on August 22, 2001, can be accessed at the
following site:

                                     h
ttp://www.columbiagaspamd.com/products_services/tariff_revisions_effective_oct.htm

Shippers serving aggregation pools on the Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania,
Inc. system should carefully review Columbia's new Elective Balancing
Service (proposed tariff pages 164 - 169) and choose one of the three
balancing service options for each aggregation pool.  Also, suppliers who
have been designated as an authorized agent for non-aggregated customers
may choose an elective balancing option on behalf of those customers.
Columbia's current estimated rate for Option 1, Full Balancing Service, is
as follows:

SGS, SDS Customers  $0.20/Mcf
LDS, MLS  Customers $0.10/Mcf

Please note that Columbia's interruptible banking and balancing service
will no longer be available.  The cost for the interruptible service
($0.1109/Mcf for SGS and SDS, and $0.0358 for LDS and MLS) will be removed
from customers' distribution rates when the new Elective Balancing Services
become effective.

Under the newly approved Elective Balancing Service (Rider EBS), customers
or their authorized agents are given 20 days in which to elect their
service option.  Customers or their authorized agents who do not elect one
of the three Elective Balancing Service options on or before November 12,
2001 will default to Option 1, Full Balancing Service.  Columbia will post
final rates for Rider EBS Option 1 by the close of business on November 15,
2001.  If the final rates exceed the above estimated rates by more than
20%, customers or their authorized agents who have elected Option 1 may
change their election by submitting a change to Columbia in writing  by the
close of business on November 20, 2001.  Columbia will begin providing
service under the elected option as of December 1, 2001.

A form for the election of Rider EBS options will be e-mailed to the
"notices" contact person for each supplier that is active on the Columbia
Gas of Pennsylvania systemwhen it is available.

Please contact your Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania, Inc. representative at
412-572-7117 with any questions relating to these new services.

Attached are the forms and a brief outline of the changes.

(See attached file: EBS & FOMS forms.doc)
Shirley

Alan --

What about a simple price cap (ala PJM) of $250/Mwh rather than a gas-index deriviative?  Just a thought, do whatever the desk thinks is right.

Jim

EPMI's request to participate in the 29 Oct 01 FERC conference was granted.  I will be on one of two panels and I will be given 5 minutes to give a statement.

Please review the attached draft statement / talking points for EPMI and PGE and get me comments by COB Monday.  One question is whether we need to change what PGE is proposing to say in light of our position (rule certainty, make any changes to caps consistently accross the WSCC).

I will be meeting with the West Desk folks on Tuesday morning (schedules permitting).  Please let me know if you want to participate in that meeting.

Here is who I think will be on these panels thusfar:
California Rep. Anna Eshoo (D Atherton)
Pacificorp
Allegheny Supply (anybody know who might be speaking for them?)
Powerex/TGF Richard Tabors (note that Enron is a member of TGF but has made it clear it is not funding this effort)
PGE Mike Naeve
EMPI Alan Comnes
CAISO
Puget Energy - Kimberly Harris
and 5  other parties
BPA and WPTF will not be speaking.
I was told Commissioners "may" be present.

Alan Comnes

 << File: Enron West Wide Price Mitigation.doc >> 

sounds good.  pls talk with Bob Frank about his involvement in this group.

Jim

Unless you sent me a list of Distribution Enron's positions (as the attached document for the RTOs) I will prepare a summary of their recommendations trying to identify in which extent they allow the implementation of effective wholesale and retail competition. Please let me know if this is ok with you.
Guille

 << File: Effective Markets in the Near Term.doc >> 

Are these papers consistent with Enron's positions?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: DISCO of the Future Participants
FR: Hope Duncan, Director of Administration
RE: Meeting Materials
DT: October 18, 2001

Please find attached the agenda for next week's DISCO meeting.  I also
have attached the materials for the meeting -- the regulatory white
paper and the POLR paper.

Please address all questions and/or comments regarding the
aforementioned materials during the meeting.

 - DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc << File: DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc >> 
 - DISCO POLR Revised.doc << File: DISCO POLR Revised.doc >> 
 - DISCO October Agenda.doc << File: DISCO October Agenda.doc >> 

The first order of business is getting the cost/benefit analysis done.  Once we have that study, let's go to press.

Jim

I think a rebuttal would be in order if others agree.

Do we need to specifically rebut this?  Enron did file a study to support the natural markets of the SE, and, while we generally have stated responses to his issues in various forums, do we need to respond item by item?  (FYI--I have never heard the "lake" analogy before -- his characterization of it as the opponent position helps his case, but it is incorrect because as far as I know, there is no one proposing a system that ignores constraints).

Also, we have not focused much recently on the transmission pricing issues.  This may be an opportunity to discuss this in context.  He seems to use it as a reason against the Southeast RTO. 

	

Below is a link to Southern Co. CEO Allen Franklin's prepared testimony at the Barton hearing last week (October 10).  He says they favor wholesale competition, but he then goes on to talk about the virtues of geographically smaller RTOs, with a phased approach of smaller RTOs that could later merge to become larger (although the Barton discussion draft would prevent such mergers).  The statement also chronicles their involvement in the Southeast mediation process.

In his oral testimony, Franklin kept ephasizing the lack of FERC cost/benefit studies on RTOs and the similar (alleged) lack of studies and analysis to support the 4 RTO model.

http://energycommerce.house.gov/107/hearings/10102001Hearing387/Franklin647.htm

 

23.51

Stock price?

thanks.

I would agree.  I have just been trying to answer any question that are posed.  I just wanted to make sure that you were aware of this in case you were asked any questions.  Thanks.
 

Nancy A. Hetrick 
Enron Corp. 
Director, Government Affairs 
Phone:  712-366-3399 
Pager:   888-912-1426 

this is a fight we should avoid.

FYI!  Please see the emails below.  I just wanted to let you know that this "political" battle within EES/EWS is brewing.  I have been providing support whenever I have been asked, e.g. answering questions, research, etc.  I will be in my office tomorrow if you would like to discuss or have any questions.  Otherwise you can page me today (I have meetings and flights, but I will call if I can.)  Thanks.

Nancy A. Hetrick 
Enron Corp. 
Director, Government Affairs 
Phone:  712-366-3399 
Pager:   888-912-1426 

Joe, 

I requested a meeting with you yesterday to work with you and convey what we have learned over the last three months by working with regulatory and the ERCOT ISO to utilize and create additional LSE accounts.  As you were informed by Nancy Hetrick of regulatory all three currently available LSE account are committed by Structured Supply for use under currently negotiated masters.  We requested the meeting with you yesterday to explain what we were doing and why we needed the other three EES LSE accounts.  We also took the time to explain the process for establishing new LSE accounts, under a LLC structure which is not complicated, but the structure that the new LSE accounts would be created under (SPV) is inconsistent with the masters negotiated and EES would not be able to perform under these masters.

We have tried to work with you in cooperation to accomplish your goals consistent with the constraints of the ERCOT rules.  We have explained our needs and the reason for them. We conveyed our interest in working together to accomplish the greater good for the company and offered our help in any way we could.  You mark and I agreed that it would be easier to help each other and not duplicate efforts.  We were appreciative of your willingness to proceed consistent with this spirit of cooperation.  It disheartens and surprises me that you would leave the meeting with this understanding and in agreement of the business situation and send an e-mail the next morning, without picking up the phone or stopping by to discuss this and just attempt to dictatorially commandeer the LSE accounts that you knew were committed and why they were committed.  

Moreover; you told us that you thought you might need one more and you have attempted to take three more. 

Best regards, 

Jeff 

Thank you for taking the time to discuss the LSE situation in ERCOT.  The present LSE was set up by EES and is being utilized by EWS Retail and EWS Services Group, for physical delivery in ERCOT for EES load.  In order to better manage EES volume and structure growth in ERCOT, billing issues, and optimization of the present and future portfolio, EES/EWS Retail will require the use of the sub LSE's available under EES's existing LSE arrangement.  Structured Supply will be responsible for the creation of any LLC's that need to be created to facilitate additional LSE availability.  If you have any questions or comments, please either email or call me (ext 33143).  Thanks.

-Joe  

While I appreciate the concerns about the diffferences in East and West, we've waited too long for utilities to agree to make RTOs happen.  We can finesse this forever, but we need to give FERC some tools to force the process.

Jim

Christi,

If you don't mind, I'd like to weigh in on your message below and share my perspective with you regarding the actions you are considering taking.

Timing, they say, is everything.  While we may ultimately want to file an action with FERC as you describe, I don't think the timing to make such a filing is now or the next 3-6 months.  I also don't think we should make such a filing alone.  

With my being from the Eastern Interconnection (23+ years at the New York Power Pool) I understand how everyone in  the east feels when they hear, "it's different in the West", but after spending the past 5 years in the west, the fact is, it is different!  

Here are my reasons I don't think the time is not right for making a filing:
The west is ground zero for the disaster known as California - fact of the matter is, I am amazed that the utilities in the west are even still participating in talks about forming RTO's.  California has significantly hurt ours and everyone elses efforts, not just in retail, but wholesale as well.  Any effort to merge, or force anyone in the west, together with CAISO would meet with significant resistance.
The make up of the parties is considerably different from the east.  The Municipalities(SMUD, Seattle City Light, Tacoma), Government Authorities (WAPA, BPA, SRP) and Public Power Districts (too numberous to mention) are significantly larger and stronger (politically) than those in the East.  They use their political influence to their maximum benefit.  Again, the resistance to merge with CA will be great but include a message that would include these groups as quasi-FERC juristictional, would not especially fair well at this point.
As Steve points out below, there has been much political work done on the state level in the west to at least continue moving the parties in RTO West and DSTAR forward.  And while the folks at DSTAR are not ideal, at least they have gotten the message to "do-something" and they ar moving faster than I would have predicited just 2 months ago.  Any filing as described below would surely slow down the process at this point.  
In working with Duke, Reliant, Mirant and Dynegy in filing comments on the July DSTAR informatioal filing all parties, while they agree that ultimately we want a west-wide RTO, they will not agree to language within the comments which discusses a west-wide RTO at this point in time.  All parties cite similar reasons as stated above for this decision.

The goal as I see it in the west and the east as well (for now), is to continue supporting the formation of the two new RTOs.  Wait to see how the Mediation process for the Northeast and Southeast takes form and the reaction to any ALJ decisions, then re-assess the climate in the political arena in regards to de-regulation and the utility industry as well as our position.  If after this evaluation we still feel compelled to file, attempt to garner support for the initiative with a coalition of marketers and generators.  

I hope you don't mind my sending out these comments but as Steve stated below, this filing, while may ultimately be necessary to file, is probably best held off, at least until we can see what DSTAR, RTO West and the mediation ALJs all submit to FERC for consideration.

Kind Regards,

Dave

For your information

Paul,
	As you can tell from my last message, I just dumped gasoline on the fire.  It could be my last message, but I didn't think I could stay silent, when I think the filing to compel will fail and will at the same time poison the well with the State and with the utilities.

Steve

Can we have breakfast Wednesday morning at the Park Hyatt to discuss where we are and necessary next steps?  Given Southern's statements (as well as others), this is the key analysis that would hold up this from moving forward.

Jim

Progress?

I spoke with Seabrom Adamson and Kevin Wollenus (sp?) about a cost/benefit study.  Seab said that they are not set up to do a detailed modeling analysis, but that Tabors has the programs already set up and could probably do some type of a modeling analysis.  However, we discussed what other type of study we could do, and we came up with a few ideas.

Seab said that there are general benefits to RTO formation:  e.g., transmission expansion (although you still have siting problems, RTOs will build new transmission where it is needed); administrative cost savings; savings from reserve sharing.  We also discussed the arguments of the cheap power states.  For example, many of the southeastern states oppose RTOs because they fear losing their low cost power.  But Seab points out that RTOs do not mean that the states "lose" their low cost power.  The PSCs retain their authority to decide whether their utilities can or cannot sell power from their plants to third parties.  The PSCs can prohibit utilities from exporting low cost power if it is needed to serve local retail customers.  Seab thought this response to a potential "cost" of RTOs could also be worked into the analysis.

Seab and Kevin are going to give the issue more thought and put together a proposal.  The problem is timing.  Seab has California testimony due on November 6 and he expects to be tied up with that for the next 2 weeks.  If we use the cost/benefit study as part of our NOPR comments (due end of Nov - mid Dec), then he will have enough time.  If we want to present a study before that time (perhaps with comments on RTO week), he will not be able to do the work.  Seab will have a proposal by COB tomorrow or perhaps Monday morning.

I have a call in to Tabors to discuss the same proposal with him.

Larry Ruff is on vacation this week.  He's back on Monday.  We can call him then.

Rick, you also named a few other people:  Charles Stallon, Eric Wolchek, the Brattle Group.  Should I put calls in to these people as well?  Let me know.

Sarah

Where are we on getting our study jumpstarted? Time is of the essence.

I am going through all of my notes and testimony from the hearings to put together a list of issues like this that we need to address.  The best way to do this in a disciplined, orderly manner is to start with Sarah and other regulatory folks here and also share a list of these issues with folks in Houston to figure out the best way to respond in short order.  Pat is correct that the "no studies" point was a common refrain from Southern and others at the House RTO hearing yesterday.

A point floating out there that we need to bat down: There are no studies or analysis showing cost-benefit on RTOs.  Is that true?  If it's false, can we get copies of the pro-RTO studies that exist?

Pat --

Are we doing dinner with Keith Tuesday?

Jim

My Top 5

1.=09(  )  *Up to the minute restructuring data.

2.=09(  )  Catalog of Enron public documents [policy talking points, handou=
ts]

3.=09(  )  Thumbnail analyses by industry experts on various topics

4.=09(  )  *Enron formal documents [filings, comments, testimony]

5.=09   Other - CUSTOMER NEWSLETTER / MONTHLY POLICY POSITION "push"

Please see note from Elizabeth below, and respond directly to Rita Hartfiel=
d by tomorrow!!!

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

I wanted to be sure that everyone had the opportunity to give their input i=
f interested!  If you haven't already responded, below is a list of potenti=
al/existing information resources and we invite you to identify your top fi=
ve priorities (1=3Dhigh).  Responses should be directed to Rita Hartfield b=
y tomorrow, October 18th.

Thanks!
Elizabeth

Ginger - Please forward to Gov't Affairs group.  Thanks!

We're trying to identify information needs - both specific and general.  Ma=
ny of these are already provided, and response to this survey will help in =
identifying new services and prioritizing/improving existing offerings.  De=
pending on the response to each offering, most will likely be made availabl=
e.  For this effort, please rank up to five choices in the list below (1=3D=
highest).  We'll tally the results, identify which items will have priority=
 and communicate back how those needs will direct implementation efforts.  =
Please note that items marked with (*) would require your input.  Please cl=
ick on Forward for this message to allow you to type in your ranking number=
s, and send the response to Rita Hartfield by Wednesday, October 17.

Thanks!
Elizabeth

(  )  Catalog of web resources.  [Including websites, electronic documents]

(  )  Catalog of Enron presentations and group member presentations.=20

(  )  Catalog of statistical data and information (some in slide format).  =
[Might include information like generation statistics, company information,=
 various maps, customer migration data, and anything else of general intere=
st and use.]

(  )   Individual access to in-depth research tools [Might include access t=
o Lexis.com, market data tools like PowerDat, etc]  Most applications would=
 require some level of training, and might involve subscription costs.

(  ) Primary research contact assigned by subject matter expertise..

(  )  Catalog of Enron internal position statements

(  )  Ad-hoc research upon request.

(  )  News clipping services

(  )  *Group calendar of significant events with links to associated docume=
nts.

(  )  Catalog of print  publications that we currently own that would be av=
ailable for loan [books, periodicals, studies]

(   )
How much time per week are you willing to spend to contribute to certain it=
ems (marked with *):      hours

ok.  I'm booked all week but next week I can do it.

Jim

Jim:  We should schedule a time to go to lunch between now and November 12th.  - Lisa

Yes.  And I'll need clubs (right handed).

Thanks for doing this,

Jim

Howdy Golfers,

Tee times have been arranged on the East Course (18 holes of golf) at the Broadmoor for Thursday, November 8 (tee times: 1:40pm & 1:48pm).  The price for playing this course is actually $90; slightly cheaper than what is indicated below.  I have arranged for each of your golf charges to be charged to your individual rooms.  Please refer to the list below for additional charges such as, clubs & shoe charges.   I'm hoping to finalize all the activity choices by the end of the week, so please confirm by COB tomorrow Thursday, October 18 that your activity choice will remain golf.

Thanks!
  
Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

 
There are several changes to the Direct Report meeting in November.  

First, the meeting will now conclude by 12:00 (noon) on Friday, November 9.  

Second, the activities portion of the trip will not be sponsored by Enron....each individual will be responsible (personally) for payment of activity of choice.  Most individuals either chose golf or horseback riding.....below is an estimate as to how much these activities will cost.

Golf:
Green Fees	(East/West Course)	$155.00/18 holes (Includes golf cart, use of practice balls, club care & storage)	
		(East/West Course)	$85.00/9 holes	(includes - same as above)	

		(Mountain Course)	$95.00/18 holes  (includes - same as above)
		(Mountain Course)	$50.00/9 holes	 (includes - same as above)		
Rentals:
Golf clubs with sleeve of balls	$55.00
Golf Shoes			$20.00

Horseback riding:		1hour		$25.00/person
				1hour pkg	$35.00/person (pkg includes shuttle ride to stables)
				2hour		$40.00/person
				2hour pkg	$50.00/person (pkg includes shuttle ride to stables)

				mini ride	(group only) $15.00/approximately 20 minutes
				

If you have an interest in the spa services that are available, please let me know and I will fax the spa list to you.

Please let me know ASAP which activity you choose so I can make the necessary arrangements. 

Thanks and please call me if you have any questions.

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Any idea when this will be rescheduled?

Jim

Please let me know if your supervisors are able to attend a meeting on Friday, October 19 at 4 pm CST regarding California contracts.

Dave Hensel
Vicki Sharp
Scott Gahn
Mike Smith
Andy Wu
Jim Steffees

Thank you
Xochitl-Alexis

Tom --

Where do we stand with this?

Jim

EES was recently assessed $147,000 by the Pennsylvania PUC as a method of r=
ecovering their costs.  Enron's local PA attorney, Kevin Moody of Wolf, Blo=
ck, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP, notified us that he has taken the lead for =
a group of natural gas suppliers to challenge the assessments and inquired =
if Enron wanted to be a part of the group.  The group includes IOGA (an ass=
ociation of oil & gas suppliers in PA), TXU, Hess, New Power, and 4 others.=
  Moody successfully got a postponement of the payments until Oct 16.  EES =
is included in the postponement at this time.  The options are to litigate =
the assessment (Moody feels we are on solid ground to prevail) or to negoti=
ate a settlement with the PUC where we agree to some assessment to be deter=
mined.  Litigating the assessment could cost about $50K - $60K (in addition=
 to the $25K to date) whereas settling would obviously be less expensive in=
itially but would provide an assessment for each year going forward.  Moody=
 id meeting with the PA PUC this Friday to determine what would be the best=
 way to proceed (he is hoping to convince them that the statute is quite cl=
ear that they cannot make the assessment and that they withdraw it).  We wi=
ll have a better grasp of the situation and clearer path for the direction =
we should pursue after that meeting.  I will keep you informed. =20

A few notes.

1.	Be cautious about divestiture.  Remember we own pipes and a electric LDC.

2.	Agree with you that we don't want Utility in merchant role - key issue.

3.	POLR issue involves getting pricing right.

Why don't you put together a note to the CAEM that we can send as our thoughts.  Just the Top 5 issues.

Jim

 << File: distco future.doc >> 

Attached are summarized the main recommendations of the distco of the future paper and  their impact.
Most recommendations would have a positive impact on competition. However, some recommendations could be potentially dangerous. Besides, it does not have a clear position regarding unbundling: it opens too many unbundling possibilities and discards the extreme, and more effective (divestiture).
I will work on the default supplier paper today.

Are these papers consistent with Enron's positions?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: DISCO of the Future Participants
FR: Hope Duncan, Director of Administration
RE: Meeting Materials
DT: October 18, 2001

Please find attached the agenda for next week's DISCO meeting.  I also
have attached the materials for the meeting -- the regulatory white
paper and the POLR paper.

Please address all questions and/or comments regarding the
aforementioned materials during the meeting.

 - DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc << File: DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc >> 
 - DISCO POLR Revised.doc << File: DISCO POLR Revised.doc >> 
 - DISCO October Agenda.doc << File: DISCO October Agenda.doc >> 

Try to respond end of the week.  I'd like to see your drafts.

Jim

Fine. Which is the deadline? 

A few notes.

1.	Be cautious about divestiture.  Remember we own pipes and a electric LDC.

2.	Agree with you that we don't want Utility in merchant role - key issue.

3.	POLR issue involves getting pricing right.

Why don't you put together a note to the CAEM that we can send as our thoughts.  Just the Top 5 issues.

Jim

 << File: distco future.doc >> 

Attached are summarized the main recommendations of the distco of the future paper and  their impact.
Most recommendations would have a positive impact on competition. However, some recommendations could be potentially dangerous. Besides, it does not have a clear position regarding unbundling: it opens too many unbundling possibilities and discards the extreme, and more effective (divestiture).
I will work on the default supplier paper today.

Are these papers consistent with Enron's positions?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: DISCO of the Future Participants
FR: Hope Duncan, Director of Administration
RE: Meeting Materials
DT: October 18, 2001

Please find attached the agenda for next week's DISCO meeting.  I also
have attached the materials for the meeting -- the regulatory white
paper and the POLR paper.

Please address all questions and/or comments regarding the
aforementioned materials during the meeting.

 - DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc << File: DISCO-Regulation-MembersDraft(010907v14).doc >> 
 - DISCO POLR Revised.doc << File: DISCO POLR Revised.doc >> 
 - DISCO October Agenda.doc << File: DISCO October Agenda.doc >> 

This evening and stay until Wed pm.

Jim

I didn't know/remember you were here. They are still closed, but I'll see if I can reach him.  Another option: we're sponsoring this Alliance to Save Energy dinner that night and we still have room at our table, if Keith and you want to go.  Pataki gets an award.   It should be an ok time.

I'll try to raise him and let you know.  When do you get in?

Pat

Pat --

Are we doing dinner with Keith Tuesday?

Jim

yes

This outside bill assumes I am acting as Enron attorney and Pat Keene is the witness.  Can this go to the RCR for next week?

I will assume two hours of my time for testimony review and about four hours for Rob Kinas to fly up to Reno and back (I realize this is generous, but I don't know the place schedule or whether he can do any useful work in transit, so I thought I would give you worst case).  That's probably about $1,600 plus expenses.  You could knock off at least two hours if Rob can admit you from the Las Vegas office of the Commission.  Usually the PUCN allows parties to participate via teleconference in Las Vegas if the hearing is in Carson City and vice versa.  It would also save you the airfare and car rental (its cheaper than a cab even if you are only staying in Carson City a short while) for Rob.  However, I urge you and your witness to appear live in Carson City.

P.S.  When did Enron become such a tightwad?

I didn't get the attachment.  If you want my thoughts, please let me know.

Jim

I would ask Mike about the last sentence in bullet 5.  Based on the language of the quote the Commission appears to be referring to the surcharge "adopted in D. 01-03-082."  Was the .01 surcharge "adopted" in that proceeding?  Maybe I am reading this too literally.  I do agree that the rationale for exempting DA customers from the 3 cent surcharge applies equally to the 1 cent surcharge, and that we should continue to strive for this clarification at the CPUC (which Sue Mara is handling).  Sue, I am forwarding this to you for your comments.

please let me know if any of you disagree/have comments
Here is our settlement sheet on the one cent surcharge, attached below.
Mike Day

 - X28655.DOC [Mellencamp, Lisa]   << File: X28655.DOC >>  

Thanks for the update.  It is disappointing that AGA is not opening the pro=
cess, although the final EISB Retail Gas standards will need to be vetted b=
y an ANSI group so we'll get our comments in one way or the other.

Also, what are we doing to get the different states to adopt these protocol=
s across the board?  Seems like pushing NARUC to agree that this is the rig=
ht vehicle makes sense. =20

Thanks,

Jim

Our UBP group met for two days last week in St. Louis, along with GISB and =
AGA reps.  UBP is definitely on board with creating the retail electric qua=
drant of an EISB.  We have been working extensively on getting the membersh=
ip in line with a national organization.  Attached is a "draft" governance =
document that was completed at our meeting last month.  When this document =
was initiated, we were unsure of the progress to an EISB and it was develop=
ed to accommodate either a stand-alone retail organization until the EISB w=
as formed or to be used as a part of the EISB organization.  AGA has been o=
ff on their own developing details for the retail Gas quadrant of EISB.  We=
 have been very vocal in stating that they cannot develop these documents i=
n a vacuum with only gas utility representation; they must reach out to Sup=
pleirs, Services, etc.  The AGA member told us at our meeting that they pla=
n to have an open meeting sometime in November to gain input.  We'll wait a=
nd see how that develops.  A Virginia SCC staff member is also working to g=
et us some time in front of the Electricity Committee to update them on our=
 progress and continue to foster their support of our endeavor.  Please fee=
l free to let me know if you have any questions.  Thanks.
 << File: RESB_CLEAN_STL_101101.doc >>=20

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Nancy, etal --

With the discussions at NERC recently to broaden their role, I think that w=
e need to be very coordinated on our EISB message and begin to figure out h=
ow we get AGA to work with the Retail Gas and EEI/UBR to work with the Reta=
il Power quadrants.  Let's think about a NARUC message to drive this very q=
uickly (maybe at the next meeting).

Having one body begin to coordinate all of these matters will greatly expan=
d our policy reach.

Thanks,

Jim

Thanks Luiz.  As a follow-up, I'd like to be on record as saying that the PUCT wasted my time in flying to Austin (when plane travel is not secure, I'd add) and not even listening to my statements.  Why bring us if they had already made the decision?  Also, I don't know who is going to pay for more Market Readiness work in SPP unless AEP agrees to pay our costs.  The customers pay for their activities.  

Jim

Jean, Pat:

Jim would like us to discuss next steps. 

In particular what should we do regarding Comission decision to delay retail competition - docket 24468? 

As far as Docket 24469 is concerned (SERC-Texas), please confirm the following:

	*	Comission decision to delay competition applies only to 24468
	*	There is an ongoing hearing on 24469 
	*	Today is the deadline for parties to intervene.
	*	However, Enron is not a party in this hearing; nor we filed any motion to intervene
	*	Comission has not requested Enron a specific Request for Testimony
	*	Arguments for delaying competition in SERC are similar to the ones for SPP
	*	Therefore, Comission may decide to delay retail competition as well
	*	Is there anything we can do about it?

Any other ideas?

LM

Reagan

The decision is for SPP Texas only - Docket 24468. 

You are right. SERC Texas has a different Docket number - 24469.

LM

Luiz-  

Is this decision for all non-ERCOT Texas?  SPP Texas and SERC Texas?  I understand there are two docket numbers, and SERC Texas has not been decided yet?

Reagan C. Rorschach
The Comission did not set a firm date for opening of the retail market in non-ERCOT Texas

Tks

LM

Luiz,. What dos "until further notice" mean??  Thanks

Reagan

Sounds good.  Please make sure that Jeff Brown in EES is kept in the loop if this gets close to goal line.

Jim

FYI -
Susan Covino of New Power Company has successfully at formed a users group within PJM (PJM rules require at least five companies to form a users group that then has the authority to present changes to the PJM Members Committee for implementation but can also petition the Board directly if not satisfied with the Members Committee outcome) to address ICAP in PJM.  The group is called "ICAP Solution User Group" and the first meeting is scheduled for Oct 29.  I am planning on attending.  I assume the approach will be interim changes to ICAP with the ultimate goal of elimination.  

Wanda --

Who do I need to call at EPMI West Power to discuss the following -

We are considering proposing a Settlement for SCE.  The language we are considering on the Negative CTC is as follows.  Does this help or hurt?  Do we have "final ISO invoices"?  

Please call me.

Jim

"Calculation of those energy credits utilizing the PX Rate Schedule shall include a "pro-ration of bill cycles through and including January 18, 2001, and true-ups for ISO settlement charge forecasts based on the December 2000 and January 2001 final ISO invoices."

Lisa --
 
Let me know what you decide.
 
Jim
Lisa:
 
When we meet later today to discuss the price risk management project, I would like to address the following:
 
1. Should the matrix Masha and I put together of exisiting hedging activity go out to the group (Sue and I had talked about this at one point)?  Attached is the most recent matrix.
 
2. In my absence, who (if anyone) should take over the responsibility of keeping the matrix updated?  If it is someone here, it may be helpful for me to sit down with that person to let them know what I consider to be the best sources of info.
 
3. I have a lot of files organized by state of dockets, etc.  Who should these be passed on to?
 
Thanks, 
 
Jennifer
 
 

Barbara --

What's up with TN?  Did we ever solve the issue with Stokes Bartholomew funding with the commercial team?

Jim

The Governor's Energy Working Groups' subcommittee on merchant plants will take comments from independent suppliers on October 18th.  TVA made a presentation at the last meeting of the subcommittee.  I will forward to you an outline of their comments.

Please take a look at them and provide me with comments on how you think the industry should respond and who you think should do it (i.e. should we have EPSA testify, a panel of industry experts, etc...).  I will be on the EPSA call Friday afternoon.

For those of you who are not aware, Enron has site near Memphis that it is developing.  The air permit application was submitted prior to the Chief of Staff's letter advising local air boards to not accept new permits.  We tentatively believe that our permit can go forward w/o holdup.   While our site might be spared, we need to take into consideration the fact that the state could take action to severely limit independent power projects in TN.  This action could result in a domino effect in the south.  Also, this meeting provides us with an opportunity to bring our message regarding TVA into Tennessee.

I will also obtain a copy of the subcommittee's members and forward it to you.

Also, Robert Gowan of Stokes Bartholomew, one of our law firms in TN, is talking with the head of the EWG about getting EPSA appointed to the Advisory Board of the Working Group.   

The meeting with the Committee will be held in Nashville on October 18th.  Instead of 30 minutes, we will have 60 minutes.  Following our presentation, the Tennessee distributors
will have 30 minutes.  We are welcome to stay for the distributors' presentation.  The continental breakfast/registration will begin at 9:30 a.m.
 Our presentation will begin at 10:00 a.m.  The distributors will begin their
presentation at 11:00 a.m.

I hope you'll be able to join the conference call on Friday, September 28th at 11:00 a.m. EDT to discuss how to use our 60 minutes.  To access the call, please dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the EPSA/Samantha Slater call.  Please make sure to ask for the Samantha Slater call, since we will have two EPSA calls going on at the same time.

Thanks!

Thanks.

Jim

Greetings!

We wanted to let you know that Your Secretary, Linda created a Hallmark.com e-card for you.  To see your card, click the link below, or copy and paste this link into your Web browser's address line:
http://ecardview.hallmark.com/hmk/Website/greeting.jsp?id=EG1104-183131-6546550

If you have trouble using the link we provided, please follow these steps:

1. Click this link to go to our homepage, or copy and paste it into your browser's address line:
   http://www.hallmark.com
2. Click on the "e-cards" link.
3. Click on the link on the upper left hand side of the page that says "pick up a greeting."
4. Enter your email address and this retrieval number: EG104831546550.  This e-card will be available for 90 days.
5. If you'd like to send an e-card yourself, use the "send your own greeting" button beside the e-card.
Enjoy!

While you're visiting Hallmark.com, be sure to explore our other products.  We offer paper cards, great gifts, beautiful flowers and more.  And our e-cards are fast, fun, and free.  You're sure to find something you like at Hallmark.com.

With best wishes,

Jan Scott
Hallmark.com

P.S.  Your privacy is our priority.  To see our online Privacy and Security statement, please use this link:
http://www.hallmark.com/hmk/Website/goto.jsp?CONTENT_KEY=FOOTER_PRIVLEGL&CONTENT_TYPE=ARTICLE

Mike --

I'd shorten the letter to one page by simply referencing the State Commission's letter and issues.  Don't we want to also work on pushing a Mediation (or some other solution) right now?

Donna --

Pls check with Linda R. about filing.  It's important but let's make sure our overall FERC strategy is consistent.

Jim

Jim, attached is a draft letter to Pat Wood.  It is basically the same letter sent by the State Commissions and consumers groups today....if we are to send it, it needs to go out this afternoon probably by 3pm (i don't know the process, Donna could you help....).

regards
Mike
 << File: Ltr to Wood, response to ARTO status report 22 October.DOC >> 

Ok.  I may call Keith anyway.

Jim

By the way, the dinner we're sponsoring is Wed, not Tuesday.  I don't think I can do dinner on Tuesday.  I have to provide airport shuttle service for my sister-in-law who's getting married Sat.

This evening and stay until Wed pm.

Jim

I didn't know/remember you were here. They are still closed, but I'll see if I can reach him.  Another option: we're sponsoring this Alliance to Save Energy dinner that night and we still have room at our table, if Keith and you want to go.  Pataki gets an award.   It should be an ok time.

I'll try to raise him and let you know.  When do you get in?

Pat

Pat --

Are we doing dinner with Keith Tuesday?

Jim

cheers.

We are in the process of calculating EWS's potential short position on gree=
n power that could result from an RPS in California. We should have definit=
ive numbers by mid-day tomorrow. We are working with Steve Swain and Jeff R=
ichter to assess the exposure, running our commodity short against $1.50, $=
3.00 and $7.00 green curves. Numbers will eventually be adjusted for contra=
cts with pass-through clauses. We can discuss the results on our conference=
 call tomorrow.
EM

I want to make sure that Jeff Richter from the power desk knows about this =
potential increased cost.

Jim

How about tomorrow afternoon at 4:00 Houston time?

=09 -----Original Message-----
=09I think that's a good idea -- particularly w/ respect to the likelihood =
of passage.  If we could arrange for tomorrow afternoon after 2:00 p.m. CDT=
 that would be great.  I've got a 4:00 and a 5:00 this afternoon.

=09Thanks,
=09Stacey Bolton
=09Environmental Strategies
=09Enron Corp
=09713-853-9916 direct=20
=09713-303-2632 cell=20
=09sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=09=20

=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09Jenny -- I would appreciate you setting up a call with relevant folks=
 to discuss this. Later this afternoon or tomorrow afternoon work well for =
me.

=09=09Thx,

=09=09Elliot

=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09=09Jeff:

=09=09=09As you may know, at Jim's request, Stacey Bolton reviewed the rene=
wables language in SBX2 79 and SB 532 and identified some important issues.=
=20

=09=09=09In a memo she sent out yesterday, she detailed her concerns about =
these bills (copied below, for your reference). =20

=09=09=09How do you suggest we proceed?  Shall I arrange a brief call for u=
s with Stacey, Elliot, Mary and Jesse to discuss where we stand and strateg=
y going forward?

=09=09=09Jennifer =20

=09=09=09***************
=09=09=09Overall Concerns: =20
=09=09=09=091.=09The requirement for retailers to enter into a direct bilat=
eral for the power from renewable energy and schedule it into the CA grid p=
resents limitations and could drive up costs.
=09=09=09=092.=09It?s unclear if the REC is truly separate instrument from =
the underlying commodity.  The above requirement indicates that it is not. =
 This would negatively impact, and even negate the main reasons to have a R=
EC trading program - to provide flexibility and act as verification for the=
 RPS.
=09=09=09=093.=09The biomass definition is too limiting.  Would be difficul=
t to detail this amount of information on a REC.  Need to have language tha=
t distinguishes whether the REC is RPS eligible or not.
=09=09=09=094.=09Utilities are given preferential treatment in proposed lan=
guage in that utilities can recover costs through rate base and the Departm=
ent of Water Resources (SB 532 only) is instructed to purchase renewables o=
n their behalf if it is cost prohibitive for the utilities.
=09=09=09=095.=09While the cost cap is positive from a retail perspective, =
it might be out of the market from a wholesale perspective to cover the ren=
ewable premiums for new sources.

=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09=09The concerns that I listed at the end of the memo are the ones tha=
t I believe need to be addressed and clarified if it appears one of these b=
ills are moving forward at a rapid pace.  Thanks!

=09=09=09Stacey Bolton
=09=09=09Environmental Strategies
=09=09=09Enron Corp
=09=09=09713-853-9916 direct=20
=09=09=09713-303-2632 cell=20
=09=09=09sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=09=09=09=20

=09=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09=09=09Stacey:

=09=09=09=09As Jim has asked me to follow more closely CA legislation, I su=
ggest you let both Jeff and me know what your issues are, etc. and we can d=
etermine the best way to proceed.

=09=09=09=09Thanks,=20

=09=09=09=09Jennifer

=09=09=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09=09=09=09Thanks.  The changes in combination are okay, though it woul=
d be better to get the date as Sept '96 for eligibility and interconnected =
to CA grid.  Also, we still need to work on the REC language (i.e. not mand=
atorily tied to output power contracts).  What's the best way to approach? =
 Discuss w/ Jeff Dasovich?

=09=09=09=09=09Stacey Bolton
=09=09=09=09=09Environmental Strategies
=09=09=09=09=09Enron Corp
=09=09=09=09=09713-853-9916 direct=20
=09=09=09=09=09713-303-2632 cell=20
=09=09=09=09=09sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=09=09=09=09=09=20

=09=09=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----

=09=09=09=09=09FYI - see Scott's message below for an update on SBX2 78. =
=20

=09=09=09=09=09Also, I wanted to make sure that you have on your radar scre=
en the most recent versions of the bills you analyzed.   I noticed, for exa=
mple, that in the most recent version of SB 532 (amended on 8/27) there wer=
e some important revisions (for example, see highlighted text).   This bill=
 is avaiable at: http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0501-0550/sb_532_bi=
ll_20010827_amended_asm.html

=09=09=09=09=09Jennifer

=09=09=09=09=09CHAPTER 5.6. CALIFORNIA RENEWABLES PORTFOLIO STANDARD PROGRA=
M 25465. For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the followi=
ng meanings. (a) "Eligible renewable energy resource" means an electric gen=
erating facility or solar thermal energy system that reduces the consumptio=
n of electricity through the use of renewable resources and generating faci=
lity that meets all of the following criteria: (1) Uses wind, solar, geothe=
rmal, or biomass as its primary fuel. (A) A solar thermal energy system tha=
t reduces the consumption of electricity may be considered an eligible rene=
wable energy resource. (B) Fuel cells using renewable fuels are an eligible=
 renewable energy resource. (2) Improves the resource diversity in the elec=
tricity market that serves the state, and increases the reliability of the =
state's electricity system. The commission shall deem an electric generatin=
g facility or solar thermal energy system to satisfy this requirement if it=
 meets any one of the following criteria: (A) It is located within or inter=
connected to the control area of the California Independent System Operator=
, the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, or the Imperial Irrigation=
 District. (B) Its power is sold under a direct bilateral contract to a ret=
ail seller and its energy is scheduled into the control area of the Califor=
nia Independent System Operator, the Los Angeles Department of Water and Po=
wer, or the Imperial Irrigation District. (C) It meets other fact-based cri=
teria established by the commission. seller and its energy is delivered to =
end-use customers within the state. (b) "Eligible existing renewable energy=
 resource" means an electric generating facility that satisfies all criteri=
a in subdivision (a) and is in existence before January 1, 2001 September 2=
6, 1996 . Any facility that sells its output to an electrical corporation u=
nder a contract entered into prior to 1996 under the federal Public Utiliti=
es Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617) shall be considered an eli=
gible existing resource. (c) "Eligible new renewable energy resource" means=
 output from an electric generating facility that satisfies all criteria in=
 subdivision (a) and meets at least one of the following criteria: (1) The =
facility commenced initial operation on or after January 1, 2001. September=
 26, 1996. (2) The output represents incremental production from repowered =
or refurbished existing facilities and project additions completed on or af=
ter January 1, 2001 September 26, 1996 , as measured by the production of k=
ilowatthours above the five-year average of the kilowatthours delivered fro=
m the project during the five-year period ending December 31, 2000. kilowat=
thours previously delivered from the project. Incremental output from repow=
ered or refurbished facilities sold to an electrical corporation under a co=
ntract entered into prior to January 1, 2001, that specifies fixed capacity=
 payments for the incremental output may not be considered an eligible new =
renewable energy resource. (3) The output represents incremental output abo=
ve levels specified in contracts for facilities defined in subdivision (b).

=09=09=09=09=09Also: (c) "Eligible new renewable energy resource" means out=
put from an electric generating facility that satisfies all criteria in sub=
division (a) and meets at least one of the following criteria: (1) The faci=
lity commenced initial operation on or after January 1, 2001. September 26,=
 1996. (2) The output represents incremental production from repowered or r=
efurbished existing facilities and project additions completed on or after =
January 1, 2001 September 26, 1996=20

=09=09=09=09=09 -----Original Message-----
=09=09=09=09=09The Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee heard =
and voted on
=09=09=09=09=09amendments to SBX2 78 proposed by many interested parties.  =
Some passed,
=09=09=09=09=09some failed and most of them served to further confuse the c=
ommittee
=09=09=09=09=09members.  Eventually the committee stalled on detailed propo=
sals made by
=09=09=09=09=09TURN and other consumer groups.

=09=09=09=09=09During the hearing Hedy had the opportunity to speak to Nanc=
y McFadden and
=09=09=09=09=09Richard Katz from the Governor?s office regarding a couple o=
f issues
=09=09=09=09=09highlighted by Jeff and Mike Day.  Richard said he is willin=
g to make more
=09=09=09=09=09technical amendments when the bill gets to Appropriations.  =
Subsequently,
=09=09=09=09=09Hedy and I spoke to D.J. Smith at Jeff?s request.  D.J. agre=
ed that the bill
=09=09=09=09=09needs to use the August 24th date as a grandfather date for =
executed DA
=09=09=09=09=09contracts, but specifically asked that we (Enron) not speak =
to Richard about
=09=09=09=09=09it.  He said he will have the business entities request it a=
s a clarifying
=09=09=09=09=09amendment.  If we request it, he thought Richard would be le=
ss likely to
=09=09=09=09=09believe it's clarifying since he believes our motives to be =
too
=09=09=09=09=09self-serving.  Also, we spent some time with Lenny Goldberg =
on direct
=09=09=09=09=09access.  We suggested that ?shall? be changed to ?may? in or=
der to give more
=09=09=09=09=09leeway to the PUC on direct access suspension.  He didn?t ne=
cessarily oppose
=09=09=09=09=09the policy, but his position is not to amend a bad bill unle=
ss you can
=09=09=09=09=09totally rewrite it (which he later attempted to do).

=09=09=09=09=09A lobbyist for a significant generator told us that they are=
 prepared to
=09=09=09=09=09push Edison into bankruptcy (along with the Canadian governm=
ent) if this
=09=09=09=09=09bill passes.

=09=09=09=09=09There is no consensus that this measure will ever get to the=
 Governor?s
=09=09=09=09=09desk.

=09=09=09=09=09The committee will meet again tomorrow at approximately 1:30=
 p.m. to vote on
=09=09=09=09=09additional amendments and ultimately to vote on the complete=
 bill.

Sue, Mike, & Jeanne --

Attached is the letter from PG&E regarding our payment "issues".  Discussions this morning have this gameplan - 1.  file at CPUC and Bankruptcy the appropriate paper & $ to hold our issues.  

We need to have a call at 12 Houston time to discuss and ensure that the filings are consistent.  If anyone has any problems, please let me know.

Jim

FYI . conf call is being set up for tomorrow. 

FYI. 
 
Dan Leff
08/31/2001 03:31 PM
 
Diann Huddleson
08/31/2001 03:09 PM
 
 <<DHuddleson8-30.doc>>

(From Lorraine Reyes, acting secretary to Michael Alexander)

 - DHuddleson8-30.doc 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Randy --

Last minute, I'm coming to DC today through Wednesday afternoon.  Any chance to grab dinner or a beer?  You're probably swamped, but thought I'd check.  I'm staying at Park Hyatt  (24 and M) - leave a number if it works 202-419-6795.

Thanks,

Jim

Leaving for airport - can we talk in am???

Jim

Ray, John and I would like a few minutes to discuss our political and strategic approach on the two refund cases.  We have some ideas to suggest, and want your input.  This could also serve as prep for the Glotfelty/Kelliher lunch tomorrow. 

Thanks.  If you need any additional support pls let me know.  Also, pls send my best to Thane and his family.
 
Jim

Thane's daughter, Sarah, is in Texas Children's Hospital.  I spoke with Thane this afternoon, Sarah will have surgery tonight.  The surgery is exploratory in nature, as well as repair of her broken leg. She has been in a great deal of pain since last night. 
 
This has been and continues to be a very difficult time for Thane and his wife, Linda. I sent a doll to Sarah, she is three years of age, from the American Girl Collection on behalf of governmental affairs.  Jean 

Vicki --

I will be in town on Thursday and available to meet.  Assuming that the meeting won't go for more than 1 - 1.5 hours, I'd be happy to attend.  

Thanks,

Jim

Yes.  I've called Keith and he says he can also go.  Please call Lora Sullivan 202-466-9142 to arrange a time.  I'm good whenever.

Jim

I've been working pretty long hours recently.  I'd like to do it, but won't
really know my schedule until tomorrow.  Can I give you a buzz then?

Randy --

Last minute, I'm coming to DC today through Wednesday afternoon.  Any
chance to grab dinner or a beer?  You're probably swamped, but thought
I'd check.  I'm staying at Park Hyatt  (24 and M) - leave a number if it
works 202-419-6795.

Thanks,

Jim

I think that EES would like to send out some regulatory information on a re=
gular basis.  Maybe qty instead of monthly.  Nothing formal right now.

Jim

Jim, can you elaborate on "customer newsletter/monthly policy position"

My Top 5

1.=09(  )  *Up to the minute restructuring data.

2.=09(  )  Catalog of Enron public documents [policy talking points, handou=
ts]

3.=09(  )  Thumbnail analyses by industry experts on various topics

4.=09(  )  *Enron formal documents [filings, comments, testimony]

5.=09   Other - CUSTOMER NEWSLETTER / MONTHLY POLICY POSITION "push"

Please see note from Elizabeth below, and respond directly to Rita Hartfiel=
d by tomorrow!!!

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

I wanted to be sure that everyone had the opportunity to give their input i=
f interested!  If you haven't already responded, below is a list of potenti=
al/existing information resources and we invite you to identify your top fi=
ve priorities (1=3Dhigh).  Responses should be directed to Rita Hartfield b=
y tomorrow, October 18th.

Thanks!
Elizabeth

Ginger - Please forward to Gov't Affairs group.  Thanks!

We're trying to identify information needs - both specific and general.  Ma=
ny of these are already provided, and response to this survey will help in =
identifying new services and prioritizing/improving existing offerings.  De=
pending on the response to each offering, most will likely be made availabl=
e.  For this effort, please rank up to five choices in the list below (1=3D=
highest).  We'll tally the results, identify which items will have priority=
 and communicate back how those needs will direct implementation efforts.  =
Please note that items marked with (*) would require your input.  Please cl=
ick on Forward for this message to allow you to type in your ranking number=
s, and send the response to Rita Hartfield by Wednesday, October 17.

Thanks!
Elizabeth

(  )  Catalog of web resources.  [Including websites, electronic documents]

(  )  Catalog of Enron presentations and group member presentations.=20

(  )  Catalog of statistical data and information (some in slide format).  =
[Might include information like generation statistics, company information,=
 various maps, customer migration data, and anything else of general intere=
st and use.]

(  )   Individual access to in-depth research tools [Might include access t=
o Lexis.com, market data tools like PowerDat, etc]  Most applications would=
 require some level of training, and might involve subscription costs.

(  ) Primary research contact assigned by subject matter expertise..

(  )  Catalog of Enron internal position statements

(  )  Ad-hoc research upon request.

(  )  News clipping services

(  )  *Group calendar of significant events with links to associated docume=
nts.

(  )  Catalog of print  publications that we currently own that would be av=
ailable for loan [books, periodicals, studies]

(   )
How much time per week are you willing to spend to contribute to certain it=
ems (marked with *):      hours

Randy --

Dinner is at 7:45 pm at Cashion's Eat Place - 1819 Columbia.  Keith is coming.  Call me on my cell phone at 713-851-2499 with any problems.  Hope to see you there.

Jim

I've been working pretty long hours recently.  I'd like to do it, but won't
really know my schedule until tomorrow.  Can I give you a buzz then?

Randy --

Last minute, I'm coming to DC today through Wednesday afternoon.  Any
chance to grab dinner or a beer?  You're probably swamped, but thought
I'd check.  I'm staying at Park Hyatt  (24 and M) - leave a number if it
works 202-419-6795.

Thanks,

Jim

FYI.  

Pat -- Can you please let Heather Kroll, Reagan Rorschach and Rudy Acevedo in EPMI know when we can expect a decision from the TX PUC on whether Entergy goes retail open access 1/1/02?

Also, Texas team, please keep the EPMI SE team informed of the Texas outside of ERCOT information and progress.  The best way is to send an email to Claudette Harvey and ask that she forward it to her group.  Thanks much.

Charles & Jose --

The spinmisters are already at work.  People at FERC thought we had bought into the "new NERC" Enron DOES NOT SUPPORT NERC in working through commercial issues.  We need to develop our opinions of where to go next, but right now you can respond to Dave Nevius that we still don't believe that NERC and its process/organziation is the right vehicle.  We are willing to find a way to do this, but we can't have the same SRO bullshit that they have been saying for 3 years.

Sorry I missed the call.  I'll talk with you guys Friday.

Jim

Jose

We will discuss this on the 2:30 pm call Tues.

I think what NERC needs to know is that their job is not done. Big issues were tied into the Stakeholder's recommendation - changes in governance, voting, funding.  The idea of expanding NERC's role is not for the sole purpose of getting NERC to develop business practices - but rather get NERC to recognize the market and commercial needs in its reliability rules.  Presently, NERC focuses on reliability rules and considers commercial impacts as a secondary issue.  This is what the Stakeholders wish to change.  We must make sure that message is not misconstrued by spin-doctors.

To ensure, this, the charter of NERC would need to change and the idea of a Self-Regulated Organization should cease.

Jose and Charles
Given the actions taken by the NERC Stakeholders Committee and Board
last week, we need to take steps to broaden stakeholder support and
endorsement of these recommendations, especially the one dealing with
NERC taking on an expanded role for the development of business practice
standards in addition to reliability standards.

At the FERC panel discussion last Thursday on standardizing business
practices, it was pretty clear that FERC is not going to make this call,
but rather leave it up to the industry to decide who assumes this
responsibility. In this regard, we would welcome the support of Enron
and EPSA.

Give me a call when you can so we can discuss where Enron is on this,
and how you might help gain EPSA's support.

Thanks.
dave

PS - I still remember that at the 1995 FERC Technical Conference on
OASIS it was Rick Shapiro who first spoke up in response to Betsy
Moler's question about who should take on the responsibility for
developing OASIS standards. Maybe Enron wants to be the first one to
publicly endorse the "New NERC" as the one-stop shop for wholesale
electric standards.

No.  Talk with Pat Keene and/or Leslie Lawner.  We haven't done much on Arizona lately.

Jim

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Ray --

These are being finalized today for filing tomorrow.  I'll send you final.

Jim

Please see the attached proof of claims in the PG&E bankruptcy proceeding.  These could save us some work in the CA proceeding!  Thanks.  Ray

Ray --

FYI.  Some information on how we are talking about the claims in the Bankrupcty case.

Jim

I enclosed blacklined versions of the riders for the proofs of claim for EES, EEMC and EPMI.  I also enclose the riders for the ECC and ENA claims, which have not changed from the versions circulated last night.

Please let me know your comments as soon as possible.

Ben Young

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 

Jeff --

I'd leave the number blank for all parties to be discussed between the different parties.  Best way would be to have some Attachments for the amount that the companies can sign after everything else.  Don't want Dan Douglas to know the $$$ before Richard Sanders oks.

Jim

Quck question:  w.r.t. to the stipulation with Edison.  1) Do we care that D. Douglas will know what our claim (or proposed settlement amount is), i.e., do we prefer that Dan sign a confidentiality agreement?  2)  When we file the stipulation at the Commission, do we care that the universe will see the number, i.e., do we prefer to file any such stipulation under seal at the Commission?  Not sure if this matters whatsoever. But it might.  Who's the person that needs to answer these questions?

Best,
Jeff

Roy --

Do we need to run a more thorough legal analysis to check?  I trust your th=
oughts.  I just don't want to be left hanging.  I'd rather spend $2500 now =
than have this come back and bite us in the $%*@.

Jim

Victor -- This is just a brief note to memorialize our earlier conversation=
 today.  You had asked me whether there were any regulatory impediments to =
Enron renegotiating the Ada contract with Consumers so as to increase the v=
alue of the deal to our mutual benefit.  Specifically, you inquired whether=
 changing the PPA to permit us to source the power used to comply with tour=
 obligations under the contract from the market.  The changes you recommend=
 to make to the PPA would not change the rate paid by Consumers but rather,=
 the sourcing requirement.=20

=09 My preliminary assessment is that such PPA changes would not need to be=
 filed for approval at the PSC.

I have several reasons why the above mentioned changes would likely not hav=
e to be approved by the Commission.  First, rate increases must be  subject=
 to hearings and approval by the Commission.  Consumers has a frozen purcha=
sed power/fuel adjustment clause and any changes in its contracts could not=
 be passed on to customers during the term for which that rate is frozen. S=
ince the rate could not increase, there would be no chance to pass through =
to customers a rate increase hence, no requirement to seek approval.  Moreo=
ver, after Consumers' fuel/purchased power  adjustment clause is reinstated=
, we could reneotiate the contract downwards and pass on a small savings (a=
gain, a rate decrease)to customers and we and Consumers could split the lio=
n's share of the savings revenue.  Lastly, but more significantly, the Mich=
igan law that pertains to utilities recovering QF costs through rates only =
provides authority to the Commission to review PPA changes if the costs for=
 power and energy increase.  Our proposed changes are not likely to be deem=
ed to be a rate increase.  Generally an unchanged rate for a service with a=
 declining quality of service ( e.g., a firm transport service changed to a=
n interruptible service at the same rate)could be construed as a rate incre=
ase thus triggering the Commission's authority.  Our proposal is quite diff=
erent from that instance because, as I understand it, the change we propose=
 would only affect our power sourcing ability and that Consumers would rema=
in able to call on the Ada unit's capacity at all times if needed.  If chan=
ged as described, Consumers will receive the full quality and quantity of s=
ervice for which it contracted under the PPA so its rights seem undisturbed=
.  The only change we seek is for Enron to have an option for power sourcin=
g, which should be "invisible" to Consumers  -- except for the check we pro=
vide them as inducement.

I look forward to meeting with you Friday of this week to discuss this matt=
er more fully.

I think when you add the publics into Southern they'll hit 40k.  

It may make sense to send this question to Intellibridge.  We have their resource.  Call Margaret Allen in Houston she'll have their number.

Jim

The Barton discussion draft says that FERC's hands would be tied and that they would have to approve a proposed RTO, as to size and scope, if the proposed RTO owns or has operational control over transmission facilities that serve at least 40,000 MW of load.  Southern's CEO testified in Congress recently that their load is over 35,000.  I assume the 40,000 MW minimum would permit the SeTrans proposal to meet the proposed statutory minimum since it is Southern plus a few munis, as I understand it.  Is this correct?

Who would know how many RTOs there would be if each were just over the 40,000 MW minimum?  I assume it is much more than 4-5 RTOs -- if so, this is a good contrast to use in our Hill efforts.

Thanks.

thanks.

I am working on a "issues" list that outlines what Enron supports - irregardless of what organization fulfills oure needs.

On today's call - we reiterated the anti-SRO position and that we, last week, support the NERC "direction", and not the organization itself.  NERC's Board just approved a new direction - not a new organization.

Charles & Jose --

The spinmisters are already at work.  People at FERC thought we had bought into the "new NERC" Enron DOES NOT SUPPORT NERC in working through commercial issues.  We need to develop our opinions of where to go next, but right now you can respond to Dave Nevius that we still don't believe that NERC and its process/organziation is the right vehicle.  We are willing to find a way to do this, but we can't have the same SRO bullshit that they have been saying for 3 years.

Sorry I missed the call.  I'll talk with you guys Friday.

Jim

Jose

We will discuss this on the 2:30 pm call Tues.

I think what NERC needs to know is that their job is not done. Big issues were tied into the Stakeholder's recommendation - changes in governance, voting, funding.  The idea of expanding NERC's role is not for the sole purpose of getting NERC to develop business practices - but rather get NERC to recognize the market and commercial needs in its reliability rules.  Presently, NERC focuses on reliability rules and considers commercial impacts as a secondary issue.  This is what the Stakeholders wish to change.  We must make sure that message is not misconstrued by spin-doctors.

To ensure, this, the charter of NERC would need to change and the idea of a Self-Regulated Organization should cease.

Jose and Charles
Given the actions taken by the NERC Stakeholders Committee and Board
last week, we need to take steps to broaden stakeholder support and
endorsement of these recommendations, especially the one dealing with
NERC taking on an expanded role for the development of business practice
standards in addition to reliability standards.

At the FERC panel discussion last Thursday on standardizing business
practices, it was pretty clear that FERC is not going to make this call,
but rather leave it up to the industry to decide who assumes this
responsibility. In this regard, we would welcome the support of Enron
and EPSA.

Give me a call when you can so we can discuss where Enron is on this,
and how you might help gain EPSA's support.

Thanks.
dave

PS - I still remember that at the 1995 FERC Technical Conference on
OASIS it was Rick Shapiro who first spoke up in response to Betsy
Moler's question about who should take on the responsibility for
developing OASIS standards. Maybe Enron wants to be the first one to
publicly endorse the "New NERC" as the one-stop shop for wholesale
electric standards.

FYI.

Jim

 [IMAGE] =09

                                                                           =
 =09  E  Source teleconferences on retail markets and industry  restructuri=
ng  Join us for two informative  teleconferences designed to help you respo=
nd to highly volatile retail  energy markets and shifting corporate imperat=
ives.   Please forward this e-mail  to colleagues in other departments who =
might be interested in  participating. Sign up by replying to this e-mail w=
ith the appropriate  information completed below.   "Creating a Vibrant Ret=
ail Electricity Market"   Tuesday, October 30, 2001, at 10 am (MST), 12 noo=
n  (EST)  What key findings have  marketing practitioners and restructuring=
 architects gleaned from retail  energy markets that have opened to date? I=
f currently closed markets are  to open successfully, what critical element=
s must be in place? Which  stumbling blocks need to be removed? E Source ha=
s convened a panel of  experienced players to distill what can be learned f=
rom recently opened  markets and offer advice for incorporating these lesso=
ns into your  strategic and marketing planning. The panel will  include:   =
[IMAGE]       Karen O'Neill, Vice  President of New Markets, Green Mountain=
  Energy               [IMAGE]       John Hanger, CEO of  Penn Future and f=
ormer Commissioner with the Pennsylvania Public  Utility Commission        =
       [IMAGE]       Joe Douglas, Marketing  Manager with npower direct, on=
e of the largest retail energy  suppliers in the United Kingdom            =
    "Is it  Possible to Restructure Retail Electric Markets?" Tuesday, Nove=
mber 6,  2001, at 10 am (MST), 12 Noon (EST)  The catastrophic failure of  =
California's restructuring efforts, coupled with extremely low switching  r=
ates in overseas and various U.S. state markets, raises anew the debate  ov=
er whether it is even possible to restructure retail electric markets.  Is =
there something fundamentally different about electric markets that  render=
 them impossible to open? Over the past quarter-century, numerous  once-reg=
ulated industries, such as financial services, airlines, and  telecommunica=
tions, have been successfully restructured. Why is  electricity an outlier?=
 Will it change?  Two distinguished industry  analysts, Ken Malloy, CEO of =
 the Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets and publisher of the RED =
 Index, and Dr. Mark Cooper,  Director of Research for Consumer Federation =
of America, will debate two  interrelated propositions:   1. All retail cus=
tomers  should be required to choose a new energy supplier.  2. Non-commodi=
ty  products--such as demand-side management, distributed generation, green=
  power, and combined heat and power--will penetrate faster and more deeply=
  in open retail markets than they would under the continuation of  traditi=
onal regulation.   To Register Registration fee is  $50 for each dial-in co=
nnection for companies that are not members of E  Source. To register, cont=
act our customer response team at 800-424-2908 or  720-548-5700. Or complet=
e the form below and e-mail it to:custserv@ftenergy.com .  To  register via=
 this e-mail, please hit the "reply" button in your e-mail  program, and th=
en type an "X" next to the title of the teleconference(s)  you wish to atte=
nd.  Yes, I'd like to register  for the teleconferences selected below: ___=
__"How to Create a Vibrant  Retail Energy Market" When: Tuesday, Oct. 30, 2=
001, at 10 am  (Mountain), 12 noon (Eastern)  _____"Can Retail Electric  Ma=
rkets be Restructured?" When: Tuesday, Nov. 6, 2001, at 10 am  (Mountain), =
12 noon (Eastern)  Name: Title: Company: Address: E-mail: Phone: Fax:    Pa=
yment  Information Credit Card  Number: Expiration Date: Name on Card: Addr=
ess, if different from  above:  Recordings  Available If your schedule does=
 not  allow you to participate in these events, a compact disc recording of=
 each  teleconference will be available for purchase within one week of eac=
h  event. Please contact our customer response team at 720-548-5700 for mor=
e  information.  If you wish to unsubscribe  from this Platts promotion, cl=
ick  here  and type UNSUBSCRIBE in the subject line, then  send.  [IMAGE]  =
  =09     =09

=20
   =09

Pat --

If you're in on Friday, let's sit down for 15.

Thanks,

Jim

We should intervene based on our potential interest in serving customers pursuant to AB661(short answer=Paul's language).  It is possible that we may want to reduce revenue requirements by recommending the use of financial products to minimize utility revenue risk. We have intervened in the AB 661 regulation proceeding as Enron Energy Services, Inc. and Enron Power Marketing, Inc. If you think we can raise issues outside of "unbundling" we should limit our intervention to EES and EPMI.

Pat,

Shall I use the language proposed by Paul or would you like me to say
something different?  Please let me know ASAP as I would like to get the
petition filed today.  Thanks.

Bonnie

We have intervened in certain cases where we may have an ongoing
commercial interest to require "rate unbundling" in anticipation of
direct access.  We also can intervene on behalf of EWS who may provide
risk mgt. products to reduce utility rates (i.e., weather derivitives to
stabilize rates and reduce utility-reated risk).  In this case we are
there to make sure rates are properly unbundled to facilitate AB 661.

By this e-mail, I'm forwarding this to Pat Keene.  He will be your main
contact on Nevada matters for a while.  I'm swamped processing the
filings for the sale of PGE.  My view is that it should be both ENA and
EES.  Our interest is:  (1) we are a potential new electric resource
under AB 661; and (2) these cases will influence whether we can serve
customers under the statute as the unbundled costs incurred by our
potential customers will be determined in this case.

Pat:  What do we say in other states where we intervene and there is no
direct access?  I'd rather not say that we that we are representing the
interests of several large consumers in Nevada.  It opens our deals up
for discovery.

Paul,

As I was preparing the petition to intervene, it occurred to me that
information has changed.  Do you want the petition to reflect both ENRON
ENERGY SERVICES, INC. and ENRON NORTH AMERICA.  Also, since you do not
own LV Cogen anymore, what would you like me to put as the reasons for
intervention for these entities.  I have attached a draft petition.  It
needs to be filed on Wednesday.

Thanks for your assistance.

Bonnie

Fine by me.  Not sure if I'd make so much of the recent FERC statements - may come true if we don't keep a straightforward message.

Attached for review and comment is a draft set of talking points on the Barton RTO discussion draft.  I went through the testimony at the recent hearing and parsed the legislative language of the discussion draft.  You will see that the talking points are designed to respond to two basic points being raised by our opponents: (1) that FERC is rushing and being heavy-handed and (2) that the only interests involved are those of the transmitting utilities (i.e., no mention of discrimination as being what RTOs will remedy).

Please let me have your thoughts in the next few days.  Once Capitol Hill is up and running again, we will distribute the final talking points to our consultants and to members/staff of the Barton Subcommittee as we continue our efforts against the discussion draft's treatment of RTOs.

 << File: DraftCommentsOnBartonRTO102201.doc >> 

Agree.

I tried to make it clear that we were not ourselves moving off of 4/5 RTOs -- and I will try to make that clearer.  I was just trying to take advantage of what Wood and others said to show that they are not the heavy-handed regulators that Barton and others on the Hill are painting.  In other words, I wouldn't have asked them to say what they did -- but once said, we might as well get some mileage out of it.

Fine by me.  Not sure if I'd make so much of the recent FERC statements - may come true if we don't keep a straightforward message.

Attached for review and comment is a draft set of talking points on the Barton RTO discussion draft.  I went through the testimony at the recent hearing and parsed the legislative language of the discussion draft.  You will see that the talking points are designed to respond to two basic points being raised by our opponents: (1) that FERC is rushing and being heavy-handed and (2) that the only interests involved are those of the transmitting utilities (i.e., no mention of discrimination as being what RTOs will remedy).

Please let me have your thoughts in the next few days.  Once Capitol Hill is up and running again, we will distribute the final talking points to our consultants and to members/staff of the Barton Subcommittee as we continue our efforts against the discussion draft's treatment of RTOs.

 << File: DraftCommentsOnBartonRTO102201.doc >> 

Jeff --

How would we calculate EES' "contribution" to SCE undercollection?

Jim

I talked to John Fielder (SVP Edison) about setting up a meeting for Barry Tycholiz with Edison's CFO about hedging Edison's QF price risk. Fielder wanted to talk about the negative CTC issue. Here's what he said:

They plan to "settle" with the ESPs and pay them when they pay everyone else, which he re-iterated would be sometime in Q1'02.
Edison is holding firm to the notion that the negative CTC contributed to the utility's undercollection and that the ESP's share of the undercollection has to be netted against the payables attributable to the negative CTC and owed the ESP.
He said that they will propose to net it out in one of two ways:  1) lump sum netting (i.e., if they owe $50MM and the share of the undercollection is $30 MM, then they pay the ESP $20 MM; or 2) future reductions in PX Credit (i.e., they pay the ESP $50 MM, and then reduce the PX going forward until the $30 MM is paid down).  The numbers are illustrative only.
In addition, he said that they have the view that a decision is going to have to be made about 1) whether DA customers pay for stranded costs tied to the DWR L-T contracts, and 2) whether DA customers pay going forward for stranded costs tied to the QF contracts.  (Edison is clearly lobbying the PUC to get DA customers to pay for these costs.)
I recommended strongly that he de-link issues 1 and 2 above from the issue of paying us ASAP what they owe us for negative CTC.  He agreed.
He said that the PUC judge's recently issued pre-hearing conference order requires that Edison "meet and confer" with ESPs prior to the Nov. 7th hearing, and that Edison intends to set something up with ESPs prior to that hearing.
Fielder is also the point person on "getting ESPs paid" and intends to initiate settlement discussions with ESPs week after next.
It was very clear from the conversation that Edison is going to do everything possible (at the expense of creditors) to maximize headroom under the settlement it struck with the PUC a few weeks ago.  Edison's stalemate with the QFs is evidence of it.  We shouldn't assume anything different with the Negative CTC issue.

If you have any questions, let us know.

Best,
Jeff

How about 1pm Friday afternoon?  You on a plane.

Jim

I'm in NM Thur. and Fri..  Alway's available by phone.  Got a time in mind?

Pat --

If you're in on Friday, let's sit down for 15.

Thanks,

Jim

We should intervene based on our potential interest in serving customers pursuant to AB661(short answer=Paul's language).  It is possible that we may want to reduce revenue requirements by recommending the use of financial products to minimize utility revenue risk. We have intervened in the AB 661 regulation proceeding as Enron Energy Services, Inc. and Enron Power Marketing, Inc. If you think we can raise issues outside of "unbundling" we should limit our intervention to EES and EPMI.

Pat,

Shall I use the language proposed by Paul or would you like me to say
something different?  Please let me know ASAP as I would like to get the
petition filed today.  Thanks.

Bonnie

We have intervened in certain cases where we may have an ongoing
commercial interest to require "rate unbundling" in anticipation of
direct access.  We also can intervene on behalf of EWS who may provide
risk mgt. products to reduce utility rates (i.e., weather derivitives to
stabilize rates and reduce utility-reated risk).  In this case we are
there to make sure rates are properly unbundled to facilitate AB 661.

By this e-mail, I'm forwarding this to Pat Keene.  He will be your main
contact on Nevada matters for a while.  I'm swamped processing the
filings for the sale of PGE.  My view is that it should be both ENA and
EES.  Our interest is:  (1) we are a potential new electric resource
under AB 661; and (2) these cases will influence whether we can serve
customers under the statute as the unbundled costs incurred by our
potential customers will be determined in this case.

Pat:  What do we say in other states where we intervene and there is no
direct access?  I'd rather not say that we that we are representing the
interests of several large consumers in Nevada.  It opens our deals up
for discovery.

Paul,

As I was preparing the petition to intervene, it occurred to me that
information has changed.  Do you want the petition to reflect both ENRON
ENERGY SERVICES, INC. and ENRON NORTH AMERICA.  Also, since you do not
own LV Cogen anymore, what would you like me to put as the reasons for
intervention for these entities.  I have attached a draft petition.  It
needs to be filed on Wednesday.

Thanks for your assistance.

Bonnie

Is there a room inside Enron?

Jim

A conference call re: PG&E recoupment is scheduled for today at 12 p.m. CST.  The dial in no. is as follows:

	1-800-991-9019; passcode: 7213917

We (Marianna and I) decided that with the new baby on the way - not sure if you knew this - that now wasn't the time to head to DC.  Although with the stock price and company in shambles, maybe it would be a more "conservative" bet.

Hope you're doing well.  

Jim

Did you ever follow up with the DOE opportunity?

Schriver --

No big deal.  Next time I'm in town I'll give you a little more notice.  

Hope things are going well at State - for what it's worth, I think it would be a total mistake for America to stop our hunt for Osama during the Muslim religious month...I don't think the grieving families in NYC and around the Pentagon are going to stop their mourning for their loved ones during that timeframe.  Just one opinion out of millions.

Take care,

Jim

Busted.

JDS -- You and I know the truth -- Randy was running in the Dupont Circle
Drag
Races last night.

Hey, at least he got second place.

kbh

Sorry I missed you last night.  I was running about half an hour late, then
arrived only to circle around for another 30 minutes looking for parking.
Unfortunately, I had accidentally left your phone number on a slip of paper
at work.

In any event, sorry again to miss your visit.  Hope to see you the next time
you swing through town,

Randy

Luiz -

I would like to schedule a phone call with Nick and the PUCT staff to understand the implication of this...  Maybe he isn't asking for too much, but let's get some clarity before we say anything at FERC.

Can you please set something up with you, Christi, Jean and me for Friday pm and then we'll go outside next week??

Jim

Jim

You were right. SPP is going to use this episode as a lever to be "promoted" to an RTO. 

Texas is recommending three steps to introduce competition at Texas-SPP. One is described as follows:

*	Support the SPP's efforts to begin wholesale market operations: Mr. Brown, Vice President of SPP, testified that SPP can begin wholesale market operations and complete systems testing by April 1, 2002. He has requested that the SPP Board approve his recommendation to start to wholesale market operations. This Commission should support that process by:

-	Requesting in writing that the SPP Board begin wholesale operations as soon as possible with a target date of completing systems testing by April 1, 2002.
-	Advising FERC of the need to support SPP wholesale market operations. While Mr. Brown testified that the recent July and September Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) orders regarding SPP's start up expenditures will not impede SPP from implementing wholesale market operations, this Commission should advise FERC that the findings from our hearing show the need for FERC to fully support SPP wholesale operations startup. 

Linda --

Pls set up a 30 minute meeting with Melinda tomorrow.  

Thanks

I know that SCE is taking this position.  They are simple wrong.  Unless and until we get all of our "positive" CTC back from the Utility, why should I even begin to consider their "goofy" arguments.  In addition, SCE is receiving $3.3 B which is a full payment of all Negative CTC.  If their issue is to have a Undercollection charge against all customers, that's a different policy matter.  The CPUC agreed to the idea of Negative CTC and SCE needs to pay.  

Also, if we are 5% of load and the Undercollection is $3.3 B, I think that SCE would be looking for $165 MM - our entire claim.  They aren't talking about 5% from our view $150 MM claim.

Jim

Need to think about it a bit.  Here's some of what we know based on the settlement:

Total debt = 6.35 B
After they contribute all cash on their books and agree to eat a little, the PUC is allowing them to collect somewhere between $3.0-3.3B--depends on who you talk to.
The total owed to ESPs is $243 MM.

Jeff,

Do we know how much Edison's total under collection is?  Would it be as simple as to determine their total (around $3 billion?) and  gross receivable (before any payments - 145 million) and calculate the % (around 5%)?  This would result in a pretty small percentage.  Another way to look at it would be on a % of load basis.  If you use the DA load information Sue forwarded to us on October 1st,   this % (5.7%)  would also be very small.  How do you think they will look at it?  I think we would all agree to a 5% haircut, if they would JUST PAY US!

Wanda

Wanda:  I faxed the examples that Edison faxed us and that you and Michael and I talked about some time back.  I'm sure that's how Edison would calculate it.  Does it make sense to run the numbers and see what our "contribution" to Edison's undercollection would be under Edison's view?  If you need another copy, let me know.  Question:  I don't know what our book looks like on this issue, but if we were to take the "netting" through a reduction in the PX credit going forward, how much of a hit would that be, particularly if we were to get the $120 MM up front?

Best,
Jeff

Jeff --

How would we calculate EES' "contribution" to SCE undercollection?

Jim

I talked to John Fielder (SVP Edison) about setting up a meeting for Barry Tycholiz with Edison's CFO about hedging Edison's QF price risk. Fielder wanted to talk about the negative CTC issue. Here's what he said:

They plan to "settle" with the ESPs and pay them when they pay everyone else, which he re-iterated would be sometime in Q1'02.
Edison is holding firm to the notion that the negative CTC contributed to the utility's undercollection and that the ESP's share of the undercollection has to be netted against the payables attributable to the negative CTC and owed the ESP.
He said that they will propose to net it out in one of two ways:  1) lump sum netting (i.e., if they owe $50MM and the share of the undercollection is $30 MM, then they pay the ESP $20 MM; or 2) future reductions in PX Credit (i.e., they pay the ESP $50 MM, and then reduce the PX going forward until the $30 MM is paid down).  The numbers are illustrative only.
In addition, he said that they have the view that a decision is going to have to be made about 1) whether DA customers pay for stranded costs tied to the DWR L-T contracts, and 2) whether DA customers pay going forward for stranded costs tied to the QF contracts.  (Edison is clearly lobbying the PUC to get DA customers to pay for these costs.)
I recommended strongly that he de-link issues 1 and 2 above from the issue of paying us ASAP what they owe us for negative CTC.  He agreed.
He said that the PUC judge's recently issued pre-hearing conference order requires that Edison "meet and confer" with ESPs prior to the Nov. 7th hearing, and that Edison intends to set something up with ESPs prior to that hearing.
Fielder is also the point person on "getting ESPs paid" and intends to initiate settlement discussions with ESPs week after next.
It was very clear from the conversation that Edison is going to do everything possible (at the expense of creditors) to maximize headroom under the settlement it struck with the PUC a few weeks ago.  Edison's stalemate with the QFs is evidence of it.  We shouldn't assume anything different with the Negative CTC issue.

If you have any questions, let us know.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  We're happy but Marianna is extremely sick - all day.

Enron could see $10 easily.  It's very bad!!!!!

Jim

Hadn't heard. That's great. Pass along my best to Marianna.

I had a feeling that the furthest northeast you would be moving is to
Kingwood.

When is the bloodletting going to stop?

We (Marianna and I) decided that with the new baby on the way - not sure if
you knew this - that now wasn't the time to head to DC.  Although with the
stock price and company in shambles, maybe it would be a more
"conservative" bet.

Hope you're doing well.

Jim

    -----Original Message-----
   Did you ever follow up with the DOE opportunity?

David -

You should contact Mike Smith in EES legal.  He is the one to respond to this allegation.  My fax is 713-646-8160.

Jim

Jim,
First let me introduce myself.  I work for Mark Courtney and manage the Enron Direct Mid Market gas group in Long Beach, CA.  Mark suggested I contact you regarding the following issue:

We have received a letter from the above mentioned customer complaining that they were misled during contract negotiations and that resulted in them signing a contract with prices that are much too high.  I am contacting you because in this letter they make reference to contacting the FERC 'to investigate possible manipulation of the natural gas market'.  Paul Darmitzel in legal is reviewing the letter and drafting a response to this letter.

Since I only have a hard copy of the letter I need your fax number.  Please advise if you have any questions regarding this matter.

Thanks,
David Hensel
Director - Enron Direct West

Agreed.  Need to talk this morning about our exposures.

Jim

You are right, but Jeff was much quicker to point out my error.  Might I be distracted by everything going on around me??

Wanda

I know that SCE is taking this position.  They are simple wrong.  Unless and until we get all of our "positive" CTC back from the Utility, why should I even begin to consider their "goofy" arguments.  In addition, SCE is receiving $3.3 B which is a full payment of all Negative CTC.  If their issue is to have a Undercollection charge against all customers, that's a different policy matter.  The CPUC agreed to the idea of Negative CTC and SCE needs to pay.  

Also, if we are 5% of load and the Undercollection is $3.3 B, I think that SCE would be looking for $165 MM - our entire claim.  They aren't talking about 5% from our view $150 MM claim.

Jim

Need to think about it a bit.  Here's some of what we know based on the settlement:

Total debt = 6.35 B
After they contribute all cash on their books and agree to eat a little, the PUC is allowing them to collect somewhere between $3.0-3.3B--depends on who you talk to.
The total owed to ESPs is $243 MM.

Jeff,

Do we know how much Edison's total under collection is?  Would it be as simple as to determine their total (around $3 billion?) and  gross receivable (before any payments - 145 million) and calculate the % (around 5%)?  This would result in a pretty small percentage.  Another way to look at it would be on a % of load basis.  If you use the DA load information Sue forwarded to us on October 1st,   this % (5.7%)  would also be very small.  How do you think they will look at it?  I think we would all agree to a 5% haircut, if they would JUST PAY US!

Wanda

Wanda:  I faxed the examples that Edison faxed us and that you and Michael and I talked about some time back.  I'm sure that's how Edison would calculate it.  Does it make sense to run the numbers and see what our "contribution" to Edison's undercollection would be under Edison's view?  If you need another copy, let me know.  Question:  I don't know what our book looks like on this issue, but if we were to take the "netting" through a reduction in the PX credit going forward, how much of a hit would that be, particularly if we were to get the $120 MM up front?

Best,
Jeff

Jeff --

How would we calculate EES' "contribution" to SCE undercollection?

Jim

I talked to John Fielder (SVP Edison) about setting up a meeting for Barry Tycholiz with Edison's CFO about hedging Edison's QF price risk. Fielder wanted to talk about the negative CTC issue. Here's what he said:

They plan to "settle" with the ESPs and pay them when they pay everyone else, which he re-iterated would be sometime in Q1'02.
Edison is holding firm to the notion that the negative CTC contributed to the utility's undercollection and that the ESP's share of the undercollection has to be netted against the payables attributable to the negative CTC and owed the ESP.
He said that they will propose to net it out in one of two ways:  1) lump sum netting (i.e., if they owe $50MM and the share of the undercollection is $30 MM, then they pay the ESP $20 MM; or 2) future reductions in PX Credit (i.e., they pay the ESP $50 MM, and then reduce the PX going forward until the $30 MM is paid down).  The numbers are illustrative only.
In addition, he said that they have the view that a decision is going to have to be made about 1) whether DA customers pay for stranded costs tied to the DWR L-T contracts, and 2) whether DA customers pay going forward for stranded costs tied to the QF contracts.  (Edison is clearly lobbying the PUC to get DA customers to pay for these costs.)
I recommended strongly that he de-link issues 1 and 2 above from the issue of paying us ASAP what they owe us for negative CTC.  He agreed.
He said that the PUC judge's recently issued pre-hearing conference order requires that Edison "meet and confer" with ESPs prior to the Nov. 7th hearing, and that Edison intends to set something up with ESPs prior to that hearing.
Fielder is also the point person on "getting ESPs paid" and intends to initiate settlement discussions with ESPs week after next.
It was very clear from the conversation that Edison is going to do everything possible (at the expense of creditors) to maximize headroom under the settlement it struck with the PUC a few weeks ago.  Edison's stalemate with the QFs is evidence of it.  We shouldn't assume anything different with the Negative CTC issue.

If you have any questions, let us know.

Best,
Jeff

Bill --

Steve Kean needs to talk with some analysts today about our CA exposures.  Can you send me your most recent information on our wholesale and Negative CTC exposures as soon as possible?  Call me with questions.

Jim

FERC today issued an Initial Decision in the hearing in the Transwestern case concerning several negotiated rate agreements to which Indicated Shippers and the CPUC had raised objections.  Briefly, the Judge ruled that Transwestern had not exercised market power and that the capacity was advertised and awarded in accordance with Transwestern's tariff.  However, Transwestern must modify its tariff to add a separate provision where all the posting, bidding and award procedures for purposes of awarding capacity are clearly stated.  A highlighted copy of the ruling is attached for your information.

 

Christi's call.

	Christi has asked me to schedule the above meeting/conference call.  September 11th (p.m.) seems to be the best date.  Question:  Does this meeting need to be a 1/2 day meeting?  Christi and I were wondering.

	Give us your thoughts.

Wade --

Attached are some additions.  Looks fine.  Mary Lynne Ruffer has the most recent Negative CTC numbers (my understanding is $405MM for PG&E and $100MM for SCE as of today).

Jim

 

Here is my draft answer to the questions posed by one of the banks.  I am still chasing down some data, but wanted the group editing with me.  Would you please review ASAP so I can get up to Wes.  Keep in mind, these are the responses to Jeff M., not necessarily what they should or will share with the bank.  I think we should give them all the data points and let them judge what is disclosed.

1.  What effect of global slow down?  We believe that the current economic environment provides a good opportunity for RES given customers' desires to reduce/fix their exposure to commodity price volatility and meet budget and liquidity needs.

2.  How much of new business is tied to customer capital investment? To be sure we address the intent of this question we have three types of capital investment (i) Expenditures by customers - no new origination activity is contingent on customer capital expenditures (ii) RES internal capital expenditures - the only internal capital expenditures are approximately $10-15MM in Q4 2001 and $60MM in 2002 in IT capital expenditures (iii) We have, as part of our PRM Liability, forecasted expenditures for equipment at existing customer locations as part of our Demand Side Management (DSM) business.  For the next six months these expenditures total $______.   If not spent on schedule we would "lose" PRM asset value of approximately $____MM from loss of savings to be generated from these investments.

3.  What effect on business of CA decision to terminate retail access? Although unable to initiate new contracts within California, we believe that the renewal of existing contracts within Califonia will offset any losses experienced in that market and with the anticipated market openings across North America (especially Texas and Ontario in early 2002) there will be no negative impact to RES' growth.  Excluding California, approximately 26% of the retail electric market is open representing a total market size of approximately $56.1 billion.

4.  What is impact if order made retroactive? None, all contracts put in place have change of law provisions with liquidated damage language to protect RES' exposures.

5. What effect does slowing electric deregulation have? The pace of deregulation across the United States is uneven, however planned openings in 2001-2003 are adequate to meet RES near-term goals.  The California crises has increased customers' urgency in the marketplace and has reduced RES' customer acquisition costs.  Continued deregulation is important to our long-term strategy.  To counter the effect of the slowdown we have increased our product offering of Demand Side Management activities which bring value to RES and our customers in regulated environments.  

6.  What is credit exposure to utilities, PX, ISO - if still can't get numbers is exposure changing, what about Retail direct access credit receivables.  What of ENE's $580 in receivables is "Allowable" - how much is contested?  We currently have approximately $_____ MM in "PX" receivable from utilities ($____ MM from PG&E and $_____ MM from SCE).  EPMI has a $____MM receivable from the California ISO.  PG&E is contesting $_____MM of our recorded receivable and SCE is contesting $____MM.  We have a total reserve of $_____MM established for these items. 

Linda --

Please put on my calendar that I will not travel or go out of town for all of May 2002.  I will be in Houston during this period.

Thanks

Craig --

As we discussed yesterday, we would be very interested in a memo outlining a work product that would document the cost/benefit of RTOs.  If you have any questions, please don't hesitate to call me at 713-853-7673.

Thanks.

Jim

Sue -

Received your voice mail.  Having AReM only file is ok with me.  Spoke with Lamar Frazier - Jeremy sounds worried.  Let's make sure that the contract question is vetted with internal and external lawyers - agree not to give CPUC any info.

Thanks,

Jim

FYI.  You may want to send out to RTO team.

Jim

As discussed on the Power Marketers conference call, attached is the final consolidated version of the 'Bare Essentials' handouts from FERC RTO Week.

 - bare essentials.doc 

Thanks.

Will do.

Sue -

Received your voice mail.  Having AReM only file is ok with me.  Spoke with Lamar Frazier - Jeremy sounds worried.  Let's make sure that the contract question is vetted with internal and external lawyers - agree not to give CPUC any info.

Thanks,

Jim

Jeremy --

To let you know where we stand on the CPUC's Investigation on DA Suspension.  

1.	Sue Mara is leading the effort to respond to the CPUC for Enron.

2.	We knew that the CPUC was at a minimum going to investigate how and/or whether to allow extensions of contracts and the application of other surcharge $$ to DA load given their earlier statements.  The issue on retroactivity is open primarily because they can ask these questions and (I believe) as leverage for other issues.

3.	We are coordinating with the big customers who recently left.  They are marshalling forces to oppose any retroactivity.  This is as much their fight as it is ours.

4.	At this time, Enron will file as a member of AReM.  We intend to oppose the CPUC's request for our contracts and transaction information.

If you want any other info or want to discuss further, let me know.

Jim

Vince --

I see that you are on the panel on market monitoring.  Dave Perrino and Alan Comnes are following the issue for Enron in the Western power markets as RTOs are formed.  It may make sense for some people from Govt Affairs to talk with you to discuss current issues and focus of FERC and others?  If we can get together, please let me know a good time.

Also, the attached paper from EPSA on Market Monitoring is something we support through our trade association.

Thanks,

Jim
Here's the EPSA MM white paper.

I will send the workshop announcement to Julie Simon and Erin P at EPSA.  They really ought to get on a panel.

 
Yes I know Vince and I think one of you should call him to chat before the workshop.  Either Jim or I should probably be on the call.  Thanks.

To All,

Below is the announcement of a Market Monitoring workshop to be held in San Francisco on November 16.  There is a fee to attend of $50.00.  The scope of the meeting is to discuss market monitoring in the west.  The workshop is hosted by the CAISO and co-sponsored by RTO West and WestConnect.  I am planning on attending and I'm guessing Alan and Sue will want to attend as well.  You'll see on the agenda, that the friend of the market - Anjali Sheffrin is on the first panel, so expect an action packed day!  And our own Vince Kaminsky is on panel 3 (Christi, do you know Vince and should we check with him on any positions we have?).

Kind Regards,

Dave

Subscription Option #1 -- Document Distribution Mailing List

APPENDICES DOCUMENTS:

WESTERN MARKET MONITORING WORKSHOP
Attached is an invitation and draft agenda for a Market Monitoring workshop
to be held on November 16, 2001 and brought to you, in part, by WestConnect.
This is your opportunity to be involved in discussions relating to market
monitoring in the West.

NOTE:  If you have difficulty opening the attached documents from this
e-mail, save them to your hard drive first and then open them from Word.

QUESTIONS?
...About a document?  Please send and email to:
docadministrator@dstarnet.com <mailto:docadministrator@dstarnet.com>
<<mailto:docadministrator@dstarnet.com>>.
...About your subscription to this mailing list?  Please email:
listmanager@dstarnet.com <mailto:listmanager@dstarnet.com>
<<mailto:listmanager@dstarnet.com>>.

WANT TO UNSUBSCRIBE?
Please send a blank email to:  dstarwdoc-request@dstarnet.com
<mailto:dstarwdoc-request@dstarnet.com> and type the word "Unsubscribe"
into the subject line.

Thank you.

<http://www.dstarnet.com>

 - Invitation to 11-16-01 Market Monitoring Workshop 10-23-01.doc << File: Invitation to 11-16-01 Market Monitoring Workshop 10-23-01.doc >> 
 - Agenda for 11-16-01 Market Monitoring Workshop 10-23-01.doc << File: Agenda for 11-16-01 Market Monitoring Workshop 10-23-01.doc >> 

Steve --

What's up??

Jim

FYI, Pennsylvania LDC issues with the PUC are handled through Steve Montovano's group, but I don't know which of his people has primary responsibility.  

FYI...

Marde,

Pennsylvaina is not part of my region.  I have forwarded this on to see if I can get you the info you need.

Janine

Janine:  Was anyone in regulatory involved with this?  We found out this was coming last week at the CPA Shipper meeting.  This is going to cause a curve shift which could have been minimized had we known it was coming.  Thanks!  mde

Josh,

Please make sure you are on Shirley's mailing list, I didn't see your name listed.

Thanks

The following notice was posted on the Nominations Electronic Bulletin
Board today:

On October 12, 2001 the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission approved
Columbia's tariff filing to become effective on October 22, 2001, subject
to an Administrative Law Judge Recommendation.  This tariff filing includes
several changes that may be important to suppliers, such as changes in
Columbia's banking and balancing service, introduction of a new Flow Order
Management Service, and a new Imbalance Trading Service.

The full text of Columbia's original tariff proposals, as filed with the PA
Public Utility Commission on August 22, 2001, can be accessed at the
following site:

                                     h
ttp://www.columbiagaspamd.com/products_services/tariff_revisions_effective_oct.htm

Shippers serving aggregation pools on the Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania,
Inc. system should carefully review Columbia's new Elective Balancing
Service (proposed tariff pages 164 - 169) and choose one of the three
balancing service options for each aggregation pool.  Also, suppliers who
have been designated as an authorized agent for non-aggregated customers
may choose an elective balancing option on behalf of those customers.
Columbia's current estimated rate for Option 1, Full Balancing Service, is
as follows:

SGS, SDS Customers  $0.20/Mcf
LDS, MLS  Customers $0.10/Mcf

Please note that Columbia's interruptible banking and balancing service
will no longer be available.  The cost for the interruptible service
($0.1109/Mcf for SGS and SDS, and $0.0358 for LDS and MLS) will be removed
from customers' distribution rates when the new Elective Balancing Services
become effective.

Under the newly approved Elective Balancing Service (Rider EBS), customers
or their authorized agents are given 20 days in which to elect their
service option.  Customers or their authorized agents who do not elect one
of the three Elective Balancing Service options on or before November 12,
2001 will default to Option 1, Full Balancing Service.  Columbia will post
final rates for Rider EBS Option 1 by the close of business on November 15,
2001.  If the final rates exceed the above estimated rates by more than
20%, customers or their authorized agents who have elected Option 1 may
change their election by submitting a change to Columbia in writing  by the
close of business on November 20, 2001.  Columbia will begin providing
service under the elected option as of December 1, 2001.

A form for the election of Rider EBS options will be e-mailed to the
"notices" contact person for each supplier that is active on the Columbia
Gas of Pennsylvania systemwhen it is available.

Please contact your Columbia Gas of Pennsylvania, Inc. representative at
412-572-7117 with any questions relating to these new services.

Attached are the forms and a brief outline of the changes.

(See attached file: EBS & FOMS forms.doc)
Shirley

Here are my thoughts.  Use as you see fit.

Jim

 

A working draft for your comments.  Please do not distribute.

 << File: ENRONprinciples10-01.doc >> 

Lamar --

It is critical that every customer in California that switched (signed new or renewal customer) during this year.  We need a contact person for each account.  The key to securing a better date is to have the customers push the Governor and the Legislature and the CPUC.

We are able to provide phone numbers and contacts through our trade groups.

Jim

Let me know.  I'd talk with APS just to find out more details.  If we do, let's take Dave Perrino our wholesale guy to also talk about RTOs.

Jim

Let me cogitate on this.  The local counsel we use on electric matters is more of a gas attorney than an electric one, and the counsel we use for the SW Gas matters is also APS's counsel so he can't help us on these matters.  The customers are no allies, since they are happy with their deal, and the only other marketer who was active in the settlement is gone now (the internet marketer from California).  Perhaps we could talk to APS to see what they are thinking.  That might be more enlightening than anything else.  Just a thought.

I would think that we should take the time to talk with local counsel or other "allies" to get a feel for the chances in AZ.  I also think that the difficulty in AZ will be a physical problem with getting transmission service - no RTO.

It would be great to have a thorough analysis of problems in every open market just to know what the issues are.

Jim

I have received 2 calls in the last two days from EES and ENA (Lance Hinricks and David Porter) wanting to know the details of AZ electric marketing.  They are apparently revisiting things there.  So here is my reaction to the APS filing, which I had not heard about.

It is my recollection that the spin off is part of the entire-ball-of-wax settlement approved by the ACC for the APS restructuring in 10/99.  Therefore they must have filed to reopen this settlement (which was not to be allowed, of course).  The settlement, while "opening" markets, effectively keeps them closed for lack of headroom until 7/04 at the earliest.  So, if there is a commercial interest in AZ, then this filing could give us a chance to jump back in and make the arguments we made back in 99 that the settlement would not result in competition (and it didn't - time has proved us 100% correct on that) and if APS wants to change the settlement, then the non-competitive terms should be amended as well.

That said, we do not get a great reception in AZ, and it is hard to say we would have any great chance of success.  The large customers do not mind that there is no competition because they have been on a mandated rate reduction path and saw none of the price run-ups that Californians and other westerners saw last winter (at least not yet).  We would have no one on our side.  

SO, it is an opening, but I would let the commercial folks tell us how much it is worth to them, given the less than great odds.

Is this something in which you think we should be engaged?

No.  Talk with Pat Keene and/or Leslie Lawner.  We haven't done much on Arizona lately.

Jim

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Some more information would be nice.  These seem low.

Jim

The back out credits are set at 0.5 mills per kWh for S.C. 13 customers (industrial); 2.0 mills per kWh for S.C. 3 customers (large commercial); 3.0 mills per kWh for S.C. 2 demand customers (small commercial); and 4 mills per kWh for S.C. 2 non-demand, S.C. 6 and S.C. 1 customers (residential).  Theses back out credits will be in effect until the completion of the Unbundling Proceeding where at that time the credits determined from that proceeding will supercede the above credits. 

As for improvement in the market, are you referring to the retail market? If so, I think EES will be able to start marketing in CH territory because not only are we eligible for back out credits, all customers (including retail access customers) are entitled to benefits from the transition power agreement (TPA) with Dynegy and the purchase power agreement (PPA) with Constellation.  If you are interested, I'm happy to summarized the mechanics of how all customers receive those benefits but I don't want to bog you down with unnecessary details unless requested.
  

Great job.  

What are the back out rates for CH going forward?  Any improvement in the market?

Jim

Good news on a dismal day... The New York State Public Service Commission today voted
to approve the joint settlement in the Central Hudson Rate Case.  See the attached press release.  Please contact me with any questions.

 << File: CH Press Release.pdf >> 
Kathleen A. Sullivan
Manager, Regulatory and Government Affairs
ENRON
713.345.7304 direct
713.306.8498 cell
kathleen.sullivan@enron.com

Agreed.

Jim

I propose that we agree on a number in a confidential side letter with SCE and not include it in the publicly-available stip.

We have not made public the SCE amount (as far as I'm aware).  We need to make sure that IR is in the loop - I think that Mark Koenig is following this issue.

Jim

Have we disclosed the $125 million SCE number in any other filing that you can recall that is public.  At the FERC maybe?  We are considering including it in our stip to be filed at the CPUC.  Peggy, would this be a problem?

If made to choose, I'm for Option a) below.

Jim

Good mark ups.  Thanks.
Originally, I purposely excluded acknowledging the need for a forum to develop non-physical/pure financial standards.  I was not sure if this was an issue we could win buy-in from other marketers that NERC establish business practices.

However, on the EPSA-NAERO Working Group conference call today, one member suggested we alert NERC and FERC to the fact that "business practices" have the hardest impact on the marketers and IPPs.  And if NERC is going there - then the likes of EPSA and ELCON become the major staekholders in that forum.  I think this is a great twist to the old "reliablity first approach" of NERC  and can give us major leverage.  I will bolster this point in the write-up.

EPSA will draft a letter to be sent to Mike Gent explaining what EPSA members support.  It will be based upon a "checklist" of issues similar to this write-up.  I would like to get this write-up into Mark Bennett's hands to incorporate into the letter and see if other EPSA members can support it.  We may still want to send this write-up directly to Dave Nevius and Mike Gent since, they approached us directly.

Additionally, EPSA members agreed that we should continue the parallel development of EISB and NERC.  But - take an active role in the formation of the 4th quadrant of EISB.  DOE has offered to host a forum for an industry effort to kick-start the 4th quadrant.  Mark Bennett has been talking with Rae McQuade at GISB and she told him that NERC, as an organization, cannot be folded under the EISB umbrella.  FERC would have liked such a simple solution, they want the expertise/experience of NERC - and the fair process of GISB.  So, the challenge is 
a) migrate the NERC expertise into the EISB, or
b) transform the NERC structure into an EISB like structure

NERC is proceeding at Warp Factor 10 in making a transition into the new One-Stop Shop. EPSA members believe that NERC leading this charge will certainly result in the marketers geting the short endf as we did with the Blue Ribbon Panel of a few years ago.  EPSA members want an open and inclusive forum for shaping the new organization.  That is the justification for participating in the DOE sponsored forum - to challenge NERC leading this charge.  This concern will also be expressed in the EPSA letter.

Some additional comments to Jim's.

 << File: Enron Principles on New SSO1 - AJR.doc >> 
Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Here are my thoughts.  Use as you see fit.

Jim

 << File: Enron Principles on New SSO.doc >> 

A working draft for your comments.  Please do not distribute.

 << File: ENRONprinciples10-01.doc >> 

Thanks.

I sent to Kevin the names forwarded to us from Paul for possible panelists from Western governors' offices for FERC's November 2 Energy Infrastructure conference in Seattle.  From the financial community, I sent him the name of Leonard Hyman.  Andy Vesey (the person on Jim's Barton subcommittee panel) suggested Leonard as a possible speaker.  I also spoke with Margaret Morgan (Price Waterhouse and and an EPSA member) to see if she has any ideas, and she too suggested Leonard.  She says Leonard is very knowledgeable about California issues and would be a good speaker.  Margaret is checking with colleagues to see if they have any other recommendations.  I'll keep you posted.
 
Sarah
 
 
Thanks, I have staff calling Snezak. Will wait to hear from you on financial folks.

>>> "Novosel, Sarah" <Sarah.Novosel@ENRON.com> 10/24/01 05:32PM >>>
Kevin:

It was good to meet you yesterday.  I decided to watch the Commission
meeting on television so I wasn't at FERC today, but I wanted to pass on
this information to you about possible panelists for the November 2
Infrastructure Meeting in Seattle.

From Governor Geringer's office, a staff level person is Steve Reynolds
(Wyoming Business Council, also staffs the Wyoming Energy Council).  

    His contact information:  (307) 777-2841.  sreyno@state.wy.us.
Steve is great, pro-RTO, pro-economic development.  

Lt. Governor Ohs (Montana) or Steve Snezak.  The Lt. Governor runs
Economic Development for the State.  

    Steve is the Lt. Gov.'s Chief Policy Aide.  406.444.3111.   

    Both Wyoming and Montana are pro-RTO.  

Other options:  Governor Leavitt is pro-infrastructure development, but
probably not a strong RTO supporter.  

        Jeff Burke (State of Utah Energy Office) is probably the
contact in Utah for this matter if you want a staff person.  

        His contact information is:  (801) 538-5428.
nroerp.jburks@state.ut.us

We are still looking for names to represent the financial industry.  I
will let you know what we find out.  Please let me know if you have
questions.

Sarah

Sarah Novosel
Senior Director, Federal Regulatory Affairs
Enron Corp.

(202) 466-9160
sarah.novosel@enron.com

Thanks for moving ahead.

Jim

I can ask our Phoenix counsel if he can set up a meeting or give us an idea who can.  The head of APS transmission is an attorney (who actually represented us for a brief moment) who left Snell and Wilmer in June.  I can call him as well.  Dave, what does your schedule look like?

Let me know.  I'd talk with APS just to find out more details.  If we do, let's take Dave Perrino our wholesale guy to also talk about RTOs.

Jim

Let me cogitate on this.  The local counsel we use on electric matters is more of a gas attorney than an electric one, and the counsel we use for the SW Gas matters is also APS's counsel so he can't help us on these matters.  The customers are no allies, since they are happy with their deal, and the only other marketer who was active in the settlement is gone now (the internet marketer from California).  Perhaps we could talk to APS to see what they are thinking.  That might be more enlightening than anything else.  Just a thought.

I would think that we should take the time to talk with local counsel or other "allies" to get a feel for the chances in AZ.  I also think that the difficulty in AZ will be a physical problem with getting transmission service - no RTO.

It would be great to have a thorough analysis of problems in every open market just to know what the issues are.

Jim

I have received 2 calls in the last two days from EES and ENA (Lance Hinricks and David Porter) wanting to know the details of AZ electric marketing.  They are apparently revisiting things there.  So here is my reaction to the APS filing, which I had not heard about.

It is my recollection that the spin off is part of the entire-ball-of-wax settlement approved by the ACC for the APS restructuring in 10/99.  Therefore they must have filed to reopen this settlement (which was not to be allowed, of course).  The settlement, while "opening" markets, effectively keeps them closed for lack of headroom until 7/04 at the earliest.  So, if there is a commercial interest in AZ, then this filing could give us a chance to jump back in and make the arguments we made back in 99 that the settlement would not result in competition (and it didn't - time has proved us 100% correct on that) and if APS wants to change the settlement, then the non-competitive terms should be amended as well.

That said, we do not get a great reception in AZ, and it is hard to say we would have any great chance of success.  The large customers do not mind that there is no competition because they have been on a mandated rate reduction path and saw none of the price run-ups that Californians and other westerners saw last winter (at least not yet).  We would have no one on our side.  

SO, it is an opening, but I would let the commercial folks tell us how much it is worth to them, given the less than great odds.

Is this something in which you think we should be engaged?

No.  Talk with Pat Keene and/or Leslie Lawner.  We haven't done much on Arizona lately.

Jim

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Agreed.  Pls make sure the PUCT understands this.

Jim

It makes a lot of sense

LM

SPP is joining MISO and today MISO said that the merger should be filed at FERC 1Q02.  MISO also told FERC that the same congestion management systems would be used in SPP/MISO, so no seams.  Since MISO is moving toward the market design we want, then really it seems that SPP should be implementing the MISO system for Day1 (which may well be up 12/15/01) and should be right in line with MISO on Day 2 issues (that we like).

However, FERC should not approve SPP as an RTO until it is in with MISO.  I don't see that FERC needs to approve SPP as an RTO in order to allow SPP to finish work on a wholesale energy system because presumably SPP will be using MISO's system.  This summer FERC told SPP to not spend more $ since it was not an RTO yet and it was going off on its own merry way.  Therefore, FERC could say "use MISO's system and specify exactly the minimum that needs to be done on systems in order to have the TX retail settlements done.  This should be done consistent with the no seams, as represented by MISO."  That should satisfy Texas PUC concerns.

Jim

My feeling is that FERC is not going to change its RTO plans because of this possible interference from the Texas PUC

A possible scenario is SPP to ask permission to continue the implemantation of a new settlement and congestion management system. A good point for internal discussion is: To what extent  we want to oppose to those changes ? (which seem to be aligned to our recommendations, but those may imply additional SPP resources)

Christi - What do you think?

Luiz -

I would like to schedule a phone call with Nick and the PUCT staff to understand the implication of this...  Maybe he isn't asking for too much, but let's get some clarity before we say anything at FERC.

Can you please set something up with you, Christi, Jean and me for Friday pm and then we'll go outside next week??

Jim

Jim

You were right. SPP is going to use this episode as a lever to be "promoted" to an RTO. 

Texas is recommending three steps to introduce competition at Texas-SPP. One is described as follows:

*	Support the SPP's efforts to begin wholesale market operations: Mr. Brown, Vice President of SPP, testified that SPP can begin wholesale market operations and complete systems testing by April 1, 2002. He has requested that the SPP Board approve his recommendation to start to wholesale market operations. This Commission should support that process by:

-	Requesting in writing that the SPP Board begin wholesale operations as soon as possible with a target date of completing systems testing by April 1, 2002.
-	Advising FERC of the need to support SPP wholesale market operations. While Mr. Brown testified that the recent July and September Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) orders regarding SPP's start up expenditures will not impede SPP from implementing wholesale market operations, this Commission should advise FERC that the findings from our hearing show the need for FERC to fully support SPP wholesale operations startup. 

Will do.

FYI. Please keep me posted as we hear from clients.

Jim, Sue and Jeff, please distribute any and all updates on this topic to: Angela, Michael, Lamar, David and Greg as they each own clients effected any actions. 

Thanks, Jeremy

 Sent:	Thursday, October 25, 2001 1:35 PM
Jeremy --

To let you know where we stand on the CPUC's Investigation on DA Suspension.  

1.	Sue Mara is leading the effort to respond to the CPUC for Enron.

2.	We knew that the CPUC was at a minimum going to investigate how and/or whether to allow extensions of contracts and the application of other surcharge $$ to DA load given their earlier statements.  The issue on retroactivity is open primarily because they can ask these questions and (I believe) as leverage for other issues.

3.	We are coordinating with the big customers who recently left.  They are marshalling forces to oppose any retroactivity.  This is as much their fight as it is ours.

4.	At this time, Enron will file as a member of AReM.  We intend to oppose the CPUC's request for our contracts and transaction information.

If you want any other info or want to discuss further, let me know.

Jim

What record will FERC file today???  This is crazy.  Ray please call me whe=
n you get in.

Jim

Ray - it seems highly likely the court will allow FERC to proceed w/ rehear=
ing.  In any case, I doubt an adverse ruling would affect the PNW case as t=
he 7/25 order simply announced the new proceeding. =20

OK, here are the facts as I understand them:  The CPUC filed petitions for =
review of the FERC's various refund orders in the Ninth Circuit Court of Ap=
peals. There is an unresolved jurisdictional issue that the petitions filed=
 in the Ninth Circuit are incurably premature because they sought review of=
 orders for which the petitioner was also requesting rehearing.  The curren=
t status of the CPUC's Ninth Circuit petitions is that the court has not ye=
t dismissed the petitions as premature and FERC must file the record in the=
 Ninth tomorrow, October 26.  At that point, under Section 313 of the Feder=
al Power Act, the jurisdiction of the court of appeals becomes exclusive, a=
nd  FERC will not be able to modify the orders under review except by leave=
 of the court.  FERC has filed, and the CPUC is supporting, a motion for an=
 order permitting FERC to keep jurisdiction over its orders so that it can =
act on the pending rehearing requests.  By all rights, the court should go =
along with this, but it's gone on this long.  We are not adversely impacted=
.  Arguably if FERC loses jurisdiction, the PNW and CA refund cases should =
come to a complete stop, although this is an unlikely scenario.  I will kee=
p you posted of new developments.  Ray

Who at Reliant said this???  I'd let them go forward and we'll do our own.

Jim

Marchris said that Reliant is going to do an RTO cost benefit study for the SE.  I have not contacted Reliant.

We may want to think about whether we continue to do our own or consider going in with Reliant.

Looks like we need to make sure that this NERC / RTO policy dispute gets identified and recognized as what it is - discrimination.

Jim

The current Grid South/ARTO/MISO/SPP scheduling model moves only limited types of transactions to the RTO.  That is those schedules that are for "through" transactions.  If a schedule starts or stops (source/sink) within an existing control area - that control area retains the ability to approve/deny the tag (the bastards!).  Only if the control area is "in the middle" or an intermediary control area in the transaction path will they not have to approve the tags.  What then is the value of the RTO other than a tariff coordinator?  My view is that control areas should relinquish all tag approval rights AND OASIS approval rights to the RTO.  They will argue that the telemetry and analysis tools is not at the RTO to do this. So - why not?

At a meeting Thursday to finalize the waiver for NERC approval, their arguments ran into a stumbling block.  Policy 3 requires that source and sink control areas must communicate directly to coordinate TLR.  Rather than seeking an exception to doing this - they all felt it best to maintain this responsibility at the source and sink control area and not assign it to the RTO Scheduling Agent.  With approvals and curtailments kept at the control area level, this jeopardizes independent judgment.

Charles --

If the RTO has the Interchange function, what else is needed for "virtual" consolidation?

Jim

Hello  SE RTO folks

I know you all have a ton and half things going on - but I would like for you to look over the attached proposal that will be a waiver for existing control areas to assign certain control area functions over to a central RTO operator.  This waiver was originally intended for Grid South but since has expanded to include Alliance, SPP, MISO.  The purpose of the waiver is to allow for the continued existence of individual utility based control areas within an RTO AND to fulfill the FERC Order 2000 requirement that the RTO to implement Interchange Schedules.  This may become a direct conflict with our position for consolidation of control areas.

If you don't read anything else, I advise you to at least read - Sec 2.2 Rationale - 5 brief paragraphs which outlines what the RTOs want to do.   

Since I am chairman of the NERC Subcommittee that oversees Policy 3, Enron is associated with facilitating this process.  I want those working at the settlement conferences to be aware that this is coming.  Grid South's original intent was to change sections of Policy 3 to fit their new RTO structure.  I successfully argued against doing this on the basis that NERC policy should not prescribe the Grid South scheduling process and control area structure as reliability policy - hence the waiver.

Charles Yeung
713-853-0348
 
>  RTO Scheduling Group,
>
> Attached is the latest draft of the RTO Scheduling Waiver sent to the
> group by Paul Sorenson on Friday, August 24.  Please provide comments
> to Gordon Scott by 12 noon EDT tomorrow on the document and any items
> for the agenda.  I will combine the comments, including those from
> NERC staff, and send the combined comments to the group for Thursday's
> meeting.  An agenda will also be attached.  The meeting announcement
> is attached.  If you plan to attend, and have not let me or Barbara
> Bogenrief know, please do so.
>
> Thanks, Gordon.
> 		 <<Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc>>
>  <<RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc>>
> 		
 - Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc << File: Waiver Request-08-24-2001 Draft 2 from Sorenson.doc >> 
 - RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc << File: RTO Scheduling Group Meeting Announcement August 30 Chicago.doc >> 

Guillermo --

I should sign the letter.  Also, we should be consistent on affiliates given EPMI and Enron Gas Mktg.  We are affiliates of a pipeline.  We offer competitive services on the affiliated pipelines.  Let's be consistent with our own business.

When are you going to send the letter?

Jim

Attached is a first draft of comments to CAEM about the Disco of the future document to discuss in our 4pm meeting.
The idea is to comment just the top 5 issues.
Regards,
Guillermo

 << File: n-distco future.doc >> 

Sarah --

Do we need to replace Tom on the Reg Project list??

Jim

What did we do on this??

Jim

Do we have any interest in addressing this within Government Affairs?

Dear Rick:

As a follow-up to my voicemail message today just before 5PM, I am sending this email with additional details, including a track of earlier descriptive communications.

Please advise regarding the specific request for legal assistance addressing the Florida Sunshine laws.  Please let me know if you would address the request, or if we should proceed with local Florida counsel.

As additional background, Mike Nelson, VP under Phil Lowry,  is heading an initiative for security of the ETS related pipelines.  Enron Corp. security personnel are also participating as a service to ETS.

Selected communications on this matter will be held as confidential.  

Thank you.

Richard Melton
Senior Counsel
ETS Legal
x52555
Dear Mike:

The email you forwarded from Rob Wilson included the following request:

	"A side item- beyond the committees interest in hearing from our security personnel, Sue has asked if  an attorney in our 	group could assist her in drafting language, if needed, to provide exemptions/protections to FL sunshine laws regarding 	security related documents."

In discussions with Lou and Colleen, we concluded that I would check with Rick Shapiro, Counsel for Legislative Affairs, to address the request.  Alternatively, we can seek assistance from local Florida counsel (e.g. Ann Longman in Tallahassee FL).  

I will let you know what develops soon.

Also, I understand that Rob Wilson is Manager of Regional Governmental Affairs in Tallahassee.  He mentioned that he had a prepared presentation that he had already used. Perhaps we should consider asking him to begin routing written matters on security through you and me for the time being.  Please ask him for a copy of the presentation before the conference call.  I assume we will meet in advance of the 10/24 call too.

Thank you.

Richard

I would like Kyle, David Johnson, Rick Craig, Richard Melton, and I to attend the conf call on the 24th. We'll figure out who can / should attend.

Mike,

Richard Hixson, House staff and Sue  Skelton, Senate staff have requested a meeting w/ our security rep. on the 24th. I suggested a conference call, since the same individual will be the presenter on the 26th. A time has not been established for the call. The conference call would include Sue, Richard , and the House and Senate chairs of each committee, Dudley Goodlette and Ginny Brown -Waite respectively. The intent would be to brief this audience on current security practices on the pipe and initiatives we are participating in w/ other stakeholders i.e. INGAA, DOE, OPS etc... In addition, the chairs want to be aware of information we do not want to share and how to manage the committee Q and A.

 I have indicated the 26th presentation will be succinct, generic, but reassuring . We can manage the Q and A  w/ some general responses regarding our efforts w/ the Florida Law Enforcement Department and heightened state of awareness responses.

 A side item- beyond the committees interest in hearing from our security personnel, Sue has asked if  an attorney in our group could assist her in drafting language, if needed, to provide exemptions/protections to FL sunshine laws regarding security related documents. 

FYI- I have a presentation, I'll be using Monday w/ our PSC which includes bullet points on reliability and security, which should satisfy our needs for the 26th. 

This is something we can do, but it will be at a very high level in terms of specific information shared. 

I suggest we have a confernce call on this next week (or before) to 1.) determine what the Florida House and Senate is expecting, 2) who should attend, and 3.) who else is invited. 

I will be out of pocket until next Monday, but could possibly call in if the timing was right.

Mike

Mike,

This morning legislative staff asked that I arrange for the appearance of an ETS security personality to address the House and Senate committees examining FL security issues. The committees tentatively plan to meet jointly on October 26th to discuss infrastructure security. There also will be a prehearing meeting on the 25th w/ committee leadership, to discuss the presentations. 

The hearing schedule and agenda continues to be a work in progress as legislative members and staff prepare for a special session to begin on Monday. However, I wanted to alert you to the possibility of needing someone from your shop on at least the 26th. I have seen most everything we've produced to date regarding this issue and drafting a statement will be relatively straight forward. As is always the case, it is the committee Q and A where the practitioner is most helpful.

I will keep you informed of any developments, my contact numbers are 850-350-5018 office;  850-544-6938 cell; 850-668-2782 home

Rob

 

Rogers --

Harry Kingerski informed me that you and some team members were going to visit ConEd to discuss the Benchmark Rate Swap.  I think it's a great idea (Scott Gahn and I had discussed something similar a few years ago when he ran URM).  

My only thoughts for you would be: 1) maybe difficult to do the swap with the Utility (given PUC oversight), but the Holding company should be in the same place financially and should be protected from PUC scrutiny and 2) being long T&D (assuming that you don't sell 100% of the position to customers) creates interesting regulatory questions.

I'd love to sit down with you to discuss this product.

Jim

Any luck on my password??

Jim

Alert!
You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iPayit in-box that is past due.  It is critical that you login to iPayit and take immediate action to resolve this invoice.

Remember, you play an important role in ensuring that we pay our vendors on time.

Tip!:  You must login to the system to forward this invoice to another user.

To launch iPayit, click on the link below:
http://iPayit.enron.com
Note:  Your iPayit User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iPayit user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://sap.enron.com/sap_doclib/user/file_list.asp?cabinet_id=265

Need help?
North America: ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.
Europe: European Accounts Payable at +44-20-7783-7520.
Asia-Pacific: Sydney Accounts Payable at +61-2-9229-2336

Mike --

When you have the list of customers we should contact, please let me know.  I should try and get back with Ashley today.

Jim

Chip --

Did you get the chance to look at the combined company?  Just interested.  

Thanks

Dale --

Right now I'm in all of next week (although may have to travel on Thursday).

Jim

Dale -

Can you set up a meeting with Jim so we can discuss.  I think we are covered on issie #1 but I am very interested in hearing more from him on issue #2.

Thanks,
Rogers

Rogers --

Harry Kingerski informed me that you and some team members were going to visit ConEd to discuss the Benchmark Rate Swap.  I think it's a great idea (Scott Gahn and I had discussed something similar a few years ago when he ran URM).  

My only thoughts for you would be: 1) maybe difficult to do the swap with the Utility (given PUC oversight), but the Holding company should be in the same place financially and should be protected from PUC scrutiny and 2) being long T&D (assuming that you don't sell 100% of the position to customers) creates interesting regulatory questions.

I'd love to sit down with you to discuss this product.

Jim

Linda --

Pls arrange a room for a visit from Ken Malloy on Nov 6 at 8:30 am.

Thanks,

Jim

Bob --

Where do we stand on the SCE stipulation?  I want to make sure that our push in SCE doesn't conflict or contradict something we are doing in the PG&E discussions.

Can we meet today?

Jim

Great plan.

Are we discussing today at 4 DC time?

Jim

Attached for your review and any comments is a draft legislative action plan of initial steps to be taken on RTOs when Congress returns next week.  We will also be sending this draft plan to our lobbying consultants for their input and discussion at our meeting/conference call next Tuesday afternoon.  As always, your input is much appreciated.

John

 << File: DRAFT RTO LEGISLATIVE PLAN 83001.doc >> 

Susan --

Please talk with Jeff Golden and the EES Dist Generation group to get their take as well.

Thanks,

Jim

Please see the attached.  FERC has asked for preliminary comments on its proposal to adopt a standard generator interconnection agreement and procedures; the deadline for comments is December 21.  After it has considered the comments, FERC will issue a NOPR.

EPMI will participate in the Nov. 1 meeting at FERC; an update will be sent to you.  I will be taking the lead on drafting our comments.  

Please contact me if you need further information.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

Last night, FERC issued an Advanced Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANOPR) on Standardizing Generator Interconnection Agreements and Procedures.  The ANOPR incorporates the ERCOT interconnection procedures, modified by various "best practices" identified by the Commission in an attachment.  A public meeting has been scheduled for November 1st in Washington, although the notice of the meeting is not yet available.  We will forward it when it becomes available.  The ANOPR is attached.

Scott --

Any thoughts on this merger???  I would love to know how the financials would look post merger.

Charles --

My final edits.  Let's talk.  Also, please let John Shelk and Sarah look at before sending to EPSA.

Jim

 

Here is a new version of the document I plan to provide EPSA and NERC.

I wish to get this to Mark Bennett today and to Dave Nevius.

 << File: Enron Principles on New SSO ver2.doc >> 

I will let Ashley Brown know.  Do you have phone numbers for these guys?  Also, NG is willing to do a conference call late Wednesday or meeting on Thursday.  What do you think?

Jim

Jim, i suggest that the group includes Exelon (Jack Crowley), Constellation (Harvey Reed), Edison Mission Energy (Reem Fahey), Reliant (John Orr), Duke (Mike Gildea or Lee Barrett), Mirant (Jim Mayhew), PG&E (Richard Doying) and Cinergy (Dennis Flaherty).  Some of these parties may not be supportive but would appreciate being contacted (which at least opens up the communications channel for NG).  

I suggest that NG make contact with the executives rather than Enron (we need to continue to hedge our position, the old no fingerprints approach)...

cheers
Mike
Mike --

When you have the list of customers we should contact, please let me know.  I should try and get back with Ashley today.

Jim

How about 2:30 CST?  Jim

i think we've sent a markup to SCE.  i am available today and agree it would be a good idea to meet.  BTW are you available for a call today at 2 CST to discuss strategy for the mon meet and confer with SCE?

Bob --

Where do we stand on the SCE stipulation?  I want to make sure that our push in SCE doesn't conflict or contradict something we are doing in the PG&E discussions.

Can we meet today?

Jim

Sounds good.  Should we put out a note through Ginger that indicates the changes???

Jim

Jim:

Yes, Susan is the lead and I have a call in to her now to see if she is coming up for the conference next week.  In response to your earlier email about filling in the Team Coverage chart due to Tom Briggs' departure, this is what Linda and Rick and I talked about earlier this week (you were unable to come to the meeting because you were at the EPSA Reg Affairs meeting).

Tom was on the Standards of Conduct team and was the inside counsel writing out comments.  Leslie has agreed to write all of the comments with support on our native load position from Christi and me on an as needed basis.

Tom was the lead on the market based rate inquiry.  We put Donna on as the lead for that proceeding.  She's been following it pretty closely and is on top of the FERC process/procedure aspect of whatever needs to be done.  Alan will provide the technical consulting part (and we may need outside consulting as well) but Donna will be responsible for organizing the team and doing an initial draft of the comments (if or when we need to write comments).

Tom was on a couple of other teams, but because he was not taking a lead role, I don't think he needs to be replaced.

Let me know what you think.

Sarah

Is Susan the lead??

Jim

Last night, FERC issued an Advanced Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANOPR) on Standardizing Generator Interconnection Agreements and Procedures.  The ANOPR incorporates the ERCOT interconnection procedures, modified by various "best practices" identified by the Commission in an attachment.  A public meeting has been scheduled for November 1st in Washington, although the notice of the meeting is not yet available.  We will forward it when it becomes available.  The ANOPR is attached.

 - rm02-1.pdf << File: rm02-1.pdf >> 

How about 2pm EST - 1pm CST?

Jim

Jim,
Julie wants to hold a conference call on Tuesday, October 30th to discuss the possibility of designing and undertaking cost-benefit analyses to support FERC's RTO policies.  She wants to have you on the call & would like to know when you would be available.  Anytime after 1:00 p.m. EST would probably be best for her.  If you could let me know ASAP I will be able to send out an email to those she thinks should be on the call.  Thanks, Jim.

Jackie Gallagher

FYI.  EPSA looks interested in undertaking a cost-benefit analysis.  As soon as I hear more, I'll give everyone the info.

Jim

Jim,
Julie wants to hold a conference call on Tuesday, October 30th to discuss the possibility of designing and undertaking cost-benefit analyses to support FERC's RTO policies.  She wants to have you on the call & would like to know when you would be available.  Anytime after 1:00 p.m. EST would probably be best for her.  If you could let me know ASAP I will be able to send out an email to those she thinks should be on the call.  Thanks, Jim.

Jackie Gallagher

Thanks.  I want you on the call.  Try to do Wednesday pm conference call.

Jim

i would prefer Wednesday (but i don't need to be on the call or meet)....numbers are:

Exelon (Jack Crowley)  6107656612
Constellation (Harvey Reed)  410 468 3480
Edison Mission Energy (Reem Fahey)  312 583 6033
Reliant (John Orr)  713 207 3490
Duke (Mike Gildea or Lee Barrett)  713 627 6519 Lee  or 713 627 5529 Mike
Mirant (Jim Mayhew)  478 579 3421
PG&E (Richard Doying) 301 280-6780
Cinergy (Dennis Flaherty)  can't find his number...let me know if you cant get it.

cheers
MR
I will let Ashley Brown know.  Do you have phone numbers for these guys?  Also, NG is willing to do a conference call late Wednesday or meeting on Thursday.  What do you think?

Jim

Jim, i suggest that the group includes Exelon (Jack Crowley), Constellation (Harvey Reed), Edison Mission Energy (Reem Fahey), Reliant (John Orr), Duke (Mike Gildea or Lee Barrett), Mirant (Jim Mayhew), PG&E (Richard Doying) and Cinergy (Dennis Flaherty).  Some of these parties may not be supportive but would appreciate being contacted (which at least opens up the communications channel for NG).  

I suggest that NG make contact with the executives rather than Enron (we need to continue to hedge our position, the old no fingerprints approach)...

cheers
Mike
Mike --

When you have the list of customers we should contact, please let me know.  I should try and get back with Ashley today.

Jim

Thanks.  We have some relationship with Trans-elect - supported Trans-elect on the NG question of managing member of ARTO.  If you want to sit down with them, let me know.

Jim

There are materials of the Trans-elect website that details the CMS purchase,  http://www.trans-elect.com/. Under a Q&A section is the following:

Q: Will Trans-Elect put the METC transmission system in an RTO?
A: Yes, in accordance with FERC requirements that all systems must join an RTO.
Q: Which RTO will Trans-Elect choose?
A: Either the Midwest Independent System Organization (MISO) or the Alliance will be selected. Trans-Elect has 40 days from the announcement to make a selection. Trans-Elect is assessing the two organizations to make a determination as to which one will best serve the interests of Michigan consumers.

Looks like there was substance to the Consumers energy rumour.  Consumers are currently part of Alliance, the fact that the new owner wanted to make a decision on RTOs suggests that they are moving to MISO (they would have looked at the ARTO structure as part of due diligence).  Will let you know when the decision is made.

regards
Mike

Linda -

Pls print attachment.

Jim

Attached for your review and any comments is a draft legislative action plan of initial steps to be taken on RTOs when Congress returns next week.  We will also be sending this draft plan to our lobbying consultants for their input and discussion at our meeting/conference call next Tuesday afternoon.  As always, your input is much appreciated.

John

 

3 is better.

Jim

We have another EPSA call scheduled at 2--  how does 3 or 3:30 EST look?

>>> <James.D.Steffes@enron.com> 10/26/01 11:55AM >>>
How about 2pm EST - 1pm CST?

Jim

    -----Original Message-----
   Jim,
   Julie wants to hold a conference call on Tuesday, October 30th to
   discuss the possibility of designing and undertaking cost-benefit
   analyses to support FERC's RTO policies.  She wants to have you on the
   call & would like to know when you would be available.  Anytime after
   1:00 p.m. EST would probably be best for her.  If you could let me know
   ASAP I will be able to send out an email to those she thinks should be
   on the call.  Thanks, Jim.

   Jackie Gallagher

Ashley -

We would prefer (given the schedules) to hold a conference call on Wednesday pm with a group of marketers/generators.  Seems like the easiest way to discuss with everyone.  It would be great to have a paper from NG earlier in the week.  

Here is our list of recommended people.  Probably best to have NG or you call to invite (rather than Enron) to highlight your interest in brokering a deal in the Midwest. 

Exelon 			(Jack Crowley)  	610 765 6612
Constellation 		(Harvey Reed)  	410 468 3480
Edison Mission Energy 	(Reem Fahey)  	312 583 6033
Reliant 			(John Orr)  	713 207 3490
Duke 				(Mike Gildea)	713 627 5529 or (Lee Barrett)  713 627 6519
Mirant 			(Jim Mayhew)  	478 579 3421
PG&E 				(Richard Doying) 	301 280-6780
Cinergy 			(Dennis Flaherty) ?????

Thanks,

Jim 

Tom --

You may at some time want to cross train on NYISO rules - especially as the region integrates.

Thanks,

Jim

Either today or Monday, I expect the NYISO to announce that it will be offering its 3-day Market Orientation Course in Houston December 11-13 at the Hyatt Regency. Enrollment will be limited to 150 people on an as-registered basis, so early registration is encouraged. The on-line registration process will be included in their announcement, which will be broadcast to the ISO's TIE list as well as put on their web site www.NYISO.com. Because Enron has previously sent people through this training course, the costs for Enron employees attending this training session will be $800.00 per person, rather than the normal $1,200.00 charge. Please feel free to contact me if you have any questions.

Dave --  Pat Keene is working on a number of issues before the NV Commission on retail access and unbundling (one thing being the implementation of DA for C&I).  Can you please reach out to him to help on some transmission issues involved in retail competition.

Thanks,

Jim

What lobbying did Enron do last year with regard to EnronOnline and the Commodity Futures Modernization Act?

thanks.

Rick told me you were pregnant (you look great by the way).  
Congratulations, and tell Marianna I hope she feels better soon.

FYI.  Steve you may want to be on this call.

Jim

Erin Perrigo will hold a conference call on Monday, October 29th at 11:00 a.m. EST to discuss the meetings next week in Seattle - the Western Interstate Energy Board's Committee on Regional Electric Power Cooperation (CREPC) (held October 31st - November 1st) and FERC's meeting to discuss Western infrastructure issues (November 2nd).

Attached is a list of questions that are to be considered at the CREPC meeting.  To date, we do not have the agenda for the FERC meeting but will send it out when it becomes available.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Erin Perrigo/EPSA call.

 - WIEB Is1.doc 

Seems to me that we need to engage in AZ (along with NV and OR?) in the Western states to try and push competition forward.  Why don't we first assemble a (1) what we know - what we don't know memo and then (2) look at oppotunities to push our agenda.  

Leslie - everyone is looking to you to lead us to the promised land in AZ...  GO GET 'EM!!!!!!

Jim

Mark Frankena is now an advisor to the Chair of the FTC.   Leslie--when do you start?

I don't think past absences of reasoned decision making by the ACC should prejudice our attempt to re-engage, if there is a cause worth fighting for.  We had a good case then, and they blew us off.  One of the guys mainly responsible for that has since been run out of the state.   It's not like opportunities are as abundant as they once were nor are the commercial people going to go out of their way to tell us to engage.  Retail guys periodically ask about AZ but there is little to tell them.  If we see a worthy cause, let's go for it.   

Leslie - where do we start?

We fought this issue at the ACC when it was first presented several years ago.  Recall that this was the settlement where we were joined at the hip with the industrials, the industrials cut and run for a rate reduction, and we ended up litigating the case (testimony by Mark Frankena--on local market power, Tom Delaney, Harry Kingerski, and another consultant).  We got our bottoms kicked--although I think we won on the credit for billing our own customers (APS wanted to credit ESPs $0.25/customer--we got the number up somewhere above the cost of postage).

My recollection is simliar to Leslie's re:  the asset transfer and affiliate as the PLR.  It was part of the settlement.  We fought the arrangement and lost.  Recall that we appealled the ACC's decision on the basis of bias and lost.  I'm not a big fan of the ACC ... given our track record.  We have much better political contacts in Arizona now; however, the contacts are with the Gov's office and not the ACC.  Recall that the ACC is elected and is one of Arizona's four branches of government--i.e., the judiciary, the legislature, the executive branch and the ACC (by virtue of Arizona's constitution).

APS may be pushing back a little hard here (25% by 2008), but I'd want a firm indication that there was interest in Arizona before we fight it, and I'd want a clear indication that the market wasn't competitive from a retail perspective without the PLR being 100% short.  When we fought it last time, Frank Vickers and ENA had some interest in the PLR.  We tried to negotiate a deal with Jack Davis to swap some power so the PLR was instaneously being served by other than APS.  We were entirely unsuccessful and Vickers dropped Arizona like it had the plague.  

Having said all that, I'm always up for a good fight.  If we can EPSA to step in and spend some money, I'd be happy to help out in any way I can.  

Thoughts?

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Mike --

How about lunch at 11:30 - meet in the lobby?

Jim

Ricardo --

I tried to call this morning - no answer.  Pls give me a call today.

Jim

Please feel free to attend.

Jim
MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group
       Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Jack Cashin, Sr. Manager of Policy
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: September 4, 2001

RE: September 6th Gas Issues Conference Call
        ?2:30 p.m. (EDT)

We have scheduled a conference call of the Gas issues Working Group on Thursday, September 6th, at 2:30 p.m. (EDT).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

September 6, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?Upcoming FERC Agenda Items
   ?NOPR on Affiliate Rules

?El Paso 637 Compliance Technical Conference update (RP00-336)

?FERC Decisions
   ?Texas Gas Rate Settlement (RP00-260)

?Items Pending FERC Action
   ?Withdraw of Applications for Millennium Pipeline project (CP98-150)
   ?East Tennessee Patriot Filing
   ?Dynegy LNG Application

?California
   ?Increased Data Reporting
   ?CPUC alternative demand stand-by charge

?Next Call

Sorry -- I need to be in Houston both days.

Jim

Hello GT Team,

I am interviewing  at Wharton and Stern - NYC next week we are in a bind.  I am in need of interviewers, last minute cancellations.

Need:

Wharton:  Second Rounds Oct 30th (Need One)

NYU :  First Rounds Nov 1 (Need Two)

If you are available, please let me know.

Thanks -=- Paul L.

FYI

FYI.
X-Mailer: Novell GroupWise Internet Agent 5.5.5.1
Date: Fri, 26 Oct 2001 17:27:13 -0400

Fine.  Everything's crazy at Enron.  Just trying to keep my head down.  

Thanks,

Jim

Hi Jim.  Thanks for copying me on this e mail.

HOw are you?  I havn't talked to you in a long time...

Hi Steve.  Are you able to jump on this call?  I could if you aren't able I could listen and pass the info on.  As is referenced in this e mail, FERC hasn't issued any thing yet on their agenda or schedule.
FYI.  Steve you may want to be on this call.

Jim

Erin Perrigo will hold a conference call on Monday, October 29th at 11:00 a.m. EST to discuss the meetings next week in Seattle - the Western Interstate Energy Board's Committee on Regional Electric Power Cooperation (CREPC) (held October 31st - November 1st) and FERC's meeting to discuss Western infrastructure issues (November 2nd).

Attached is a list of questions that are to be considered at the CREPC meeting.  To date, we do not have the agenda for the FERC meeting but will send it out when it becomes available.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Erin Perrigo/EPSA call.

 - WIEB Is1.doc << File: WIEB Is1.doc >> 

Do all REPs have to report this information - including our customer complaints?  Even if we only serve non-PTB customers?  Who is tracking this internally assuming we have to file it?  Do the business people understand this obligation?

Jim

Attached is the final report requirements and reporting template to be used for the draft report to the PUCT on October 31st and the November 15h report to be filed with the PUCT.  I had provided due dates in the previous email, but please have the October 31st information to me so I can send to the PUCT by 2:00 p.m., October 30th.  I would like to have the November 15th report by COB November 12th so we can properly prepare the filing.  Thanks.
 << File: PilotStatusReportAtt1.doc >>  << File: PilotStatusReportTemplate1.doc >> 

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Ok.  It seems that (1) we should try and get a handle on AZ - Leslie Lawner please put something together and (2) need a Market Plan on NV - Pat Keene put together.  

Paul, I appreciate the issue with OR but I'd like to know what is the opportunity and make sure that PGE is not destroying our chances - Christi got wind of a Imbalance pgm that was punative to marketers.  Who can we meet with to discuss?

Jim

I also hate Arizona--regulation.  Too much of an inside game, too much like Chicago--except hotter, dryer, hillier and more Republican.  

Anyway ... I do not like (at all) the idea of pushing anything in Oregon right now and probably won't like it for about 6-9 months.  

Re:  Nevada--we need a comprehensive approach to the state ASAP.  

Re:  New Mexico.  Well ...

I hate Arizona.  I just sent you a message that changes things a little about the state, anyway.  We can out a memo together, however, Pat Keene is doing Nevada I know.  I can summarize AZ and NM.

Seems to me that we need to engage in AZ (along with NV and OR?) in the Western states to try and push competition forward.  Why don't we first assemble a (1) what we know - what we don't know memo and then (2) look at oppotunities to push our agenda.  

Leslie - everyone is looking to you to lead us to the promised land in AZ...  GO GET 'EM!!!!!!

Jim

Mark Frankena is now an advisor to the Chair of the FTC.   Leslie--when do you start?

I don't think past absences of reasoned decision making by the ACC should prejudice our attempt to re-engage, if there is a cause worth fighting for.  We had a good case then, and they blew us off.  One of the guys mainly responsible for that has since been run out of the state.   It's not like opportunities are as abundant as they once were nor are the commercial people going to go out of their way to tell us to engage.  Retail guys periodically ask about AZ but there is little to tell them.  If we see a worthy cause, let's go for it.   

Leslie - where do we start?

We fought this issue at the ACC when it was first presented several years ago.  Recall that this was the settlement where we were joined at the hip with the industrials, the industrials cut and run for a rate reduction, and we ended up litigating the case (testimony by Mark Frankena--on local market power, Tom Delaney, Harry Kingerski, and another consultant).  We got our bottoms kicked--although I think we won on the credit for billing our own customers (APS wanted to credit ESPs $0.25/customer--we got the number up somewhere above the cost of postage).

My recollection is simliar to Leslie's re:  the asset transfer and affiliate as the PLR.  It was part of the settlement.  We fought the arrangement and lost.  Recall that we appealled the ACC's decision on the basis of bias and lost.  I'm not a big fan of the ACC ... given our track record.  We have much better political contacts in Arizona now; however, the contacts are with the Gov's office and not the ACC.  Recall that the ACC is elected and is one of Arizona's four branches of government--i.e., the judiciary, the legislature, the executive branch and the ACC (by virtue of Arizona's constitution).

APS may be pushing back a little hard here (25% by 2008), but I'd want a firm indication that there was interest in Arizona before we fight it, and I'd want a clear indication that the market wasn't competitive from a retail perspective without the PLR being 100% short.  When we fought it last time, Frank Vickers and ENA had some interest in the PLR.  We tried to negotiate a deal with Jack Davis to swap some power so the PLR was instaneously being served by other than APS.  We were entirely unsuccessful and Vickers dropped Arizona like it had the plague.  

Having said all that, I'm always up for a good fight.  If we can EPSA to step in and spend some money, I'd be happy to help out in any way I can.  

Thoughts?

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Following last week's meeting, here is my recommendation on how to proceed with SCE.

1.	Form Enron Negotiation Team

	My recommendation is to use the same team we used with PG&E + Jeff Dasovich.  My understanding was that Lisa M. was the lead negotiator - I would not change this.  Jeff should only be there to make introductions.

2.	Meet & Confer (10/29)

	Sue Mara and Jeff Dasovich will listen and report back to everyone on what happens.  

3.	Reformed Stipulation

	I would propose that we take a wait and see approach to this document.  Based on Dasovich's idea to get together with SCE on Thursday, maybe let this ride.

4.	Meeting

	My understanding is that (Jeff D. please correct) SCE can meet with us this Thursday.  Can everyone make it that needs to be there?  Probably meet in California.  We should put the laundry list on the table.

Please let me know what else we need to discuss or if anyone disagrees.

Thanks,

Jim

To discuss this outline and our issues list, can people attend a 2pm Houston Time call.  The meet and confer may be on-going, but maybe either Jeff or Sue can jump off.

Linda Noske will be sending out a call-in number.

Thanks,

Jim

Following last week's meeting, here is my recommendation on how to proceed with SCE.

1.	Form Enron Negotiation Team

	My recommendation is to use the same team we used with PG&E + Jeff Dasovich.  My understanding was that Lisa M. was the lead negotiator - I would not change this.  Jeff should only be there to make introductions.

2.	Meet & Confer (10/29)

	Sue Mara and Jeff Dasovich will listen and report back to everyone on what happens.  

3.	Reformed Stipulation

	I would propose that we take a wait and see approach to this document.  Based on Dasovich's idea to get together with SCE on Thursday, maybe let this ride.

4.	Meeting

	My understanding is that (Jeff D. please correct) SCE can meet with us this Thursday.  Can everyone make it that needs to be there?  Probably meet in California.  We should put the laundry list on the table.

Please let me know what else we need to discuss or if anyone disagrees.

Thanks,

Jim

FYI.

Ashley -

We would prefer (given the schedules) to hold a conference call on Wednesday pm with a group of marketers/generators.  Seems like the easiest way to discuss with everyone.  It would be great to have a paper from NG earlier in the week.  

Here is our list of recommended people.  Probably best to have NG or you call to invite (rather than Enron) to highlight your interest in brokering a deal in the Midwest. 

Exelon 			(Jack Crowley)  	610 765 6612
Constellation 		(Harvey Reed)  	410 468 3480
Edison Mission Energy 	(Reem Fahey)  	312 583 6033
Reliant 			(John Orr)  	713 207 3490
Duke 				(Mike Gildea)	713 627 5529 or (Lee Barrett)  713 627 6519
Mirant 			(Jim Mayhew)  	478 579 3421
PG&E 				(Richard Doying) 	301 280-6780
Cinergy 			(Dennis Flaherty) ?????

Thanks,

Jim 

Nancy --

I don't understand.  Will this delay the opening of the ERCOT Tx market???  We must do everything possible to open the market on time - Jan 1 2002.

Jim

Attached for your information and review are documents concerning market impacts related to conversion to EDI Version 1.4.  An initial plan was presented and discussed at the October 25th RMS meeting, but was not approved.  An RMS workshop is now scheduled for October 31st and November 1st to discuss the options presented and finalize a conversion plan that all MPs and PUCT staff are confident in and can support.  We need to finalize a plan so that all market participants can prepare.  PUCT staff has been actively involved and they also plan to participate in the workshops.  I have also attached a copy of the email that I received from the PUCT staff on their concerns.  I have also sent this information to EES and CSC to solicit feedback.  I would appreciate any feedback that any of you might have and also, please feel free to let me know if you have any questions.
 << File: Enron - Version 1.4 Conversion Options.doc >>  << File: FW PUC Concerns with V. 1.4 Cutover.rtf >> 

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

We also need to check reporting for post Jan 1.  Gloria can you make sure that Rebecca Fite knows this.

Jim

Yes, all REPS are required to report this information on the pilot.  In the pilot there is no PTB, that becomes effective on January 2, 2002, market opening.  These requirements are defined in Substantive Rule 25.431(j)(3)(B) and Project 22384 - Implementation Issues Related to Retail Competition Pilots.  Rebecca Fite is the EES point person who is working with EES internal resources and CSC to obtain the required data.  Please let me know if you have additional questions or concerns.

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Do all REPs have to report this information - including our customer complaints?  Even if we only serve non-PTB customers?  Who is tracking this internally assuming we have to file it?  Do the business people understand this obligation?

Jim

Attached is the final report requirements and reporting template to be used for the draft report to the PUCT on October 31st and the November 15h report to be filed with the PUCT.  I had provided due dates in the previous email, but please have the October 31st information to me so I can send to the PUCT by 2:00 p.m., October 30th.  I would like to have the November 15th report by COB November 12th so we can properly prepare the filing.  Thanks.
 << File: PilotStatusReportAtt1.doc >>  << File: PilotStatusReportTemplate1.doc >> 

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Luiz --

Yes there has been a shift in the thinking - away from the "natural gas" model and toward the financial structure.  Some of this is related to the political realities of the US market and FERC.  Some is that our traders in the East are comfortable with PJM and have been making term markets at PJM West hub.  All of this assumes that we should be able to migrate to a more physical model if the industry needs to later.

I do think that it would be helpful for you to get together and work up a discussion for all Government Affairs to explain the key differences and what policy discussions we need to focus upon - (i.e., setting up good "hubs" and auctioning transmission rights).

Also, I think that any thoughts you have on the implications for EES are important.  Not sure that either model is really "great" for competitive retailers.  The difficulty is that our predictions of load and the actual usage will always be different.  As long as (1) our analytics have the data to "price" basis between hubs and from a hub to a customer and (2) there is no discrimination in allocation of transmission rights then our ability to sell at retail will be competitive.

Jim
Jim

I have seen a  trend towards nodal pricing systems, financial contracts and financial mechanism to hegde "base price" risks among nodes.

I have also noted that this represents a growing majority within Enron (at least people I have been talking to recently)

In looking at my old files (perhaps 2 years ago), I have seen some internal statements advocating for physical rights, and physical mechanisms to deal with congestion. I have seen those statements in the context of California.

Two simple questions:

1) Is the financial world the one we should clearly advocate for?
2) Does the fact that financial hedges are "imperfect" bother any of our key trading groups/developers? 

If the trend is really going financial, I think there is a lot of work and education to be done in helping our folks (particularly EES) in drafting contracts which reflect this new reality. I had some experience in dealing with US lawyers examining PPA which were being prepared in Brazil (for example, between Elektro and Riogen). Those were purely financial.

Threre was a clear cultural shock between "physical" and "financial mindsets".  Folks had a great difficulty in understanding (therefore accepting) the sheer simplicity of a financial contract, when compared to a typical, full fledged PPA. Differences are many.  For example: Our Cuiab? I contract, which is physical, has a penalty provision for non-deliverability. This becomes unnecessary in the financial contract, as the spot price is the implicit penalty. Also, in a physical contract, the asset owner (not the buyer) have control on physical dispatch. In the financial contract, the buyer has no control whatsoever, and the asset owner is the one to submit bids.  Those are only examples. I've put together several presentations explaining the basic differences.

 If "financial" contracts prevail, I think we should spend a good amount of time in explaining/training our folks in this new world. My feeling is that this change will be easier for the trading desk, but more difficult for EES and for asset developers (long term PPAs)

Any thoughts? 

I was hoping to meet with PGE (but will hold off it is imprudent).  Christi has reviewed something.  I'll loop her in to find out all the details.

Jim

Robert Neustaedter has worked up an analysis of the PGE and PP&L programs.  Ree:  who can we meet with to discuss--do you mean at PGE or at ENA?  

Let's figure out whether the rumor of a punitive imbalance charge is true before we do anything more.  

Ok.  It seems that (1) we should try and get a handle on AZ - Leslie Lawner please put something together and (2) need a Market Plan on NV - Pat Keene put together.  

Paul, I appreciate the issue with OR but I'd like to know what is the opportunity and make sure that PGE is not destroying our chances - Christi got wind of a Imbalance pgm that was punative to marketers.  Who can we meet with to discuss?

Jim

I also hate Arizona--regulation.  Too much of an inside game, too much like Chicago--except hotter, dryer, hillier and more Republican.  

Anyway ... I do not like (at all) the idea of pushing anything in Oregon right now and probably won't like it for about 6-9 months.  

Re:  Nevada--we need a comprehensive approach to the state ASAP.  

Re:  New Mexico.  Well ...

I hate Arizona.  I just sent you a message that changes things a little about the state, anyway.  We can out a memo together, however, Pat Keene is doing Nevada I know.  I can summarize AZ and NM.

Seems to me that we need to engage in AZ (along with NV and OR?) in the Western states to try and push competition forward.  Why don't we first assemble a (1) what we know - what we don't know memo and then (2) look at oppotunities to push our agenda.  

Leslie - everyone is looking to you to lead us to the promised land in AZ...  GO GET 'EM!!!!!!

Jim

Mark Frankena is now an advisor to the Chair of the FTC.   Leslie--when do you start?

I don't think past absences of reasoned decision making by the ACC should prejudice our attempt to re-engage, if there is a cause worth fighting for.  We had a good case then, and they blew us off.  One of the guys mainly responsible for that has since been run out of the state.   It's not like opportunities are as abundant as they once were nor are the commercial people going to go out of their way to tell us to engage.  Retail guys periodically ask about AZ but there is little to tell them.  If we see a worthy cause, let's go for it.   

Leslie - where do we start?

We fought this issue at the ACC when it was first presented several years ago.  Recall that this was the settlement where we were joined at the hip with the industrials, the industrials cut and run for a rate reduction, and we ended up litigating the case (testimony by Mark Frankena--on local market power, Tom Delaney, Harry Kingerski, and another consultant).  We got our bottoms kicked--although I think we won on the credit for billing our own customers (APS wanted to credit ESPs $0.25/customer--we got the number up somewhere above the cost of postage).

My recollection is simliar to Leslie's re:  the asset transfer and affiliate as the PLR.  It was part of the settlement.  We fought the arrangement and lost.  Recall that we appealled the ACC's decision on the basis of bias and lost.  I'm not a big fan of the ACC ... given our track record.  We have much better political contacts in Arizona now; however, the contacts are with the Gov's office and not the ACC.  Recall that the ACC is elected and is one of Arizona's four branches of government--i.e., the judiciary, the legislature, the executive branch and the ACC (by virtue of Arizona's constitution).

APS may be pushing back a little hard here (25% by 2008), but I'd want a firm indication that there was interest in Arizona before we fight it, and I'd want a clear indication that the market wasn't competitive from a retail perspective without the PLR being 100% short.  When we fought it last time, Frank Vickers and ENA had some interest in the PLR.  We tried to negotiate a deal with Jack Davis to swap some power so the PLR was instaneously being served by other than APS.  We were entirely unsuccessful and Vickers dropped Arizona like it had the plague.  

Having said all that, I'm always up for a good fight.  If we can EPSA to step in and spend some money, I'd be happy to help out in any way I can.  

Thoughts?

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

My fault for not making it clear that you should have been in the loop.  We will send out a message across the board to help with this.

Jim

This is going to sound like empire building. But I need to know what we're doing with PGE.  I don't need to participate in the calls--but I do need to know.  The PGE folks need to have confidence that I'm aware of our positions and plans.  

We are having a conference call tomorrow with PGE.  They did not decide anything on the last conference call after I told them why Enron retail in the East likes the Duquense type imbalance (no bandwidth, thus no penalties-- imbalances settle at verifiable system lambda).  John Malowney of EPMI west desk likes the bandwidth, but we are discussing it further since it has created problems for the East EES desk (due to the penalties associated with being outside the bandwidth).  John likes the PGE proposal to settle at an index price, but PGE is reconsidering that aspect.  

Unfortunately, I don't know of any TPs that allow a bandwidth without penalties. 

Let me know if you want to participate in the call.

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

This is critical that we are all pushing this...  Please let me know if any obstacles develop.

Jim

Just an FYI.  Input from EES desk.

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Nancy,

Thanks. That does help. 

We want Option C. Let us know if there is anything we can do to ensure that option is selected.

That is true in Option A and Option B.  The key to Option C is that we would have January and February meter read cycle to switch our customer before they would be switched to the affilliate as a customer who did not switch.  Option A and B, EES would not possibly get customers in TNMP and AEP if their meters are read during the first two weeks of the month.  We could send switches for Reliant and TXU for the first two weeks of the month, before the December moratorium.  Does this help?

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

So.

Best case - We submit on January 2 and the customers get switched on their January meter read date. 

Worst case - We submit on January 2 and the customers get switched on their February meter read date.

Is this correct?

Yes, it is.  Do we have a lot of customers lined up in those two service areas?

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Nancy,

Is it a given that we will not be able to submit any switches in TNMP or AEP until January 2? 

Please review the attached documents and provide input to me no later than noon, Tuesday, October 30th.  I have made notes in red on items of interest, etc.  I have also attached a document of questions and concerns from the PUCT staff.  RMS is holding a workshop on Wednesday and Thursday of this week to finalize our recommendation and plan for the conversion.  Please let me know if you have any questions.  
 << File: Enron - Version 1.4 Conversion Options.doc >>  << File: FW PUC Concerns with V. 1.4 Cutover.rtf >> 

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Are we still friends??

Thanks.  I hate it when I sound petulant.  

My fault for not making it clear that you should have been in the loop.  We will send out a message across the board to help with this.

Jim

This is going to sound like empire building. But I need to know what we're doing with PGE.  I don't need to participate in the calls--but I do need to know.  The PGE folks need to have confidence that I'm aware of our positions and plans.  

We are having a conference call tomorrow with PGE.  They did not decide anything on the last conference call after I told them why Enron retail in the East likes the Duquense type imbalance (no bandwidth, thus no penalties-- imbalances settle at verifiable system lambda).  John Malowney of EPMI west desk likes the bandwidth, but we are discussing it further since it has created problems for the East EES desk (due to the penalties associated with being outside the bandwidth).  John likes the PGE proposal to settle at an index price, but PGE is reconsidering that aspect.  

Unfortunately, I don't know of any TPs that allow a bandwidth without penalties. 

Let me know if you want to participate in the call.

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

Nancy --
 
Go get 'em!!!  You'll do great.  Just be factual and explain how you've worked on these issues in multiple states.  
 
Jim

I have spoken to Mark, he will send a list of issues to Nancy prior to the hearing.  The committee will acknowledge that you are an Enron employee, however, you are appearing in the capacity of  Chair of RMS subcomittee.  Bill B. from Ercot will be present, however he was not the most stellar witness.  Mark thinks Chairman Wolens will want to hear directly from the Chair of RMS.  The questions that you may be asked include:  what has RMS recommended to TAC, address issues of cutover from version 1.3 to 1.4...where are we, where do we go next, where are the participants on the issue?  Mark is preparing the list of questions and will email it to you soon.
 
Representative Paul Hilbert died last night.  If the funeral services are scheduled for Friday, the hearing will be postponed to enable the members of the committee to attend the funeral.  We may not know the date of the funeral until Wednesday.  I will let everyone know ASAP whether or not the legislative takes place on Friday.  Thanks, Jean 
 
 
 
 
Mark Bruce, Policy Analyst, Electric Resturcturing Legislative Oversight Committee, attended the October 25th RMS meeting.  When he left, he gave me his card and asked me to contact him after the meeting, which I did.  He asked that I forward my contact information and asked if I could be available to attend the Legislative Oversight Committee meeting on Friday, November 2nd.  This is the email that I received from him after I sent my contact information.  He has not elaborated on exactly what questions he has or would have for me.

Nancy A. Hetrick 
Enron Corp. 
Director, Government Affairs 
Phone:  712-366-3399 
Pager:   888-912-1426 

Thanks for your response ... Connie shared her V 1.4 cutover questions and  concerns with me ... if you reply to her e-mail prior to the Wed. RMS meeting,  please include me in your reply.

  
I'll keep in touch with you regarding possible questions from the oversight  committee on Nov. 2. 
  
/\/\ark Bruce 
policy analyst 
Electric Utility Restructuring 
Legislative Oversight Committee 
office: 512-463-0814 
mobile: 512-576-8995 
fax: 512-463-6783 
e-mail: mark.bruce_hc@house.state.tx.us <<mailto:mark.bruce_hc@house.state.tx.us>> 
  

Good job.

Jim

Mark

Here is a document Enron has prepared that describes what we want to see in a wholesale electric Standards Setting Organization (SSO).

I hope you will be able to consider these points for the letter you will be drafting from EPSA to the NERC Board of Trustees. 

Please do not distribute this until Jose Bestard, as member of the Stakeholder Committee, has had an opportunity to convey this to Mike Gent.

Thanks
Charles

 << File: Enron Principles on Electric SSO3.doc >> 

My thoughts --

1.	Focus more on Tariff standardization (I think that this is the key issue for Enron because LMP based bid balancing market is almost a done deal - and the Texas market seems to be fine for liquidity).  Build around a new proforma with a NETWORK PLUS model.
2.	I would highlight that size matters - re-double our arguments and documents on natural markets in this filing as attachments.
3.	I would highlight the importance of ending the control area benefits and also strengthen the arguments for no source/sink requirement.
4.	The gas / power industries are different not because the amount of vertical integration (ie, CNG) but because of the geographic reach.  Many LDCs used Columbia p/l, but only one LDC uses AEPs.  The electric market needs transmission to be "rationalized" across the marketplace so moving power to where it's needed from where it's at.
5.	Should we attack the 209 Boards?  Agree that they are unnecessary, but pls be careful.

Thanks,

Jim

Comments on FERC's RTO Week are due on November 3 (Saturday) so we would like to submit comments by the end of this week.  Some of us have briefly discussed the types of comments we may want to submit on behalf of Enron, and the attached list of "Talking Points" are issues that Christi and I put together for Rick during his Washington meetings last week.  These talking points focus on issues that were raised during RTO Week by panelists that we may want to address -- either because the point made was a good point that we want to highlight, or because the point made was wrong and we want to clarify the record.  We will use the talking points as an outline on issues to raise in our comments.  

We also want to state up front in the comments that FERC is on the right track and that FERC has done a lot of analysis and studies to determine that "right sized" RTOs are in the public interest (this is in response to the negative comments made by the state commissioners that FERC is taking action that has not been proven to be beneficial to consumers).  We also want to make the point that RTO creation is not about retail access and does not impact whether or not a state offers retail choice.

Also attached is a link to FERC Staff's notes from RTO Week.  I have not reviewed these notes yet, but we may also want to respond to these notes in our comments using the same criteria as above; i.e., on areas where we feel that the point made was a good point that we want to highlight, or because the point made was wrong and we want to clarify the record.  

Please review the Talking Points paper and the Staff Notes, and let me know what you think about this strategy.  I am writing the comments and welcome all help and input.  

I hope to keep these comments limited (10 pages or so), so we need to stay focused -- raise the issue, make our point, and move on.  

Thanks Everyone

Sarah

 << File: Talking Points from RTO Week.doc >> 

 http://www.ferc.gov/Electric/RTO/workshops/staffsummary.pdf  

Janine --

Good job.

On the hourly market price index, until we have LMP dispatch, the best we can do is a public index.  Let's not ask for too much.  Just something we can hedge against.  Can you talk with the EWS folks for the best index option???

Also, if the default is a monthly public index, why do the customer's need any "parking"?  They can move directly to the new option.

What is your definition of "functioning wholesale market"?  Are we stating that unless an RTO is running, we can't get rid of the PPO?  Maybe just resolve the Imbalance issue.  More specifics would be helpful.

Thanks,

Jim

The ICC Energy Committee held a meeting to discuss ComEd's proposal to drop the PPO.  We argued that this should not be allowed until the wholesale market/delivery issues are dealt with because otherwise customers will have no choice but to return to ComEd at the higher bundled rate.  The good news is that a rather lengthy discussion on this issue ensued as a result.  The industrial customer group and Mid American Energy supported our views; however AES New Energy said that this was not a problem for them.

We also commented that once the PPO goes away it should not be resurrected due to the uncertainty it would create in the market.  ComEd responded that under the statute they can not offer to waive the PPO but could negotiate an arrangement on the CTC if approached by the customer.  This would mean that we could negotiate on behalf of all our customers regarding the CTC.  

We have the opportunity to file comments to the Commissioners before the actual filing.  A draft is attached. 

 << File: Commissioner Terry Harvill.doc >> 

If you have any comments, please respond by the end of the week.

Trying to put something together.

Jim

Always.  By the way, did you have further thoughts about a call to develop a comprehensive Nevada strategy?

Are we still friends??

Thanks.  I hate it when I sound petulant.  

My fault for not making it clear that you should have been in the loop.  We will send out a message across the board to help with this.

Jim

This is going to sound like empire building. But I need to know what we're doing with PGE.  I don't need to participate in the calls--but I do need to know.  The PGE folks need to have confidence that I'm aware of our positions and plans.  

We are having a conference call tomorrow with PGE.  They did not decide anything on the last conference call after I told them why Enron retail in the East likes the Duquense type imbalance (no bandwidth, thus no penalties-- imbalances settle at verifiable system lambda).  John Malowney of EPMI west desk likes the bandwidth, but we are discussing it further since it has created problems for the East EES desk (due to the penalties associated with being outside the bandwidth).  John likes the PGE proposal to settle at an index price, but PGE is reconsidering that aspect.  

Unfortunately, I don't know of any TPs that allow a bandwidth without penalties. 

Let me know if you want to participate in the call.

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

Hope you and Gracie are having a good day!!  I miss you guys.  California is a difficult State to understand.  Things are crazy.

Jim

Please put on my calendar.  

Also, how do I find out how much vacation I have?

Jim

Thought I ought to advise you about my vacation plans for the remainder of the year:

October 5, October 8-12
December 19-21, December 26-28 and December 31(December 24-25 are Enron holidays)

I also have the floating holiday which I will take before year-end.  According to the timekeeping system, I will have 5 days carryover for 2002.

Think the best thing is to let it ride - no sense in discussing because we don't have a solution for them.  See if any intelligence on how hard they are going to push NPCo to fight us.

Jim

I'm going to Carson City tomorrow.  I thought I could present the following message to the Commissioners:    

Contracts were negotiated in a bilateral market at arm's length.  Nobody was requiring NPCo to do business with us.  Similar contracts were upheld by the ALJ in the PNW refunds case.  You're going to completely screw up forward markets and NPCo's ability to contract in the future.  Think of the risk premium that will attach to future contracts.  
We tried to be the good guy with NPCo by offering a more comprehensive solution for them numerous times.  Now we're getting attacked for their mistakes?
We have met with NPCo a number of times to try and resolve this issue.  But the resolution requires that they post collateral.  Now they won't even talk with us.  The only way you (PUCN) are going to fix this is if you step up and require the utilities to post collateral when necessary. 
 
However, after talking with Steve Hall I concluded that it would be unwise at this point for me to contact the Commissioners.  We don't have anything to offer and very little new to say.   For example, according to Steve, we won't touch a blend and extend because of credit problems.  This said, he was uncomfortable saying that the entire issue was collateral.  

Trying to put something together.

Jim

Always.  By the way, did you have further thoughts about a call to develop a comprehensive Nevada strategy?

Are we still friends??

Thanks.  I hate it when I sound petulant.  

My fault for not making it clear that you should have been in the loop.  We will send out a message across the board to help with this.

Jim

This is going to sound like empire building. But I need to know what we're doing with PGE.  I don't need to participate in the calls--but I do need to know.  The PGE folks need to have confidence that I'm aware of our positions and plans.  

We are having a conference call tomorrow with PGE.  They did not decide anything on the last conference call after I told them why Enron retail in the East likes the Duquense type imbalance (no bandwidth, thus no penalties-- imbalances settle at verifiable system lambda).  John Malowney of EPMI west desk likes the bandwidth, but we are discussing it further since it has created problems for the East EES desk (due to the penalties associated with being outside the bandwidth).  John likes the PGE proposal to settle at an index price, but PGE is reconsidering that aspect.  

Unfortunately, I don't know of any TPs that allow a bandwidth without penalties. 

Let me know if you want to participate in the call.

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

Yes.  Thanks.

Jim,
 
Should I start monitoring the energy events in Canada as well as California?
 
Thanks,
 
DB

Ok.  Also, don't forget about the Dynegy v. ComEd dispute at FERC.  Important for us in our physical business.  Probably want the letter to be a little more specific on a monthly index v. an hourly.  Also, what about the 400 kw size distinction, is this the right #?  May want to talk with Jim Wood.

Isn't the DST question also important?  The ICC's decision will impact the need for a PPO.

Jim

Thanks Jim!

I will talk with EWS.  Last time I did they were indifferent between Cinergy and ComEd and because of the uncertainty, I thought it better not to commit to something until we get closer to the date and we have a better idea of what we want - also because what we want may change.  It's more important at this point just to get the concept in front of the ICC.

You are right on the parking, but in the event that when customers are off PPO and there is no monthly public index, I wanted to make absolutely sure we had an out.

Good question.  Harvill said that if we wait for a good functioning wholesale market it will take 25 years and they were not going to do that.  I n the meeting I stated that the ICC should put more pressure on COmEd to fix the problems with the RTO, but I emphasized the imbalance issue.  I agree that I could clarify the letter to say fix the imbalance problems and that would be perhaps an acceptable compromise to fixing the whole RTO.  That would let us physically deliver.

Janine  

Janine --

Good job.

On the hourly market price index, until we have LMP dispatch, the best we can do is a public index.  Let's not ask for too much.  Just something we can hedge against.  Can you talk with the EWS folks for the best index option???

Also, if the default is a monthly public index, why do the customer's need any "parking"?  They can move directly to the new option.

What is your definition of "functioning wholesale market"?  Are we stating that unless an RTO is running, we can't get rid of the PPO?  Maybe just resolve the Imbalance issue.  More specifics would be helpful.

Thanks,

Jim

The ICC Energy Committee held a meeting to discuss ComEd's proposal to drop the PPO.  We argued that this should not be allowed until the wholesale market/delivery issues are dealt with because otherwise customers will have no choice but to return to ComEd at the higher bundled rate.  The good news is that a rather lengthy discussion on this issue ensued as a result.  The industrial customer group and Mid American Energy supported our views; however AES New Energy said that this was not a problem for them.

We also commented that once the PPO goes away it should not be resurrected due to the uncertainty it would create in the market.  ComEd responded that under the statute they can not offer to waive the PPO but could negotiate an arrangement on the CTC if approached by the customer.  This would mean that we could negotiate on behalf of all our customers regarding the CTC.  

We have the opportunity to file comments to the Commissioners before the actual filing.  A draft is attached. 

 << File: Commissioner Terry Harvill.doc >> 

If you have any comments, please respond by the end of the week.

Charles --

The RTO week stuff is different from SSO stuff, right?

Jim

We can consider this a final version for Jose to send to the BOT.

Sarah,

I wrote a couple paragraphs on the "standards and practices" section.  Essentially, they reinforce what was in the staff summary and add a little hint of some of the language Charles, Jim, you, and I have been working on re: support of an SSO.

 

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Andy:

For some reason, I cannot get email to list your name as a recipient, so I am sending this email to you as a reply to your email.  Anyway, I just sent this note out to the RTO team.  Let me know what you think.

Sarah

Comments on FERC's RTO Week are due on November 3 (Saturday) so we would like to submit comments by the end of this week.  Some of us have briefly discussed the types of comments we may want to submit on behalf of Enron, and the attached list of "Talking Points" are issues that Christi and I put together for Rick during his Washington meetings last week.  These talking points focus on issues that were raised during RTO Week by panelists that we may want to address -- either because the point made was a good point that we want to highlight, or because the point made was wrong and we want to clarify the record.  We will use the talking points as an outline on issues to raise in our comments.  

We also want to state up front in the comments that FERC is on the right track and that FERC has done a lot of analysis and studies to determine that "right sized" RTOs are in the public interest (this is in response to the negative comments made by the state commissioners that FERC is taking action that has not been proven to be beneficial to consumers).  We also want to make the point that RTO creation is not about retail access and does not impact whether or not a state offers retail choice.

Also attached is a link to FERC Staff's notes from RTO Week.  I have not reviewed these notes yet, but we may also want to respond to these notes in our comments using the same criteria as above; i.e., on areas where we feel that the point made was a good point that we want to highlight, or because the point made was wrong and we want to clarify the record.  

Please review the Talking Points paper and the Staff Notes, and let me know what you think about this strategy.  I am writing the comments and welcome all help and input.  

I hope to keep these comments limited (10 pages or so), so we need to stay focused -- raise the issue, make our point, and move on.  

Thanks Everyone

Sarah

 

 http://www.ferc.gov/Electric/RTO/workshops/staffsummary.pdf  

FYI, FERC has posted their perceptions of the results of RTO week.  They look pretty good, for the most part.  We may want to make some comments to support or refute items as the case may be.  The summary is located at the following link:

http://www.ferc.fed.us/Electric/RTO/workshops/staffsummary.pdf

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Gloria --

Vicki Sharp was interested in trying to update our Licenses throughout the country.  I will arrange a meeting for us to follow-up.

Thanks,

Jim

agree

O.K.  I will inquire along the lines you suggest.  It would be pretty good to know if they're just making a political statement and have no intention of pushing it, if, e.g., FERC approves the ALJ's order in the PNW case.  

Think the best thing is to let it ride - no sense in discussing because we don't have a solution for them.  See if any intelligence on how hard they are going to push NPCo to fight us.

Jim

I'm going to Carson City tomorrow.  I thought I could present the following message to the Commissioners:    

Contracts were negotiated in a bilateral market at arm's length.  Nobody was requiring NPCo to do business with us.  Similar contracts were upheld by the ALJ in the PNW refunds case.  You're going to completely screw up forward markets and NPCo's ability to contract in the future.  Think of the risk premium that will attach to future contracts.  
We tried to be the good guy with NPCo by offering a more comprehensive solution for them numerous times.  Now we're getting attacked for their mistakes?
We have met with NPCo a number of times to try and resolve this issue.  But the resolution requires that they post collateral.  Now they won't even talk with us.  The only way you (PUCN) are going to fix this is if you step up and require the utilities to post collateral when necessary. 
 
However, after talking with Steve Hall I concluded that it would be unwise at this point for me to contact the Commissioners.  We don't have anything to offer and very little new to say.   For example, according to Steve, we won't touch a blend and extend because of credit problems.  This said, he was uncomfortable saying that the entire issue was collateral.  

Trying to put something together.

Jim

Always.  By the way, did you have further thoughts about a call to develop a comprehensive Nevada strategy?

Are we still friends??

Thanks.  I hate it when I sound petulant.  

My fault for not making it clear that you should have been in the loop.  We will send out a message across the board to help with this.

Jim

This is going to sound like empire building. But I need to know what we're doing with PGE.  I don't need to participate in the calls--but I do need to know.  The PGE folks need to have confidence that I'm aware of our positions and plans.  

We are having a conference call tomorrow with PGE.  They did not decide anything on the last conference call after I told them why Enron retail in the East likes the Duquense type imbalance (no bandwidth, thus no penalties-- imbalances settle at verifiable system lambda).  John Malowney of EPMI west desk likes the bandwidth, but we are discussing it further since it has created problems for the East EES desk (due to the penalties associated with being outside the bandwidth).  John likes the PGE proposal to settle at an index price, but PGE is reconsidering that aspect.  

Unfortunately, I don't know of any TPs that allow a bandwidth without penalties. 

Let me know if you want to participate in the call.

Christi --

What's the latest on the PGE imbalance method??

Jim

Lisa --

I'll leave it to you to decide if Mike Day needs or should be at the SCE initial meeting.  I received a message that he can, but haven't told him either way. 

Pls advise.

Jim

FYI.
Thanks.  I remember everything you have taught me!
 

Nancy A. Hetrick 
Enron Corp. 
Director, Government Affairs 
Phone:  712-366-3399 
Pager:   888-912-1426 

Nancy --
 
Go get 'em!!!  You'll do great.  Just be factual and explain how you've worked on these issues in multiple states.  
 
Jim

I have spoken to Mark, he will send a list of issues to Nancy prior to the hearing.  The committee will acknowledge that you are an Enron employee, however, you are appearing in the capacity of  Chair of RMS subcomittee.  Bill B. from Ercot will be present, however he was not the most stellar witness.  Mark thinks Chairman Wolens will want to hear directly from the Chair of RMS.  The questions that you may be asked include:  what has RMS recommended to TAC, address issues of cutover from version 1.3 to 1.4...where are we, where do we go next, where are the participants on the issue?  Mark is preparing the list of questions and will email it to you soon.
 
Representative Paul Hilbert died last night.  If the funeral services are scheduled for Friday, the hearing will be postponed to enable the members of the committee to attend the funeral.  We may not know the date of the funeral until Wednesday.  I will let everyone know ASAP whether or not the legislative takes place on Friday.  Thanks, Jean 
 
 
 
 
Mark Bruce, Policy Analyst, Electric Resturcturing Legislative Oversight Committee, attended the October 25th RMS meeting.  When he left, he gave me his card and asked me to contact him after the meeting, which I did.  He asked that I forward my contact information and asked if I could be available to attend the Legislative Oversight Committee meeting on Friday, November 2nd.  This is the email that I received from him after I sent my contact information.  He has not elaborated on exactly what questions he has or would have for me.

Nancy A. Hetrick 
Enron Corp. 
Director, Government Affairs 
Phone:  712-366-3399 
Pager:   888-912-1426 

Thanks for your response ... Connie shared her V 1.4 cutover questions and  concerns with me ... if you reply to her e-mail prior to the Wed. RMS meeting,  please include me in your reply.

  
I'll keep in touch with you regarding possible questions from the oversight  committee on Nov. 2. 
  
/\/\ark Bruce 
policy analyst 
Electric Utility Restructuring 
Legislative Oversight Committee 
office: 512-463-0814 
mobile: 512-576-8995 
fax: 512-463-6783 
e-mail: mark.bruce_hc@house.state.tx.us <<mailto:mark.bruce_hc@house.state.tx.us>> 
  

Linda --

Pls put on my calendar.  Pls arrange a room and have Mike Roan and Luiz Maurer attend (also invite Kerry Stroup).  

Thanks,

Jim

During its October 24 meeting there was a great deal of discussion at the FERC about the role of transmission companies and the possibility that some activities should be parrcelled out to other entities to perform.  National Grid intends, later this week, to file a white paper in response to those queries.  Before doing so, however, Grid would welcome the opportuity to discuss its filing with you.  We will try to circulate at least an outline of those comments prior to meeting with you, but given the FERC's time constraints we cannot guarantee that we will be able to do so.  I know that Jim Steffes from Enron has spoken with at least some of you.  Based on our converstion, we have set the conference for 4:30 PM EST on Wedensday, October 31.

Dialin number follows:

1-888-422-7101
Host Code: 957625
Participant Code - 377856

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Sarah & Christi --

Can you ask the Project Leaders on the key projects for a timeline (comments due date, etc.) of their activities?  I would love to have a crib sheet to know when to expect comments.  I saw the NOPR commetns on Code of Conduct was moved to Dec 20.

Thanks,

Jim

I heard today that Brad Nebergald will take over the ILL market under Greg Adams.  I'll try and track down all the facts.

Jim

brad nebergald run ill mkt -Jim Steffes

Harry --

Do want to shepherd the development of our comments?  Team would be you (lead), Charles, Nancy Hetrick, Andy Rodriquez, Christi Nicolay.

What do you think?  

Jim
Nancy

GISB has posted the amended by-laws for industry comment by mid-November.
Is there a coordinator for Enron comments?

Charles
FYI!
 << File: GISB status report 10-29-011.pdf >> 

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Can someone please cover this meeting?  

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE: October 29, 2001

RE: November 1st Gas Issues Conference Call
      ?3:30 p.m. (EST)

We have scheduled a conference call of the Gas issues Working Group on Thursday, November 1st, at 3:30 p.m. (EST).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

November 1, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?October FERC Meetings
   ?Update on responses to El Paso 637 Compliance Technical Conference
    allocation plan (RP00-336, CP01-90)

?FERC Decisions
   ?ALJ decision regarding Transwestern negotiated contracts (RP97-288)
   ?Rehearing denial for natural gas reporting in California (RM01-9)
   ?Kern River Expansion (CP01-106)
   ?Texas Gas Rate Settlement (CP01-31)
   ?Petal Gas Storage pipeline certificate (CP01-69)
   ?ANR Pipeline (Badger) certificate (CP01-79)
   ?Tuscarora Expansion (CP01-153)

?Items Pending FERC Action
   ?Change in Affiliate NOPR due date for comments
   ?NOPR on Allowance of Partial Day Recalls of Released Capacity (RM96-
    1)
   ?Kinder Morgan North Texas Pipeline
   ?Next Call

Pls put on my calendar.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE: October 29, 2001

RE: November 1st Gas Issues Conference Call
      ?3:30 p.m. (EST)

We have scheduled a conference call of the Gas issues Working Group on Thursday, November 1st, at 3:30 p.m. (EST).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

November 1, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?October FERC Meetings
   ?Update on responses to El Paso 637 Compliance Technical Conference
    allocation plan (RP00-336, CP01-90)

?FERC Decisions
   ?ALJ decision regarding Transwestern negotiated contracts (RP97-288)
   ?Rehearing denial for natural gas reporting in California (RM01-9)
   ?Kern River Expansion (CP01-106)
   ?Texas Gas Rate Settlement (CP01-31)
   ?Petal Gas Storage pipeline certificate (CP01-69)
   ?ANR Pipeline (Badger) certificate (CP01-79)
   ?Tuscarora Expansion (CP01-153)

?Items Pending FERC Action
   ?Change in Affiliate NOPR due date for comments
   ?NOPR on Allowance of Partial Day Recalls of Released Capacity (RM96-
    1)
   ?Kinder Morgan North Texas Pipeline
   ?Next Call

cheers.

I already have it on my calendar.  

Can someone please cover this meeting?  

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Senior Manager of Policy

DATE: October 29, 2001

RE: November 1st Gas Issues Conference Call
      ?3:30 p.m. (EST)

We have scheduled a conference call of the Gas issues Working Group on Thursday, November 1st, at 3:30 p.m. (EST).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

November 1, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?October FERC Meetings
   ?Update on responses to El Paso 637 Compliance Technical Conference
    allocation plan (RP00-336, CP01-90)

?FERC Decisions
   ?ALJ decision regarding Transwestern negotiated contracts (RP97-288)
   ?Rehearing denial for natural gas reporting in California (RM01-9)
   ?Kern River Expansion (CP01-106)
   ?Texas Gas Rate Settlement (CP01-31)
   ?Petal Gas Storage pipeline certificate (CP01-69)
   ?ANR Pipeline (Badger) certificate (CP01-79)
   ?Tuscarora Expansion (CP01-153)

?Items Pending FERC Action
   ?Change in Affiliate NOPR due date for comments
   ?NOPR on Allowance of Partial Day Recalls of Released Capacity (RM96-
    1)
   ?Kinder Morgan North Texas Pipeline
   ?Next Call

Friday breakfast works for me.  6:30 am at 59 Diner.

Jim

Jim, 
It's been a while since we visited.  Let's catch up over a breakfast/lunch.  Saw Civiletto last week and he mentioned you have another bambino on the way.  My schedule is good this Friday, else Monday or Tuesday next week.  
Jason Riley 
NOVOFORUM
10370 Richmond Ave #200
Houston , Texas  77042
832.201.3120 office 
<mailto:jason.riley@novoforum.com << File: mailto:jason.riley@novoforum.com >> > 
See us at: http://www.novoforum.com << File: http://www.novoforum.com >>  
Novoforum (Latin for "New Markets") provides e-business infrastructure for manufacturing and energy companies.  Novoforum creates competitive advantage for its clients through cost-efficient solutions that enable supply chain integration and collaboration with their key customers, suppliers and service providers. 

No.  I'll let her know if she asks.

Thanks,

=09
Jim,=20

Since Susan will miss this call/meeting (vacationing in Mexico), would you =
like me to calendar about 30 minutes with her next week to fill her in?

Linda

Per Rick's promise on last Friday's conference call, he will hold another g=
eneral update call as follows:

Date:=09=09Wednesday, October 31

Time:=09=0910:30 AM (CDT)

Number:=091-800-283-1805

Location:=09ECN 4701(for those in Houston)

Thanks!

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Good work. =20

Attached is another RTO document that you can use as talking points or in y=
our meetings with policy makers.  It is the Natural Markets paper which exp=
lains the physical flow of electricity and why the proposed FERC RTO model =
works better than a fragmented model.

 << File: Natural Markets_FINAL 101801.doc >>

FYI

Kathleen: Congratulations. You did a great job protecting and even increasing the value of our IBM position. Howard

Good news on a dismal day... The New York State Public Service Commission today voted
to approve the joint settlement in the Central Hudson Rate Case.  See the attached press release.  Please contact me with any questions.

 << File: CH Press Release.pdf >> 
Kathleen A. Sullivan
Manager, Regulatory and Government Affairs
ENRON
713.345.7304 direct
713.306.8498 cell
kathleen.sullivan@enron.com

Great job.  

What are the back out rates for CH going forward?  Any improvement in the market?

Jim

Good news on a dismal day... The New York State Public Service Commission today voted
to approve the joint settlement in the Central Hudson Rate Case.  See the attached press release.  Please contact me with any questions.

 << File: CH Press Release.pdf >> 
Kathleen A. Sullivan
Manager, Regulatory and Government Affairs
ENRON
713.345.7304 direct
713.306.8498 cell
kathleen.sullivan@enron.com

I'm back in Thursday am.  Let's beat the heck out of Dynegy on this case.

Jim

Susan and I are on the case.  Are you still in DC?

yes, excellent.  thanks - i will review.

Susan and I will circulate a draft response against Dynegy's position later today.  ComEd plans to file a lengthy answer disputing Dynegy stating that there are no transmission problems due to the use of the firm LD resources and that FERC precedent does not support a capacity payment requirement.

Enron will respond similarly and include an argument that Dynegy is actually trying to create an "icap/capacity" requirement where there is none (Dynegy's pleading states "ComEd's failure to enforce the network designation provisions of its OATT also deprives Dynegy of capacity payments to which it is entitled.)  We will also include statements that the continuation of the network v. PTP transmission tariffs perpetuates these types of issues and the market/tariff design that we advocate should be approved to stop these problems.

As I mentioned in my previous e-mail, on October 17 Dynegy filed a complaint against ComEd.  This proceeding may be of particular interest to Enron given EES's plans to offer physical delivery in Illinois in early 2002.  I've outlined Dynegy's principal arguments below.  Dynegy requested fast-track processing, so any intervention and comments we file are due Friday, Oct. 26.  In order to file a timely intervention (and meaningful comments, if we decide to comment), I need to know your thoughts on this as soon as possible.  Elizabeth and Harlan, I'm copying you because I would especially like to know what you think of Dynegy's characterization of the Firm LD product.

Main argument:
Dynegy challenges ComEd's published Business Practice that allows "marketer firm" (Firm LD) contracts to be designated as Network Resources.  Dynegy argues that this practice conflicts with the OATT provisions that 1) Network Resources are generation "owned, purchased or leased by the Network Customer designated to serve Network Load," and 2) a Network Customer "must demonstrate that it owns or has committed to purchase generation pursuant to an executed contract" in order to designate a Network Resource.

Dynegy's theory on why Firm LD should not be a Network Resource:

	- permits designation of network resources that are committed for sale to others, creating reliability problems
	- Firm LD under the EEI contract is not capacity-backed, nor is it a commitment to purchase generation
	- allows transmission customers to get the advantage of generation capacity without actually paying the cost of that capacity
	- since retail providers are allowed to rely on "over-the-counter" firm instead of securing long-term contracts, adequate reserves are not being carried to serve retail load
	
Dynegy claims that ComEd's practice has deprived DMG of payments for capacity and the ability to earn revenues for capacity properly designated as network resources.  It cites specific instances in which ComEd has accepted transmission reservation requests from New Energy and Cilco in which these parties designated Illinois Power as a network resource, when only a Firm LD contracts were in place with IP.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

Don --

Can you please add Becky Cantrell, Melinda Pharms, and Guillermo Canovas to your Nat Gas weekly discussions?  Not sure if they will all come, but I'd like someone from Government Affairs at the meeting to try and keep us up-to-date on the issues.

Jim

We have not made public the SCE amount (as far as I'm aware).  We need to make sure that IR is in the loop - I think that Mark Koenig is following this issue.

Jim

Have we disclosed the $125 million SCE number in any other filing that you can recall that is public.  At the FERC maybe?  We are considering including it in our stip to be filed at the CPUC.  Peggy, would this be a problem?

Great job Leslie.  Let's keep up the pressure.

Jim

I am very impressed with these findings and the opening that is allowed for us to continue to pursue the issues with SWG.

This is far better than I had hoped for, but as you can see, it ain't over yet.  I will send out more details when I get the order, but I will move on getting the complaint drafted ASAP.  I may need a small RCR for it.

ACC approved SWG rate order today with following relevant amendments:

   1.  SWG directed to file new imbalance language within 30 days adopting "most expensive slice of gas" methodology proposed by Enron/Midwest

   2. Staff to review filing for compliance with order - has up to 120 days for this, but SWG was warned from bench not to apply current imbalance calculation during that interim period.

   3.  Finding in Recommended Order upholding SWG's current interpretation of imbalance provisions deleted - Enron instructed from bench that it should file a separate complaint for the 2000-2001 winter period which ACC would consider "without preconceptions"

   4.  Language about considering new types of transportation programs in the PGA workshops retained.

On the surface, I consider this at least a partial win.  However, Staff was particularly upset about these amendments and vowed off the record to use the 120 period to try to get the Commission to reverse its position on reducing imbalance charges.  I told Andy Bettwy that if SWG and Staff did not play games with this 30 day filing and acted in good faith during the workshops, we would be willing to discuss the issue of last winter prior to filing anything with the Commission.  He was non-committal.

May be some value here when all over.

I am very impressed with these findings and the opening that is allowed for us to continue to pursue the issues with SWG.

This is far better than I had hoped for, but as you can see, it ain't over yet.  I will send out more details when I get the order, but I will move on getting the complaint drafted ASAP.  I may need a small RCR for it.

ACC approved SWG rate order today with following relevant amendments:

   1.  SWG directed to file new imbalance language within 30 days adopting "most expensive slice of gas" methodology proposed by Enron/Midwest

   2. Staff to review filing for compliance with order - has up to 120 days for this, but SWG was warned from bench not to apply current imbalance calculation during that interim period.

   3.  Finding in Recommended Order upholding SWG's current interpretation of imbalance provisions deleted - Enron instructed from bench that it should file a separate complaint for the 2000-2001 winter period which ACC would consider "without preconceptions"

   4.  Language about considering new types of transportation programs in the PGA workshops retained.

On the surface, I consider this at least a partial win.  However, Staff was particularly upset about these amendments and vowed off the record to use the 120 period to try to get the Commission to reverse its position on reducing imbalance charges.  I told Andy Bettwy that if SWG and Staff did not play games with this 30 day filing and acted in good faith during the workshops, we would be willing to discuss the issue of last winter prior to filing anything with the Commission.  He was non-committal.

We should the testimony at FERC in the ARTO docket.  By pushing FERC to get=
 with the program and by pushing ARTO to use a better CM model, we'll get l=
everage.  Taking it to the PUCO is a nice step, but I don't think that they=
 are going to change the current ARTO program. =20

By the way, where is the PUCO on ARTO / MISO issues?

Thanks,=20

Jim
That would be great.  One thought would be to file it in the docket where w=
e filed on the native load issue, a copy of Ron's testimony. =20

Good idea!  Janine--we will get you Ron McNamara's testimony on behalf AEP =
(SWEPCO in Texas) and see if it will help in Ohio.

Why can't we use AEP's position against them in their own backyard (Ohio). =
  AEP's position is that you can't have effective retail markets without re=
al-time energy markets (which I agree with), yet there is no real-time ener=
gy market with ancillary clearing prices in AEP's service territory in Ohio=
.

Can we use their own testimony against them?

AEP asked the Texas PUC to postpone opening the Texas (outside of ERCOT) re=
tail market because there is no centralized dispatch (per Ron M's testimony=
 on behalf on AEP).  After talking with our SPP folks (I understand that EP=
MI has bid to serve a portion of Entergy's load) , Jim's testimony is that =
the outside of ERCOT Texas market should open 1/1/02 and that other states =
have implemented retail open access without a centralized dispatch model (f=
or example, AEP in Ohio, ComEd in Ilinois and Duquense in ECAR/PA).  Jim st=
ates that while RTOs and central dispatch will certainly facilitate the mar=
ket, it is not absolutely required, and that, if AEP thinks that the retail=
 market will not be competitive without it, then, perhaps, REPS other than =
AEP should be the only ones allowed to serve retail load in this part of Te=
xas until central dispatch is in place.  In addition, he states that the im=
balance provisions should be changed and that network firm capacity should =
be available to REPs (without the need for protracted system impact studies=
, since the load is already being served.)

Apparently, Entergy has also changed its mind and now is opposing the 1/1/0=
2 opening of the Entergy/Texas retail market.

Attached is the testimony that I filed today asking thh PUC of Texas to ope=
n the retail markets in the SPP territory.

Thanks,

Jim

 << File: PUCT on Order 13.doc >>

Isn't there a better option for all of the ComEd issues - open the legislation???  Why not talk with ComEd about this???

Jim

ComEd seeks rate hike for biz
Second proposal spurs opposition among regulators
Crain's -- October 15, 2001
By Steve Daniels <mailto:sdaniels@crain.com>
Commonwealth Edison Co. is pressing for another big hike in its charges for
delivering electricity to customers of rival power suppliers.

The Chicago utility's Aug. 31 filing with federal regulators to nearly
double transmission rates - for carrying electricity over its long-haul,
high-voltage lines for these customers - has triggered opposition from state
regulators.

That request followed a June proposal for a 37% increase in distribution
charges, for moving power through the utility's more local, lower-voltage
wires (Crain's, June 11). That bid is subject to approval by the Illinois
Commerce Commission (ICC).

If approved, the two rate hikes together will increase transmission and
distribution costs by about 50% for business customers that leave the
utility for competing power suppliers.

Perhaps more important, the new rates would clear the way for delivery
charge increases of the same magnitude on all Chicago-area power users in
three years, when a freeze on ComEd's rates expires.

Transmission and distribution rates account for 20% to 25% of a typical
business customer's total power bill - so, a typical bill could rise as much
as 10% with these increases.

Apart from the bottom-line hit to businesses, ComEd competitors and local
government officials also warn that the hikes could stymie the nascent
competitive market because they could prevent alternative suppliers from
offering savings from the utility's bundled rate.

AES NewEnergy Inc., the largest alternative supplier in Illinois with more
than 800 customers, says 86% of its customers will see their bills increase
if both proposals are approved.

"What this means is that large numbers of customers would be down to the
point where bundled (utility) service is cheaper, or it's so close that they
wouldn't bother choosing an (alternative) provider," says Philip O'Connor,
president of AES NewEnergy's Chicago office. "You cannot have competition
being viable when your base of potential customers is so small."

Arlene Juracek, ComEd vice-president of regulatory and strategic services,
counters that few businesses actually will pay higher rates in the short
term because the rise in delivery charges will be offset in many cases by a
corresponding decrease in "transition" fees paid to the utility when
customers use another supplier.

The Aug. 31 transmission rate proposal, filed with the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission (FERC), surprised the Illinois Commerce Commission,
which asked FERC two weeks ago to block the rate hike.

The latest rate hike proposal incorporates a proposed change in ComEd's
account methodology, in which the utility would wipe off its books more than
$660 million of accumulated depreciation of transmission assets and ask
ratepayers to shoulder that investment again.

'Unjust and unreasonable'

In its filing with FERC, the ICC said the proposed change "would result in
artificially high transmission rates, and an unjust and unreasonable
windfall to ComEd at the expense of transmission ratepayers."

"They're essentially changing the rules of the game halfway through the
game," says ICC Commissioner Terry Harvill.

ComEd responds that FERC itself - in an order last year pushing utilities to
combine their transmission assets into large, regional networks - said
utilities could consider changing the accounting method.

"ComEd believes we have an obligation to the shareholders of (parent
company) Exelon Corp. to receive compensation in accordance with what is
permissible by law," says Steven T. Naumann, ComEd vice-president in charge
of transmission services. "The commission will determine if this is what
they meant (in their order) or if it is not what they meant."

Meanwhile, the city of Chicago, frustrated by ComEd's resistance to sharing
detailed financial data, is poised to ask the ICC formally to order an
outside audit of ComEd's books for 2000. The state attorney general's office
and the Cook County state's attorney's office are joining the city in the
petition, which could be filed as early as Monday, sources say.

The audit, which ComEd opposes, would be aimed at separating ordinary
maintenance and improvement costs from the extraordinary measures ComEd took
in 1999 and 2000 to beef up its distribution system, after acknowledging it
had neglected that infrastructure during the previous two decades.

The behind-the-scenes skirmishing spotlights how seriously local government
officials are taking the regulatory proceedings. While the new rates affect
only those customers in the competitive market, they'll be the benchmark
used for the power delivery charges all other ComEd customers will pay in
2005, when the utility's "bundled" rates are no longer frozen.

Setting the rules

"The company is very much aware of the fact that the rules for the future
are getting set now," says William Abolt, commissioner of the city's
Department of Environment. "Basically, the next 36 months are going to set
an awful lot of the fees for the future."

Mr. Abolt says the audit request is one option the city has to pressure
ComEd into opening its books, but says it wouldn't be necessary if the
company agreed to do so voluntarily.

A ComEd executive says the data will be made available to those who sign a
blanket confidentiality agreement - which intervenors in the case, including
the city, aren't likely to sign.

Ms. Juracek of ComEd says the utility already has sifted extraordinary costs
associated with its $1.5-billion infrastructure upgrade out of the rate
base. But she allows that most of those are minimal tree-trimming expenses.
Large amounts of overtime paid to unionized workers, as well as contractor
expenses, are included in the rates.

"There's no free lunch here," she says.

Says Mr. Abolt: "Now, it's time to sort that all out. So, let's sort it
out."

David I. Fein
Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
203 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1500
Chicago, Illinois  60601
phone:  312-368-3462
fax:  312-630-7418
e-mail:  david.fein@piperrudnick.com

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com

Are we winning?  Any movement on our issues?

Jim

The attachment summarizes all of the comments filed by other parties in this proceeding.  They're now in alphabetical order by the party filing, and the ones that I added since last night are highlighted.  Let me know if you'd like a copy of any of them.

 << File: Summary of 10-15-01 Comments.doc >> 

I would think that we should take the time to talk with local counsel or other "allies" to get a feel for the chances in AZ.  I also think that the difficulty in AZ will be a physical problem with getting transmission service - no RTO.

It would be great to have a thorough analysis of problems in every open market just to know what the issues are.

Jim

I have received 2 calls in the last two days from EES and ENA (Lance Hinricks and David Porter) wanting to know the details of AZ electric marketing.  They are apparently revisiting things there.  So here is my reaction to the APS filing, which I had not heard about.

It is my recollection that the spin off is part of the entire-ball-of-wax settlement approved by the ACC for the APS restructuring in 10/99.  Therefore they must have filed to reopen this settlement (which was not to be allowed, of course).  The settlement, while "opening" markets, effectively keeps them closed for lack of headroom until 7/04 at the earliest.  So, if there is a commercial interest in AZ, then this filing could give us a chance to jump back in and make the arguments we made back in 99 that the settlement would not result in competition (and it didn't - time has proved us 100% correct on that) and if APS wants to change the settlement, then the non-competitive terms should be amended as well.

That said, we do not get a great reception in AZ, and it is hard to say we would have any great chance of success.  The large customers do not mind that there is no competition because they have been on a mandated rate reduction path and saw none of the price run-ups that Californians and other westerners saw last winter (at least not yet).  We would have no one on our side.  

SO, it is an opening, but I would let the commercial folks tell us how much it is worth to them, given the less than great odds.

Is this something in which you think we should be engaged?

No.  Talk with Pat Keene and/or Leslie Lawner.  We haven't done much on Arizona lately.

Jim

Are we (or EPSA) taking an active role in the filing APS made with the Arizona Commission to use the unregulated affiliate of its parent as the wholesale provider of last resort?  (There's an article on the filing in today's Electric Power Daily that says they've filed to push back the requirement that they purchase 100% of their power from the competitive market by 2004 to a requirement that they purchase 25% of their power competitively by 2008).

Sue Nord
Senior Director
Government Affairs
713-345-4196

I'll be at my desk.

Not on a plane, boat or train.  I'll call at 1 pm CDT.

How about 1pm Friday afternoon?  You on a plane.

Jim

I'm in NM Thur. and Fri..  Alway's available by phone.  Got a time in mind?

Pat --

If you're in on Friday, let's sit down for 15.

Thanks,

Jim

We should intervene based on our potential interest in serving customers pursuant to AB661(short answer=Paul's language).  It is possible that we may want to reduce revenue requirements by recommending the use of financial products to minimize utility revenue risk. We have intervened in the AB 661 regulation proceeding as Enron Energy Services, Inc. and Enron Power Marketing, Inc. If you think we can raise issues outside of "unbundling" we should limit our intervention to EES and EPMI.

Pat,

Shall I use the language proposed by Paul or would you like me to say
something different?  Please let me know ASAP as I would like to get the
petition filed today.  Thanks.

Bonnie

We have intervened in certain cases where we may have an ongoing
commercial interest to require "rate unbundling" in anticipation of
direct access.  We also can intervene on behalf of EWS who may provide
risk mgt. products to reduce utility rates (i.e., weather derivitives to
stabilize rates and reduce utility-reated risk).  In this case we are
there to make sure rates are properly unbundled to facilitate AB 661.

By this e-mail, I'm forwarding this to Pat Keene.  He will be your main
contact on Nevada matters for a while.  I'm swamped processing the
filings for the sale of PGE.  My view is that it should be both ENA and
EES.  Our interest is:  (1) we are a potential new electric resource
under AB 661; and (2) these cases will influence whether we can serve
customers under the statute as the unbundled costs incurred by our
potential customers will be determined in this case.

Pat:  What do we say in other states where we intervene and there is no
direct access?  I'd rather not say that we that we are representing the
interests of several large consumers in Nevada.  It opens our deals up
for discovery.

Paul,

As I was preparing the petition to intervene, it occurred to me that
information has changed.  Do you want the petition to reflect both ENRON
ENERGY SERVICES, INC. and ENRON NORTH AMERICA.  Also, since you do not
own LV Cogen anymore, what would you like me to put as the reasons for
intervention for these entities.  I have attached a draft petition.  It
needs to be filed on Wednesday.

Thanks for your assistance.

Bonnie

Yes.  Although probably more useful (if we have a smoking gun) in the Legislative arena.  DOE has no authority over TVA.

Jim

Ben Jacoby told me that the state of Tenn. (through an Energy Policy Committee) has implemented a moratorium on the state reviewing air permits and siting on new IPPs.  Apparently TVA is exempt from the moratorium.  He heard that TVA has been telling the govenor's office that all the new IPPs coming on line in Tenn. are putting TVA's transmission resource at jeopardy.  If this is being said, it is incorrect because, per TVA's "procedures", TVA conducts an interconnection study before connection, so TVA actually approves the interconnection, plus TVA would not let the IPP purchase transmission (or would cut its transmission).

Enron's proposed plant in Tenn. already has the air permit, so Ben is not as concerned about Enron's plants.  However, this type of behavior could show that TVA may be simply keeping IPPs off its system (even though presumably they would pay it revenue -- same problems that we continue to have with VIUs).  Could this be helpful in messaging somehow to DOE, etc. that TVA should be in an RTO?

Joe --
 
Let us know.
 
Jim

 I haven't heard anything lately about TVA forming a group.  They were talking about it early in the year and TVA said they were going to file something with FERC but never did.  I'll try to find out what's going on.

Oscar -- At this point, FERC does not have jurisdiction over coops and munis (most public power entities are non-jurisdictional) and cannot "force" them to join RTOs.  TVA does not have to join an RTO either.  However, FERC does have some carrots and sticks that it can use, for example, a public that does not join an RTO could be precluded from using the jurisdictional (actually, the rest) of the transmission system.  Therefore, many will probably join just as they have currently filed "reciprocity" tariffs at FERC in order to have the advantages of using the system.  EK Coop currently has a reciprocity tariff on file with FERC, so would probably have to withdraw it at some point if it decides not to join an RTO.

Also, requirements to make publics join RTOs are in the current legislative proposals before Congress.  I am not sure that any will actually pass; however, Enron is working on this too.

Other questions are answered below. 

Christi/Mike: 

In a meeting yesterday with East Kentucky Power Cooperative, they indicated that they will be joining a RTG to be headed by TVA which will essentially become and RTO for Public Power entities.  We have also heard indirectly, that EK will make some type of filing/release that they are non-jurisdictional and therefore not required to join any 

RTO. 

I would like your comments on whether FERC can force EK into the MISO or Alliance. 

EK has mostly 161 kv line with some 345kv and is right in the middle of the North to South transfer that takes place between the Midwest and TVA.

Key questions: 

1.  Can EK opt out of the process....even if they have a large transmission system 
[Nicolay, Christi L.]   Currently, yes, see above for sticks. 

2.  Will a RTG for public power be encouraged/discouraged.  If its discouraged by FERC, can FERC shut it down? 
[Nicolay, Christi L.]  FERC cannot actually tell publics that they cannot be an RTG; however, FERC has the same sticks.  If legislatively or otherwise (through DOE) TVA ends up joining an RTO, these others in the vicinity of TVA may well follow.

3.  Where in the process is the Public Power RTG? 
[Nicolay, Christi L.]  I am not familiar with this RTG (I don't think they have filed anything at FERC and they do not have to.)  JOE C.- have you heard anything?

any other comments would be helpful. 

thanks 

oscar 

Please put on my calendar.

Jim

Rick would like to hold a Direct Report conf. call on Thursday, September 6.  Please mark your calendars for a 30 minute call to begin @ 10:00 AM (CDT).  The dial information will be 1-800-283-1805.

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

No problem.
 
Jim

My apologies for the late notice, but I would like to take a vacation day this Friday, August 10.  I will be reachable at home (713-861-7204).
 
Thank you, 
 
Jennifer

Bob --

Before we do anything on this issue, I would suggest that we need to have developed a strategy on a number of issues (primarily the proper reformation of the PX Credit calculation after Jan 18 and the application of the 1c/kwh surcharge).

On this issue, assuming that we haven't discuss the failure of SCE to apply our account's past credit with the CPUC (given that the bills were just received), I can't imagine that a federal court would look to favorably upon a legal action.  

In addition, we have not identified where the "credits" are if they are not on the customer's accounts.  

My recommendation is to first (a) work with SCE - have Jeff Dasovich run the traps and (b) discuss the issue with CPUC Division of Energy and see if there is a solution without Complaint. 

If this doesn't get us anywhere before August 19, then it seems that to protect our interest we would need to file a complaint with the CPUC.  I am not opposed to LeBouef looking into federal action, but that seems a bit dramatic without first trying to exhaust our adminstrative remedies.

Please call me.

Jim

P.S. There is a meeting on the 1c/kwh surcharge with Janet Dietrich today at 1:30 in her office.  I think you should attend.

Now that we have the SCE bills showing that they are not going to credit past PX Credits against the T&D charges, here is the preliminary plan for challenging SCE's (and PG&E's anticipated) action.  As Diann explained, the bills begin becoming past due August 19, with late fees of 1.5% accruing thereafter.  Disconnect notices could be received 30 days thereafter, or about September 19.  Our target date for filing is Monday, August 20.  

     1.  Charley Ferguson (LeBoef Lamb) will prepare an analysis of the pro's and con's of challenging the action in federal court versus at the CPUC (considering, e.g., bias of CPUC, timing, disconnect protection, etc.).  Charley will draft alternative Complaints.   He will get the input of the bankruptcy lawyers on the draft PG&E complaint.  I will circulate these drafts as soon as they are available.

     2.  Charley will first meet with Jeanne Bennett for a "download."  After that meeting he will likely also wish to speak with Wanda and Diann for additional background information.  (Thank you for your generosity with your time.)

     3.  I will check with Sue Mara to see what, if anything, the other ESPs may be planning to do to challenge SCE's action.  Not many still have direct access customers, but some do.

     4.  I will talk to Jim Steffes about an unofficial approach to SCE.

Please let me know if I have missed anything, and I would appreciate it if you would forward this along to anyone else who you think may like to have this information.  Thanks.    

I think the best person to provide the affidavits for the PX Credit receivable is Wanda Curry (if we want to make this claim inside of the FERC proceeding - still an open question).

Jim

I met with Gary Fergus and we determined the  need to prepare affidavits and/or exhibits as part of our August 15th showing in the Califronia refund case. 

Exhbits in a FERC case require supporting documents and a sponsor (witness).

 I am trying to contact various people on getting the data together but here are the parameters of the exhibits:

Witness designations are preliminary.

1. EPMI's receivables from ISO/PX
What it shows:  ISO owes us $41.5 million and the PX $9.1 million plus any claims we want to make w.r.t. letters of credit with the PX
Sponsor: Tracy Ngo (PX data) and Murray O'Neil (ISO data)  (Tracy has agreed to prepare the exhibit but wants support from Murray's group on the ISO numbers.) 

2. EPMI's "receivables" from ISO for the underscheduling penalty
What it shows:  ISO has yet to actually implement the underscheduling penalty but has been tracking it.  According to information provided Chris Stockly, EPMI would receive $30 million of penalty revenues 
Sponsor:  Chris Stokley or Murray O'Neil

3. Enron's PX credit receivables
What it shows:  PG&E and SCE collectively owe EES $500 million
Sponsor: Steve Swain or ??

GAC

Jeff --

Seems to make sense to put out a "What's Up in Sacramento" to the whole business crew with likelihood of success.  Best to come from you.

Jim
The Assembly working group on ABX2 82 is preparing new amendments based on
yesterday's meetings.  The amendments will make 82 look even more like the
Senate bill than the previous version.  Direct access will remain in 82 with
some supposedly minor modifications.  DA will be authorized effective in
January 2002 at the sole discretion of the CPUC with some non-bypassable
charge.  There is still no number for the core/non-core dividing line.  The
Democrats still face obstacles within their own party and it is unclear if
they have the votes to pass this proposal.  They expect no support from
Republicans.

Assemblyman Keeley is going to meet with the following Senators today and
tomorrow to see if the Senate is willing to budge at all; Burton, Sher,
Bowen, Dunn and Peace.  The Assembly is not sure if they will bring up the
bill if they do not reach consensus with the Senate.

Sarah --

We have the last draft.  I was talking with Rick yesterday and I don't think that we want to publish it or use it publicly.  It did it's primary job of validating that a non-gas model structure would not be harmful to Enron's interests.

Give me a call.

Jim

Do we have a revised draft of Seab's paper "Moving from RTOs to Effective Power Markets?"  It would be a timely paper to have now, and Linda has asked for an updated version, if we have one.

Thanks

Sarah

Yes, if by Aug 19 we don't have the strategy, we should file.  

But we need a comprehensive strategy before the end of the week.  I hope to drive that to conclusion.

Jim

Jim, I am in complete accord with your assessments and recommendations.  If we don't have the strategy to which you allude in paragraph 1 figured out by August 19, though, don't you agree that we need to go ahead and file?  We're owed more credits for the  pre-January 18 period than we'll ever recoup through these bills so it is sort of a moot point as far as the recoupment effort is concerned.  

Bob --

Before we do anything on this issue, I would suggest that we need to have developed a strategy on a number of issues (primarily the proper reformation of the PX Credit calculation after Jan 18 and the application of the 1c/kwh surcharge).

On this issue, assuming that we haven't discuss the failure of SCE to apply our account's past credit with the CPUC (given that the bills were just received), I can't imagine that a federal court would look to favorably upon a legal action.  

In addition, we have not identified where the "credits" are if they are not on the customer's accounts.  

My recommendation is to first (a) work with SCE - have Jeff Dasovich run the traps and (b) discuss the issue with CPUC Division of Energy and see if there is a solution without Complaint. 

If this doesn't get us anywhere before August 19, then it seems that to protect our interest we would need to file a complaint with the CPUC.  I am not opposed to LeBouef looking into federal action, but that seems a bit dramatic without first trying to exhaust our adminstrative remedies.

Please call me.

Jim

P.S. There is a meeting on the 1c/kwh surcharge with Janet Dietrich today at 1:30 in her office.  I think you should attend.

Now that we have the SCE bills showing that they are not going to credit past PX Credits against the T&D charges, here is the preliminary plan for challenging SCE's (and PG&E's anticipated) action.  As Diann explained, the bills begin becoming past due August 19, with late fees of 1.5% accruing thereafter.  Disconnect notices could be received 30 days thereafter, or about September 19.  Our target date for filing is Monday, August 20.  

     1.  Charley Ferguson (LeBoef Lamb) will prepare an analysis of the pro's and con's of challenging the action in federal court versus at the CPUC (considering, e.g., bias of CPUC, timing, disconnect protection, etc.).  Charley will draft alternative Complaints.   He will get the input of the bankruptcy lawyers on the draft PG&E complaint.  I will circulate these drafts as soon as they are available.

     2.  Charley will first meet with Jeanne Bennett for a "download."  After that meeting he will likely also wish to speak with Wanda and Diann for additional background information.  (Thank you for your generosity with your time.)

     3.  I will check with Sue Mara to see what, if anything, the other ESPs may be planning to do to challenge SCE's action.  Not many still have direct access customers, but some do.

     4.  I will talk to Jim Steffes about an unofficial approach to SCE.

Please let me know if I have missed anything, and I would appreciate it if you would forward this along to anyone else who you think may like to have this information.  Thanks.    

As some of you may be aware, Dick's consulting arrangement with Enron ends later this fall.  In an effort to make the transition as easy as possible, I would recommend that the following people work with Dick to transition on critical committees and tasks (nothing is hardwired, so if we need to change people, let me know).

Dick will attend the upcoming WSCC EPITF meeting (not sure of date, but think in the next two weeks).  My recommendation is that Steve Walton attend with Dick and become the lead.  We may not get a voting seat after Dick leaves, but we should try and cover.

Ray Alvarez should attend the WSCC Board Meeting on Aug 27 with Dick to pick up these responsibilities.

Charles Yeung should pick up coverage for the FlowBased discussions.  Dick will not attend the next meeting in Chicago that takes place on Aug 30.  

Andy Rodriguez should pick up the Security Coordinator Subcommitte discussions that take place Sept 25 - 27.  Dick will not attend.

I think that Charles, Ray, Dick and I should attend the NERC Stakeholders Mtg on Oct 15 - 16.

Finally, Dave Perrino should go with Dick to the next WSCC OCTPG meeting.

Let me know if this transition plan works.

Jim

Not sure if we can do anything.  It's Paul's call.

Jim

FYI - 
 
Enron owns part of Northern Border Partners (as does Williams).  Crestone is a subsidiary of NBP.
 
 
Several weeks ago while in Denver I had the opportunity to meet with Brian Bierbach, Dan Bump and Don Baldridge at Crestone (I was with my husband who has met with these individuals before).  They told me that they are having some pretty significant government affairs issues, particularly related to the substantial discharge of water associated with coal bed methane extraction.  
 
To what extent can/should we support their efforts, if at all?  It seems to me that our closer association with them may give us more visibility and access in the Rocky Mountain region (assuming that this is desirable).  Does it make sense to explore this further?
 
I appreciate your feedback.  
 
Thanks,
 
Jennifer 
 

Don't we want the ISO to provide to whom the refunds are entitled?

Jim

NOTE: WE RECEIVED THIS PROPOSED SCHEDULE  FROM THE ISO AND ARE  FORWARDING =
IT ALL THE PARTIES ON OUR LIST AND ON SCE'S LIST.  PLEASE NOTE  THAT THEY I=
NCLUDE THE ADDRESS TO  FAX YOUR NON-DISLOSURE STATEMENT TO SO WE  CAN GET T=
HE DATA..
       Aug  9   ISO provides mitigated prices together with a write-up =20
                   of its methodology and two attachments: gas prices and =
=20
                   heat rates=20
        Aug 14  ISO provides Transaction data (sales by bid segment) =20
        Aug 17  ISO provides refund amounts by seller=20
                   (The remaining items that are on Staff's proposal =20
                    under the date of Aug 15th)=20
        Aug 24  Initial pre-filed testimony by all=20
        Aug 31  Responsive testimony by all=20
        Sept 5  (The items listed on Staff's proposal for Aug 22,  absent=
=20
                 the  Protective Order which already has been dealt with)=
=20
        Sept 6-13  Hearing=20
        Sept 21  Briefing by all, including proposed findings of fact =20
                    with citations to the record support =20
        =20
        In putting together the above schedule the ISO was as aggressive as=
 it  could be in making the essential data available.  Although it will not=
 be  possible to provide everything on the 9th, what will be provided on th=
at date  (the mitigated prices and their derivation) will allow the parties=
 to get  started on the most important, and possibly controversial, data se=
t, and will  include the items covered by the Order issued by Chief Judge W=
agner.  The  above schedule does afford Judge Birchman 10 days to prepare h=
is findings and  still comply with the 45 day limitation if he is willing t=
o commence that 45-day  schedule on Aug 17th, the date on which the ISO wou=
ld complete the above  submission.  If Judge Birchman does not believe that=
 he is free to do so in  light of the Commission Order, we would urge that =
he certify to the Commission  our joint request for a modest extension.  (W=
e do believe that the ISO will  be in compliance, certainly substantially s=
o, with the data that it is to  produced within the specified 15-day period=
 and we read the Commission Order as  intending to provide the ALJ a full 4=
5 days from the completion of the data  submission.)
  =20
        There is another important process issue that we have got to put in=
 place  IMMEDIATELY.  May I please prevail on you to include in your transm=
ittal to  all of the parties that they should fax a signed copy of the Non-=
Disclosure  Certificate to Stacey Karpenin at the ISO (mailing the original=
 to her).   Stacey's fax number is (916) 608-7296 (her phone number is (916=
)  608-7273).  In the transmittal to Stacey the ISO should be advised of th=
e  Company name and its billing code (there will be charges associated with=
  preparing the disk as well as air courier charges), the person to whom th=
e  materials are to be sent together with that individual's address, phone =
and fax  numbers. Upon receipt of the faxed signature page the ISO will air=
 courier ONE  set of the materials to the designated individual. The ISO ca=
n only assure that  it will be able to air courier the materials for delive=
ry on the 9th if it is in  receipt of the Non-Disclosure Statement and the =
above information by 3 PM (PDT)  on the 8th.
       

Sue --

We should probably file something on this CPUC docket just ensuring that if these meters are put in place, ESPs have access on a timely basis to the data if they serve the customer DA.  What do you think?  Maybe the Vinio could help?

Jim

Fine.  Same here.

Jim

Jim,

	With all the other travel I have, I am not planning to attend the ESCA Summit 2001 in Las Vegas, unless you have objections.

Steve

Can we have a meeting on Friday at 9am this morning as an update?

Jim

Yes.  Shapiro will also attend as I may need to be in Houston.

Jim

Looks like it will be Teusday at 10:00 AM.  Grid is bringing some folks from the UK so monday is tough.  Does that work for you?

Dan --

The EES offsite has been cancelled.  I am now coming to DC for the National Grid meeting.  I can fly up as early as Monday am to attend a meeting.

Thanks,

Jim

Jeff -- 

Are you going?  The list looks pretty good.  If not, we may need to have someone there.
 
Jim

Jeff:
 
Below is a list of expected attendees at the CERA meeting at La Costa.  
The price is $2,500 (sorry, manicures not included!)
 
Jennifer

Jennifer, 

Here's a partial list of some notable registrants for the upcoming Summit. 

Hope you're able to make it. 

Dave 

- Federal Energy Regulatory Commission: Dan Larcamp (or designee), Director, Office of Markets, Tariffs and Rates 

- Nevada Public Utilities Commission: Commissioner Richard M. McIntire 

- California Energy Commission: Chairman William Keese 

- Arizona Corporation Commission: Commissioner Marc Spitzer 

- Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission: Chairman Glen Thomas 

- Florida Public Utility Commission: pending confirmation 

- Texas Public Utility Commission: pending confirmation 

- U.S Department of Energy: Jimmy Glotfelty, Advisor to Secretary Abraham 

- Federal Trade Commission: Commissioner Thomas Leary 

- Electric Power Supply Association: Executive Director Lynn Church 

J. Stuart Ryan, Executive Vice President, AES Corporation 

Ray Spitzley, Managing Director, Morgan Stanley 

Christopher Lowe, Vice President, JP Morgan 

Dougl W, Kimmelmann, Managing Director, Investment Banking, Goldman Sachs Gary Rodford, Senior VP, BC Hydro 

Cheryl Muench, VP, Black & Veatch 

Gary Lavey, General Manager, Global Risk Management, Cinergy 

Grady Blakley, VP, Engineering & Construction, El Paso Energy 

Ron Litzinger, Senior VP, Worldwide Operations, Edison Mission Energy 

Terry Bundy, Administrator & CEO, Lincoln Electric Systems 

Armando Olivera, Senior VP, Power Systems, FP&L 

Stan Marks, VP, North America, NRG 

Tom Patrick, President & CEO, Peoples Energy 

Jack Farley, President, West Region, North America, Reliant Energy 

Curtis Morgan, President East Region - North America, Reliant Energy 

Tim Leyshock, Senior VP, Siemens Power Transmission and Distribution 

Denise Russell, Director, Market Analysis, Williams Energy Mktg & Trading 

Can we talk at 9am your time - lots going on.  

Jim

Sue, thanks.  I think it would be a good idea to see what others with Direct Access customers and a negative CTC balance are considering doing.

As I mentioned previously, ARM is supporting the SCE approach which does not charge DA customers for the 1 cent.  ARM is working with the Energy Div staff to get a favorable ruling on it.  We decided that approach had the highest probability of success.  But ARM will seek to change the earlier order charging DA if this approach doesn't work. 

 I have not really talked to other ARM members on the PX Credit balances.  I can if you like.  I believe we should follow the requirements in our tariff and ESP/UDC agreement for a dispute as the best first step.

Sue,

Any information about whether ARM plans to challenge the passthrough of this?  Also, on a separate subject, are there any plans to challenge PG&E's and SCE's removing our PX Credit balances from customer's bills?

Jeff & Sue --

We need to discuss at 9am your time (as well as other things).

Jim

Privileged and Confidential Attorney-Client Communication

This is to recap our discussion today about two billing issues--recoupment =
of the PX Credit and the $10 surcharge.  I would appreciate it if those of =
you with more first-hand information, particularly Wanda and Diann, correct=
 or clarify anything I've misstated.  Also, please forward this to anyone e=
lse with an interest in this matter.

A.  Recoupment of the PX Credit (also known as the "Negative CTC")

     1.  Background:  The issue here relates to the fact that PG&E and SCE =
are no longer reflecting credit balances on the bills for our customers.  P=
rior to our returning the customers to bundled service in March, the bills =
would reflect the PX Credit as an offset to T&D charges.  SCE and PG&E have=
 now removed the PX Credit from the bill and are attempting to charge us fo=
r T&D, despite the fact that they owe us hundreds of millions of dollars in=
 PX Credits.  This is potentially harmful particularly in view of the opini=
on of perhaps three of the Commissioners that the PX Credit can only be col=
lected as a bill credit, and not in cash.  Mike Day, our regulatory lawyer,=
 expressed his strong opinion that removing the Credit from the bills was i=
mproper, and that we should challenge the action by making a filing with th=
e CPUC.  Note:  the PX Credit to which I am referring here is that which ac=
crued to prior to December 31, 2000; the utilities do not dispute that a PX=
 Credit accrued during that time frame, and there is no dispute as to the p=
roper methodology for computing the PX Credit for that time frame.  Further=
more, PG&E and SCE are in virtual agreement with us as to the amount of the=
 Credit that had accrued as of December 31, 2000.

    2.   Action Items/Issues:  (a)  With respect to SCE, Legal is evaluatin=
g filing a suit in federal court versus filing at the CPUC.  The CPUC has a=
 process whereby we could prevent the utilities from disconnecting our cust=
omers while the issue is being determined (by depositing the payments in an=
 interest-bearing account controlled by the CPUC); while there is no equiva=
lent procedure in federal court, one can request that the court enter an in=
junction against the utilities disconnecting customers.   While the analysi=
s is worth doing, I suspect that we will conclude that we have to go to the=
 CPUC for relief.  (b)  With respect to PG&E, the banruptcy team is evaluat=
ing whether to file at the CPUC or in bankruptcy court.

    3.  Timing:  Late fees will begin accruing August 20.  The first discon=
nect notices would not be received until September 19.

    4.  Effect on other CTC issues:  Pursuing action at the CPUC or in cour=
t to force the utilities to restore the PX Credit to our bills has no effec=
t on the issues of how the CTC should be calculated post-January 17, and pr=
ospectively.

B.  $10 Surcharge

     1.  Backgound:  Although when provisionally imposed in January the $10=
 surcharge went to the utilities to keep them financially solvent,  when ma=
de permanent in March it became dedicated to defray the DWR's purchases of =
power on behalf of the utilities.  This evolution gives rise to two bases f=
or EES to argue that it should not bear the financial burden of the $10 sur=
charge.  First, since the $10 surcharge is now dedicated to purchasing gene=
ration for bundled customers only, and not direct access customers, direct =
access should not have to pay it.  This is the same logic that caused the C=
PUC to exempt direct access customers from the $30 surcharge.
Secondly, if legitimately applied to direct access, because it is of no dir=
ect benefit to direct access customers it (arguably) can only be viewed as =
a tax.  Under EES's contracts with its customers, taxes assessed at the del=
ivery point are borne by the customer.  Note:  SCE, unlike PG&E, may not im=
pose the $10 surcharge on direct access customers, according to a filing ma=
de at the staff level at the CPUC, so this action may relate to PG&E only.

     2.  Action Items/Issues:  (a)  Regulatory (Jim Steffes) has the lead i=
n advising us about a challenge to the application of the $10 surcharge to =
direct access customers at the CPUC.  It may be advisable for an industry g=
roup rather than Enron to make the filing.  (b)  I would expect that we wou=
ld follow the same procedure outlined above--depositing the payment with th=
e CPUC--to prevent any customer from being disconnected.  In the interim we=
 would likely bill the customer for the surcharge and promise a credit if o=
ur challenge to the application of the surcharge to DA customers is success=
ful. (c) A decision will need to be made on how far we go back--to July 1 w=
hen the customers became DA again or to January 4 when the surcharge was fi=
rst imposed.

     3.  Timing.  Same timeframe as with the Recoupment issue since we will=
 need to have CPUC challenge on file to prevent late fees and disconnect no=
tices.

     4.  Effect on other CTC issues:  Regulatory (Jim Steffes) will analyze=
 with the appropriate people the effect, if any, of taking this position on=
 other CTC issues (principally how CTC should be calculated post-January 17=
, and prospectively).=20

End.    =20

 

Thanks.  Maybe we should have Nancy Hetrick simply put in a place holder.

Jim

But in the past two years you've asked us to get out and stay out of these cases on meters. Is this a change?  I don't believe that meter data is an issue given that meter data is a separate and competitive function -- so far anyway -- but I'll check.

Sue --

We should probably file something on this CPUC docket just ensuring that if these meters are put in place, ESPs have access on a timely basis to the data if they serve the customer DA.  What do you think?  Maybe the Vinio could help?

Jim

Call Greg Sharp.
 

Who in EES would market a retail product to the commercial real estate community in Dallas?  

Janel--

No one on my team is really qualified.  
 
Jim

 
As part of Public Affairs Global New Economy Initiative (GNEI), Margaret Allen has requested a comprehensive list of publications whose audiences are state and federal policymakers.  
 
For example, Roll Call, The Hill, National Review and Weekly Standard are a few of the magazines and newspapers whose readership includes the U.S. Congress.  
 
Part of the GNEI brand marketing initiative may include a certain level of advertising by Enron in these publications, and therefore it's important that we deliver to Margaret an adequate list to work from.  
 
Please identify someone on your team who will be responsible for pulling this list together and send me their names so that we can coordinate.
 
In addition to Washington, DC you should focus on those states where Enron has a significant stake in the wholesale and retail energy business as well as states where policies are being debated that affect Enron's other commodities (broadband etc).  
 
I will need the name of your designee by Friday, August 10th 
 
Margaret needs a final list by Friday, August 17th.  
 
Thanks!

RECEIVED

This is a test for the master  California refund e-mail group.  Please send a confirmation  
e-mail to me to let me know that you  have received this e-mail. 
 
Thanks!
 
 

Nothing.  I'll give him a call.

Jim

Jim:

Have you received any feedback as to whether they need additional data?

Thanks, 

Jennifer
Daniel:

Attached is the research I did on components of residential electricity rates for select states (CA, MA, NY and PA).  As discussed, once you have reviewed it, please forward it on.  Please let me know if you have any questions or if you require additional information.

Jennifer
713-345-3550

 << File: residental rate components.xls >> 

Steve & Rick --

FYI.  PG&E Bankruptcy counsel has provided the below stipulation that holds any further action on this issue for 48 hours.  It appears that PG&E doesn't want to be anywhere near the CPUC.

Provide more details as they go through.

Jim

This is the stipulation we were able to receive from PG&E to allow Lisa and I to negotiate a stipulation within the next 48 hours.  We will keep you posted.

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
Content-Transfer-Encoding: quoted-printable
Received: from securemail1.llgm.com ([10.4.218.42]) by llgm.com; Tue, 04 Sep 2001 15:30:58 -0400
Received: from 131.89.128.10 by securemail1.llgm.com with ESMTP ( Tumbleweed MMS SMTP Relay (MMS v4.7)); Tue, 04 Sep 2001 15:33:13 -0400
X-Server-Uuid: 2ddd99fc-ca0e-11d4-9906-00508bdcbe76
Received: from dns00.pge.com (dns00 [131.89.128.66]) by can01new.pge.com (8.11.6/8.11.6) with ESMTP id f84JQMf20600; Tue, 4 Sep 2001 12:26:22 -0700 (PDT)
Received: from dns02.comp.pge.com by dns00.pge.com (8.8.8+Sun/SMI-4.1) id MAA19213; Tue, 4 Sep 2001 12:26:20 -0700 (PDT)
Received: from exchange01.comp.pge.com by dns02.comp.pge.com ( 8.8.8+Sun/SMI-4.1) id MAA04104; Tue, 4 Sep 2001 12:26:16 -0700 (PDT)
Received: by exchange01.comp.pge.com with Internet Mail Service ( 5.5.2650.21) id <R5A9YAGB>; Tue, 4 Sep 2001 12:26:16 -0700

Carl:

This will confirm the agreement of PG&E not to take any action for 48 hours
with respect to our ongoing disputes with Enron.  We will meet with you and
your client tomorrow in an effort to formulate a process for resolution of
outstanding issues.

Obviously, this is without prejudice to anyone's rights.

Jim Lopes

Makes sense to me.  Good luck.  Let me know if you need anything.

Jim

Becky and I were talking earlier about the meeting Donna is setting up with FERC on the MA rule.   I think we should also use the occasion to talk about the reporting requirements for the CA gas market, and how they don't work.  Any feelings on this?

FYI

Attached is a Word document with my notes from the PG&E meeting last Thursday August 1.
I am also including an Excel spreadsheet that shows how the PX credit is calculated under the various methods that have been discussed.

My conclusion is:
PG&E continues to make unpredictable and arbitrary decisions without applying with the CPUC.  If not for the PX receivable, I would recommend an immediate protest to halt this behaviour.
They are also bending the existing rules so far as to strain credibility.

The SCE method of calculating a PX credit is the best choice both from a logical perspective and does not require an adjustment to our mark.  (Again, setting aside the PX receivable issue.)  Many external parties support it, the CPUC is heading in this direction.
It makes sense because it keeps DA customers paying for the services they use, i.e. T&D.
DA may be getting a "break" to the extent the current generation rate pays for "past sins", i.e. if market prices are below embedded generation plus the 3-cent surcharge.  This is where a yet-to-be determined nonbypassable CTC may come from.

Setting the PX credit equal to the Market Price is unlikely to be approved, on a go-forward basis.  If PX Credit = Market, the  DA customer will only pay frozen rates.  Although this confirms to AB1890 since the rate freeze is not technically over, it is unlikely that this will go forward since:
bundled customers are paying more than rate-freeze rates
there is no agreed-upon market price

  

Cheers.  

My participation is exceedingly spotty.  My past experience is that  we tend to know what's going on and that EPSA's information is more from published sources.    

Not sure if this is something you follow.  Do these calls help you at all?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO:	State Issues Committee

FROM:	Jane Cahill, State Issues Committee Chair
                Samantha Slater, Manager of State & Regional Affairs

DATE:	August 2, 2001

RE:	August 6th West Region Conference Call
                REMINDER

We will hold a conference call on Monday, August 6, 2001, at 2:00 p.m. (EDT).  This week's call will focus on legislative and regulatory issues and recent developments in the West region.  To access this call dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the EPSA/Samantha Slater Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

August 6, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?	Arizona
?	California
?	Colorado
?	Montana
?	Nevada
?	New Mexico
?	Oregon
?	Washington

Guillermo -

Can you please find the different prices (coach vs. business) so I can have a record?

Thanks,

Jim

Below are the flight reservations I am doing in advance for Christmas, to prevent last minute problems. I am arranging to flight coach. I think you would not mind my eventually exchanging 2 business tickets for 4 coach (as far as I know, the coach rate is less than half the business).
I would leave Houston Friday, Dec 21 at 7:02pm and return Thursday, Jan 03 at 8:44am
Please let me know if this is OK with you.
Thanks
Guillermo

______________________________________________________
Flight:  	United Airlines flight 855  (Non-Stop)
Depart:  	Miami, FL (MIA) - Fri, Dec 21 at 11:55pm
Arrive:  	Buenos Aires, Argentina Pistar (EZE) - Sat., Dec 22 at 10:35am
Seats:  		18A, 18B (Boeing 777 Jet)
Freq. Flyer:  	UA 01206857591
Meal:  		Dinner / Snack/Brunch
Status: 	Confirmation Code  KCKH3W
______________________________________________________
Flight:  	United Airlines flight 854  (Non-Stop)
Depart:  	Buenos Aires, Argentina Pistar (EZE) - Wed, Jan 02 at 9:55pm
Arrive:  	Miami, FL (MIA) - Thu., Jan 03 at 4:35am
Seats:  		34A, 34B (Boeing 777 Jet)
Freq. Flyer:  	UA 01206857591
Meal:  		Dinner / Snack/Brunch
Status: 	Confirmation Code  KCKH3W

______________________________________________________ 
 ______________________________________________________
Airfare Summary-Prices shown in U.S. dollars  	Subtotal: 2304.20
Travelers 	Base price per person 	Taxes & Fees 	Total Price
2 adults 	1079.00 	 	73.10 	 	2304.20
______________________________________________________

______________________________________________________
Flight:  	Continental Airlines flight 190  (Non-Stop)
Depart:  	Houston, TX Bush (IAH) - Fri, Dec 21 at 7:02pm
Arrive:  	Miami, FL (MIA) - Fri., Dec 21 at 10:39pm
Seats:  		15A, 15C (McDonnell Douglas MD80 Jet)
Freq. Flyer:  	CO XY240413
Meal:  		Snack/Brunch
Status: 	Confirmation Code  V7RGP4
______________________________________________________
Flight:  	Continental Airlines flight 7  (Non-Stop)
Depart:  	Miami, FL (MIA) - Thu, Jan 03 at 7:00am
Arrive:  	Houston, TX Bush (IAH) - Thu., Jan 03 at 8:44am
Seats:  		8A, 8B (Boeing 737-300 Jet)
Freq. Flyer:  	CO XY240413
Meal:  		Snack/Brunch
Status: 	Confirmation Code  V7RGP4

______________________________________________________ 
 ______________________________________________________
Airfare Summary-Prices shown in U.S. dollars  	Subtotal: 641.50
Travelers 	Base price per person 	Taxes & Fees 	Total Price
2 adults 	290.23 	 	30.52 	 	641.50
______________________________________________________

I approve.

Jim Steffes

Melly,
This is to confirm you that my supervisor, James Steffes, has approved my taking English clases.
As we spoke, I would take 2 clases a week from 5 to 6:30pm. Days to be determined.
Regards.
Guillermo

Aleck --

Will try and find.  Not sure if the material is responsive.  Read the article (sending to others on TO list).  Maybe Ursula Brenner can help you pull a response together?

Jim

Jim,  I am preparing a response to a recent article in the Toronto Star (liberal left anti-competition editorial board but Toronto's largest circulation daily).  Lisa is faxing you a copy.  Rick mentioned you had some data re the economic and environmental benefits that accrue from greater optimization of the treansmission grid.   Can you or your assistnt send me that data.  Thanks Aleck  -   fax number below. 

Aleck Dadson
Senior Director, Government Affairs
Enron Canada Corp.
1100 - 70 York Street
Toronto, ON     M5J 1S9
Tel:  416 865 3707
Fax: 416 865 3766
Email: Aleck.Dadson@enron.com
 

thanks for update.  pls keep sending info.

The attached document summarizes the main tasks I did in the last weeks.

 << File: ww1.doc >> 

FYI.  Some info on the CA experience.

Jim

 

Can you please get a hard copy for me?

Jim
FYI.

Samantha M. Slater
Manager of State & Regional Affairs
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 New York Avenue, N.W.
11th Floor
Washington, D.C.  20005
Phone: 202-628-8200
Fax: 202-628-8260
E-mail: sslater@epsa.org
Received: from femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com	by mail.epsa.org; Wed, 01 Aug 2001 08:18:30 -0400
Received: from cc470486-a ([65.8.222.90]) by femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com          (InterMail vM.4.01.03.20 201-229-121-120-20010223) with ESMTP          id <20010801121806.MXGF553.femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com@cc470486-a>;          Wed, 1 Aug 2001 05:18:06 -0700
Message-Id: <4.2.0.58.20010801081608.00ca48a0@mail>
X-Sender: hirstea@mail
X-Mailer: QUALCOMM Windows Eudora Pro Version 4.2.0.58
Date: Wed, 01 Aug 2001 08:16:55 -0400
Dear Colleague,
The Edison Electric Institute just published a paper, The California Electricity Crisis: Lessons for Other States, which I wrote. The paper is available on the Publications page of my website, www.EHirst.com << File: http://www.ehirst.com/ >> . Please let me know if you have any comments on the paper.
Here is a summary of the paper:
        California was supposed to show the rest of the nation a brighter electricity future. That future, as outlined by the California Public Utilities Commission in 1994, envisioned an electricity industry featuring competitive markets. Such markets were intended to produce lower costs and more choices for consumers, while ensuring profits for efficient energy suppliers and encouraging the retirement of old, inefficient power plants.
        Although the first two years of restructuring (beginning in April 1998) seemed to bear out these promises, the last year has been a disaster for California's electricity consumers, taxpayers, and electric utilities. Part of the fallout from California's electricity crisis is considerable concern-even opposition-in other states to restructuring the electricity industry. 
        Although a few states have decided, based on the California experience, not to restructure, I believe that is the wrong outcome. Instead, the primary lessons other states should learn from California are that competitive markets can work; competition is not to blame for California's problems; and basic economic principles of supply, demand, and prices affect market outcomes.
        Section 2 of this paper briefly reviews the history of electricity regulation and restructuring in California and the problems that occurred beginning in May 2000. Section 3, the heart of this paper, offers guidance to other states on the key ingredients of a competitive electricity industry. This section makes several points:  
Maintain a favorable investment and regulatory climate for new generation to ensure that enough generation capacity is online and planned to meet growing loads.  
Ensure that enough infrastructure (transmission capacity and natural gas pipeline capacity) is in place and planned to meet growing loads, maintain reliability, connect new generators to the grid, support large regional markets, and provide fuel to power plants.  
Encourage retail customers to participate in dynamic-pricing and voluntary-load-reduction programs (i.e., couple retail and wholesale markets).  
Create honest retail competition: avoid standard-offer rates with artificial discounts and create conditions that encourage many companies to offer retail services without favoring individual competitors.  
Encourage electricity suppliers to manage and diversify their supply and price risks.  
Create efficient and integrated wholesale markets for energy, ancillary services, and transmission congestion.  
Monitor and minimize horizontal market power (generation) and vertical market power (combined ownership and operation of generation and transmission).  

        Ultimately, competitive markets for electricity will lower costs and prices, better align consumer prices with producer costs, improve producer efficiency in both investment and operation, maintain or improve reliability, and yield greater innovation in customer services and pricing options. 
        But, this transition from one industry structure to another is turning out to be long and complicated. It is complicated because electricity is so important to our modern, high-tech society; electricity is our most flexible fuel, providing light, heat, motive power, and the energy to operate all our electronic equipment. Also, electricity truly is a real-time product for which production and consumption must occur at the same time. 
        Although the problems that have occurred in California are substantial and worrisome, regulators and legislators in other states should focus on the long-term benefits of competitive electricity markets and accept the possible short-term problems that may occur. They also need to recognize that wholesale markets are regional in scope and extend far beyond the boundaries of any single state. Finally, competition in retail and wholesale markets must be coordinated; in particular, it is not possible to have competitive wholesale markets unless at least some retail load faces time varying prices. 
        If states restructure properly to create competitive markets for wholesale energy and retail services, we should all benefit. Consumers will enjoy lower prices, they will have many more choices of energy services and price-risk tradeoffs, reliability will be improved because most reliability services will be obtained through markets instead of by engineering edict, and the financial risks associated with building and operating power plants will be assigned properly to investors rather than consumers. 
Eric

Probably have to work through Kaufman for Seminar / Education cost.

Jim

I'm seriously considering going.  It's an hour plane ride away, and the presenters look darn good.  Does this cost require and RCR?
 
Best,
Jeff

Jeff -- 

Are you going?  The list looks pretty good.  If not, we may need to have someone there.
 
Jim

Jeff:
 
Below is a list of expected attendees at the CERA meeting at La Costa.  
The price is $2,500 (sorry, manicures not included!)
 
Jennifer

Jennifer, 

Here's a partial list of some notable registrants for the upcoming Summit. 

Hope you're able to make it. 

Dave 

- Federal Energy Regulatory Commission: Dan Larcamp (or designee), Director, Office of Markets, Tariffs and Rates 

- Nevada Public Utilities Commission: Commissioner Richard M. McIntire 

- California Energy Commission: Chairman William Keese 

- Arizona Corporation Commission: Commissioner Marc Spitzer 

- Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission: Chairman Glen Thomas 

- Florida Public Utility Commission: pending confirmation 

- Texas Public Utility Commission: pending confirmation 

- U.S Department of Energy: Jimmy Glotfelty, Advisor to Secretary Abraham 

- Federal Trade Commission: Commissioner Thomas Leary 

- Electric Power Supply Association: Executive Director Lynn Church 

J. Stuart Ryan, Executive Vice President, AES Corporation 

Ray Spitzley, Managing Director, Morgan Stanley 

Christopher Lowe, Vice President, JP Morgan 

Dougl W, Kimmelmann, Managing Director, Investment Banking, Goldman Sachs Gary Rodford, Senior VP, BC Hydro 

Cheryl Muench, VP, Black & Veatch 

Gary Lavey, General Manager, Global Risk Management, Cinergy 

Grady Blakley, VP, Engineering & Construction, El Paso Energy 

Ron Litzinger, Senior VP, Worldwide Operations, Edison Mission Energy 

Terry Bundy, Administrator & CEO, Lincoln Electric Systems 

Armando Olivera, Senior VP, Power Systems, FP&L 

Stan Marks, VP, North America, NRG 

Tom Patrick, President & CEO, Peoples Energy 

Jack Farley, President, West Region, North America, Reliant Energy 

Curtis Morgan, President East Region - North America, Reliant Energy 

Tim Leyshock, Senior VP, Siemens Power Transmission and Distribution 

Denise Russell, Director, Market Analysis, Williams Energy Mktg & Trading 

Agreed.  Ray Alvarez is working with Fergus and Watkiss, etal to get this taken care of.

Jim

You both probably already know this, but just to reiterate from my notes.  We need to be in the position to produce the following for FERC:
Paper trail that proves its value
Paper trail that explains the assignment from EES to EPMI (if that is indeed true)
Identify who will prepare the affidavit and give testimony if needed

Jim, we talked about the first one but not the next two.

Please do not contact these customers. 

FYI, Enron signed the following customers after July 1 (we are checking on Wal-Mart).

I would like Bev and Hedy to rank these parties with their ability to help in Sacramento with our messaging.  Once you have this, let's talk this afternoon to plan going forward.

As you can see from the e-mail, we are going to have to work through our business people.

Jim

1.  Jack in the Box (Jack in the Box's name cannot be used without their prior consent) ;
   2.  BD Biosciences;
   3.  Ball Corp.
   4.  TABC -- Toyota;
   5.  Raytheon;
   6.  Burger King (Batla Franchises);
   7.  Northrop;
   8.  Toys r' US; and
   8.  Wendy's

The following originators are responsible for the deals set forth above:

1.  Michele Sorensen  (562) 901-3807 -- Jack in the Box & Burger King (Batla Franchises);
2.  George Waidelich  (925) 543-3500 -- BD Biosciences & TABC Toyota
3.  Rob Rice                    x58065               -- Ball Corp.
4.  Mark Allen                  x58926               _ Raytheon
5.  Mike Moore               x39668               _  Northrop
6.  Scott Porter                x31842              _   Toys r' US
7.  Rick Campbell          x54530              _  Wendy's

Please note that the originators I have spoken do not want their customer's to be contacted without being consulted.

Hope this helps.  If I hear of any other customers who have signed or renewed after July 1 I will notify you.

John McMullan

 

Steve --

Alan is on vacation next week.  Jeff is tied up.  Bryan Gottfredson will be compiling this information.  

By the way, there may not be a listing of who (meaning generators) is owed how much - wasn't disclosed in the FERC Settlement.

Jim

Ken is talking to Willie Brown today.  He will encourage him to get involved as a facilitator for a comprehensive solution to the California problem.  Ken would like to have the following information to provide Brown perhaps next week:

Listing of who is owed how much in California
Listing of the forward contract holders and the relative size of their positions.
Any insights about the correlation (or lack of correlation) between the names on those lists
Listing of the defendants in the class action suits.

The objective is to identify for Brown what his leverage would be (and what benefits could be offered) if he were to convene the parties to work for a comprehensive solution.  Please let me know who will take the lead on this.

With Alan Comnes on vacation starting this week, the primary point person from Enron Govt Affairs will be Ray Alvarez in our DC office.  Ray will be following up on this and other filings, etc. on this case.

Jim Steffes

I have drafted a detailed outline on our receivables due from the underscheduling penalty.  Because the penalty has not been implemented by the CAISO, our case needs to clearly lay out the CAISO has failed to implement FERC orders and what our receivable is even though we have no invoices to rely on.

The biggest "to dos" on this are: (1) update our receivable amount to the extent we can get more data from CAISO (we have asked for data informally from CAISO), (2) lodge discovery questions re: the computation of our receivable (I drafted questions in Section 5), and (3) review Enron's past positions on this matter.

I am assuming that sections 1. and 2. will go in our pleading and/or policy testimony and that sections 3. AND 4. will be beefed up and/or updated by Murray O'Neil (with help from Stokley and Blair).  

I am on vacation from 8/11//01 - 8/24/01 so please look at this ASAP so that I can answer any questions before I leave.

 << File: Underscheduling Penalty Receivable Draft.doc >>  << File: CAISO Data on Underscheduling Penalty 010101thru041801.zip >>  << File: EOB Request for Rehearing June 14.pdf >> 

Lisa --

Please let me know what else I need to do.

Jim

there are some things that do not match betweed cpuc and bankruptcy pleadings and some things that need to be corrected and refined. leboeuf is going to send list of questions/open items that need to be tracked down to bob and i by tomorrow morning i believe.  i have asked linda to arrange a time to talk tomorrow with ferguson/kingley at leboeuf and bennett and she will be calling you about doing. kingsley said they were meeting with bennett today. 
let her know if any others need to be involved re this part. 

Steve --

FYI on the information your requested.  Bryan is working to pull this together ASAP.  What exactly is the deadline?

Jim

JIm: 
	I wanted to let you know my progress as of 5:45, Thursday.

Listing of who is owed how much in California
	I have left messages (both email and phone) with Ray Alvarez (who is currently in D.C.)

Listing of the forward contract holders and the relative size of their positions.
	Jenn Thome helped with this, and we have a good list.

Any insights about the correlation (or lack of correlation) between the names on those lists
Listing of the defendants in the class action suits.
		Linda Guinn, in legal, said she would gather some information, regarding the preliminary creditors involved in the PG&E bankruptcy by Fri. morning.(Richard 		Sanders is on vacation).  I was unable to reach Lisa Melencamp today. 
		Bill Bradford is currently checking with Mike Tribolet to see what they may already have.  He is going to update me in the morning.

	Linda explained to me that a list of defendants may be rather lengthy, and that if we could be more specific in our search request it will help her.
	I will be in tomorrow ASAP and if my sources cooperate, should have a report by early afternoon.

	Bryan

Bryan --

FYI.  Not sure if you are going.

Jim

Please Note:

The Underwriting Meeting generally held each Friday @ 10:30 am in EB2831 has been rescheduled to 10:00 am for tomorrow, Friday, August 10, 2001.  Thanks.

If you want to talk about the KY issues, probably best to get with Janine Migden.

Jim

Tom:

Just to recap what we discussed to make sure I understand.

Next Steps

1. You have asked counsel from Akin, Gump to analyse the possible options we may have to intervene at a the federal regulatory level in the Eon take-overs. Possible avenues are the FERC and the SEC. I understand that you and she will also carefully examine any options we mave via the USTR - which may prove to be our strongest hand. She will provide you with an assessment of the various options and risks to these options in the course of the next week or so. As you know, Andreas and I have spoken to Steffes, Shapiro, and Frevert - all of whom were supportive of this idea and so no marked risk to our relationship with Eon or possible 

2. Akin Gump  will also file an intervention on our behalf with the FERC re the Eon acquisition of LG&E by no later than cob Monday to provide us with a place holder in the proceedings should we wish to act. We will jointly contact Shaw on Monday to 
let him know that this is being done. 

3. Building from our meetings in Washington, Russ Kean from Kissinger and Associations will draft up an initial "political leverage" program which would cover the following:  

what goals we might realistically achieve by engaging senior US politicians in the issue of energy market opening in Germany and equal treatment for American companies; 
what key messages would we want to develop to generate high-level political interest in this; 
what politicians and decision-makers should we want to approach, how should the messages be presented, and how can we galvanise political action (possible targets would be the US Trade Rep,. the White House/ VP Cheney, key members of Congress, US Assistant Secretaries at State and possibly Commerce, and local politicians in Kentucky)

4. You and I can then pull this material together into a coherent presentation for Eric and other senior folk in London to present the program of how, in a graduated fashion, we can apply increasing pressure on Eon to seek their co-operation and or acquiesance in regulatory areas such as unbundling, regulated TPA, and reciprocity as well as  commercial issues such as tolling agreements, and  long-term interconnector capacity. Mark Frevert has offered to raise any of this with Harig (head of Eon) if and when we want.   

5. On a parallel path, we will continiue to get the message out that the German market is not open and US firms are suffering when John meets with the Congressional Delegation in Berlin next week and a meeting slated with the new US Ambassador (Coates) in Berlin later in September.

Missing Items:

1. Do we have interest in also developing a PR angle to this program? It may be a bit premature, but, if so, we would need to work with Enron's PR agency to develop the messages we would want to get out, the vehicles for doing so, the localities to hit, and the follow-up.  

2. We still need more detail from (Shaw, Thompson, and Radmacher) on exactly what their commercial priorities are and how to balance these with regulatory objectives. 

3. An assessment for options at the state regulatory level. 

4. Have meetings yet been set up with USTR? This is a key pressure point.

Let me know what other thoughts you may have and let's talk tomorrow afternoon.
Thanks, Paul 

Yes.

I spoke with Mary Kay Miller when she was in town to give her an update of where we were on the storage project.  I told her we had gotten the LeBoeuf law firm and Brown, Williams involved to help.  I told her that both firms suggested that once pipelines were sufficiently interested in the storage monetization products, they should set up meetings at FERC and with their own respective pipeline customers in order to explain specific storage monetization proposals.

She was glad for the update and was comfortable with the suggested meetings as long as Enron did not attend the meetings at FERC or with the pipeline's customers.  This seems what LeBouef and Brown, Williams had in mind, since the pipelines are responsible for the regulatory needs of the storage project.  Enron is merely offering background research in order to get the pipelines interested in the storage monetization and to give the pipelines ideas on how to put the project in the best regulatory framework at FERC.

I would like to send this note to Paul Bieniawski if you agree with my comments.

--Donna

I can't - in a UNITED WAY event.

Jim

SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP

DATE:	Friday, August 10, 2001
TIME:	11:00 am (CST)
TOPIC:	Recoupment
LOCATION:	EB38C2
DIAL IN:	800/998-2462
PASSCODE:	5458498

Please advise if you will be able to participate.

Linda Simmons

FYI.  The EES USA organization has been reorganized to centralize all sales teams under Jeremy Blachman.  Scott Gahn's group stays unchanged.

Harry, you and I may want to let people in the field know these changes?

Jim

Sent by:	EES Distribution
Attached please find two documents from EES Office of Chairman:

                

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

 

Can you please get a hard copy for me?

Jim
FYI.

Samantha M. Slater
Manager of State & Regional Affairs
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 New York Avenue, N.W.
11th Floor
Washington, D.C.  20005
Phone: 202-628-8200
Fax: 202-628-8260
E-mail: sslater@epsa.org
Received: from femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com	by mail.epsa.org; Wed, 01 Aug 2001 08:18:30 -0400
Received: from cc470486-a ([65.8.222.90]) by femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com          (InterMail vM.4.01.03.20 201-229-121-120-20010223) with ESMTP          id <20010801121806.MXGF553.femail27.sdc1.sfba.home.com@cc470486-a>;          Wed, 1 Aug 2001 05:18:06 -0700
Message-Id: <4.2.0.58.20010801081608.00ca48a0@mail>
X-Sender: hirstea@mail
X-Mailer: QUALCOMM Windows Eudora Pro Version 4.2.0.58
Date: Wed, 01 Aug 2001 08:16:55 -0400
Dear Colleague,
The Edison Electric Institute just published a paper, The California Electricity Crisis: Lessons for Other States, which I wrote. The paper is available on the Publications page of my website, www.EHirst.com << File: http://www.ehirst.com/ >> . Please let me know if you have any comments on the paper.
Here is a summary of the paper:
        California was supposed to show the rest of the nation a brighter electricity future. That future, as outlined by the California Public Utilities Commission in 1994, envisioned an electricity industry featuring competitive markets. Such markets were intended to produce lower costs and more choices for consumers, while ensuring profits for efficient energy suppliers and encouraging the retirement of old, inefficient power plants.
        Although the first two years of restructuring (beginning in April 1998) seemed to bear out these promises, the last year has been a disaster for California's electricity consumers, taxpayers, and electric utilities. Part of the fallout from California's electricity crisis is considerable concern-even opposition-in other states to restructuring the electricity industry. 
        Although a few states have decided, based on the California experience, not to restructure, I believe that is the wrong outcome. Instead, the primary lessons other states should learn from California are that competitive markets can work; competition is not to blame for California's problems; and basic economic principles of supply, demand, and prices affect market outcomes.
        Section 2 of this paper briefly reviews the history of electricity regulation and restructuring in California and the problems that occurred beginning in May 2000. Section 3, the heart of this paper, offers guidance to other states on the key ingredients of a competitive electricity industry. This section makes several points:  
Maintain a favorable investment and regulatory climate for new generation to ensure that enough generation capacity is online and planned to meet growing loads.  
Ensure that enough infrastructure (transmission capacity and natural gas pipeline capacity) is in place and planned to meet growing loads, maintain reliability, connect new generators to the grid, support large regional markets, and provide fuel to power plants.  
Encourage retail customers to participate in dynamic-pricing and voluntary-load-reduction programs (i.e., couple retail and wholesale markets).  
Create honest retail competition: avoid standard-offer rates with artificial discounts and create conditions that encourage many companies to offer retail services without favoring individual competitors.  
Encourage electricity suppliers to manage and diversify their supply and price risks.  
Create efficient and integrated wholesale markets for energy, ancillary services, and transmission congestion.  
Monitor and minimize horizontal market power (generation) and vertical market power (combined ownership and operation of generation and transmission).  

        Ultimately, competitive markets for electricity will lower costs and prices, better align consumer prices with producer costs, improve producer efficiency in both investment and operation, maintain or improve reliability, and yield greater innovation in customer services and pricing options. 
        But, this transition from one industry structure to another is turning out to be long and complicated. It is complicated because electricity is so important to our modern, high-tech society; electricity is our most flexible fuel, providing light, heat, motive power, and the energy to operate all our electronic equipment. Also, electricity truly is a real-time product for which production and consumption must occur at the same time. 
        Although the problems that have occurred in California are substantial and worrisome, regulators and legislators in other states should focus on the long-term benefits of competitive electricity markets and accept the possible short-term problems that may occur. They also need to recognize that wholesale markets are regional in scope and extend far beyond the boundaries of any single state. Finally, competition in retail and wholesale markets must be coordinated; in particular, it is not possible to have competitive wholesale markets unless at least some retail load faces time varying prices. 
        If states restructure properly to create competitive markets for wholesale energy and retail services, we should all benefit. Consumers will enjoy lower prices, they will have many more choices of energy services and price-risk tradeoffs, reliability will be improved because most reliability services will be obtained through markets instead of by engineering edict, and the financial risks associated with building and operating power plants will be assigned properly to investors rather than consumers. 
Eric

Sent the wrong address first time.

Jim

Please do not contact these customers. 

FYI, Enron signed the following customers after July 1 (we are checking on Wal-Mart).

I would like Bev and Hedy to rank these parties with their ability to help in Sacramento with our messaging.  Once you have this, let's talk this afternoon to plan going forward.

As you can see from the e-mail, we are going to have to work through our business people.

Jim

1.  Jack in the Box (Jack in the Box's name cannot be used without their prior consent) ;
   2.  BD Biosciences;
   3.  Ball Corp.
   4.  TABC -- Toyota;
   5.  Raytheon;
   6.  Burger King (Batla Franchises);
   7.  Northrop;
   8.  Toys r' US; and
   8.  Wendy's

The following originators are responsible for the deals set forth above:

1.  Michele Sorensen  (562) 901-3807 -- Jack in the Box & Burger King (Batla Franchises);
2.  George Waidelich  (925) 543-3500 -- BD Biosciences & TABC Toyota
3.  Rob Rice                    x58065               -- Ball Corp.
4.  Mark Allen                  x58926               _ Raytheon
5.  Mike Moore               x39668               _  Northrop
6.  Scott Porter                x31842              _   Toys r' US
7.  Rick Campbell          x54530              _  Wendy's

Please note that the originators I have spoken do not want their customer's to be contacted without being consulted.

Hope this helps.  If I hear of any other customers who have signed or renewed after July 1 I will notify you.

John McMullan

 

Charles + Steve + Ray + Dave + Andy --

There have been a number of e-mails related to my initial request for a transition plan for Dick Ingersoll.  

By this e-mail, I am asking that Charles Yeung take the lead on ensuring a smooth transition and that all meetings are appropriately covered.  Please coordinate as a team to work out the details.  Charles please also consider that Jose Bestard will be returning at some point in the near future.

Thanks,

Jim

I am planning to go to the Security Subcommittee meeting in Sept since I will be there for other NERC meetings that week.  I may need Andy or Steve to cover the Flowbased meeting onA Aug 30, I am conflicted with a NERC meeting on RTO Scheduling practices on that day.

As some of you may be aware, Dick's consulting arrangement with Enron ends later this fall.  In an effort to make the transition as easy as possible, I would recommend that the following people work with Dick to transition on critical committees and tasks (nothing is hardwired, so if we need to change people, let me know).

Dick will attend the upcoming WSCC EPITF meeting (not sure of date, but think in the next two weeks).  My recommendation is that Steve Walton attend with Dick and become the lead.  We may not get a voting seat after Dick leaves, but we should try and cover.

Ray Alvarez should attend the WSCC Board Meeting on Aug 27 with Dick to pick up these responsibilities.

Charles Yeung should pick up coverage for the FlowBased discussions.  Dick will not attend the next meeting in Chicago that takes place on Aug 30.  

Andy Rodriguez should pick up the Security Coordinator Subcommitte discussions that take place Sept 25 - 27.  Dick will not attend.

I think that Charles, Ray, Dick and I should attend the NERC Stakeholders Mtg on Oct 15 - 16.

Finally, Dave Perrino should go with Dick to the next WSCC OCTPG meeting.

Let me know if this transition plan works.

Jim

Howard --

I received a call from Jeff Brown who said that he had visited the NYPSC and NYISO to discuss load curtailment.  He had placed a few calls into you and hadn't heard back.

When you get back, please let me know where this stands.  No big deal, but I want to understand what is going on with the load curtailment efforts.

Jim

A few thoughts before the NG meeting --

1.	Maybe we should (as a team) call Transelect (Paul Buckman) before our NG meeting.  You may remember that Transelect sent an initial letter into Skilling to try and solicit our support for stopping the NG application to be managing member of the ARTO.  I think that it would be good to call Buckman and ask if he has a better idea than NG.  We are right now stuck between two very bad answers - let AEP and FE construct a managing member or have NG.  Maybe Transelect has a better solution.

2.	Chief Issues with NG --
a.	are they "really" independent?  having a short position in NY and owning generation in NE effectively makes NG into a "market participant" - I think that Enron should make as a hold firm position that to operate an RTO there can be no agreement with anything less than almost perfect independence.
b.	who do they feel the customer is?  maybe we want to get Paul Dawson's take on their business model from the UK.  it is critical that the new RTO operators across the country view traders/marketers and generators as their key customers.  what form of regulation for cost recovery of their operating expenses do they want - pass thru, PBR, etc.? 
c.	who writes the tariff?  I would make a strong argument that the problem with most of the RTO work to date has been that FERC has allowed the current incumbents to first write a bad tariff and then assign the provision of service under that tariff to someone who has very little (if any) control over future changes.  the RTO operator must be free to make changes to the tariff with only two constraints - (1) must not restrict the ability to pay facility revenue reqts and (2) must not damage the assets.  
d.	do they intend to build/own transmission and how does this impact the energy markets?  will their planning and construction processes impact any long term positions that EPMI may take in the energy market.  how do they manage to allow other merchant transmission into the business?
e.	how do they intend to provide balancing energy?  the flip side of our fight on congestion management involves the pricing of energy imbalances.  what is NG intending to do on this issue?  does NG believe that multiple control areas makes sense for a single RTO?  does NG support unbalanced/uncovered schedules day-ahead?  

Also, just to let people know, Kerry Stroup will also be working on the Midwest RTO efforts going forward.  Please keep him included on the e-mails.

Jim

Meeting confirmed with National Grid for 10:00 am, Tuesday, August 13, 2001 at National Grid's office, 633 Pennsylvania Avenue, Washington, D.C.

Attendees from Grid will include some or all of the following people:

Nick Windsor (UK)
Phillip Johnson (UK)
Tony Hill (Business Dev)
Peter Flynn (US Transmission)
Masheed Rosenquist (US Transmission)
Paul Halas (US Transmission)

Leslie -

Can you coordinate with Jay Dudley at 503-464-8860 on how to change the filing (if at all) on PGE's pipeline issue?  PGE is willing to modify the filing to try and take out the language on Native Load.  They are suggesting that maybe they should sign a contract for the full amount of the capacity (about 170,000 mmcf/d) rather than assume its right.

The goal should be to have a final decision on next steps before next Friday, Aug 17.

Please call me with any questions.

Thanks,

Jim

Jeanne --

Not quite sure that I am getting the picture.  Let me lay it out more directly.

The PX Credit for October 2000 was $225 based on the actual market rates.

Now FERC is saying that October 2000 hourly prices for CalPX DA and CalPX HA markets were "too high" in June 2001.  Can the CPUC change the PX Credit for October 2000 and make the Utilities recalculate our Negative CTC?

What is prospective?  Have they ever done this before?

Jim

Jeff and Jim --

I have done some research into the issue of whether the CPUC would be able
to restate the UDC's PX Energy Charges (and thus PX Credits) back to October
if the FERC were to apply its mitigation plan back that far. Thus far, my
research indicates that the answer is yes (or at least there is a strong
argument that the answer is yes) and it would not violate the rule against
retroactive rate making.  The reasoning is as follows:

The Commission (as affirmed by the courts) have ruled that they may subject
a utility's rates to refund to account for adjustments made pursuant to a
methodology or formula adopted before the date the utility's rates became
subject to refund. Thus any ratemaking is considered prospective because the
formulas are in place before the utility's rates are made subject to refund.
The PX Energy Charge is calculated pursuant to the formula/mechanism set
forth in the utility's tariffs.  These charges were always subject to
adjustment on a prospective basis due to the settlement process.  The change
in energy prices which would be effected by the FERC ruling could very well
be viewed as an adjustment made pursuant to a formula.  Thus the change
would not be considered retroactive ratemaking.

I had a chance to talk with Mike Day for a couple of minutes about this
issue.  He concurred with my analysis.

Jeanne

P.S. Please forward this e-mail to anyone you think needs to see it.     

YOUR BUDDY
Monday on Jerry Bowyer in the Morning:
?        Monday is the 20th anniversary of Reagan's signing his famous tax cut bill, and Americans for Tax Reform's Grover Norquist is here to talk about what it has meant for our economy.
?        Senator Rick Santorum responds to President Bush's decision on stem cell research funding.
?        Brian Wesbury gives us the economic news.
Listen Monday morning and every weekday morning, from 6-9am, on Pittsburgh's New Talk Radio, 1360 WPTT.
Call with your comments, at (412) 333-1360
To comment on the program, e-mail me at susan@jerrybowyer.com .
To unsubscribe reply to jerrybowyer@home.com  with "remove" in the subject line.
Jerry Bowyer
Pennsylvania Newsmakersseen across the state on these television stations: www.jerrybowyer.com/coveragemap.php     
The Jerry Bowyer Programon WPTT radio in Pittsburgh, 1360am: www.1360wptt.com/bowyer 
Focus on the Issueson Cornerstone Television
Audio clips from these programs can be heard at www.jerrybowyer.com/audio.php  
412.771.2282 phone
412.771.2363 faxjerrybowyer@home.com    
 

Rick --

FYI.  Becky heard Michelle Foss talk the other day.  Was very aligned with our perspective.  Maybe someone for FERC?

Jim

Susan -

I put together a short write-up and would like to submit to HR for your mid-year.  Because you've only been here a short time, most of the responses are To Be Determined.

If you don't have any problems, please come by and sign.

Thanks,

Jim

Looks good.  Please make sure that you submitted an RCR.  

If Ed wants more info of this type for other states, I'd like to make sure that we organize our efforts so we don't duplicate too much and deploy the proper resources.

Thanks,

Jim

I agree with Christi's point.  The problem is that those arguments - effectively that real competition will take away market power - are no longer effective at FERC.  I think that Massey and Wood are ready to do something more potent.  My primary question is how do we think that Appendix A would apply to Enron?  Do we want Hirenymous (sp?) to undertake a proxy exam to see the real impact?  
 
I am going to try and schedule a phone call for next Friday to outline our next steps.  Should anyone else be in on the call?  Who else could lead this analysis for us (given that we are all so busy)?

Jim
 
 

After looking at the EPSA draft documents (Craig Roach etc.), here are some thoughts.  Also, it seems that we should be able to work with EPSA (then hopefully it can be Enron's position, as well).  
 
Ideas for Determining Market Power mitigation:
--How long can price be influenced?  (for example, a generator in a load pocket vs. DSM, onsite generation, new transmission, new technologies, additional generator).
--Price spikes in times of shortage are normal -- This can signal the need for more generation, gas, etc.  Prices should reflect costs that are incurred during drilling, etc./ keeping rigs available, etc.
--Market Power can be mitigated in a variety of ways by new entry through IPPs, merchant transmission, regular cost based transmission, access to interconnectiion and transmission on a non-discriminatory basis.
-- Need real time price and other RTO information (transparency) in order to effectively monitor and to send good price signals for the new entrants (who are putting their capital at risk, rather than the traditional cost -based, almost guaranteed recovery).

Christi & Sarah -- 

Any preference for how we proceed on developing an Enron position?

My preference is to establish stronger mechanisms but I don't know how to make them only apply to generators, not to marketers.

We need this pretty soon. 

Jim 

Sent:   Monday, August 06, 2001 2:21 PM 
Hello Jim- 

Greetings from the sweltering city of Washington!  Per our conversation, you know that we are hosting a one day meeting on market based rate analysis here in Washington in September to "roll up our sleeves" and develop an official EPSA position, if possible, as FERC moves forward on the issue.  What I'd like to get out of this message is where Enron stands - what is your take on the hub and spoke, and what are your suggested alternatives?  I'd like to get a heads up of our members' perspectives on the matter prior to the meeting so as to structure the agenda in the most effective and helpful manner.

As you know, Commissioner Massey has been very vocal about re-evaluating the hub and spoke, and we now have Commissioner Brownell voicing similar concerns.  Whether or not we see a NOPR in the future is anyone's call, but I'd like EPSA to be an industry leader if and when the opportunity arises.  Any help you can provide would be appreciated.

Regards- 
-erin 

Erin N. Perrigo 
Manager of Policy 
Electric Power Supply Association 
1401 New York Ave., NW 
11th Floor 
Washington, DC  20005 
p)  202.628.8200 
f)   202.628.8260 
eperrigo@epsa.org 

not sure.  it was stated rather quickly in passing.

In what capacity?  Is that instead of Marcus Datson?

I heard today that Brad Nebergald will take over the ILL market under Greg Adams.  I'll try and track down all the facts.

Jim

brad nebergald run ill mkt -Jim Steffes

Linda --

Please arrange a phone call with Christi & Sarah Novosel to discuss market power for this upcoming Friday.

Jim

I assume that we will discuss the entire process on the next NERC call?  

Jim

Bullet 4:
FERC cannot directly "amend" a proposed standard (I was told this is because the Canadians would object to FERC telling them what to do directly); however, FERC can remand a proposed standard to the ERO for a modification by a date certain.  The proposed standard is not implemented until the modification is made.  (In some cases, a proposed standard takes effect automatically if FERC fails to act on the proposed standard within a specified period of time.)

At the GISB - EPSA meeting last Thurs, the GISB people clearly stated that GISB has NO authority over its members, it is 100% voluntary.  All the muscle lies in FERC and any governmental agency that is willing to adopt the GISB standard.  Agencies in Mexico for example have adopted certain GISB standards.  In fact, ANSI acreditaion requires that the standards setting organization NOT to have authority.  So it makes sense for FERC to not amend a proposed standard since other agencies will have to be able to adopt it.(e.g.- Canada)  I don't see a problem with this - but this makes the consensus building process even more important since the final product must be amenable to any and all relevant governement authorities.  

This is a good reason why the legislation cannot give deference to the ERO, especially one which proposes to have compliance and enforcement authority as NERC's proposal.  If NERC is going to set standards AND have compliance authority over its members - then the ANSI acreditation they claim to be getting will not be the same as that of GISB.  ANSI does not allow this combination.  If the deference language is in the legislation - that means the GISB/EISB proposal is excluded from FERC's choice.  FERC needs to be aware of this.  So why does the voluntary GISB process with FERC oversight model work? 

It is the very nature of knowing FERC has final authority that makes the consensus building process work - not the threat of the ERO's compliance authority over its members as NERC approaches this.  In GISB, the  members know that if they do not produce a standard that all its members and FERC can live with - FERC will not adopt it, nor can FERC amend it - and since no enforcement mechanism will be behind the mis-guided standard (remember it is 100% voluntary), it becomes a worthless exercise.  This is a powerful incentive.   

On the other hand, NERC's approach of a standards organization with enforcement power sets the stage for power struggles between sectors and knocks down the consensus building attitude the GISB process encourages.   Compliance and penalites are not assigned or targeted to every member/sector.  Certain parties are impacted by certain standards - and in different ways. For example - a congestion management standard will affect a control area very differently than it would a power marketer.  The penalites may not apply at all to the marketers who want to protect themselves by making the congestion management penalites as harsh as possible and vice versa for the control areas.  If the ERO doles out compliance without FERC approval - then the standards will become a battleground over compliance and penalties. The point is the enforcement and penalty debate will drive sector arguments and will cloud the real task of developing an equitable congestion management standard.

Attached is a summary I did of the key points in the Final Draft of the NERC reliability legislation, as amended yesterday.  While it is now shorter than the old version, and some of the objectional features have been deleted or watered down, I assume we still do not support the final version.  We and others who attended these meetings have been asked to provide our comments and position by close of business on Thursday, August 16th.  I thought the summary would help highlight the major features so we can evaluate the final version in light of our concerns and interests in this subject.  Your comments are welcome.

 << File: SummaryNERCFinalDraft081001.doc >> 

Susan --

Please discuss with Ben (you may want to call Barbara & Christi to see if anyone else has discussed already) and relay importance of this to his future plans to me?  Key question is whether or not we need to be engaging directly with local governments.

Jim

 - TEXT.htm 

Nancy --

Please keep John & Charles in the loop on this question.  They are both working on next steps for NERC and while not directly related to the RSB, there is potential for overlap down the road.

Also, where does Enron publicly stand on the incorporation of this into an EISB?  I thought we were ready to go?  Finally, are you giving the presentation?

Jim

Attached is a copy of the presentation that the UBP Governance Committee plans to give at the August 14th and 15th meeting.
 << File: GISB Aug Mtg rev2.ppt >> 

Linda --

Let's talk about all expense report matters tomorrow.  Also, please send out reminders to everyone that I want to deal with this only on Friday and not to go too long without a report.

Thanks,

Jim

PLEASE ENTER INTO MY CALENDAR.

Jim

CORRECTION: THIS CALL WILL BEGIN ON TUESDAY 8/14

 
Ray Alvarez
08/10/2001 07:10 PM
Please plan to participate in daily 30-minute teleconferences that I will host, regarding the status of the captioned proceedings.  Starting next Monday 8/13:  

Time:			6:00 PM EDT, 5:00 PM CDT

Dial in number:		888.296.1938

Participant code:	955164

Host code:		524906

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Ginger --

I am taking that entire week off.

Jim

Rick would like to hold another budget meeting in September.  Please see the dates below and let me know how many of the dates will work for your schedules

September 25, 26 & 27.

Please get back with me at your earliest convenience.

Thanks

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Tom --

Can put some analysis into this market opportunity and relay the results to the Enron Direct team?  Current Shopping Credit versus 2002 Shopping Credit versus market.  

Maybe we should be highlighting the opportunity to pick up some quick market share where the saving opporunities are relatively large and have Enron Direct enter now to lock in the deals?

Jennifer Thome may be able to help you with this project (although she may have some other projects).

Jim

PennFuture's E-cubed is a commentary biweekly email publication concerning the current themes and trends in the energy market. If you have trouble reading this email, please see the document on our website (www.pennfuture.org) under Pressroom & Publications.
August 10, 2001
Vol. 3, No. 15

Pittsburgh 2002: A Golden Opportunity For Renewable Energy

The end of large stranded cost charges to consumers will usher in a golden opportunity next year for the Pittsburgh area to become the renewable energy capital of America. In the Duquesne Light Service Territory in 1996, rates for some customers approached 50 percent above the national average, with residential customers paying more than 12 cents per kilowatt-hour (kWh). Of this 12 cents plus total, about 8.5 cents was for just generation.

And what did consumers get for this premium 8.5 cents generation price, well above any price - including for today's 100 percent renewable energy products - seen in Pennsylvania's competitive retail market since 1997? Did they get clean and safe energy? Not unless you believe that coal and uranium are renewable resources.

In fact, the Pittsburgh area was powered by incredibly expensive nuclear plants that often were shut down more than they ran, as well as some of the highly polluting coal plants that kill 2,250 Pennsylvanians each year with microscopic dirt, cause acid rain, produce smog, and contribute to global warming. Both the pollution and the high costs were jammed down the throats of consumers by monopoly-friendly regulators.

Those who challenged the legacy of high rates and dirty power and asked the old Pennsylvania monopoly utilities about renewable energy were often lectured that renewable energy technology would cost more or was not practical. Today's competitive retail market shows how wrong those lectures were. Right now in Pittsburgh, four competitive suppliers (two are Green-e certified) are offering 100 percent renewable energy products for prices ranging from 6.5 cents to 7.5 cents per kWh. Those prices are less than the 8.5 cents Duquesne's customers paid for coal and nuke generation five years ago. In fact, they are more than a full cent less per kWh.

Since renewable energy products exist in the marketplace, are exponentially cleaner, and cost less than Duquesne's traditional power products, why have they so far not swept the marketplace?

Can You Say Stranded Costs or Competitive Transition Charges?
Customers who switch to renewable energy products pay not just the price of the product, but also a regulatory stranded cost charge of up to 3.39 cents per kWh. On a system average basis, the stranded cost charge is 18 percent of each customer's total electric bill and for residential customers it is a whopping 27 percent of the total electric bill. The stranded cost charge is paid even if you switch from Duquesne Light to another company, and allows Duquesne to recover uneconomic investments in nuclear power made when it was a regulated generation monopoly. Without the collection of stranded cost charges, Duquesne may have gone bankrupt.

Yet, adding the stranded cost charge to the otherwise less costly renewable energy products has the effect of increasing a customer's total bill when s/he bought renewable energy products. Thus stranded cost charges are a real barrier to renewable energy products and other competitive retail electric products.

But in 2002 in the Duquesne Light service territory, the regulatory ball and chain of stranded cost charges will be eliminated by giving a large total rate cut of probably 17 percent to all residential customers and by increasing the shopping credit from 4.89 cents to about 6.1 cents for residential customers. The removal of stranded cost charges means many Pittsburgh-area customers will soon be able to switch to renewable energy products and pay less or no more than what they were paying for electricity in 1996.

Yes, they could save even more by buying even lower cost dirty power products. But the coming opportunity to power Pittsburgh with renewable energy and pay less than 1996 bills is a once-in-a-century chance.

The Duquesne Transition
The reason why Duquesne will be the first Pennsylvania utility to eliminate stranded cost charges is its successful sale of its generation plant. Duquesne first swapped some generating assets with FirstEnergy and then sold all of its generating assets to Orion, while contracting with Orion to continue to provide default service to Duquesne's native load customers. Duquesne has provided distribution service and Orion has provided default generation service at capped rates without notable problems.

Without a former monopoly utility with a vested interest in keeping generation customers, a far greater portion of customers switched to a competitive supplier than anywhere else in the U.S. Competitive suppliers now serve about 30 percent of all Duquesne customers. The number of Duquesne customers served by competitive suppliers rose steadily until peaking in late 2000 at about 185,000, held steady through spring 2001, and then declined to about 171,230 as of July 2001. The recent decline occurred when retail offers exceeded the system's shopping credit but remained well below Duquesne's 1996 generation rate of 8.5 cents.

Today, there are four competitive suppliers offering six different products to residential customers in the Duquesne territory, one of which is priced below the shopping credit and enables customers to switch and save, and four of which are renewable energy products. Recent sharp declines of more than 50 percent in forward electric markets make it likely that more products will soon be able to beat the current Duquesne shopping credit of 4.89 cents and of course the 8.5-cent 1996 monopoly rate.

After 2002, the two remaining principal impediments of completing a successful transition to competition in the Duquesne Light service territory will be the full integration of its control area and wholesale market into PJM and wide deployment of demand-response technologies. Time-of-use meters and appliance-control devices allow customers to profit from reducing usage in summer peak hours, protect reliability, reduce market power, and can lessen pollution. The failure to achieve PJM integration and demand response could derail the benefits of stranded cost elimination and what has been so far a successful transition for the Duquesne Service territory.

No More Stranded Costs!
Stranded cost charges will likely be first removed for residential customers starting in March 2002. Up until now, average system customers have had to pay 18 cents on every dollar paid for total electric service so that Duquesne could recover its stranded costs. With the end of stranded cost charges, different classes of customers (and different individual customers, depending on their usage) will receive a substantial rate cut.

Current Prices for Electric Service from Duquesne Light
(Rates in cents/kWh)
                         RS Rate         GS         GL
Distribution     4.263             2.453        0.475
Transmission 0.250             0.257         0.119
Generation     8.50                 6.451        3.172
CTC portion
of Gen.             3.390             2.205         0.926
Shopping
Credit             4.880                 4.246         2.246
Total             12.533                 8.085         3.646

The portion of the bill that is the "Competitive Transition Charge" represents the basic rate reduction that each class will enjoy when the charges are terminated. The charges are scheduled to end in March for general residential customers (RS), April for smaller commercial customers (GS), and September for larger commercial customers (GL). The charges end for other customer classes as late as April, 2004. Residential customers using 600 kWh/month, for example, will stop paying 3.39 cents/kWh for stranded costs, reducing their total electric bill by 27 percent.

Real Market Prices
Generation rates will still be regulated for customers receiving default generation service under Duquesne's contract with Orion. However, the rates will no longer reflect the remnants of pre-restructuring cost-of-service rates. Instead, they will be based (imprecisely) on "market rates." When the PUC approved the sale of Duquesne's generating plants and the transfer of the default service to Orion, it approved tentative default rates at "market prices" as determined by the Duquesne contract with Orion.

The precise level of default rates remains unknown, however. Consumers would see total rate reductions of about 21 percent if the default rate is set at 5.5 cents/kWh, and a total rate cut of 17 percent if it is pegged at 5.9 cents. Again, these default rates are well below the 8.5-cent 1996 monopoly rate.

Although the Duquesne/Orion contract set and the PUC approved the default rates, the rates did not assume that Duquesne would be joining PJM West. There have been some non-public discussions taking place between the PUC, Orion, and Duquesne as well as some public discussions, but at this point it is unclear whether the existing rates should or will be adjusted. Whatever the precise answer, the PUC needs to move these proceedings to the public domain and resolve the issues expeditiously, so that customers and suppliers may plan to take advantage of the new market opportunities.

Competitive Market Opportunities
In 2002, the shopping credit will increase for customers who choose to buy generation from a competitive supplier instead of Orion's default service. Given reasonable assumptions about market prices and what the shopping credit may be, it appears that competitive suppliers will have substantial opportunities to provide competitive service at prices below the shopping credit. For example, if the present residential shopping credit of 4.88 cents/kWh is raised to 5.75 cents/kWh, as presently scheduled, consumers would have a modest opportunity to save by shopping in addition to the savings that all customers - including those remaining on default generation service - will experience from the end of stranded cost charges. If the residential shopping credit is increased to about 6.15 cents/kWh, suppliers competing on price would have a substantial opportunity to offer consumers meaningful savings by shopping.

One might presume that the 30 percent of all customers already shopping in the Duquesne service territory include many of those most interested in shopping. Will the opportunity to save a bit more after receiving a 17 percent rate decrease without shopping be sufficient to entice many of the remaining customers to shop? Setting the rate too low will provide a disincentive to shop by delivering even more savings to non-shopping customers who already will be getting a huge rate cut because of the end of the stranded cost charges. Given that "market rates" are a prediction that no one has been making accurately, perhaps the PUC should err on the high side to increase competitive market opportunities. There is no better time for doing so than when all customers are about to receive a huge rate cut from the elimination of stranded cost charges.

Renewable Energy's Time is Now
Even moderate additional shopping based on price does not mean a non-competitive market, however. Perhaps the most successful competitive suppliers will be those that offer products or services that encourage customers to switch for reasons other than price. Renewable energy, energy efficiency, and demand-side response products may well provide suppliers with the competitive edge.

The opportunity for renewable energy market penetration is, in fact, unprecedented. Two new wind farms are under construction at this time in Somerset and Fayette counties, bringing the total installed wind capacity in the region to about 34.4 megawatts (MW). Two additional wind farms are under development in the same area and another is under development about 30 miles across the state line in West Virginia, potentially bringing an additional 127-145 MW of wind power to serve the Pittsburgh market. Depending on the precise shopping credit, it is likely that wind electricity from these developments could be sold to retail customers at prices close to or not too far above the shopping credit.

Even if buying renewable energy is not the lowest cost option, consumers would still be investing a portion of their 17 percent rate cut in renewable generation and still receive a reduction in their electric bill from what is now paid. For example, a residential customer could buy one of the five renewable products presently available to consumers in the Duquesne territory and still save from 1 cent to 2 cents per kWh. Alternatively, consumers probably will be able to buy 50 percent wind energy and still receive a total electric bill more than 5 percent less than it is today and was in 1996.

Large institutions, government agencies, businesses, and families can, without increasing their current electricity bills, become renewable energy consumers. With their choices, they can make Pittsburgh known far and wide as the first green-powered city.
PennFuture (www.pennfuture.org), with offices in Harrisburg, Philadelphia and Pittsburgh, is a statewide public interest membership organization, which advances policies to protect and improve the state's environment and economy. PennFuture's activities include litigating cases before regulatory bodies and in local, state and federal courts, advocating and advancing legislative action on a state and federal level, public education and assisting citizens in public advocacy.

To unsubscribe, simply reply to this email with "unsubscribe" in the subject.
 - vol3no15_81301.doc 

Christi -

Did this come from FERC??

Jim

Do you know who the appropriate accounting person for this info?

Enclosed: 

                                                     OED-DRAP
                                                 Docket No. AI01-1-000

                                                         August 10,
     2001

                                 
             TO ALL JURISDICTIONAL PUBLIC UTILITIES, LICENSEES,
             NATURAL GAS COMPANIES, AND OIL PIPELINE COMPANIES
                    
     SUBJECT:       ACCOUNTING AND REPORTING FOR CERTAIN TYPES OF
                    FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND HEDGING ACTIVITIES 

                                                                      

     INTRODUCTION

          The Financial Accounting Standards Board has issued three
     pronouncements affecting the manner in which certain types of
     financial instruments and hedging activities are measured and
     reported in the financial statements.  

     Please see that attachment. 

     Thank you, 

Duscha S. Brown 
Legal Assistant 
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
2000 K St. NW
Washington, D.C. 20006

Ray --

Please examine closely the attached note from the CalPX.  In the letter the=
y appear to want some guidance on how to allocate the refunds to buyers or =
they'll simply decide.  This is a quote ---

d.=09Allocation of refunds to demand (buyers).  As part of these proceeding=
 the method of allocation of refunds to buyers must be addressed.  CalPX pr=
oposes to use its share-fraction allocation method to determine how to spre=
ad the refunds among its participants if there are no specific Commission o=
rders on how to allocate the refunds.

Please let me know the implication and if the CAISO has a similar provision=
 in its tariff.

Jim

The attached was filed with the FERC today.

 - BLF0525.DOC

FYI.  Same holds - let's not talk to Wal-Mart until we work through our business folks.

Jim

I just confirmed that WalMart closed on 8/31.  Mike Howe is the originator.  His extension is x58877.

As you can see from the comments below, staff at the Texas PUC is considering whether or not certain areas of Texas are ready for competition (the non-ERCOT region).  

Who on your teams do we need to talk to understand the implications of this action?

Jim

The Staff of the PUCT has filed a petition to determine whether the market institutions and participants are ready for competition in the Texas portion of SPP (SERC), namely Entergy Gulf States, SWEPCO,  and WTU power regions, copies attached.  Staff has also requested the PUCT to suspend the capacity auction for Entergy and SWEPCO but not for WTU.  The petition requests the PUCT to make the determination at the November 1, 2001, meeting and to suspend the capacity auction at the August 23, 2001, meeting.

In support of their petition, staff argues that there has been limited participation in the SERC region, based on an "informal survey" of the staff.  Staff also explains that the FERC has not yet approved a RTO for the SERC region (SPP).  Staff is concerned that if auction of capacity results in a low price, this will have a detrimental effect of the affiliated REPs headroom under the price to beat determination as it is all tied to the price of capacity at the auction.  In addition, staff is concerned if Entergy or SWEPCO sells 15% of their capacity and are required to serve 100% of their load.  The staff has not requested a delay in the WTU capacity auction due to the fact that the WTU capacity is located in ERCOT and WTU's relatively small load. 

In order to prepare for filing comments, if neccessary, Enron Government Affairs would like to know the following:
1)  Does EES/EWS have signed contracts for physical delivery in Entergy, SWEPCO or  WTU?
2)  What amount of load do we have contracted in each utility within SPP?
3)  It appears that SPP will not open and no RTO will be in place on 1/1/02.  Therefore, is EWS prepared to operate in SPP under the existing control area structure?

Please forward your responses to Thane Twiggs and myself.  Also, please feel free to contact either of us if you have any questions.  Thanks.  

Thane Twiggs	713-853-3199
Nancy Hetrick	712-366-3399

Ray --

Please examine closely the attached note from the CalPX.  In the letter
they appear to want some guidance on how to allocate the refunds to
buyers or they'll simply decide.  This is a quote ---

d.	Allocation of refunds to demand (buyers).  As part of these
proceeding the method of allocation of refunds to buyers must be
addressed.  CalPX proposes to use its share-fraction allocation method
to determine how to spread the refunds among its participants if there
are no specific Commission orders on how to allocate the refunds.

Please let me know the implication and if the CAISO has a similar
provision in its tariff.

Jim

>  -----Original Message-----
 - BLF0525.DOC 

Charles & Nancy --

Please make sure that we are on the same page "publicly".

Jim

Publicly, I am unsure thats what prompted my question about allegiance to the Independent Board members.  If we push for the EISB, there is a good chance the Independents will become obsolete.  The GISB process requiers stakesholder Board members.  The Independents may be able to remain on in some advisory capacity for reliability - but I don't think that will fly.  The whole purpose for the independent members was to ensure non-discriminatory decision making.

I will be presenting the EPSA position - which I will be working on with other EPSA folks, Mon and Tues.

Nancy --

Please keep John & Charles in the loop on this question.  They are both working on next steps for NERC and while not directly related to the RSB, there is potential for overlap down the road.

Also, where does Enron publicly stand on the incorporation of this into an EISB?  I thought we were ready to go?  Finally, are you giving the presentation?

Jim

Attached is a copy of the presentation that the UBP Governance Committee plans to give at the August 14th and 15th meeting.
 << File: GISB Aug Mtg rev2.ppt >> 

Jeanne --

I guess the other big question is this - what is the best argument one could make that any retroactive calculation (and application in a forward-going manner) is illegal?  We need to develop this argument ASAP.

Jim

Jim and Jeff --

I spoke with Brian Cragg about the Commission's adjustment of QF prices.  He
said that to date they have only done it on a going forward basis.  They did
say when they issued their decision in March which changed the formula for
QF  pricing that they were going to continue their examination of the
formula inputs and additional future changes could be made retroactive to
March.  To date they have not taken further action.

In the past, when the Commission has made changes to rates to reflect
overcollections or undercollections, they have not gone back and
recalculated each bill. The corrections are made on a going forward basis.
Thus in the case of the PX energy charge, the energy charge on customer's
future bills would be reduced to reflect the past over payments.
Conversely, the PX credit would be reduced to reflect the fact that they
were to high in the past.

Jeanne

Jeanne --

Not quite sure that I am getting the picture.  Let me lay it out more
directly.

The PX Credit for October 2000 was $225 based on the actual market rates.

Now FERC is saying that October 2000 hourly prices for CalPX DA and CalPX
HA markets were "too high" in June 2001.  Can the CPUC change the PX Credit
for October 2000 and make the Utilities recalculate our Negative CTC?

What is prospective?  Have they ever done this before?

Jim

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-JBennett+20+3CJBennett+40GMSSR+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com
]

   Sent:   Thursday, August 09, 2001 7:35 PM
   Jeff and Jim --

   I have done some research into the issue of whether the CPUC would be
   able
   to restate the UDC's PX Energy Charges (and thus PX Credits) back to
   October
   if the FERC were to apply its mitigation plan back that far. Thus far,
   my
   research indicates that the answer is yes (or at least there is a strong
   argument that the answer is yes) and it would not violate the rule
   against
   retroactive rate making.  The reasoning is as follows:

   The Commission (as affirmed by the courts) have ruled that they may
   subject
   a utility's rates to refund to account for adjustments made pursuant to
   a
   methodology or formula adopted before the date the utility's rates
   became
   subject to refund. Thus any ratemaking is considered prospective because
   the
   formulas are in place before the utility's rates are made subject to
   refund.
   The PX Energy Charge is calculated pursuant to the formula/mechanism set
   forth in the utility's tariffs.  These charges were always subject to
   adjustment on a prospective basis due to the settlement process.  The
   change
   in energy prices which would be effected by the FERC ruling could very
   well
   be viewed as an adjustment made pursuant to a formula.  Thus the change
   would not be considered retroactive ratemaking.

   I had a chance to talk with Mike Day for a couple of minutes about this
   issue.  He concurred with my analysis.

   Jeanne

   P.S. Please forward this e-mail to anyone you think needs to see it.

Rick --

How about sitting down on Wednesday am (say 10 am) to do this?

Jim

Rick,

As you know we had Chad's evaluation yesterday and I'll be sending you a copy for your records.  I'm also attaching the Performance Improvement Plan and the instructions on how to complete it for your convenience.  Jim Steffes mentioned that he would like to assist in putting the PIP together and he will be contacting you.     

While completing the PIP you are encouraged to consider Chad's input before finalizing the development plan.  The plan should also address the specific performance areas and examples provided in the employee's evaluation. (This form must also be reviewed by legal before presenting.  Please email me a copy before setting-up your meeting with Chad.)

  

Please email or call me if you need additional information.

Sincerely,
Ivonne Brown
Associate & Analyst Program
Ext. 57106

Not sure how this got through the "process".  Please feel free to call on me if this isn't getting fixed right.  Also, should we just have PGE pull the application and re-file with different terms.

Also, Becky you should let Amr know and keep track - he can try and quantify.

Jim

Becky, I put a call into Jay and will help them to work with FERC to modify their application.  I agree that it wouldn't fly anyway.  I just wonder how they filed it in the first place???

Jim, is this the kind of thing I should be bringing to Amr's attention since  I identified the potential problem initially?  I wouldn't know how to go about quantifying it, but I guess it could be done.  I'm pretty sure FERC will throw out their initial application if it's not modified.

Leslie -

Can you coordinate with Jay Dudley at 503-464-8860 on how to change the filing (if at all) on PGE's pipeline issue?  PGE is willing to modify the filing to try and take out the language on Native Load.  They are suggesting that maybe they should sign a contract for the full amount of the capacity (about 170,000 mmcf/d) rather than assume its right.

The goal should be to have a final decision on next steps before next Friday, Aug 17.

Please call me with any questions.

Thanks,

Jim

Great.  I'll be there.  Jim

Linda -- Please put on my calendar.

Jim:

I will RSVP for you and me, if you're still interested in attending.  Please let me know if this has changed.

Sarah

Sarah --

I think that you and I should attend.  Thoughts?

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Erin Perrigo, Manager of Policy

DATE: July 31, 2001

RE: Regulatory Affairs Panel Follow-Up & Future Meeting
       ?Thursday, September 13th

Attached you will find the presentations from EPSA's July 25th Regulatory Affairs meeting that focused on FERC's use of the hub-and-spoke method to evaluate market-based rate authority.  The speakers included John Hughes of ELCON, Diana Moss of FERC, Craig Roach of Boston Pacific Company and Don Santa of Troutman Sanders.  Also attached is EPSA's handout from the meeting outlining the hub-and-spoke method and its criticisms.

The meeting launched EPSA's effort to coordinate members' thinking on the hub-and-spoke issue and, by extension, the debate surrounding the definition of market power.  While EPSA has not expressly endorsed one particular method to determine market-based rates, we have written on the broader issue of market monitoring and market power assessment in various RTO dockets, and most recently in our Market Monitoring: A White Paper, which was filed in both California and New York
dockets.

Whether or not the hub-and-spoke method is the correct and most efficient model to determine market-based rate authority, an even larger issue also enters the debate -the definition of market power.  The issues are ripe for debate: we've seen it on the regulatory front, with FERC Commissioners calling to reassess the hub-and-spoke method, and on the political front, with politicians making allegations of market power abuse.

FERC's Order No. 2000 does allow market monitoring proposals to vary with RTO structure; however, one fundamentally important detail was left undecided in the rule - the definition of market power and abuse thereof.  Similarly, in the traditional definition of market power, "the ability to profitably sustain prices above competitive levels, acting alone or together with other firms," the definition of the word sustain remains subjective and unclear.  Therefore, as EPSA moves forward, we must be sure to endorse clear and consistent standards to identify and remedy anti-competitive behavior.

Next Steps:

EPSA would like to host a one-day roundtable discussion on the issue of market-based rate methods and EPSA's forward-looking position on the subject.  We are planning for Thursday, September 13th, here in Washington, DC.  The meeting will piggyback our Annual Board Planning meeting that will be held the following day.  We would like to gauge members' interest in attending the meeting and need to get a preliminary headcount so as to secure an appropriate venue.  If you are interested in attending the September 13th meeting, please RSVP to Jackie Gallagher at jgallagher@epsa.org or 202-628-8200 by Friday, August 10th.  An announcement with the exact time and location will be forwarded in the near future.  If you have any questions, please contact Erin Perrigo at eperrigo@epsa.org.

 - EPSA Po1.ppt << File: EPSA Po1.ppt >> 
 - epsa1.ppt << File: epsa1.ppt >> 
 - EPSA market power.ppt << File: EPSA market power.ppt >> 
 - mp_prof.pdf << File: mp_prof.pdf >> 
 - CaliforniaSpecialReport.pdf << File: CaliforniaSpecialReport.pdf >> 

I'll attend if you think it's important.  Otherwise, I'm assuming that ya'll are covering the meeting.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Legislative Affairs Committee
       Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Scott A. Weiner, Legislative Affairs Committee Chair
            Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Mark Bennett, Senior Manager of Policy
            Donn J. Salvosa, Manager of Government Affairs

DATE: August 10, 2001

RE: Reliability Meeting
       ?Monday, August 20th, 10:00 a.m. to 3:00 p.m.

The Legislative and Regulatory Affairs Committees have scheduled a meeting on reliability legislation for Monday, August 20th from 10:00 am to 3:00 pm at EPSA's offices, 1401 New York Avenue, NW.  Lunch will be provided.  The purpose of the meeting is to review and discuss specific legislative proposals in order to develop fundamental positions on reliability legislation.  The proposals now being considered both on Capitol Hill and at FERC reflect dramatically different approaches.  Whichever is ultimately pursued will have significant implications for the scope of FERC jurisdiction and perhaps the nature or reliability standards themselves.
We have invited representatives from NERC and PJM, as well as Bonnie Suchman and Cindy Bogorad - all of whom have worked on different proposals on reliability.  These individuals will make presentations in support of their respective approaches and to answer any questions that EPSA members may have.

We expect this meeting will provide a meaningful opportunity for EPSA members with an interest in this issue to obtain a better understanding of competing proposals and related issues and to participate in the development of a unified approach.  If you or someone from your company would like to attend this meeting, please fill out the form below and either fax or email it to Michael Reddy at 202-628-8260 or mreddy@epsa.org.  If you have any questions, please contact EPSA Senior Manager of Policy Mark Bennett (mbennett@epsa.org) or Donn Salvosa, Manager of Government Affairs (dsalvosa@epsa.org) at (202) 628-8200.

____ Yes, I would like to attend the Joint Regulatory/Legislative Affairs Committees Meeting on Reliability on Monday, August 20th from 10:00 a.m. to 3:00 p.m.

Name:_________________________ Company:____________________

Email: _________________________ Fax:_________________________

Dung --

Best to start with Jean Ryall (in Austin).  Different utilities in different places of restructuring.

By the way, aren't you in EBS?  

Jim

Jim,

Who is the reg person for Texas?  Are the tariffs for 1/1/2001 available yet?  Thanks.

Dung

Please put on my calendar if possible.  Probably can only go for 1.5 hours.

Jim
All -=20

Elliot and I have scheduled EB 8C1 for the meeting next Thursday, August 16=
th (12-3pm CDT) to discuss green origination and trading opportunities.   I=
f you are dialing in to the meeting, the domestic number is: 800-991-9019, =
and the international number is: 847-619-8039.  The passcode is the same if=
 you are calling in or out of the US: 7210392#.  Attached below is the agen=
da with the details.  Please let Elliot or me know if you have any question=
s.

Regards,
Stacey Bolton
Environmental Strategies
Enron Corp
713-853-9916 direct=20
713-303-2632 cell=20
sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=20
=20
All -=20

Please see the below invitation from Elliot Mainzer.  We are working togeth=
er to establish an internal Enron Renewable Network to capitalize on commer=
cial opportunities in the renewable power sector. =20

Stacey Bolton
Environmental Strategies
Enron Corp
713-853-9916 direct=20
713-303-2632 cell=20
sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=20

I'm writing to invite you to a meeting on August 16 to discuss origination =
and trading opportunities in the renewable power sector. On April 1, we est=
ablished the Renewable Power Desk under the umbrella of West Power Trading =
and West Origination here in Portland. The Desk was established to apply En=
ron's power marketing and development expertise to the growing market for g=
reen power in the WSCC. Within 6 weeks we closed our first deal (a five yea=
r fixed-price sale of energy and renewable energy credits worth several mil=
lion dollars) and I am very excited about the opportunities in this market =
nationwide. I've spent a lot of time during the last several months establi=
shing contacts with the key developers and marketers in the renewable power=
 market, and Stacey Bolton of Enron's Environmental Strategies Group has ga=
rnered a very solid understanding of the regulatory environment and supply/=
demand dynamics in markets across the country. When you combine Enron's ski=
lls in the wholesale market with our huge customer base at EES and the incr=
easing level of green power committments in the public and private sectors,=
 it becomes readily apparent that Enron is poised to be a major player and =
market-maker in the renewable power sector.

I would like to meet with you and other representatives of Enron's trading =
and origination groups on Thursday, August 16 from 12-3 to discuss a coordi=
nated commercial response to the renewable power market on a nationwide bas=
is.  Lunch will be served. Please let Stacey or me know ASAP if you or a de=
signate from your group will be able to attend.  We will contact you with a=
 follow-up call/e-mail the week of August 6th with a room location and agen=
da, and hope you will be able to attend.
=20

Best wishes,

Elliot=20

Elliot Mainzer
Renewable Power Desk

Good news or bad news?  My quick read is that FERC looks like it is trying to end the obligation but is waiting for an industry solution.  What is New Power saying?

Jim

Attached is Order issued by FERC on Tuesday accepting ISO-NE's proposal to impose ICAP deficiency charge of $4.87/kW-month.

 - EL00-62.00S[1].doc 

I enclose the EPMI, ENA and ECC riders revised per my calls with Liz today.

The claims must be filed by September 5; please call ASAP with comments.

Ben Young

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - RIDERTOE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 

Howard, Kathleen, & Steve --

Can we sit down and discuss our strategies going forward in light of this RD?  I'd like to understand where there are opportunities (both for POLR outsourcing and standard market entry).  I don't think that there will ever be a huge surplus in generation (and there shouldn't be in a competitive market).  Instead of focusing on something the NYPSC can't control, why not work on demand responsiveness?  Better metering technology would certainly help.

Let me know when a good time would be?

Jim

Sarah,
I've attached an article from today's Megawatt Daily regarding NY's generic energy competition case.  I've also attached a summary of the RD written by Kevin Brocks, our NESPA Counsel.  As you can see, the RD dismisses aggressive migration measures until wholesale markets are functioning better.  Furthermore, the RD states that until supplies increase and markets stabilize, ratepayers must be protected.  In addition, a PSC official is quoted as saying that it "will be another three to four years until there is sufficient supply in the state to allow for workably competitive markets, and that it could be at least 10 years before retail competition is viable."  

Is there anything in the RTO Order or your participation thus far in the mediation process that could refute the claim that it will be 3 or 4 years until there is sufficient supply in NY to allow for workably competitive markets?
-Kathleen

 << File: nespa rd highlights 7-19-01.doc >> 

MegawattDaily
New York PSC draft report sees competition in 3-4 years

New York regulatory staff expects
comments tomorrow on a recom-mended
decision about the future of
competitive power market development
in the state.
The recommended decision, issued
last month by two administrative law
judges for the state Public Service Com-mission
and a PSC official (00-M-0504),
says it will be another three to
four years until there is sufficient supply
in the state to allow for workably com-petitive
markets, and that it could be at
least 10 years before retail competition
is viable.
Two principal problems in transi-tioning
to a competitive market are
inelastic supply and demand, both of
which are inherent in energy markets, the
proposed decision, issued last month,
says. Until supply consistently exceeds
demand by a certain margin, the PSC
must play a prominent role in the state's
power markets.
"Markets characterized by largely
inelastic supply and demand where
demand is approaching or is equal to
supply are not workably competitive and
will not produce just and reasonable
rates," the recommended decision says.
"Until supplies increase, ratepayers
should be provided some measure of
protection from those markets. Once
supply exceeds demand sufficiently to
eliminate the exercise of excessive mar-ket
power, the markets can become
workably competitive and will likely
produce just and reasonable rates."
The recommended decision goes on
to warn, "Unrealistic expectations con-cerning
the timing of market develop-ment
(either too long or too short) can
have serious consequences to the public,
and can, in the extreme, result in the
worst of all possible outcomes - the
creation of an unregulated monopoly.
"If competition is assumed to
develop very rapidly and wholesale
market prices are imposed on customers
without regulatory intervention and
from a market that is not workably com-petitive,
higher prices and rates that do
not meet the statutory standard of just
and reasonable are likely. On the other
hand, if a long transition is assumed and
significant regulatory control continues
to be exercised over prices, competition
and its benefits could be stifled indefi-nitely."
In March 2000, the PSC initiated
the proceeding to examine the state's
progress toward competitive markets. It
sought information on the difficulties
that have emerged, lessons learned and
directions for where to go next.
The recommended decision says
that in a competitive market, utilities
should play no role in providing electric
or gas service. But before the PSC
removes a utility from the market, cer-tain
preconditions must be met, "includ-ing
a determination that the wholesale
and retail markets are operating without
the exercise of market power. As a gen-eral
matter, the utilities should not be
removed from any market until multiple
suppliers offering a variety of products
are available for the entire customer
class throughout the utility's service ter-ritory."
The PSC also should wait for state
lawmakers or the courts to confirm its
authority to take such action.
The recommended decision also
says that "robust, fully competitive retail
markets will develop at different times
for different customer classes."
The PSC should encourage invest-ment
in transmission and distribution
infrastructure for both electricity and gas
"including, if necessary, ordering the
franchised utilities to construct any need-ed
facilities," the recommended decision
says.
Although the PSC should restate its
support for retail competition and pro-ceed
"with deliberate speed in fostering
market development," the agency should
maintain "just and reasonable rates"
throughout the period of transition to
competition.
"We are confident that a flexible
oversight process that encourages com-petition
and allows it to develop wherev-er
the economics can support it will pro-tect
consumers during the transition, per-mit
markets to develop freely, and will
serve the public interest," the recom-mended
decision says.
Exceptions to the proposed decision
are due tomorrow and responses are due
Aug. 28.
The judges and the PSC official plan
to present a final recommended decision
to the commission this fall. JCS

Please put on my calendar if possible and RSVP if necessary.
 
Jim
 
Rob Bradley invites you to sit at the Enron table to hear the new chairman of President Bush's Council of Economic Advisors.  (This luncheon was originally scheduled for June 13th but Tropical Storm Allison caused the cancellation.)
 
The Houston Forum and the UH Department of Economics present:
 
Date:  Thursday, August 23 
 
Place:  Houston Club, Texas Room, 10th floor --- 811 Rusk (across from Chase Tower)
 
Time:  Registration:  11:30-12:00 ---   Lunch program:  12:00-1:30
 
Speaker:  Dr. Glenn  Hubbard, Chairman, Council of Economic Advisors
 
Will you please let me know at your earliest convenience if you will be able to attend.   Thank you.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Looks good.  Are these "incremental" to the total?  May be important to highlight the % growth as well.

Jim

Jim:

These are some numbers that I have been working on.  Hopefully they will be helpful to you. 

 << File: TX v. CA.ppt >> 
Bryan

Bryan --

Thanks for the update.  On the first issue, there was a letter sent from the CAISO to some Congressmen.  Please find this.  Also, keep trying to locate the creditors list - we want people that bought and sold electricity.

Jim

Jim,
 This is what I have for you today (8/10).  It is not as complete as I would have liked at this point.  I am trying to find some new places to look for this info.  If you have any ideas on other contacts I can check, I will call them ASAP.  If you have some new ideas, I can work on this throughout the weekend.  Just let me know.  

Bryan x52430
Home: 713-942-7307

1. Listing of who is owed how much in California
	Ray Alvarez - in DC (202-466-9170)
Explained that the best figure anyone has right now is the conglomerate 8.9 million that CAISO put together.  Clearly not everyone agrees with this summation, but Ray believes that CA will still fight for this figure.  They have not made public how they derived this information therefore it is not very helpful.  However, the FERC is beginning a hearing on Monday, 8-13, to find out the exact numbers, per company that we are after.  We should have an estimate on when we can get the reported numbers on Monday afternoon. Numbers will most likely be brought up in the opening, so we should know in a few days.
He also suggested that the following is a good list of all groups who have a major interest in the California situation.  It is derived from FERC docket #EL00-95.  

 << File: CA Players.doc >> 
2. Listing of the forward contract holders and the relative size of their positions.
 We have a good list from the CA State Controller's office.  We know size of forward contracts, but not overall positions.  *See attached file of "Summary of DWR Long-Term Energy Contracts As of 7/2/01"

 << File: DWR contracts.pdf >> 
3. Any insights about the correlation (or lack of correlation) between the names on the lists.
4. Listing of the defendants in the class action suits.
Linda Guinn, in legal, said she would gather some information, regarding the preliminary creditors involved in the PG&E bankruptcy as soon as she could. (Richard Sanders is on vacation).  I was unable to reach Lisa Melencamp. 
Linda explained to me that a list of defendants may be rather lengthy, and that if we could be more specific in our search request it will help her.
Neither Bill Bradford nor Mike Tribolet have a creditors list available.  I am currently searching the SEC filings (that are made public on the web) for some of the larger Corps, such as PG&E and SoCal Edison. 

Has your initial question been answered?

Jim
Jim:

These are some numbers that I have been working on.  Hopefully they will be helpful to you. 

 
Bryan

Here is a list of point people for issues in the West.  

Jim

 

Did we get the right people to sign-up to speak?  Let me know.

Jim

Jim & David,

Here is the info for the Finance Day on September 14th.  Phil Polsky, Associate, has revived confirmation from Chip Schneider and someone from his group in RAC to present at the Lunch.( I will forward those details as soon as I have them).  We are still needing someone to talk on the Panel.  Someone had suggested Kirk Nuener, I think he needs some convincing.  

Thank you for your help.  I will keep you posted.

Paul L./ Recruiter

Dear Mr. LeBeau,

Attached please find an invitation for Georgetown MBA's upcoming Finance Day.  We look forward to having Enron participate in this event, and I look forward to speaking with you soon.

Regards,

Michael Chiang 

Not sure if you knew this.  

Jim

Following-up on my previous e-mail, DWR has apparently announced that are
negotiating a deal to purchase 1,000 MW of wind energy which would satisfy
the proposed RPS requirement through 2005.

Sue --

Is the issue for the Governor's eminent domain or Native Load exception?  Very important distinction maybe lost on these guys.

Jim

Reporting from Providence Rhode Island......although the plenary sessions of the NGA summer meeting have not focused on energy issues, DOE secretary Spence Abraham did make a short presentation to the Natural Resorces Committee this morning.  He used only one visual, and it was pretty effective---very simple/one page.  The message was 175 Quadrillion BTU's will be the nation's energy needs by 2020, 48 could be met by conservation, 98 is today's supply (domestic and imported) which leaves 29 quads as the shortfall.  The last line showed that between 1991-2000, domestic supply had only increased by 1 quad. He was very well received by the governors (committee members attending were Vilsack-IA, Keating-OK,Geringer-Wy, Minner-DE, Johnson-NM, Hoeven-ND, McCallum-WI)

Governor Davis showed up for the end of Abraham's comments and did his normal personal pat on the back for how well his state has done in conservation and how they had many power plants on line.  He made a slightly disparaging comment about Wyoming/Cheney needing to get on the bandwagon for conservation, at which point Geringer got a bit testy and cautioned Davis to be "careful" about whether he wanted to get into that debate.

Most of the questions by the Governors to Abraham focused on transmission.  Abraham inidicated that federal eminent domain was intended as a last resort if the states can't get it done and that he is sensitive to the governors wanting local control.  Several Governors expressed their hope that they could get transmission issues solved on their own, and that if they did not, they were open to further "discussion" of having FERC help them.

After the meeting, Gov. Vilsack (chairman of the committee) and Gov. Keating (vice chair) held a press conference, along with next year's committee chairs,  Hoeven/ND and Minner/DE.  They presented the NGA comprehensive energy policy resolution--NR-18 (I had forwarded it on to most people on this list last week) and talked about how much there was that both dems and republicans had agreed on in the document.  The reporters asked several questions on the eminent domain....both Vilsack and Keating again stated that they wanted to see if states could get the job done and if not, they were open to further discussions with the feds.

I'll be here thru tomorrow.  Page me or leave me a voice mail if you want to discuss in more detail.

Charles --

Very well put.  This is another example why it is so important for you and =
Andy R. to be out with the RTO teams helping us to be more precise.  We nee=
d to blend our NERC and FERC advocacy.

Of course, you realize that ELCON will never support a PJM model central ma=
rketplace for balancing energy.  At the last EPSA meeting, ELCON really bla=
sted centralized pools. =20

Jim

John=20

You are correct in your observations concerning market dynamics and the nee=
d for flexibility by the marketplace.  "Control area consolidation risks re=
bundling the industry and this would stifle innovation and market
dynamics."  Enron agrees with this observation and does not endorse an RTO =
structure that perpetuates the advantages control areas enjoy today in the =
marketplace.

We fully support your statement: "Our efforts should be directed at ensurin=
g adequate independence of balancing, security and interchange authorities.=
"

Enron's desire for consolidation of control areas can be misconstrued to ad=
vocate the old bundled control area structures.  I want to clarify this is =
absolutely NOT the case and Enron DOES support the CACTF model.  Specifical=
ly, the Interchange Authority functions called for in the CACTF model must =
NOT be rolled up into a single entity.  The Security Authority(SA), the Tra=
nsmission Service Provider(TSP), and the Balancing  Authority(BA) all need =
to be separated from today's transmission owner/generation owner/load servi=
ng/control area operator entities.  Independence of these functions from ma=
rket interest are critical to ensure fair and competitive markets. =20

The Interchange Authority (IA) functions do not require centralization or i=
ndependence from market participants - but rather the scheduling advantages=
 that the IA functions provide for must be available to every market partic=
ipant.  Today, the entities that operate a "control area" are advantaged by=
 the capabilities NERC rules provide under the Interchange Authority.  Unde=
r a contract path transmission model, control areas do not have to keep day=
-ahead balanced schedules and can "play" in the energy market with unbalanc=
ed portfolios up until the schedule ramping times.  Non-control areas can o=
nly get transactions approved for scheduling under specific source and sink=
 requirements that forces them to submit balanced interchange schedules.  T=
his is a major reason why competitive generators have sought to become NERC=
 certified control areas.  The CACTF model allows for the scheduling functi=
ons required of an IA to be disaggregated from the other "control area" fun=
ctions without detriment to reliability - thus levelizing the playing field=
 for all competitive PSEs.

To levelize the playing field, Enron supports 2 issues.
1) Consolidation of control areas - to provide independence to eliminate th=
e market advantages.=20
2) Elimination of day ahead balanced schedules requirements - to effectivel=
y provide the benefits of the IA function for all market players.  If there=
 are no day-ahead balanced scheduling requirements, most of the competitive=
 advantages of control areas will be eliminated.  In the same stroke, all m=
arket participants will compete on the same data and timing requriements al=
lowing for the trading of energy up until the ramping times as control area=
s enjoy today.  This is the scheduling flexibility Enron seeks to create a =
dynamic energy trading environment.

Charles Yeung
Enron Corp, Director Gov't Affairs (NERC)
713-853-0348

Luiz:
I have reviewed the documents you distributed on Friday regarding Enron's
position on interregional coordination.  In general, we agree with Enron's
position with the following exceptions.  We do believe that the
consolidation of "control areas" is a useful objective in the context of
creating a greater SE RTO, and, in fact, is inconsistent with Enron's
support of the CACTF's reliability model.  The RTO should also not be a
central dispatcher.  Its control of generation should be limited to
redispatch for congestion management and the maintenance of short-term
reliability.  The basic premise behind the CACTF model is that control
areas are becoming obsolete and unbundled.  Control area consolidation
risks rebundling the industry and this would stifle innovation and market
dynamics.  Our efforts should be directed at ensuring adequate independence
of balancing, security and interchange authorities.  This should be done by
FERC because NERC has no authority (or inclination) to do so.
John Hughes
Industrial Consumers

Thanks.

Jim

I enclose the EPMI, ENA and ECC riders revised per my calls with Liz today.

The claims must be filed by September 5; please call ASAP with comments.

Ben Young

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - RIDERTOE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 

Erin --

Enron is working right now to try and develop its policy on this issue.  Clearly, our primary goal is to ensure that market makers such as Enron are treated fairly by the FERC rules vis-a-vis other market participants.  While we are not yet enamored with any policy option, we are committed to helping FERC do whatever is necessary to create a strong and well functioning marketplace.

As soon as I have any more, I'll let you know.  Sarah Novosel and I are intending to come to the meeting.

Jim

Hello Jim-

Greetings from the sweltering city of Washington!  Per our conversation, you know that we are hosting a one day meeting on market based rate analysis here in Washington in September to "roll up our sleeves" and develop an official EPSA position, if possible, as FERC moves forward on the issue.  What I'd like to get out of this message is where Enron stands - what is your take on the hub and spoke, and what are your suggested alternatives?  I'd like to get a heads up of our members' perspectives on the matter prior to the meeting so as to structure the agenda in the most effective and helpful manner.

As you know, Commissioner Massey has been very vocal about re-evaluating the hub and spoke, and we now have Commissioner Brownell voicing similar concerns.  Whether or not we see a NOPR in the future is anyone's call, but I'd like EPSA to be an industry leader if and when the opportunity arises.  Any help you can provide would be appreciated.

Regards-
-erin

Erin N. Perrigo
Manager of Policy
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 New York Ave., NW
11th Floor
Washington, DC  20005
p)  202.628.8200
f)   202.628.8260
eperrigo@epsa.org

Janine --

Where does this stand?  I just read the text and agree with Harry.  Most importantly, the HHI may not be suitable given the high degree of regulation of ComEd service.  

As important, I don't think the ICC cares too much about Enron losing market share.  Not the best lead argument.

Let's talk.

Jim

Janine - this is getting insane.  With all due respect to Marc, this has nothing to do with the issues at hand.

Here is a copy of my uncompleted 1st draft of my testimony.  I will hopefully be finishing this week.  
 << File: M-Ulrich Direct Testimony.doc >> 

Also here is a proposed agenda for today's conference call at 3pm

 << File: Agenda ComEd 2001 DST Rate Case 08-06-01.doc >> 

Call number and pass code are as follows.

Monday, August 6, 2001  from 3 p.m. - 4 p.m. CST.  
800-991-9019.  Passcode 7314194#.

Marc L. Ulrich
713-345-4784 (office)
877-720-7711 (pager)

Not until all of the key electricity fixes are included in the package - remember RTOs are still voluntary, the Courts have yet to require FERC to do away with the Native Load exception, and NERC is in charge of reliability.  This is clearly the biggest issue for the Publics.

Jim

Thanks John!
This is the legislation that the munis were saying they needed instead of the "temporary" IRS regs that protect them now.  Hopefully, the senated will approve.
Following up on our conversation last night, Linda was right (I have to eat some crow!), but the RTO-related tax changes were in fact included in the tax title of the energy package reported by the House Ways and Means Committee and included in the omnibus energy package that was approved last night.  Specifically, the tax provisions would (1) address the "private use" issue that could otherwise be detrimental to the municipal bonds of public power entities and (2) address the tax consequences of a transfer of transmission assets from an IOU to an RTO (current law would make this a taxable event, the bill would let the IOU reinvest the proceeds in other utility property, liberally defined, and thus defer the tax.  In sum, on both counts, this is what EEI and APPA had negotiated.  The ball is now in the Senate's court on these tax issues. Given this movement on these tax issues, they should not be used as insurmountable hurdles in the RTO process.

We have hard copies of the relevant statutory language and explanatory materials for your use.   I will get them to each when you are next in the office "between RTO rounds" at FERC.

Talk with Rick, but I think this project is complete.

Yes,thanks.

Has your initial question been answered?

Jim
Jim:

These are some numbers that I have been working on.  Hopefully they will be helpful to you. 

 <<TX v. CA.ppt>> 
Bryan

FYI
Charles:
Havey Reed of Constellation and Mike Prosser of El Paso are MAIN Board members whose terms are not expiring this year.  I think that is adequate coverage for marketers.  If MAIN becomes the security coordinator for the Alliance companies that have departed
Ameren, CE, and IP then I expect MAIN to continue in business for some time,  

I would be more cautious than Dave.  We do not know who and what MAIN will be after RTOs and the new NAERO are up and running.  If MAIN and the other Regions are irrelevant, then being on the Board could help the cause to make them go away.  If possible, a better approach would be to maintain the need for marketers to be on the Board - if we cannot support putting an actual person on it.

Jim, got a message saying this did not get to you.

regards
MR

I am not a huge reliability region guy....Charles may have a view.  The only concern i have is that the ISO's and reliability regions are not discussing how to manage the transition of authority given the ISO's responsibility for reliability.  I am starting to present this issue to the various enties....so, i agree with Dave but would like Charles comment as well

regards
Mike

Do you agree?

Jim
I don't believe Enron needs to be represented directly on the MAIN Board.   Too much time and money for the value received in my opinion.
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Please see attached.

R. A. Bulley
 - Terms.doc << File: Terms.doc >> 

Lynne --

I am very sorry that I have not yet responded to your e-mail.  I am trying to firm up my calendar.  Not sure that Excelon and Enron will differ greatly on the key lessons learned.

I should know by mid-week (if you haven't already filled the slot).

Jim Steffes
713-853-7673

Jim, 
Just a quick note to follow up on the invitation I sent you last week for a November conference in San Francisco.  If you could let me know by Monday morning 8-6 if you can participate (which I hope you can), I'd be grateful, as that would leave us time to ask someone else.  Also, if you can't participate, I'd appreciate your recommending someone in your stead. 
I look forward to hearing from you. 
Regards, Lynne 
Dear Jim, 
Insight Information Company (www.insightinfo.com) is developing and presenting a conference on Deregulation of Electricity Market in California: Experiences Learned, Perils and Opportunities (working title), and they have asked me to chair the conference.  Insight Information is a leading provider of programs for North American business, executive and professional communities.  The conference is scheduled for November 5 and 6 in San Francisco.  Tentative panel titles include 
? Understanding Restructuring: The Regulator's Perspective 
? The Role of Fuel Supply Mix 
? Restructuring and Technological Change 
? Price-Responsive Demand 
? Energy Services and the Entrepreneurial Firm 
? Energy Risk Management and Electricity Restructuring 
? Restructuring and Transmission 
? Market Monitoring 
? Short-Term and Long-Term Approaches: Risk, Congestion Management, Institutional Change 
? Comparative Experiences in Deregulation 
I would like to invite you to participate as a speaker in this conference, in a session tentatively titled "Short-Term and Long-Term Approaches: Risk, Congestion Management, Institutional Change." I think the title will evolve, but what I'm going for in this panel is a discussion between you and Betsy Moler (Exelon) about short-run and long-run lessons that we should draw from the California experience. 
If you could let me know soon if you would be able to participate in this conference, I'd be most grateful.  The conference coordinator, Victor Pogostin, would then follow up with a formal letter of invitation. I look forward to hearing from you. 
Regards, 
Lynne 
-- 
Lynne Kiesling, Ph.D. 
Director of Economic Policy 
Reason Public Policy Institute 
www.rppi.org 
lynnek@rppi.org 
RPPI is a non-partisan public policy think tank promoting choice, competition, and a dynamic market economy as the foundation for human dignity and progress 
 

Dad --

Thought you may be interested.

Jim

Dear James,
I noticed your involvement in the Center for the Advancement of Energy
Markets and I would like to invite you to join the Council of Energy
Advisors, an association of petroleum engineers, electrical engineers,
petroleum geologists, consultants, power traders, and energy professionals
whom we pay their hourly rate to fill out brief online surveys and/or
consult part-time by telephone on issues of power and energy products and
services for investment managers.  I think that your knowledge of the power
and energy industry would be a valuable addition to the Council.  Membership
in the Council is free; you can register online at
http://www.thecouncils.com/peapp.asp (a quick 5-minute form).
We pay Advisors variable rates for surveys depending on the time commitment
and their customary consulting rates for telephone consultations. You may
decline any survey or consultation that is not in your area of interest or
should you not have the time; you are therefore not making any time
commitment by joining.  Also, Advisors are never asked to answer questions
about their own employers; we don't create any appearance of a potential
conflict of interest.

The Council of Energy Advisors includes members from leading universities,
organizations, and firms such as SPE, EPRI, ABB, TVA, MIT, Square D,
Calpine, Halliburton, Schlumberger, Enron, Mirant, Exxon, Shell. BP and
Chevron. The Council has more than 400 engineers, petroleum professionals,
technology solution end users, independent consultants and researchers
working at utilities and solution design consultancies, leaders on IEEE
standards bodies and thought leaders in the industry.  Our clients include
Morgan Stanley Dean Witter, Salomon Smith Barney, Fidelity Fund Management,
JP Morgan and about ninety other leading investment firms on both coasts.

Our web site at www.thecouncils.com gives more information about our work.
Please take some time to consider the Council, look over our website, and
let me know what you think.  I look forward to working with you.

Best regards,
Matt

==================
Matthew O'Brien
Gerson Lehrman Group
Council of Energy Advisors
11 E. 44th St., 11th floor
New York, NY 10017
(212) 838-6900 ext. 265
www.thecouncils.com

==================
Matthew O'Brien
Gerson Lehrman Group
11 E. 44th St., 11th floor
New York, NY 10017
(212) 838-6900 ext. 265

Bob --

Sorry this is just getting to you.  Pls work with Fergus to come up with an answer.

Jim
Please see Seabron's request, attached.  Can we arrange for him to see how the PNW trading is done?

Jeffrey D. (Dan) Watkiss
Bracewell & Patterson, LLP
2000 K St., N.W.
Suite 500
Washington, D.C.   20006-1872
(202) 828-5851
dwatkiss@bracepatt.con
jdwatkiss@aol.com
Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Received: from mcafee.bracepatt.com	by mail.bracepatt.com; Fri, 03 Aug 2001 12:42:28 -0500
Received: FROM imta02a2.registeredsite.com BY mcafee.bracepatt.com ; Fri Aug 03 12:56:35 2001 -0500
X-Proxy: keymaster.bracepatt.com protected
Received: from seabronlaptop ([10.0.58.26]) by imta02a2.registeredsite.com          with SMTP          id <20010803173944.TFUP3881.imta02a2.registeredsite.com@seabronlaptop>          for <dwatkiss@bracepatt.com>; Fri, 3 Aug 2001 13:39:44 -0400

Dan:

Just a thought. In prep. for the PNW hearing it would be very useful to
spend a day with the PNW traders in Portland (or from another firm in the
group, if that were more appropriate) just watching what they do. It would
help give me some better insight into the practical mechanics of the market,
which may prove important in the hearing. All of the various regions have
their own rules and procedures, including the WSCC. We should check with
Fergus I suppose to make sure its OK from the litigation front before
calling anyone in Portland.

I am sending you a proposed budget for the California hearing this p.m. as
well, to copy to Steffes. I assume that CRA will take the lead on the number
crunching, and that i will just follow the work plan items communicated
earlier to Steffes.

Seabron

This e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is intended only for use by the
addressee(s) named herein and may contain legally privileged and/or
confidential information.  If you are not the intended recipient of this
e-mail, you are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or
copying of this e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is strictly
prohibited.
If you have received this e-mail in error, please immediately notify me at
(617) 354-0060 and permanently delete the original and any copy of any
e-mail and any printout thereof.

Seabron Adamson
Frontier Economics Inc
Two Brattle Square
Cambridge, MA 02138 USA
Ph:  (617) 354-0060
Fax: (617) 354-0640
seabron.adamson@frontier-economics.com

www.frontier-economics.com

This is one of those to show to Amr to quantify.

Jim

Yep - in fact, they did.  I just haven't got around to summarizing the orde=
r yet.  Here's some excerpts:

"We reach no determination regarding whether PG&E Transmission's system-wid=
e cost of fuel will increase above the current cost, since the outcome depe=
nds on numerous factors, such as the total pipeline volumes transported and=
 the price of fuel.  Instead, as discussed below, and in accordance with En=
ron's request [way to go, FERC!!], we will act to insulate existing shipper=
s from increased fuel costs attributable to the proposed expansion."

After suggesting that it would have been more appropriate to calculate fuel=
 costs by using the average of the latest twelve months of actual data in p=
lace of the theoretical maximum rate, FERC directed "PG&E Transmission to d=
esign a surcharge to ensure that expansion shippers are subject to an incre=
mental fuel charge for fuel costs above the costs attributable to fuel abse=
nt the proposed addition of 97,500 horsepower of compression.  In addition,=
 PG&E must indicate compliance with this condition whenever it files to adj=
ust its compressor fuel surcharge and whenever it files its annual gas fuel=
 reimbursement reports." (emphasis added)

Do you think the Commission would apply this same principal to PGT's 2002 e=
xpansion?
According to the Draft Order that was voted out at the Commission meeting t=
oday, the subject project, as amended to reflect the approval of the Califo=
rnia Action Project, is approved, subject to certain conditions including r=
estrictions on rolled-in rate treatment. =20

The Commission was concerned that the additional fuel costs could exceed th=
e rate reduction to existing shippers.  Kern River's projections were based=
 on a $3.00/dth cost of gas.  The Commission conditioned its approval of ro=
lled-in rate treatment by providing that, "in its future compliance tariff =
filing to roll-in the costs and lower transmission rates, Kern River must s=
ubmit revised exhibits showing the excess revenues over the incremental cos=
t-of-service, and the net benefits after anticipated fuel costs are conside=
red" (Kern River's settlement in RP99-274 requires it to reduce its rates f=
or existing customers coincident with the in-service date for newly certifi=
cated facilities if it receives approval for rolled-in rate treatment).  Ad=
ditionally, if during any year, the combined level of the electric and gas =
fuel expenses exceed the benchmark level(s) of excess revenues established =
in the tariff filing, then Kern River must allocate the excess portion of f=
uel costs to its expansion shippers.  Thus, Kern River must always assure t=
hat this expansion does not increase costs for existing shippers.

The Commission rejected concerns of the existing firm shippers as well as S=
oCal Gas about the potential for additional curtailment at Wheeler Ridge.  =
The Commission found that the potential for increased curtailment did not w=
arrant rejection or modification of Kern River's proposal, in part because =
SoCal Gas does not offer firm service on its system and therefore existing =
shippers have never had any assurance that Socal Gas would accept their gas=
. =20

The Draft Order is 49 pages long.  Please advise if you would like a hard c=
opy.

Wanted you to see that Doug regarded you highly (my highlights below).  

Also, sorry I wasn't very nice on Friday - another very bad day.  I'm sorry.

Jim

Steve Kean, Executive Vice President and Chief of Staff
Rick Shapiro, Vice PresidentGovernment Affairs
Jim Steffes, Vice PresidentPublic Affairs
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX 77002-7361

August 2, 2001

Dear Steve, Rick, and Jim:

I thank you for the opportunity to work with you and your staff over the
past six months. I truly expanded my understanding of the scope and
challenges of government affairs work since our initial meeting about a
year ago. In particular, I appreciate more the important internal role that
GA plays in supporting other units at Enron (the academics tend to focus
more on external actions in the public policy arena).

I hope that I was able to contribute to the projects that I was assigned.
The GA Assessment (more below) was particularly interesting, and clearly is
important for decision making about GA activities. I also enjoyed assisting
GA's work with EIM's steel traders.

Please give my thanks to your employees with whom I worked. My overall
assessment is that they work extremely hard and are dedicated to solving
Enron's GA-related problems. I thank Maureen and Ginger for taking care of
the logistical details and making me feel part of the GA team. I also thank
Gus, Earleen, and the other support staff. Finally, I want to recognize
Lisa Yoho: I really enjoyed working with her and feel she's an important
contributor to the GA team.

If you need anything from Rice, please do not hesitate to contact me.

I hope that we continue to keep in touch.

Cordially,

Doug Schuler

[also sent by attachment]
This brief analysis is based upon my assignment with Amr Ibrahim and
Elizabeth Linnell to review the "Accomplishments for the Period November
2000 to April 2001" reports filed by the GA professional staff. It is also
based upon some of the academic literature on "valuation" of business
activities where we are interested not only on the costs side (in a
traditional cost center approach) but also the benefits (moving towards a
profit center approach). The importance of considering benefits is that it
allows the senior GA managers to assign professional staff to areas
reflecting their highest benefit (considering the opportunity costs of that
assignment). Additionally, it should allow senior GA managers to articulate
more clearly GA needs (e.g., budget requests, personnel) to internal
constituents at Enron.

What I saw
Data were collected from about 60 GA professionals in the Accomplishment
Report for the period November 2001 to April 2001. Each individual was
asked to list his or her accomplishments, the unit it served, the area
(e.g., deal support, origination, etc.), its value, and the methodology used.

Regarding the accomplishments done during the period, about 25% involved
activities aimed at other Enron units, such as improving communications
between GA/PA and ENA and EES in the New York market, developing a GA
website with EBS, and working with EIM to design a risk management program
for a client. About 75% of activities were externally oriented (although in
support of internal Enron customers) primarily towards regulatory and
legislative bodies at various levels of government.

Very few individuals provided data for value and methodology. Probably less
than 20% of the activities were valued and the methods used varied widely.
For these relatively few entries, GA professionals claimed a contribution
of $6.43 billion, a figure that appears to be highly overstated.

My analysis would be despite the considerable efforts that went into
compiling and completing these reports, that senior GA management has not
gained significant insights as to the value of these activities or as to an
accurate methodology to calculate such values.

What is needed
If our goal is the identity and measurement of GA activities, it is crucial
that these be tied to the broad strategies of Enron. Otherwise, we run the
risk of creating a system that desires "A" but rewards "B."

Thus, the first step needs to be the identification of the most important
broad strategies of GA. The "Government Affairs/PR Communications" report
appears to be a first step: it identified such strategies as (1) business
unit support; (2) create open markets and other business opportunities; and
(3) regulatory and governmental risk identification and mitigation.

For each of these strategies, some primary objectives need to be
articulated. For example, for business unit support, some objectives might
be: (1) information provision: timeliness and accuracy; (2) transaction
support; (3) new market development; and (4) asset protection [note: these
are just my "off the cuff" objectives].

Then, we need to look a ways to assess the attainment of each of these
objectives. For example, with information provision, we might go to our
users in other units of Enron to see how they would rate (perhaps on a 1-5
scale) such things as timeliness, accuracy, criticality for their
transaction, etc. We might also count the number of projects, meetings,
memos, etc. that GA produced with information for other units. We would do
likewise for the other objectives.

Note that the "Balanced Scorecard Approach" (BSA) may be used to make such
linkages and measures. The BSA is a strategy implementation tool where
activities are measured and compared to the goals of the firm. BSA gives
guidelines on the types of measures that are appropriate: it considers such
things as leading and lagging indicators (training would be a leading
indicator as it occurs before the activity; profits on a trade would be a
lagging indicator as it is the result of various activities), and financial
and non-financial measures. The goallike oursis to try to take into account
enough measures of the activity to make a satisfactory judgment of its
merits. I believe if you could create such a system, you would have a much
better idea of how to deploy your employees across projects, how much to
charge other units for GA services, and when to outsource GA activities.

In order to do what I have suggested, I think that you will have to devote
more resources. One possibility is to assemble a small team with members
from GA and one or two operating units (e.g., a director from EES who has
some GA interaction) to create this systematic approach to GA evaluations.
You also might consider adding an outsider to this process.

Finally, I am amenable to discussing a role for me in the process. I plan
to continue to work on this valuation framework in an academic way (e.g.,
for scholarly journals) with Marc Epstein, one of my colleagues in
accounting, who has done much with the balanced scorecard approach. Once we
have developed a clearer framework, we would like to create a practitioner
version that might be useful for your GA analysis.

Doug Schuler
Associate Professor of Management
Rice University
Jesse H. Jones Graduate School of Management
6100 Main Street, MS 533
Houston, TX 77005-1892
(713) 348-5472 tel.
(713) 348-6296 fax.
schuler@rice.edu
 - schuler_GA assessment analysis.doc 

Linda --

Please arrange a call-in number for 10:30 am Houston time for everyone above for tomorrow.  

Purpose - Legislative Strategy.

Thanks.

Jim

Evan --

Who is responsible for completing all paperwork for entering a new market?  Is it someone on your team or someone from CEC?  There have been some issues with getting everything coordinated lately and I wanted to make sure that we knew who was on point.

Jim

Sorry that I am just getting back to this.  I think that one of the key roles for Reg Risk Analytics is to "validate" the appropriateness of regulatory assumptions in EWS retail tariff curves as well as help Govt Affairs build risk management plans.  

Let's talk soon.

Jim

Jim,
What I meant is that, as part of the professional group --regulatory-- providing support to EES, we could start negotiating our participation in the review of the price curves sustaining the contracts, as part of our support. Tariffs have already been reviewed. Billing formulas are being analyzed and ready for most contracts. Consumption data has not been analyzed for any contract. Please advise. Regards,
ALF

Alberto --

Not sure what you mean by "prime time"?  Please provide some additional details.

Jim

Greetings,
Please find attached the latest update on the EES contracts' analysis, including responsible and contact persons, as well as customer name. In total, there are about 110 contracts. Please note that for Priority contracts, the 8 most urgent ones, documentation is 80% ready and analysis is 30% ready. For Tier I, 86 and 39% respectively. For Tier II, 88 and 0%. Consumption data is conspicuously unavailable, which is important for determining the positions. 

Billing data is being filled and its almost complete. Jim, this might mean that we could be ready for prime time. Please advise. Looking forward to talking with you all on Wednesday,
ALF
Kim Harris@EES
07/27/2001 05:03 PM
I've attached the status report for 7/27.  Please note the new prioritization of deals on the Phase by Phase sheet.  

If you have any questions, please give myself or Misty a call.

Have a great weekend!

 << File: Status-July27Final.xls >> 

Kim
5-3474

Who at EWS is the head?

Jim

Jim,

We have Rebecca Fite on our team working New Market Entry (also working with Nancy Hetrick from Legislative Affairs) as the point for EES.  Rebecca reports to Jason Woodward on my team.

There is also an EWS new market entry team that is under their (EWS) direction.  I think the two groups are getting better coordinated but I would be interested in what are the issues?  

Please let me know and we'll sort through the details.

Thanks for the heads-up,

Evan

Evan --

Who is responsible for completing all paperwork for entering a new market?  Is it someone on your team or someone from CEC?  There have been some issues with getting everything coordinated lately and I wanted to make sure that we knew who was on point.

Jim

Am I scheduled to attend?

Jim

The next meeting of the CAEM Board of Directors will be held on Wednesday,
September 12, at the Grand Hyatt Hotel in Washington, DC.

The meeting is being held in conjunction with the third meeting of our DISCO
of the Future Forum. (Please visit our newly updated website www.caem.org
for more information on the DISCO Forum.) Following the Board meeting on
Wednesday, you are invited to join with members of the DISCO Forum for a
Wednesday evening reception and dinner, including a guest speaker. Board
members are also invited to join in the substantive session of the DISCO
Forum on Thursday, September 13.

Because of an international medical convention ongoing in Washington at the
same time as our meetings, the Grand Hyatt unfortunately is already booked.
However, we have reserved a block of rooms at the nearby Wyndham Hotel. To
reserve one of these rooms, you must inform the Wyndham staff that you are
part of the CAEM group. If you should decide to arrange lodging at a
different hotel, please do so quickly as there is limited availability in
all surrounding hotels. We will be making the Wyndham rooms available to
members of the DISCO Forum on July 20.

If you have any questions or require any assistance at all, please contact
Hope Duncan at 202.739.0134 or Jeff Mangold at 703.729.2710. We are looking
forward to seeing you on September 12.

Hotel Information:

Grand Hyatt Hotel
1000 H Street NW
Washington DC 20001
Phone: 202.582.1234 or 1.800.233.1234
Fax: 202.637.4781
Website: http://washington.hyatt.com/wasgh/index.html

Wyndham Washington DC
1400 M Street NW
Washington, DC 20005
Phone: 202.429.1700 or 1.877.999.3223
Fax: 202.785.0786
Website: http://www.wyndham.com/Washington_DC/default.cfm

correct.

Is this correct?  If so, I will handle it.  Thanks Jim.
 
Lora Sullivan@ENRON
07/19/2001 03:31 PM
Dear Linda,

We are receiving invoices from Ace Federal Reporters for transcripts of the recent FERC settlement conferences.
Linda Robertson says they should be charged to Jim Steffes' cost center, etc. 

Do you want me to send the invoices to you?

Let me know.

Many thanks.

Lora

Lora Sullivan
Federal Government Affairs Representative
Enron
1775 Eye Street, NW
Suite 800
Washington, DC  20006
202-466-9142
202-828-3372 (fax)
email:  lora.sullivan@enron.com

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

I'm in all week.

Jim

Can we visit about what went on with Ursula at the PRC meeting when you catch up?
BRADLEY JR, ROBERT L,
 
A revised version of the Evaluation form for Associates and Analysts is attached below.  Please disregard  and destroy the form you received on July 2, as well as any blank forms retrieved from the PEP system prior to that date.  Please use the attached for Associate and Analyst  evaluations.   
 
All Evaluations for Associates and Analysts must be completed using this form.

 - BRENNER, URSULA J.doc << File: BRENNER, URSULA J.doc >> 

Jean & Thane --

Can we have a meeting this week (maybe Thursday at 3:30) to discuss this?

Jim

We do need a formal plan.  We have been working closely together to identify the issues as they develop and propose solutions. Doug has been providing us with the necessary specific market information.  We have been successful in communicating that information to the new commissioners and Ercot and seeking resolution. The commission is definitely more responsive to market participants that are articulating the issue, providing specific examples and proposing the solution.  Grand-standing is ignored.  Those who show up with complaints but cannot point to specifics are virtually ignored.  Those who show up and complain, but are not participating in the working groups and the daily Ercot phone calls, board meetings, etc. are ignored.   

Doug and I met with the Chairman of PUCT and have had subsequent conversations.  Thane and I also visited with him. 

Pat Wood made a phone call to Tom Noel and told him to get the Texas market fixed.  (Even though he has bigger things to do in D.C., this is his legacy and he recognizes that if deregulation does not work in Texas, the repercussions could be global.)  

Chairman Sibley and Chairman Wolens (of the Texas legislature) are also engaged in market developments.  We have been working with the State Affairs legislative committee and keeping them apprised.  There is an Electric Restructuring Committee hearing scheduled for September 6th or 7th.  The forum is expected to be invited testimony only.  Those currently listed as invitees are PUCT Commissioners and Ercot's Sam Jones and Tom Noel.  The hearing is focused on the pilot and we have an opportunity to provide some probing questions for Wolens to direct to Sam and Tom.  Now that Sibley is not a candidate for Lt. Governor, there is more freedom to open up and ask some difficult questions.   

Thane is in Austin on Friday, but is available by phone.  I will be on a plane to Houston at 8:00 a.m. Can we find another time that works for us to meet? Thane is in an Ercot PRS meeting Friday from 9:30 until 3:00.  I am available after Rick's Friday budget meeting...are you available then?  You are right, we do need a formal plan, Thane has started an initial draft.  Thanks, Jean    

Jean & Thane --

Walking out last night, Kevin Presto indicated that there were games being played in ERCOT with the new market rules and prices in certain markets were not reflective of working markets.  

Enron needs to use this situation to quickly get our viewpoints up into the PUCT and ERCOT ISO on what is driving these problems and our proposed fixes.  

If ERCOT goes the way of California - either due to market power or poor market design rules - it will be a bad day for deregulation and for Pat Wood.  As important, the new PUCT Commissioners need some help right now in messaging the market.  Let's get them to support constructive solutions that will make a real difference.

Jean and Thane, I think that we need a FORMAL PLAN on what to do over the next 3 - 6 months to leverage this situation.  I would like to discuss this with you on Friday am.  I am free at 8am on Friday before Rick's budget meeting.

Jim

FYI.  You may want to discuss with Becky.

Jim

As an outgrowth of the meeting Leslie and I had with Scott and Hunter a couple of weeks ago, we have begun work to develop an electronic tool that would allow us to provide ongoing summaries of FERC gas activities, and possibly electric activities, in a format that can be linked to the Fundamentals intranet site used by the traders.  We envision a format that would provide a brief summary and analysis of the order, filing, etc. with a link to the source document as well for those who would like more detailed information.  This would replace the paper copies you and your people are currently getting.  Many details remain to be worked out, but we will keep you advised.  In the meantime, could you please provide a contact on your side with whom we could discuss technical issues?

What do I need to do?

Jim
Please do not reply to this e-mail.

You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iBuyit Payables in-box
that is past due.  Please login to iBuyit Payables and resolve this invoice as soon as possible.

To launch iBuyit Payables, click on the link below:
http://iBuyitPayables.enron.com
Note:  Your iBuyit Payables User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iBuyit Payables user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://sap.enron.com/sap_doclib/user/file_list.asp?cabinet_id=265

Need help?
Please contact the ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.

If you are in Europe, please contact European Accounts Payable at +44 20 7783 7520.

Hope he is ok.
 
Jim

All,
   I will be out of the office on Monday, August 13. My older son stepped on a piece of glass and cut a two inch wound in his right foot. The glass cut a main vain just under his big toe and required stitches to close the wound. Because of the area of the wound it bleeds with every turn of the foot and he MUST stay off of it for 24 to 48 hours to allow healing to begin. For this reason I am keeping him home for one day to make sure he stays off of it. 
 

   Never fear, however, I can be reached by pager and will be logged in most of the day. Please be mindful that I only have one phone line and when I am dialed in to the LAN I can not call out or receive calls. 

 
   Thank you for you patience,
   Lynnette Barnes 
    888-703-0309
 

Becky--

Please keep Guillermo and Melinda in the loop.

Thx.

Jim

The meeting will not happen on Wednesday, but Mark is shooting for Thursday or Friday.  Mark, could you make sure our distinguished colleagues from Govt. Affairs are kept in the loop on these meetings?  Thanks, DB
Don, I'd like to be there for the discussion tomorrow, schedule permitting.  Jim didn't indicate what time it would be.  Could you let me know?

Don --

Can you please add Becky Cantrell, Melinda Pharms, and Guillermo Canovas to your Nat Gas weekly discussions?  Not sure if they will all come, but I'd like someone from Government Affairs at the meeting to try and keep us up-to-date on the issues.

Jim

Janine --

Who is IMServe?  I'm guessing they are a vendor that does billing, etc.  You should e-mail Evan Hughes to determine the nature of the CSC arrangement.  But I don't think that we want to give our business to a company because they help in one case?

Jim

IMServe is interested in participating in the ComEd case as part of our ARES coalition but wants to assess whether there is a business opportunity for them.  Are we bound in contract to CSC or would we be open to a presentation by them for them to handle our  business?  Please advise or let me know who I should talk with that makes those decisions.
Thanks,
Janine

Linda --

Can you please pull a copy of the ComEd OATT that would include the calculation of "OPC" mentioned below?  

Janine --

Doesn't it make sense that we are disadvantaged vis-a-vis their own transmission service and should talk to Donna Fulton about a complaint at FERC?

Jim

Jim,
Per your request, below is an email from Chris Townsend explaining the imbalance program.  I plan to call him to get a better handle on the discount issue, but I think that it is useful that marketers can trade imbalances, but the benefit is premised on there being many suppliers.  More to follow when I return.
Janine

Janine --

As you might recall from the memo summarizing the 1999 Edison DST
proceeding, the Illinois Commerce Commission essentially "punted" on the
imbalance issue, instead deferring to FERC.  Attached is the section from
our memo that discussed the imbalance issue.  It is my recollection that the
issue of establishing subaccounts was not addressed.  We will try to confirm
this tomorrow.

As lawyers, please do not hesitate to call or email if we can be of any
further assistance.

> Christopher J. Townsend
> Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
> 203 N. LaSalle Street
> Chicago, IL 60601
> (312) 368-4039 (direct line)
> (312) 630-6300 (direct fax)
> christopher.townsend@piperrudnick.com
>
		Energy Imbalances

		1.	Jurisdictional Issues

	The ARES Coalition, Alliant, and IIEC argued that the Commission
should address energy imbalances in the proceeding.  Enron and NewEnergy
abandoned this argument after reaching a settlement agreement with Edison.
Staff and Edison argued that charges for energy imbalances are properly
addressed within Edison's OATT and subject to the jurisdiction of the FERC.

	The Commission concluded that in the interest of avoiding protracted
litigation and the harm of delay to retail competition, the Commission would
not address the propriety of FERC's asserted authority over energy imbalance
issues.  The Commission indicated that its deferral to the FERC in no way
"waives its right to assert jurisdiction over energy imbalance service at
some future time."

		2.	Factual & Policy Issues

	Edison proposed an energy imbalance service to retail customers
containing the following provisions:

*	Energy imbalance will be calculated separately for each hour and
settlements will occur on a cash basis for each hour's imbalances;
*	For those RESs whose energy imbalance in an hour is 2% or less, or 2
MW or less, settlement is made at 100% of out-of-pocket costs ("OPC"),
regardless of the net imbalance or the direction of the error;
*
*	Those RESs whose energy imbalances exceed 25% of their own
individual schedules will pay an adder or be charged a discount of 25% of
OPC.  Adjustments are made to avoid double-counting of adders and discounts
applicable to those RESs that are also subject to an adder or discount
below.  These imbalance charges will be phased-in as follows:
*
*	From October 1, 1999 through December 31, 1999 -- No adder  will
apply under this provision.
*
*	From January 1, 2000 through March 31, 2000 -- 25% adder/discount
will apply to those RESs whose imbalances exceed 25% of their schedules 20%
or more of the hours of the month.  If the 20% of the hours are exceeded,
the adder/discount shall apply to all hours.
*
*	Starting April 1, 2000 -- 25% adder/discount will apply to those
RESs whose imbalances exceed 25% of their schedules 10% or more of the hours
of the month.  If the 10% of the hours are exceeded, the adder/discount
shall apply to all hours.

*	Edison also applies a bandwidth to the total net energy imbalance
attributable to unbundled retail load served by RESs.  If the hourly
imbalance caused by all unbundled retail load, excluding PPO load, is within
the 100 MW bandwidth, no RES (except those whose imbalance exceeds ?25%, as
noted below) will be subject to an adder or discount.  PPO load will, in
aggregate, be subject to the same terms and conditions as above, but
imbalance attributable to the PPO will be compared against a 100 MW deadband
separately from all RES load.

*	Edison will permit RESs to trade energy imbalances among themselves,
to offset their imbalances at whatever prices and terms they wish, before
applying a charge for energy imbalance.  According to Edison, this feature
will allow RESs to minimize energy imbalance charges by exchanging
overscheduled megawatt-hours for underscheduled megawatt-hours in the same
hour.  All remaining imbalances will be settled in cash at 100% of Edison's
OPC.  Edison shall make available information on OPC ten days prior to the
opening of the trading window.
*
*	The net retail energy imbalance in excess of 100 MW will be charged
an adder or discount of 10%.  This charge will be allocated among RESs who
are out of balance in the direction of the net and whose imbalance exceeds
their individual deadband.  The allocation will be based on the ratio-share
of the amount by which these individual RESs' imbalances exceed their
individual deadbands.  Any such adder/discount will be billed separately
from charges for any imbalances remaining after trading. Likewise, any
adder/discount attributable to the provisions of Paragraph 3 will be billed
separately from charges for any imbalances remaining after trading.
*
*	Load profiles will be developed using Dynamic Load Modeling with
seasonal adjustments.  Edison will not require the installation of interval
demand recorders for customers of less than 400 kW at this time.
*
*	Energy imbalances will be assumed to be within the bandwidth (i.e.,
no adders/discounts) when the imbalances are due to (1) Edison interruptions
and restorations, or (2) customer force majeure events, that are in each
case material to the RESs' schedule and of which the RES could not
reasonably be aware in sufficient time to adjust the schedule.
*
*	Edison will include a description of the methodology for determining
OPC in its energy imbalance schedules filed with the FERC.

	The IIEC opposed Edison's proposal and requested that the Commission
require Edison to offer an optional imbalance service at the distribution
level.  Blackhawk also opposed Edison's proposal and supported the IIEC
proposal  Alliant also supported Edison being required to offer an energy
imbalance service at the distribution level.  Mid-American opposed any
effort by the Commission to exert jurisdiction on energy imbalances.

	The Commission failed to weigh-in on the energy imbalance issue
consistent with its determination that the FERC is the appropriate forum for
such issues.  The Commission reserved the right to address the issue in some
future FERC proceeding.

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com
 - C.DTF << File: C.DTF >> 

But where in statue does the ICC have that as one of their issues?

Jim

Marc is out til next wednesday or so with surgery.  I already sent him an email to refocus.  This is not what I had expected.  I will talk to him next week when I get back.  However, Jim on your point that the ICC doesn't care if we lose market share, the premise of the anticompetitive argument is that the increase threatens our existing market share and prevents us from competing for more market.  That is the essence of the impact of an anticompetitive situation.  This would be the result not only for us but for others as well.

Janine --

Where does this stand?  I just read the text and agree with Harry.  Most importantly, the HHI may not be suitable given the high degree of regulation of ComEd service.  

As important, I don't think the ICC cares too much about Enron losing market share.  Not the best lead argument.

Let's talk.

Jim

Janine - this is getting insane.  With all due respect to Marc, this has nothing to do with the issues at hand.

Here is a copy of my uncompleted 1st draft of my testimony.  I will hopefully be finishing this week.  
 << File: M-Ulrich Direct Testimony.doc >> 

Also here is a proposed agenda for today's conference call at 3pm

 << File: Agenda ComEd 2001 DST Rate Case 08-06-01.doc >> 

Call number and pass code are as follows.

Monday, August 6, 2001  from 3 p.m. - 4 p.m. CST.  
800-991-9019.  Passcode 7314194#.

Marc L. Ulrich
713-345-4784 (office)
877-720-7711 (pager)

Charles --

In planning the transition, please include this issue.

Jim
You may want someone to respond to this one

OPERATIONS COMMITTEE AND
   OC SUBCOMMITTEES
PLANNING COORDINATION COMMITTEE 
   AND PCC SUBCOMMITTEES
WESTERN MARKET INTERFACE COMMITTEE
COMPLIANCE PROCESS TASK FORCE

TO:	STANDARDS LIST SERVER GROUP
 NERC ROSTER

Ladies and Gentlemen:

Responses to the comments received on the revised (April 11, 2001
version) Phase IIA Planning Standards during the 45-day public 
comment
period (April 11-May 29, 2001) have been posted on the NERC web 
site:

  http://www.nerc.com/~pc/standards/#planningstandardsphaseiia

These comments (10 sets) and their responses form the basis for 
the
further revisions made to the Phase IIA Standards by the Planning
Standards Subcommittee, in conjunction with the Compliance 
Review
Subcommittee and several other NERC Planning Committee 
subgroups.
These further revisions to Phase IIA are clarifying and editorial in
nature and are not believed to be substantive.

The resulting revised Phase IIA Planning Standards (June 15, 2001
version) were posted on August 2, 2001 for a 30-day notification
period prior to their consideration for approval by the PC. The posted
comments and responses complement these Phase IIA Standards.

Sincerely,

Virginia C. Sulzberger (via Angie Nicastro)
PSS Staff Coordinator

cheers

I cannot remember the name but I can get it for you Monday morning?

Who at EWS is the head?

Jim

Jim,

We have Rebecca Fite on our team working New Market Entry (also working with Nancy Hetrick from Legislative Affairs) as the point for EES.  Rebecca reports to Jason Woodward on my team.

There is also an EWS new market entry team that is under their (EWS) direction.  I think the two groups are getting better coordinated but I would be interested in what are the issues?  

Please let me know and we'll sort through the details.

Thanks for the heads-up,

Evan

Evan --

Who is responsible for completing all paperwork for entering a new market?  Is it someone on your team or someone from CEC?  There have been some issues with getting everything coordinated lately and I wanted to make sure that we knew who was on point.

Jim

Susan --

Can you please work with ENA Accounting and others to determine the following to provide to EPSA so they can calculate our Dues --

1.	Total megawatts of your company's equity ownership as of June 1, 2001 in competitive generation assets operating and under construction in the United States (including PURPA plants) - (probably good to start with Wes Coldwell).

2.	Total megawatthours of market-priced wholesale and retail sales for the 12 months ending March 31, 2001 (probably just get Linda Lawrence to sum up our monthly sales (I would have a separate total for wholesale financials) and use someone from Evan Hughes shop for physical retail sales).

Call me to discuss.  We need to get this in by August 18.

Jim

Steve --

Has PR given the go ahead?  Anything else from me needed?

Jim

Jim,
	Enclosed is my outlined for the article on the need for an RTO.  I given the outline to Karen Denne and discussed the article with her.  I also gave a copy to Paul Kaufman.  If you have any suggestions, please send them to me.  I will we working on the article next week.

Steve
 << File: Outline-ProRTO-1.doc >> 

Yes.  I'll get us a conference room on 47.

Jim

Wednesday at 10 is fine; are you still at EB4711?

Rick --

How about sitting down on Wednesday am (say 10 am) to do this?

Jim

Rick,

As you know we had Chad's evaluation yesterday and I'll be sending you a copy for your records.  I'm also attaching the Performance Improvement Plan and the instructions on how to complete it for your convenience.  Jim Steffes mentioned that he would like to assist in putting the PIP together and he will be contacting you.     

While completing the PIP you are encouraged to consider Chad's input before finalizing the development plan.  The plan should also address the specific performance areas and examples provided in the employee's evaluation. (This form must also be reviewed by legal before presenting.  Please email me a copy before setting-up your meeting with Chad.)

 << File: LANDRY, CHADWICK.doc >>  << File: PIP Instructions.doc >> 

Please email or call me if you need additional information.

Sincerely,
Ivonne Brown
Associate & Analyst Program
Ext. 57106

Linda --

Please schedule a conference room to hold this.

Jim
Wednesday at 10 is fine; are you still at EB4711?

Rick --

How about sitting down on Wednesday am (say 10 am) to do this?

Jim

Rick,

As you know we had Chad's evaluation yesterday and I'll be sending you a copy for your records.  I'm also attaching the Performance Improvement Plan and the instructions on how to complete it for your convenience.  Jim Steffes mentioned that he would like to assist in putting the PIP together and he will be contacting you.     

While completing the PIP you are encouraged to consider Chad's input before finalizing the development plan.  The plan should also address the specific performance areas and examples provided in the employee's evaluation. (This form must also be reviewed by legal before presenting.  Please email me a copy before setting-up your meeting with Chad.)

 << File: LANDRY, CHADWICK.doc >>  << File: PIP Instructions.doc >> 

Please email or call me if you need additional information.

Sincerely,
Ivonne Brown
Associate & Analyst Program
Ext. 57106

Sue --

Do you have a list of the Commissions / Officials that you have discussed these issues with either formally or informally?  It would be good to make sure that we have a running tally.

Jim

Next Steps --

1.	Leverage EES Customers Signing Post August 25 Contracts

The language in SB78 continues to hold the date for suspending DA as August 25.  EES signed a number of very large contracts that benefit important in-state businesses.  We are trying to establish a strategy around the following segments:

a)	California Restaurant Association
b)	CMTA via the Aerospace Industry 
c)	Wal-Mart.

We need all of our customers to call (a) the Governor, (b) the key Legislative members, and (c) their trade associations.  Leveraging the trade associations is critical given CMTA's support for the bill.  We can release (very quietly) to influential persons Wal-Mart, Raytheon, and Northrop.

It is also critical that we try and contact someone from Boeing to get their read of the bill and its impact.  Our understanding is that they have recently signed a deal with another marketer and will be cut out by this Bill.  Any help in communicating with Boeing is critical.

Please let me know how best to approach the Calif Rest Association.  What should we do?  Is it better to have our customers call?

I will work up some talking points and phone numbers with Sue Mara to use in these discussions.

2.	Fight the CPUC on Retroactive Order

Sue Mara is working through AReM to convince the CPUC that their Proposed Decision would be illegal.  Continue to push on this front.  

Thanks,

Jim

Sue --

What is our current involvement in the URG case?  Do we have a range of potential outcomes for each UDC?

Jim

From the attached, it looks like the URG decision is being accelerated.

 

Jean --

Please call Eric to understand the implications of filing or not filing on this issue.

Jim

Give me a call (35676).  most of the customer's we are currently engaged with, have very little load behind the non-ERCOT utilities.  however, do not have a feel for future prospects. 

 Question, is this an opportunity to force the utilities to implement pro-dereg measures (i.e., to the PUC, why else would it work behind other utilities and not here?).
As you can see from the comments below, staff at the Texas PUC is considering whether or not certain areas of Texas are ready for competition (the non-ERCOT region).  

Who on your teams do we need to talk to understand the implications of this action?

Jim

The Staff of the PUCT has filed a petition to determine whether the market institutions and participants are ready for competition in the Texas portion of SPP (SERC), namely Entergy Gulf States, SWEPCO,  and WTU power regions, copies attached.  Staff has also requested the PUCT to suspend the capacity auction for Entergy and SWEPCO but not for WTU.  The petition requests the PUCT to make the determination at the November 1, 2001, meeting and to suspend the capacity auction at the August 23, 2001, meeting.

In support of their petition, staff argues that there has been limited participation in the SERC region, based on an "informal survey" of the staff.  Staff also explains that the FERC has not yet approved a RTO for the SERC region (SPP).  Staff is concerned that if auction of capacity results in a low price, this will have a detrimental effect of the affiliated REPs headroom under the price to beat determination as it is all tied to the price of capacity at the auction.  In addition, staff is concerned if Entergy or SWEPCO sells 15% of their capacity and are required to serve 100% of their load.  The staff has not requested a delay in the WTU capacity auction due to the fact that the WTU capacity is located in ERCOT and WTU's relatively small load. 

In order to prepare for filing comments, if neccessary, Enron Government Affairs would like to know the following:
1)  Does EES/EWS have signed contracts for physical delivery in Entergy, SWEPCO or  WTU?
2)  What amount of load do we have contracted in each utility within SPP?
3)  It appears that SPP will not open and no RTO will be in place on 1/1/02.  Therefore, is EWS prepared to operate in SPP under the existing control area structure?

Please forward your responses to Thane Twiggs and myself.  Also, please feel free to contact either of us if you have any questions.  Thanks.  

Thane Twiggs	713-853-3199
Nancy Hetrick	712-366-3399

Good idea.  Harry is the best to start with.

Jim

Jim -- Thought you might want to see what our outside counsel sent (and I did submit an RCR).  Hated to be the bearer of bad news but it looks like our business guys need to find another state, at least for now.  

I thought I would talk to Mr. Kingerski about getting assistance both on following up on NC and on handling the reports for the other states, unless you have other suggestions.

Susan

Looks good.  Please make sure that you submitted an RCR.  

If Ed wants more info of this type for other states, I'd like to make sure that we organize our efforts so we don't duplicate too much and deploy the proper resources.

Thanks,

Jim

I would like to have a meeting today at 4pm to review the work that West Power URM has been working on to compare the economic impact of the 4 alternatives.  

It would also be good to get any other feedback from the meetings with SCE and other relevant activities.

I will ask my assistant Linda Noske to get a call in number and a room on 47.

Please let Linda Noske know if you will attend.

Jim

Please cover this.

Jim
SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP

DATE:	Monday, August 13, 2001
TIME:	5:30 pm
TOPIC:	Recoupment
DIAL IN:	800/998-2462
PASSCODE:	5462908

PLEASE LET ME KNOW IF YOU CAN PARTICIPATE.

Linda Simmons

To make sure that everyone is on the same page, my understanding is that Thane "owns" this issue from top to bottom - Thane needs to make the recommendation about moving forward or not.  

Please keep me in the loop.

Jim

FYI!

Nancy and Thane,

Thanks for sending this email.  We are in the process of evaluating our appetite for business in SWEPCO and GSU.  We do have load in both of these areas (non in WTU).  The load in SWEPCO is likely to go away in a negotiation process with Rexam.  However, we are running some numbers based on our curves and the prevailing tariff for a normal load shape customer in GSU and SWEPCO.  We are looking at possible negotiating with these utilities to purchase their 15% at reasonable prices so as not to hurt them with a low price to beat and have large stranded costs in the process.  I think the sooner Enron can participate in these markets ahead of competition, the more value there is to take advantage of.  I will let you know what our analysis indicates.  Thanks again for your email.

-Joe

The Staff of the PUCT has filed a petition to determine whether the market institutions and participants are ready for competition in the Texas portion of SPP (SERC), namely Entergy Gulf States, SWEPCO,  and WTU power regions, copies attached.  Staff has also requested the PUCT to suspend the capacity auction for Entergy and SWEPCO but not for WTU.  The petition requests the PUCT to make the determination at the November 1, 2001, meeting and to suspend the capacity auction at the August 23, 2001, meeting.

In support of their petition, staff argues that there has been limited participation in the SERC region, based on an "informal survey" of the staff.  Staff also explains that the FERC has not yet approved a RTO for the SERC region (SPP).  Staff is concerned that if auction of capacity results in a low price, this will have a detrimental effect of the affiliated REPs headroom under the price to beat determination as it is all tied to the price of capacity at the auction.  In addition, staff is concerned if Entergy or SWEPCO sells 15% of their capacity and are required to serve 100% of their load.  The staff has not requested a delay in the WTU capacity auction due to the fact that the WTU capacity is located in ERCOT and WTU's relatively small load. 

In order to prepare for filing comments, if neccessary, Enron Government Affairs would like to know the following:
1)  Does EES/EWS have signed contracts for physical delivery in Entergy, SWEPCO or  WTU?
2)  What amount of load do we have contracted in each utility within SPP?
3)  It appears that SPP will not open and no RTO will be in place on 1/1/02.  Therefore, is EWS prepared to operate in SPP under the existing control area structure?

Please forward your responses to Thane Twiggs and myself.  Also, please feel free to contact either of us if you have any questions.  Thanks.  

Thane Twiggs	713-853-3199
Nancy Hetrick	712-366-3399

I can't make it, but Sue Mara will cover.

Jim

SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP

DATE:	Monday, August 13, 2001
TIME:	5:30 pm
TOPIC:	Recoupment
DIAL IN:	800/998-2462
PASSCODE:	5462908

PLEASE LET ME KNOW IF YOU CAN PARTICIPATE.

Linda Simmons

Don't worry about the call.

The conference call described below has been CANCELLED for today due to conflicting schedules.  It will be scheduled at a later date.

SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP

DATE:	Monday, August 13, 2001
TIME:	5:30 pm
TOPIC:	Recoupment
DIAL IN:	800/998-2462
PASSCODE:	5462908

PLEASE LET ME KNOW IF YOU CAN PARTICIPATE.

Linda Simmons

Thanks Barbara.  If we need to do anything, please let me knwo.

JIm

FYI.

Barbara,

Our consultant (Bob Iwanchuck of ENSR) placed a call to Shelby County Pollution Control Division and spoke with David Thorpe.  Shelby County Pollution Control Division has been given authority by the state to issue permits for Shelby county.  Mr. Thorpe believes that our permit will be processed normally and is not subject to the moratorium.  Mr. Thorpe has not yet seen anything official as to how the order will apply.  I'll keep you posted.

Chris

I spoke with Chris Booth who works with Ben on the site in Shelby County, TN.  Chris is awaiting an update from their consultant who is speaking with the Dept. of Environment and Conservation.  Chris, Please keep us posted.  Barbara

Susan --

Please discuss with Ben (you may want to call Barbara & Christi to see if anyone else has discussed already) and relay importance of this to his future plans to me?  Key question is whether or not we need to be engaging directly with local governments.

Jim

 - TEXT.htm << File: TEXT.htm >> 

Please coordinate a meeting with Chad for later this week between Chad and myself.

Jim

Jim-

I would like to take you up on your offer to have a private meeting with you and Rick Shapiro to discuss the different activities that took place in Enron's Government Affairs office in  Austin.  Considering Austin is one of our satellite offices, I think it would greatly benefit your department to get an insider's perspective on the office, its senior management, and the different interactions/complications that took place over my 5 month tenure in Austin.  

While I realize that ordinarily individuals at your level would not solicit the feedback of a 3rd year analyst, I feel that I have relevant information that could help you better access the situation in Austin.

My extension is 39837.

Regards,

CKL   

Great.  Really appreciate.

Jim

Jim,

I prepared this report for the month of Sept.  Does this format work for you?  If so, Paul will complete it (or have it completed) for the rest of the Western Group.

Alan 
 << File: GAC 0901 Report.xls >> 

2:30 works for me on Thursday.

Jim

Thane and I are scheduled to meet with Doug on Thursday from 2:30 to 3:30.  Would you like to meet with all of us?  Doug may have some others sitting in, as well.  
 
I have a 3:30 on Thursday with Rick, I can ask to move that meeting if that works better for you. Doug needs to leave by 4:00.
 
Please advise...Thanks, Jean       

Jean & Thane --

Can we have a meeting this week (maybe Thursday at 3:30) to discuss this? 

Jim 

We do need a formal plan.  We have been working closely together to identify the issues as they develop and propose solutions. Doug has been providing us with the necessary specific market information.  We have been successful in communicating that information to the new commissioners and Ercot and seeking resolution. The commission is definitely more responsive to market participants that are articulating the issue, providing specific examples and proposing the solution.  Grand-standing is ignored.  Those who show up with complaints but cannot point to specifics are virtually ignored.  Those who show up and complain, but are not participating in the working groups and the daily Ercot phone calls, board meetings, etc. are ignored.   

Doug and I met with the Chairman of PUCT and have had subsequent conversations.  Thane and I also visited with him. 

Pat Wood made a phone call to Tom Noel and told him to get the Texas market fixed.  (Even though he has bigger things to do in D.C., this is his legacy and he recognizes that if deregulation does not work in Texas, the repercussions could be global.)  

Chairman Sibley and Chairman Wolens (of the Texas legislature) are also engaged in market developments.  We have been working with the State Affairs legislative committee and keeping them apprised.  There is an Electric Restructuring Committee hearing scheduled for September 6th or 7th.  The forum is expected to be invited testimony only.  Those currently listed as invitees are PUCT Commissioners and Ercot's Sam Jones and Tom Noel.  The hearing is focused on the pilot and we have an opportunity to provide some probing questions for Wolens to direct to Sam and Tom.  Now that Sibley is not a candidate for Lt. Governor, there is more freedom to open up and ask some difficult questions.   

Thane is in Austin on Friday, but is available by phone.  I will be on a plane to Houston at 8:00 a.m. Can we find another time that works for us to meet? Thane is in an Ercot PRS meeting Friday from 9:30 until 3:00.  I am available after Rick's Friday budget meeting...are you available then?  You are right, we do need a formal plan, Thane has started an initial draft.  Thanks, Jean    

Jean & Thane -- 

Walking out last night, Kevin Presto indicated that there were games being played in ERCOT with the new market rules and prices in certain markets were not reflective of working markets.  

Enron needs to use this situation to quickly get our viewpoints up into the PUCT and ERCOT ISO on what is driving these problems and our proposed fixes.  

If ERCOT goes the way of California - either due to market power or poor market design rules - it will be a bad day for deregulation and for Pat Wood.  As important, the new PUCT Commissioners need some help right now in messaging the market.  Let's get them to support constructive solutions that will make a real difference.

Jean and Thane, I think that we need a FORMAL PLAN on what to do over the next 3 - 6 months to leverage this situation.  I would like to discuss this with you on Friday am.  I am free at 8am on Friday before Rick's budget meeting.

Jim 

Works for me.

Jim

All - Agree.  How about Thursday 9:00am (est) conference call?  If this works please reply to Kirsten Bellas and she will set up the call.  Steve  

Howard, Kathleen, & Steve --

Can we sit down and discuss our strategies going forward in light of this RD?  I'd like to understand where there are opportunities (both for POLR outsourcing and standard market entry).  I don't think that there will ever be a huge surplus in generation (and there shouldn't be in a competitive market).  Instead of focusing on something the NYPSC can't control, why not work on demand responsiveness?  Better metering technology would certainly help.

Let me know when a good time would be?

Jim

Sarah,
I've attached an article from today's Megawatt Daily regarding NY's generic energy competition case.  I've also attached a summary of the RD written by Kevin Brocks, our NESPA Counsel.  As you can see, the RD dismisses aggressive migration measures until wholesale markets are functioning better.  Furthermore, the RD states that until supplies increase and markets stabilize, ratepayers must be protected.  In addition, a PSC official is quoted as saying that it "will be another three to four years until there is sufficient supply in the state to allow for workably competitive markets, and that it could be at least 10 years before retail competition is viable."  

Is there anything in the RTO Order or your participation thus far in the mediation process that could refute the claim that it will be 3 or 4 years until there is sufficient supply in NY to allow for workably competitive markets?
-Kathleen

 << File: nespa rd highlights 7-19-01.doc >> 

MegawattDaily
New York PSC draft report sees competition in 3-4 years

New York regulatory staff expects
comments tomorrow on a recom-mended
decision about the future of
competitive power market development
in the state.
The recommended decision, issued
last month by two administrative law
judges for the state Public Service Com-mission
and a PSC official (00-M-0504),
says it will be another three to
four years until there is sufficient supply
in the state to allow for workably com-petitive
markets, and that it could be at
least 10 years before retail competition
is viable.
Two principal problems in transi-tioning
to a competitive market are
inelastic supply and demand, both of
which are inherent in energy markets, the
proposed decision, issued last month,
says. Until supply consistently exceeds
demand by a certain margin, the PSC
must play a prominent role in the state's
power markets.
"Markets characterized by largely
inelastic supply and demand where
demand is approaching or is equal to
supply are not workably competitive and
will not produce just and reasonable
rates," the recommended decision says.
"Until supplies increase, ratepayers
should be provided some measure of
protection from those markets. Once
supply exceeds demand sufficiently to
eliminate the exercise of excessive mar-ket
power, the markets can become
workably competitive and will likely
produce just and reasonable rates."
The recommended decision goes on
to warn, "Unrealistic expectations con-cerning
the timing of market develop-ment
(either too long or too short) can
have serious consequences to the public,
and can, in the extreme, result in the
worst of all possible outcomes - the
creation of an unregulated monopoly.
"If competition is assumed to
develop very rapidly and wholesale
market prices are imposed on customers
without regulatory intervention and
from a market that is not workably com-petitive,
higher prices and rates that do
not meet the statutory standard of just
and reasonable are likely. On the other
hand, if a long transition is assumed and
significant regulatory control continues
to be exercised over prices, competition
and its benefits could be stifled indefi-nitely."
In March 2000, the PSC initiated
the proceeding to examine the state's
progress toward competitive markets. It
sought information on the difficulties
that have emerged, lessons learned and
directions for where to go next.
The recommended decision says
that in a competitive market, utilities
should play no role in providing electric
or gas service. But before the PSC
removes a utility from the market, cer-tain
preconditions must be met, "includ-ing
a determination that the wholesale
and retail markets are operating without
the exercise of market power. As a gen-eral
matter, the utilities should not be
removed from any market until multiple
suppliers offering a variety of products
are available for the entire customer
class throughout the utility's service ter-ritory."
The PSC also should wait for state
lawmakers or the courts to confirm its
authority to take such action.
The recommended decision also
says that "robust, fully competitive retail
markets will develop at different times
for different customer classes."
The PSC should encourage invest-ment
in transmission and distribution
infrastructure for both electricity and gas
"including, if necessary, ordering the
franchised utilities to construct any need-ed
facilities," the recommended decision
says.
Although the PSC should restate its
support for retail competition and pro-ceed
"with deliberate speed in fostering
market development," the agency should
maintain "just and reasonable rates"
throughout the period of transition to
competition.
"We are confident that a flexible
oversight process that encourages com-petition
and allows it to develop wherev-er
the economics can support it will pro-tect
consumers during the transition, per-mit
markets to develop freely, and will
serve the public interest," the recom-mended
decision says.
Exceptions to the proposed decision
are due tomorrow and responses are due
Aug. 28.
The judges and the PSC official plan
to present a final recommended decision
to the commission this fall. JCS

I can make it.  Now on my calendar.

Jim

SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP		

I would like to reschedule this conference call for 12:00 pm (CST) tomorrow.  Please advise if you can participate.

Thanks.
 
SENT ON BEHALF OF LISA MELLENCAMP

DATE:	Monday, August 13, 2001
TIME:	5:30 pm
TOPIC:	Recoupment
DIAL IN:	800/998-2462
PASSCODE:	5462908

PLEASE LET ME KNOW IF YOU CAN PARTICIPATE.

Linda Simmons

Sue --

My take on this letter is that it is a little too "jumpy".  Any way to help make it a bit more to help Lynch do something different - maybe work from the AReM filing?

Jim

Here is the latest letter

DAC members:

I need to know as soon as possible if your organizations can sign on to the
attached letter--it's a shorter, streamlined version of what you saw before.
Dorothy Rothrock of CMTA boiled down the previous version to the core issues
that the majority of DAC members appear to support.  As before, please also
let me know if you cannot sign on to the letter--which will save us
pestering you with phone calls.  For those of you who aren't signing on to
any letter because of the language supporting SB 18xx--you don't have to
call me again because this version still contains that reference. I have
"starred" the organizations that have already signed on to this version.

The Edelman team is ready to roll as soon as we hear from you.  Thanks again
for acting quickly on this.

Tracy Fairchild
Senior Account Supervisor
Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
(916) 442-2331
(916) 447-8509 (fax)

 <<DAC letter to Angelides 081001 short version.doc>> 

Thanks for the accounting treatment.  

Probably better to have one payment this year and one payment on Jan2 (charged back to 2001).

Thanks,

Jim

Thanks for the feedback.  

Your model now assumes a modification to the Distribution tariff to include a new rate element.  That may get around the Settlement (although OCA in PA will think that now D is going up and there is no offset in the G rate so consumers are getting screwed because they won't switch).  

Also, can the PaPUC implement this charge and direct the EDCs to transfer the funds to third-party generators?  Seems like that would require legislative changes.  

I like the idea that there should be fixed charge for ICAP - one way to get that number would be to go back to the EDC stranded cost cases and look at their filed testimony - remember if they are earning more from the market than that $ amount, they are overearning on their stranded costs.

Jim

In response to the issues:

1.  I would propose that the "Reliability Tax" modeled after the Gross Receipts and Franchise Tax (GRFT) and would be an additional line item on a utility's bill.  In this way it is not an increase in either T or D and perhaps the waiver would not be required.  (See related comment to issue 4 below).

2.  The proposal contemplates that the generators get the revenue (this is their "buy-in" to the proposal).  Taking PJM as the model, they currently produce three load forecasts at varying temperatures - one at a "high" temperature, one at a "low" temperature, and one at a designated temperature.  The  proposal would set the obligation at the "high" temperature forecast and the cost-recovery of the ICAP at the "low" temperature forecast (maximizes the MWH charge).  Any over-recovery would be used to pay for system improvements.  Any under-recovery would be used in setting the recovery charge for the following year.  [Conceptually this how it is intended to work.  However, this needs to be thought through in a more detailed level]

3.  Off hand I don't know what the current ICAP revenues are but I could find out.  As for the proposal, the tax would be determined by the results of the ICAP auction, e.g, PJM would go out for 60,000 MW of ICAP, review the bids, and set the clearing price.  The total "cost" of ICAP (60,000 MW x $X/MW) would be used to set the Tax (MWH charge, using the "low" temperature forecast).

4.  As a separate line item on the utility's bill and presented as a tax, the state regulators would have as much of a role in this tax as they have (or had) in the GRFT.  I see their biggest issue at this early stage of the strawman is what share of over-recovery do the ratepayers receive.  The argument that the over-recovery go to system improvements and not to the ratepayers is the efficiency improvement in the system.     

Good start. 

A couple of issues -

1.	Raising transmission rates for the PA utilities would effectively reduce their Distribution revenues (the Settlements stipulated that if T went up, then D had to come down).  Maybe we could get everyone to agree to a one-time waiver of this and have end-user's bills go up. 

2.	Where does the $ from the Reliability Tax go?  Toward what purpose?  If generators are not compensated in some manner (maybe a passthrough directly), won't they strongly oppose this model?  We need to propose some reasonable uses of these funds (better metering to enable load curtailment to smaller customers OR maybe pay for an RMR type arrangement).

3.	What is the current amount of ICAP market revenues today?  What would you recommend as a total tax?

4.	The Reliability Tax would be FERC jurisdicitional as constructed?  How are the PUCs going to view this?  Will they have a role i setting the $ and the use?

Jim

In an email I sent yesterday, I touched on an ICAP proposal I've been thinking about and thought I would expand on it more.
The political reality of ICAP is that it is here to stay; at least as long as there are energy price caps or retail rate caps.  ICAP is also a most likely outcome by regulators and politico's if energy prices are perceived to be too high (assuming no price caps).  Therefore, we need to come up with a system that is fair and doesn't prejudice any one participant, especially if the participant is us.  The system I have been kicking around is one in which we would concede any trading opportunity in ICAP but would relieve our load servers with the obligation.

The ISO's (particularly PJM) and others have been stating that ICAP is required for reliability reasons.  While we can argue against this concept and try to convince these folks that operating reserves with a well-run energy market is sufficient for reliability, I don't think we are going to win (it's a battle of perception and, unfortunately, one man's perception is another man's reality).  For this reason ICAP should be the sole purview of the RTO.  The RTO is the one who has all the information on load forecasts and installed resources and is the one who performs the necessary analysis to determine reserve margins and obligations.  In PJM, the staff  would perform all calculations and present the results to the Reliability Committee for approval which would typically be approved unanimously.  

I would propose that the RTO determine the annual ICAP obligation, and then conduct an annual auction for the necessary resources.  I know that Enron does not want the RTO involved in the market, but this would be no different than what the RTO does in a daily LMP market - he receives bids, stacks them, determines the clearing price, and dispatches according to the stack.  It would be the same for the ICAP auction.  The RTO would not be a participant in the market as such and is only the facilitator.  The total cost of ICAP  would then be allocated to the transmission owners based on a pro-rata share of their installed load and recovered from load as a part of their revenue requirements (ideally it would appear as a separate line item on an end users bill and be identified as a "reliability tax" so they would see what it is costing them).

This proposal, while not perfect would accomplish the following:
1.  It would satisfy the reliability concerns of the RTO's and politicians,
2.  It would assess a "tax" on the load for reliability since load is the beneficiary (assuming there is a benefit from ICAP) of reliability,
3.  It would relieve the LSEs of the burden and obligation of providing ICAP,
4.  Deficiency penalties would not be required and accompanying deficiency rates would not need to be determined,
5.  Generators would still receive ICAP income, provided they are selected in the auction,
6.  Since the ICAP obligation is typically for a period in the future (in PJM, the ICAP requirements approved this year are for the year 2003), the much talked about "price signal"  for new generation is provided.
7.  It allows the market to set the ICAP and not some artificial deficiency rate,
8.  Market power issues associated with the existing ICAP markets are eliminated.

I kept the distribution of this proposal to a limited number to get a feel for this type of proposal.  If you are in general agreement with the concept, I can formalize it and send it to a larger distribution including the commercial folks.  I would, of course, be interested in any comments or feedback you may have and would incorporate those into the document to be distributed to the larger group.  I think a concept of this could be sold to other participants and, after we are satisfied with it, I would solicit it to others outside of Enron to get their support.  

Send me your phone number?

Jim

Can you give me the name and phone number of your decorator?

Thanks.

I thought we were responding through some other group?

Jim

This meeting is tomorrow, but when you head up to Portland -- could you see if there is any interest in responding to this FERC request through WPTF or otherwise? (we have to pay, of course)
The FERC's June 19th "market mitigation" order provided that parties could file follow-up comments within 60 days with regard to how the market has functioned under the Order and what changes should be made to the mitigation approaches.  The specific language provides as follows:

  _____  

"8. Mitigation Beyond Summer 2001
Although we are confident of the efficacy of our West-wide mitigation plan throughout the Summer of 2001, we nonetheless wish to obtain comment for the purpose of revising the mitigation methodology for future periods, if necessary.  Accordingly, we invite interested partes to file with the Commission comments and proposals concerning: (1) any developments, either beneficial or adverse, which have occurred in the Western region spot markets as a result of this order; (2) any difficulties with implementation of the mitigation plan detailed in the order, and the relevant solutions thereto; and, most importantly (3) any alternative market mitigation approaches. In order to provide for timely review and analysis, we will require that parties' comments and proposals be submitted to the Commission within 60 days of the date of issuance of this order."

  _____  

At tomorrow's WPTF Board meeting we will be discussing the filing of comments, which would be due next Monday, in response to this invitation.  This email is a heads-up that it would be helpful for Board members to begin sending comments and suggestions with regard to the three topics noted above.  Thanks!
 
Dan

Law Offices of Daniel W. Douglass
5959 Topanga Canyon Blvd.  Suite 244
Woodland Hills, CA 91367
Tel:   (818) 596-2201
Fax:  (818) 346-6502
douglass@energyattorney.com <mailto:douglass@energyattorney.com>

 

Thanks.  Appreciate the concern.  Hopefully most of this will be legal time & $ but one never knows.

Jim

Just a thought for you - I can assure you,  based on the experience in the Ontario market with other retailers, that the more Enron Direct uses independent sales channels (i.e. direct mail, telemarketing, door to door),  the compliance issues (ie. compliance by the independent sales forces with applicable codes of conduct and consumer /business practices legislation) will mushroom.  It could eat up a lot of regulatory staff time. 

ok

We should probably think about a trip to DC (if not next week the following week) to meet with the QG folks and possibly Public Opinion Strategies to discuss our RTO effort and development of messages.  
 
Please let me know if you're interested in attending this meeting so I can set something up.  
 
Thanks.

Before we invite FERC staff to the trading floor, let's set up a gameplan a=
nd run by the trading floor - I don't want a dispute with trading after inv=
iting staff down here.
=20
Jim

Linda:
=20
You may want to raise the issue of Commissioners and their staffs coming to=
 Houston to visit the trading floor when you visit with them with Frevert l=
ater this month.
=20
Sarah

Leslie Lawner, Becky Cantrell and I met with Dan Larcamp at FERC yesterday =
to discuss the marketing affiliate issue.  He agreed with the latest press =
reports that the upcoming rulemaking NOPR, expected to be voted out in Sept=
ember, would not make major structural changes to the industry.  The curren=
t document is up to the Commission level and the Commissioners are clearly =
considering the alternatives now.  Larcamp said he expected a broadening of=
 the current market affiliate rules structure to include all corporate enti=
ties.  He did specifically mention that the Commission is not comfortable w=
ith the link between financial and physical transactions and the possibilit=
y for manipulation of market prices in one market (financial) to affect pri=
ces in the other market (physical).  He also expects the Commission to blen=
d the gas and power rules, using the best practices of each.  Any NOPR that=
 is issued will of course have comment dates to allow Enron and all industr=
y participants to comment on any proposed rule changes.

Larcamp indicated that he did not think there were pervasive afilliate disc=
rimination issues in the industry, but said that the Commission needed to a=
ct due to the political pressures they got from the Hill, etc.  The El Paso=
 case is top on everyone's mind and is of special concern because it affect=
s the California market, both gas and power.=20

Larcamp indicated that he is just now learning what a "Pat Wood" Commission=
 is going to want.  He indicated that Wood has closer ties to the producer =
community than either of the two former Chairmen.  He therefore expects  th=
at the Commission will be responsive to that sector in taking a relook at t=
he affiliate rules.  However, Larcamp did mention that the only meeting tha=
t he had previously had on the affiliate issue was with the INGAA group (Jo=
e Hartsoe went with them).  It is not clear whether the producer community =
has lobbied this issue at the Commissioner level.

We discussed strategy with Dan, how to let the Commission feel more comfort=
able with the marketing affiliate issue.  He suggested that he had gained a=
 lot by visiting the trading floors (including Enron's).  He thought the Co=
mmissioners and their immediate staffs would benefit from similar visits. =
=20

We specifically raised the issue of market prices, and talked about tranpor=
tation costs not equalling basis differentials.  We stated that our markete=
rs believed that the prices in the market were determined by market factors=
 in the specific areas of delivery rather than basin costs plus transport c=
osts.  Dan did indicate some agreement with this concept and thought that m=
ore education at the Commissioner level would be very worthwhile.

If you have any questions, call Leslie, Becky or me.=20

No problem.  Have a good vacation.

Jim

Jim, intend to take 8/17, 9/10, 9/14, 9/17 & 9/23-27 off.  Now that it have Kerry on board, he can cover any mtgs over those dates (none anticipated)...let me know if this is OK.  Joan if approved could you please update HR records...

regards
Mike

Thanks.  The key, of course, is to create a filing that could not be used against us at FERC on these issues.  I guess that amending the filing is better than withdrawing the filing and re-submitting.  My only thought would be that by withdrawing, PGE provides no trail.
 
Jim

I spoke with Jay Dudley on Friday.  I suggested he contact the FERC staffer on the case to explain that they want to withdraw the request for the native load exemption and will simply have PGE execute a contract with the pipeline.  He will call his attorney at Skadden to find out who that staff person is and then they will amend the application accordingly.  I think it will be fine in the end.

Not sure how this got through the "process".  Please feel free to call on me if this isn't getting fixed right.  Also, should we just have PGE pull the application and re-file with different terms.

Also, Becky you should let Amr know and keep track - he can try and quantify. 

Jim 

Becky, I put a call into Jay and will help them to work with FERC to modify their application.  I agree that it wouldn't fly anyway.  I just wonder how they filed it in the first place???

Jim, is this the kind of thing I should be bringing to Amr's attention since  I identified the potential problem initially?  I wouldn't know how to go about quantifying it, but I guess it could be done.  I'm pretty sure FERC will throw out their initial application if it's not modified.

Leslie - 

Can you coordinate with Jay Dudley at 503-464-8860 on how to change the filing (if at all) on PGE's pipeline issue?  PGE is willing to modify the filing to try and take out the language on Native Load.  They are suggesting that maybe they should sign a contract for the full amount of the capacity (about 170,000 mmcf/d) rather than assume its right.

The goal should be to have a final decision on next steps before next Friday, Aug 17. 

Please call me with any questions. 

Thanks, 

Jim 

Steve --

As Sue highlights below, when people talk about stranded costs ending no la=
ter than 3/31/02, they are only speaking about generation-related stranded =
costs.  Above market costs for QFs will be "collected" from DA customers fo=
r some time into the future.  Wanted to make sure that this was clear.

Jim

An update from the meeting we had with SCE on August 9:  SCE said that it h=
as TEMPORARILY stopped charging CTC because it doesn't know what to charge =
for DWR. Meanwhile, it continues to keep track of the dollar flows through =
the TCBA and the new account set up for DWR.  Once the CPUC decides on the =
DWR's revenue requirement, SCE expects that it will charge generation-relat=
ed CTC again.  There is also continuing CTC related to QF contracts that wi=
ll return (and goes beyond 3/31/02) once QF contracts are above the "market=
".  SCE is also considering filing a petition with the CPUC to get guidance=
 on all these matters. Once the CPUC rules on SCE"s advice letter approache=
s, SCE plans to go back and re-bill begining with Jan 18 (it used some diff=
erent PX credit approaches early on and switched to this approach for bills=
 going out June 4). I didn't ask the question about calculating CTC back to=
 Jan 18.  I guess if the DWR rev req is retroactive and leaves room for CTC=
, they will bill it.  The other twist I had forgotten about is that they ha=
ve a one-half cent charge added to the embedded gen rate of 10.27 cents (ma=
king it about 10.77 cents) that collects the $400 million that was uncollec=
ted while the CPUC played around with a rate design for the three cent surc=
harge.  The half cent addition is for 12 months.

I wanted to summarize the conclusions from our meeting on Wednesday, August=
 8th.  Please let me know if I have misrepresented anything. =20

Below is a description of four proposals which may help resolve issues asso=
ciated with PX credits or mitigate Enron's exposure to PX credits.  Steve S=
wain has the responsibility for evaluating each proposal, and his goal is t=
o have recommendations for EWS/EES management on August 14th. =20

Current Issues:
1)  The methodology for calculating PX credits after January 18 is undeterm=
ined (SCE and PG&E have implemented different methodologies)
2)  Applicability of the 1 cent surcharge to direct access customers (PG&E =
is passing thru to DA customers, SCE is not)
3)  Impact to Enron if  FERC implements  retroactive changes to the CAL PX =
clearing prices from Oct 2, 2000 thru January 18th which result in revised =
PX credits=20
4)  Recoupment of outstanding PX credits against future payments for T&D
5)  Uncertainty surrounding future tariffs (CTC or other pass through charg=
es), making it difficult to hedge price risk in forward positions
6)  Large uncollected receivables from both PG&E and SCE

The four proposals are as follows:

SCE Recommended Approach=20
=09This approach assumes no PX (or PE) credit effective from January 18, 20=
01 forward.  Mary Lynne and Diann will work with Steve to quantify the =09g=
ross PX receivable (as billed by each utility)  which would  be reversed.  =
 This approach will ensure that only charges for T&D (no =09generation/comm=
odity costs, CTC charges, or surcharges for CDWR, including the 1 cent)  wi=
ll be applicable to Direct Access customers. =20

=09Enron would request the following:
=091) Assurances that no surcharges for CDWR will be passed through to EES =
or EEMC
=092) SCE will support our historical PX  credit receivable as an "allowabl=
e claim" at a minimum and would provide additional credit support if possib=
le. =20
=093) PG&E will support Enron's recoupment argument=20
=094) Both utilities will immediately reinstate the Cumulative Credit Balan=
ces on utility bills and agree to a netting arrangement at the utility pare=
nt =09level.=20
=095) Both utilities agree to not adjust the historical PX credits, if/when=
 an adjustment of historical PX clearing prices is mandated by FERC=20

=09Other consideration:
=09Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concern re =
CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

PG&E Recommended Approach
=09This approach assumes the PX calculation methodology effective January 1=
8, 2001 would include an "avoided cost"  component.  This avoided cost =20
=09component would include, owned generation, QF purchases, actual CDWR pur=
chases for the utility, bilateral purchase contracts, and ISO purchases.  =
=09This resulting "avoided cost" would be used in lieu of the PX clearing p=
rice in the old PX formula through March, 2002.    If the actual CDWR purch=
ase =09costs are not included, then the surcharge (along with the embedded =
gen costs)  should be included in the calculation. =20
=09
=09Enron would request the following:
=09Same as above

=09Other Consideration:
=09Enron  would continue to be exposed to "price" risk attributable to the =
actions of the utility at a minimum through March, 2002.  This would hamper=
 =09Enron's ability =09to hedge the positions in the retail portfolio.=20

Hybrid Approach
=09This approach assumes that the PG&E approach is applicable from January =
18, 2001 through September 1, 2001 and that the SCE approach is =09applicab=
le from September 1st forward.   This approach might be necessary as a comp=
romise for both utilities to provide their support of the proposal.=20

=09Enron would request the following:
=09Same as SCE and PG&E approach

=09Other considerations:
=09Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concern re =
CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

Enron Model=20
=09This approach assumes we continue to support a market based (NP15 and SP=
15) calculation methodology for the PX credit.  =20

=09Enron would request the following:
=09It is unlikely we would receive any level of cooperation from either PG&=
E and SCE.   The consensus from legal, regulatory, and EWS commercial is =
=09the probability of getting this approach approved is low.   However, und=
erstanding this amount, at a minimum, can be used to help defend the "value=
"=09Enron is foregoing in order to reach agreement with the utilities and C=
PUC.

=09Other considerations:
=09This approach would give Enron the ability to hedge "price" risk, but th=
is is somewhat offset with  incremental credit exposure associated with the=
 =09actual collection of the PX credit.

Again, please let me know if this does not clearly represent what we conclu=
ded in Wednesday's meeting.

Thanks,
Wanda Curry

thanks

It can sometimes be difficult to withdraw a filing, as the Commission actually has to approve the withdrawal. I have seen them refuse to do so, just to be ornery. The amendment may draw less attention, and there won't be anything that can be used as precedent, just something that someone may point to to embarass us, but which we can easily explain.  But in any event, by calling the staff first, I am hoping we get some feel as to how simply this can be done and maybe a withdrawal is in the realm of possibility.  

Thanks.  The key, of course, is to create a filing that could not be used against us at FERC on these issues.  I guess that amending the filing is better than withdrawing the filing and re-submitting.  My only thought would be that by withdrawing, PGE provides no trail.
 
Jim

I spoke with Jay Dudley on Friday.  I suggested he contact the FERC staffer on the case to explain that they want to withdraw the request for the native load exemption and will simply have PGE execute a contract with the pipeline.  He will call his attorney at Skadden to find out who that staff person is and then they will amend the application accordingly.  I think it will be fine in the end.

Not sure how this got through the "process".  Please feel free to call on me if this isn't getting fixed right.  Also, should we just have PGE pull the application and re-file with different terms.

Also, Becky you should let Amr know and keep track - he can try and quantify. 

Jim 

Becky, I put a call into Jay and will help them to work with FERC to modify their application.  I agree that it wouldn't fly anyway.  I just wonder how they filed it in the first place???

Jim, is this the kind of thing I should be bringing to Amr's attention since  I identified the potential problem initially?  I wouldn't know how to go about quantifying it, but I guess it could be done.  I'm pretty sure FERC will throw out their initial application if it's not modified.

Leslie - 

Can you coordinate with Jay Dudley at 503-464-8860 on how to change the filing (if at all) on PGE's pipeline issue?  PGE is willing to modify the filing to try and take out the language on Native Load.  They are suggesting that maybe they should sign a contract for the full amount of the capacity (about 170,000 mmcf/d) rather than assume its right.

The goal should be to have a final decision on next steps before next Friday, Aug 17. 

Please call me with any questions. 

Thanks, 

Jim 

Linda -

Please work up some letters from me to the people in the file ECAR, MAIN, MAPP for my review.  Thanks.

Jim

Jim:
As we discussed and per your request, the attachment entitled ECAR, MAIN, MAPP contains my recommendation and reliability council contacts for replacing me on various committees and panels.  

The attachment entitled Sprint contains information regarding the termination of the Enron cell phone.

On Wednesday, I will terminate all phone service associated with the Enron Bismarck office.  

Please contact me with any questions.

                                       

The Offsite is more imporant.  Please call Lysa Akin to confirm the date.

Jim

No, however, I noticed this is the same day they rescheduled the Government Affairs Offsite in Portland.  

Am I scheduled to attend?

Jim

The next meeting of the CAEM Board of Directors will be held on Wednesday,
September 12, at the Grand Hyatt Hotel in Washington, DC.

The meeting is being held in conjunction with the third meeting of our DISCO
of the Future Forum. (Please visit our newly updated website www.caem.org
for more information on the DISCO Forum.) Following the Board meeting on
Wednesday, you are invited to join with members of the DISCO Forum for a
Wednesday evening reception and dinner, including a guest speaker. Board
members are also invited to join in the substantive session of the DISCO
Forum on Thursday, September 13.

Because of an international medical convention ongoing in Washington at the
same time as our meetings, the Grand Hyatt unfortunately is already booked.
However, we have reserved a block of rooms at the nearby Wyndham Hotel. To
reserve one of these rooms, you must inform the Wyndham staff that you are
part of the CAEM group. If you should decide to arrange lodging at a
different hotel, please do so quickly as there is limited availability in
all surrounding hotels. We will be making the Wyndham rooms available to
members of the DISCO Forum on July 20.

If you have any questions or require any assistance at all, please contact
Hope Duncan at 202.739.0134 or Jeff Mangold at 703.729.2710. We are looking
forward to seeing you on September 12.

Hotel Information:

Grand Hyatt Hotel
1000 H Street NW
Washington DC 20001
Phone: 202.582.1234 or 1.800.233.1234
Fax: 202.637.4781
Website: http://washington.hyatt.com/wasgh/index.html

Wyndham Washington DC
1400 M Street NW
Washington, DC 20005
Phone: 202.429.1700 or 1.877.999.3223
Fax: 202.785.0786
Website: http://www.wyndham.com/Washington_DC/default.cfm

You on this call?

Jim
I wasn't sure if everyone had received this.

Shelby J. Kelley, Esq.
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
2000 K Street, NW  Suite 500
Washington, DC 20006-1872
(202) 828-5859
skelley@bracepatt.com

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTE:
This email message is intended solely for the individual or individuals nam=
ed above.  It may contain confidential attorney-client privileged informati=
on and/or attorney work product.  If the reader of this message is not the =
intended recipient, you are requested not to read, copy or distribute it or=
 any of the information it contains.  Please delete it immediately and noti=
fy the sender by return email or by telephone.  Thank you.

>>> "Peg Moore" <MAM@vnf.com> 08/13/01 04:29PM >>>
We have scheduled a conference call for tomorrow @10:00am (EST) to discuss =
various interpretations of Judge Cintron's Discovery Order for purposes of =
putting together the information that must be submitted Thursday.

call in #:         1-800-752-1361
reference:      Peg Moore conference call ID#08130357

Peg Moore
Van Ness Feldman, PC
mam@vnf.com
202-298-1847

Becky --

What's the upside and downside from the Settlement.  My only concern is tha=
t FERC is so swamped with issues may be overwhelming.  Where is our busines=
s going?

Jim
FYI.  Obviously, we would want to participate in any settlement discussions=
.  Do you see any reason why we would not want to support the motion to est=
ablish the settlement procedure?  SRP indicates that the ongoing proceeding=
s would not be delayed. =20

Attached is a draft motion of Salt River Project to establish a date certai=
n
for convening a settlement conference under Rule 602, in accordance with th=
e
settlement package distributed on July 30. Paragraph 8 of the motion will
list all parties that are in support of this procedural motion.  A company'=
s
support for the motion IN NO WAY reflects any agreement to support any
setttlement proposal.  It merely indicates a desire to initiate a parallel
settlement path without interfering with or delaying FERC's processing of
the ongoing proceedings. Please reply to all by COB Tuesday in advising
whether your company would like to be listed.  We intend to file on
Wednesday early afternoon.  Thank you.

Energy Advocates LLP
202-371-9889
202-371-9025 (fax)
jlgreene@energyadvocates.com <mailto:jlgreene@energyadvocates.com>
 <<rp00-336setmot1.doc>>

 - rp00-336setmot1.doc << File: rp00-336setmot1.doc >>

Linda --

Please reschedule until Wednesday.  I have a meeting all afternoon on California.  Tell Mike I apologize greatly.

Jim

Sarah & Alan --

I plan on attending.  Both of you should feel free.  I think that right now we should decline any offer to present unless we can come up with a set of "Guiding Principles" (i.e., prospective market rules, etc.)
 
Jim

 

As mentioned in a July 31st memo, EPSA will be hosting a one-day roundtable discussion on the issue of market-based rate methods, as well as EPSA's forward-looking position on the subject.  The meeting will begin with lunch at 11:30 a.m., officially start at noon, and end at approximately 5:00 p.m..  Unless the group is too large, the meeting will be held at EPSA's office at 1401 New York Avenue, NW, in Washington, DC.  An agenda will be sent out closer to the meeting.

We would like to start the meeting with different members' views on the issue and have been approached by member companies who would like to make brief presentations on the topic.  If any Board member company would like to present on the issue, please contact Erin Perrigo at 202-628-8200 by noon on Tuesday, September 4th.  If you would like to attend this meeting and have not already responded, RSVP to Jackie Gallagher at jgallagher@epsa.org.

Per our discussions yesterday, the following should hopefully be completed before the 2:30 (CST) conference call on Recoupment and the 4:00 (CST) conference call on PX Credit & 1c/kwh Surcharge.

1.	Bob Williams - Synopsis of 1c/kwh Surcharge
2.	Sue Mara - Background on CPUC Activity on 1c/kwh Surcharge (to be included in Bob Williams' write-up)
3.	Dian Huddleson - Plan for Requesting Net Bill Reinstatement
4.	URM - Analysis of PX Credit Methodology
5.	Mary Lynne Ruffer - Analysis of Net Bill Amounts
6.	Jim Steffes - CPUC Legal Analysis

The goal for today is to have all necessary data to develop our recommendations for how to proceed in these matters so that we can meet with the business heads tomorrow.

Call In Information -

2:30 Recoupment
1-800-998-2462 # 5462908

4:00 PX Credit & 1c/kwh Surcharge
To Be Provided By Linda Noske

Wes & Wade --
 
You've probably seen this, but FERC issued this notice for Jurisdictional Public Utilities related to a FASB decision.

Do you know who the appropriate accounting person for this info? 

Enclosed: 

                                                     OED-DRAP 
                                                 Docket No. AI01-1-000 

                                                         August 10, 
     2001 

                                 
             TO ALL JURISDICTIONAL PUBLIC UTILITIES, LICENSEES, 
             NATURAL GAS COMPANIES, AND OIL PIPELINE COMPANIES 
                    
     SUBJECT:       ACCOUNTING AND REPORTING FOR CERTAIN TYPES OF 
                    FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND HEDGING ACTIVITIES 

                                                                      

     INTRODUCTION 

          The Financial Accounting Standards Board has issued three 
     pronouncements affecting the manner in which certain types of 
     financial instruments and hedging activities are measured and 
     reported in the financial statements.  

     Please see that attachment. 

     Thank you, 

Duscha S. Brown 
Legal Assistant 
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P. 
2000 K St. NW 
Washington, D.C. 20006 

Richard --

We need to make some decisions very soon (this morning) about Enron's submission of data into the Pacific Northwest ("PNW") refund case.  The data is due at FERC no later than Thursday August 16.

The key strategic issues in submitting the data to the ALJ include the following --

1.	Do we exclude bookouts (ie, only physical transactions)?

It appears that other market participants intend to exclude bookouts.  EPMI should also exclude bookouts given that these transactions never went physical and hence are not appropriate to consider in this case.

2.	Do we provide only sales transactions or do we include our purchases?

The ALJ's Order allows parties to include purchases only if the selling party is not an intervenor in this case and hence, our purchase would not be included in the data.  The ALJ wants to limit the amount of data to be provided to ease the workload.  Our initial analysis of some data from other parties is that there will be transaction data irregularities and hence, we should provide all of our relevant sales and purchases.  By having the data in the case, we can dispute any inappropriate transaction and ensure that all of our purchases are included in the calculation of refunds.  This is key for Enron in that our primary defense is that Enron deserves refunds as a purchaser to offset any sales refund amount.

3.	Do we provide data for all 4 time blocks (through 24 hours, through 7 days, through one month, through 1 year)?

The ALJ's Order indicates that parties are to provide data for transactions that are not consistent with the initial definition of "spot" - deals less than 24 hours done day ahead or day of.  Our initial recommendation is to provide the data but to retain our arguments that this is not consistent with FERC's Order.  The primary downside of not complying with this element of the data submission request is that we anger the ALJ and end up providing the data anyway after being told directly to comply.  In addition, it is possible that by providing all of the data we could be creating the problem that some economist or competitor could get their hands on the data at a later date and "determine" our trading strategies.  Weighing these risks, I would still recommend to include this data but argue before the ALJ and the FERC the ultimate relevance.

4.	Do we provide data based on contract date? 

The ALJ has requested data for contracts that were valid on December 25, 2000 that had physical energy flowing after December 25, 2000 through June 20, 2001.  This would explicitly include Balance of the Month transactions for December 2000 and the associated physical flows. To minimize the hours on these transactions, we intend to enter the transaction date in the data submission to allow for FERC staff to delete inappropriate transactions.

I will call you this morning.  

Thanks,

Jim

Left you off.  Sorry.

Per our discussions yesterday, the following should hopefully be completed before the 2:30 (CST) conference call on Recoupment and the 4:00 (CST) conference call on PX Credit & 1c/kwh Surcharge.

1.	Bob Williams - Synopsis of 1c/kwh Surcharge
2.	Sue Mara - Background on CPUC Activity on 1c/kwh Surcharge (to be included in Bob Williams' write-up)
3.	Dian Huddleson - Plan for Requesting Net Bill Reinstatement
4.	URM - Analysis of PX Credit Methodology
5.	Mary Lynne Ruffer - Analysis of Net Bill Amounts
6.	Jim Steffes - CPUC Legal Analysis

The goal for today is to have all necessary data to develop our recommendations for how to proceed in these matters so that we can meet with the business heads tomorrow.

Call In Information -

2:30 Recoupment
1-800-998-2462 # 5462908

4:00 PX Credit & 1c/kwh Surcharge
To Be Provided By Linda Noske

Ginger --

Please send to Rick's team.
 
Jim
 
FYI - The report is attached.

NGI's Daily Gas Price Index 
published : August 14, 2001

CAEM Study: Gas Dereg Has Saved Consumers $600B 

Nearly 20 years of competition in the natural gas market has reduced national energy costs by more than $600 billion, according to a new study issued Monday. 

This amounts to per-household savings of $5,938 as a result of gas deregulation, which began in the late 1970s with the phased removal of wellhead price ceilings, then graduated to lighter-handed regulation of interstate pipelines and now is focusing on opening up the distribution end, according to the study commissioned by the Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets (CAEM), a non-profit think-tank in Washington, DC. 

"The nearly 20 years of competition we've experienced in the natural gas industry proves that the right conditions can foster lower costs for consumers and motivate the industry to make investments that benefit the environment, our economy and our national security," said CAEM CEO Ken Malloy. 

In addition to the cost savings to the public, the study credits deregulation for the rise in the number of gas suppliers at the wholesale and retail levels; a reduction in long-term price fluctuations, although it has triggered more short-term price volatility; greater focus on energy-efficient purchases by customers, making gas the fuel of choice for many; and industry improvements in how its buys, sells and trades gas supplies. In addition, it noted that light-handed regulation of gas pipelines has been a big factor in passing through lower commodity costs to consumers. 

In short, the study reveals that the gas deregulation skeptics of the 1970s and early 1980s "were wrong by a long shot," according to CAEM. 

"What we also need to recognize is that we've witnessed a re-distribution of wealth from foreign oil producers to domestic natural gas producers, and that these lower prices have contributed measurably to a more stable inflation rate, lower greenhouse gas emissions and improved our [national] security due to a reduced reliance on imported oil," said Malloy, who formerly was on the staff at FERC and the U.S. Energy Department. 

The study, entitled "California Here We Come: The Lessons Learned from Natural Gas Deregulation," offers much guidance for the energy markets in the western state: 1) put the right regulatory framework in place, half measures are more dangerous than doing nothing; 2) don't expect results overnight, stay the course; 3) markets do work, and consumers and the environment will be winners under properly executed reform; 4) the costs of change are easier to calculate than the benefits; all the studies about gas deregulation underestimated the benefits; and 5) organized consumer advocates are often very wrong about the impact changes will have on consumers. 

Steve --
=20
I've stopped trying to understand the Utilities in California and what they=
 want - it hurts too much.  But yes, the law allows the Utilities to contin=
ue to collect "something" from customers, including DA customers, for QF co=
sts beyond 3/31/02.
=20
Jim

Let me make sure I understand this.  Prior to April 2002, the UDCs want the=
ir QF costs to be as low as possible, since this will cause the PX credit t=
o be lower and thus the positive CTC higher.  However, beginning April 2002=
, they pray for just the opposite -- the greater their QF costs, the more t=
hey can collect from DA customers to help pay for the QFs.
=20
I truly hope I have misunderstood you, else my brain may explode.
=20
=20

Steve --=20

As Sue highlights below, when people talk about stranded costs ending no la=
ter than 3/31/02, they are only speaking about generation-related stranded =
costs.  Above market costs for QFs will be "collected" from DA customers fo=
r some time into the future.  Wanted to make sure that this was clear.

Jim=20

Cc:     Gorny, Vladimir; Bradford, William S.; Kingerski, Harry; Savage, Go=
rdon; Tribolet, Michael=20
An update from the meeting we had with SCE on August 9:  SCE said that it h=
as TEMPORARILY stopped charging CTC because it doesn't know what to charge =
for DWR. Meanwhile, it continues to keep track of the dollar flows through =
the TCBA and the new account set up for DWR.  Once the CPUC decides on the =
DWR's revenue requirement, SCE expects that it will charge generation-relat=
ed CTC again.  There is also continuing CTC related to QF contracts that wi=
ll return (and goes beyond 3/31/02) once QF contracts are above the "market=
".  SCE is also considering filing a petition with the CPUC to get guidance=
 on all these matters. Once the CPUC rules on SCE"s advice letter approache=
s, SCE plans to go back and re-bill begining with Jan 18 (it used some diff=
erent PX credit approaches early on and switched to this approach for bills=
 going out June 4). I didn't ask the question about calculating CTC back to=
 Jan 18.  I guess if the DWR rev req is retroactive and leaves room for CTC=
, they will bill it.  The other twist I had forgotten about is that they ha=
ve a one-half cent charge added to the embedded gen rate of 10.27 cents (ma=
king it about 10.77 cents) that collects the $400 million that was uncollec=
ted while the CPUC played around with a rate design for the three cent surc=
harge.  The half cent addition is for 12 months.

Cc:     Gorny, Vladimir; Bradford, William S.=20

I wanted to summarize the conclusions from our meeting on Wednesday, August=
 8th.  Please let me know if I have misrepresented anything. =20

Below is a description of four proposals which may help resolve issues asso=
ciated with PX credits or mitigate Enron's exposure to PX credits.  Steve S=
wain has the responsibility for evaluating each proposal, and his goal is t=
o have recommendations for EWS/EES management on August 14th. =20

Current Issues:=20
1)  The methodology for calculating PX credits after January 18 is undeterm=
ined (SCE and PG&E have implemented different methodologies)

2)  Applicability of the 1 cent surcharge to direct access customers (PG&E =
is passing thru to DA customers, SCE is not)=20
3)  Impact to Enron if  FERC implements  retroactive changes to the CAL PX =
clearing prices from Oct 2, 2000 thru January 18th which result in revised =
PX credits=20

4)  Recoupment of outstanding PX credits against future payments for T&D=20
5)  Uncertainty surrounding future tariffs (CTC or other pass through charg=
es), making it difficult to hedge price risk in forward positions

6)  Large uncollected receivables from both PG&E and SCE=20

The four proposals are as follows:=20

SCE Recommended Approach=20
        This approach assumes no PX (or PE) credit effective from January 1=
8, 2001 forward.  Mary Lynne and Diann will work with Steve to quantify the=
  gross PX receivable (as billed by each utility)  which would  be reversed=
.   This approach will ensure that only charges for T&D (no    generation/c=
ommodity costs, CTC charges, or surcharges for CDWR, including the 1 cent) =
 will be applicable to Direct Access customers. =20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        1) Assurances that no surcharges for CDWR will be passed through to=
 EES or EEMC=20
        2) SCE will support our historical PX  credit receivable as an "all=
owable claim" at a minimum and would provide additional credit support if p=
ossible. =20

        3) PG&E will support Enron's recoupment argument=20
        4) Both utilities will immediately reinstate the Cumulative Credit =
Balances on utility bills and agree to a netting arrangement at the utility=
 parent   level.=20

        5) Both utilities agree to not adjust the historical PX credits, if=
/when an adjustment of historical PX clearing prices is mandated by FERC=20

        Other consideration:=20
        Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concer=
n re CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

PG&E Recommended Approach=20
        This approach assumes the PX calculation methodology effective Janu=
ary 18, 2001 would include an "avoided cost"  component.  This avoided cost=
 =20

        component would include, owned generation, QF purchases, actual CDW=
R purchases for the utility, bilateral purchase contracts, and ISO purchase=
s.        This resulting "avoided cost" would be used in lieu of the PX cle=
aring price in the old PX formula through March, 2002.    If the actual CDW=
R purchase  costs are not included, then the surcharge (along with the embe=
dded gen costs)  should be included in the calculation. =20

       =20
        Enron would request the following:=20
        Same as above=20

        Other Consideration:=20
        Enron  would continue to be exposed to "price" risk attributable to=
 the actions of the utility at a minimum through March, 2002.  This would h=
amper     Enron's ability         to hedge the positions in the retail port=
folio.=20

Hybrid Approach=20
        This approach assumes that the PG&E approach is applicable from Jan=
uary 18, 2001 through September 1, 2001 and that the SCE approach is       =
  applicable from September 1st forward.   This approach might be necessary=
 as a compromise for both utilities to provide their support of the proposa=
l.=20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        Same as SCE and PG&E approach=20

        Other considerations:=20
        Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concer=
n re CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

Enron Model=20
        This approach assumes we continue to support a market based (NP15 a=
nd SP15) calculation methodology for the PX credit.  =20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        It is unlikely we would receive any level of cooperation from eithe=
r PG&E and SCE.   The consensus from legal, regulatory, and EWS commercial =
is        the probability of getting this approach approved is low.   Howev=
er, understanding this amount, at a minimum, can be used to help defend the=
 "value"    Enron is foregoing in order to reach agreement with the utiliti=
es and CPUC.

        Other considerations:=20
        This approach would give Enron the ability to hedge "price" risk, b=
ut this is somewhat offset with  incremental credit exposure associated wit=
h the     actual collection of the PX credit.

Again, please let me know if this does not clearly represent what we conclu=
ded in Wednesday's meeting.=20

Thanks,=20
Wanda Curry=20

Ok.  If the FERC team in DC (Donna and Sarah) are ok, let's support this bu=
t let's make sure that we have outlined our "needs" and "wants" and "no way=
s" before going in.  Also, who would cover and can we do this in Houston (g=
uessing most of the parties in town)?

Jim

I would say, no downside to supporting implementation of Settlement proceed=
ings.  As one of the customers replied yesterday afternoon: "Count Phelps D=
odge Corporation "in" for settlement conferences - possible certainty throu=
gh settlement is preferable to several years of litigation."  I'd bet that =
FERC would be thrilled to see a settlement proposal, even one that was cont=
ested, given - as you say - that they are swamped with other issues.  With =
no settlement, any decision they issue that disadvantages one segment is su=
re to be litigated.  At least with a settlement, they stand a chance of get=
ting something out of the process even though they might not get everything=
 they want.

Feedback from Janie, presumably cleared by the Desk:  "I am deferring this =
to you but I don't see any reason we would have any problem with this  eith=
er."

Becky --

What's the upside and downside from the Settlement.  My only concern is tha=
t FERC is so swamped with issues may be overwhelming.  Where is our busines=
s going?

Jim
FYI.  Obviously, we would want to participate in any settlement discussions=
.  Do you see any reason why we would not want to support the motion to est=
ablish the settlement procedure?  SRP indicates that the ongoing proceeding=
s would not be delayed. =20

Attached is a draft motion of Salt River Project to establish a date certai=
n
for convening a settlement conference under Rule 602, in accordance with th=
e
settlement package distributed on July 30. Paragraph 8 of the motion will
list all parties that are in support of this procedural motion.  A company'=
s
support for the motion IN NO WAY reflects any agreement to support any
setttlement proposal.  It merely indicates a desire to initiate a parallel
settlement path without interfering with or delaying FERC's processing of
the ongoing proceedings. Please reply to all by COB Tuesday in advising
whether your company would like to be listed.  We intend to file on
Wednesday early afternoon.  Thank you.

Energy Advocates LLP
202-371-9889
202-371-9025 (fax)
jlgreene@energyadvocates.com <mailto:jlgreene@energyadvocates.com>
 <<rp00-336setmot1.doc>>

 - rp00-336setmot1.doc << File: rp00-336setmot1.doc >>

Jeff --

Any communications with ElectriCities on virtual direct access?  Maybe another good avenue for ElectriCities to help its members?  Now that direct access is dead in NC, ElectriCities could agree to move new products through their stable channel.

Jim
Focus on Electric Deregulation Fades at High Point, N.C., Meeting 
Jacob McConnico 

Aug. 10, 2001 
Knight Ridder Tribune Business News - KRTBN 
Copyright (C) 2001 KRTBN Knight Ridder Tribune Business News; Source: World Reporter (TM) 

High Point electric utilities officials, city staff and elected leaders plan to spend the next two days talking about power issues ranging from saving residents money to unloading some of the city's debt. The 35th ElectriCities Annual Meeting gets started today with registration from 2 to 7 p.m. in New Bern. The conference shifts into high gear, with daylong meetings, presentations and demonstrations planned for Friday and Saturday. High Point Mayor Arnold Koonce, City Manager Strib Boynton and councilmen Ron Moore and Ron Wilkins will attend the two-day event. 

Koonce said the annual meeting provides a rare opportunity for High Point officials to meet with leaders from the 50 other cities and towns across the state that run their own power systems. The group meets under the umbrella of ElectriCities, a nonprofit group formed in 1965 to handle many of the issues that arise from municipal power distribution.

"It's the only time, unless you call a special meeting, that these officials get together in one place," Koonce said. "We get to find out what is happening throughout all of the ElectriCities."

ElectriCities provides customer service and safety training, emergency and technical assistance, communications, government affairs and legal services to its 51 members. The group also provides management services to the state's two municipal power agencies, N.C. Municipal Power Agency Number 1, which includes High Point and Lexington, and N.C. Eastern Municipal Power Agency.

Representatives from across the state will attend the meeting, and Moore said he is most interested in learning about progress on restructuring the $5.4 billion debt owed by ElectriCities and its members.

Moore said it is imperative for Duke Energy Corp. to obtain recertification from the Nuclear Regulatory Commission for the Catawba and McGuire nuclear power plants, which supply power to High Point and other members of ElectriCities. Recertification would allow the plants to operate for an additional 20 years, making it possible for ElectriCities to refinance its debt.

"I want to learn more about the effects of restructuring our debt on our customers," Moore said. "I want to know where ElectriCities stands on restructuring the debt, and where Duke is on getting this recertification."

Boynton echoed Moore's sentiments, but said this year's meeting will be a little different than last year's meeting because attendees will not be as worried about the possibility of the state deregulating the power industry.

"I think deregulation is effectively a dead issue because of the trouble they have had in California," Boynton said. "This meeting, however, is critically important because the electric fund makes up about $80 million of our annual budget. It's the single-largest part of our budget. Most of the decisions are made by ElectriCities, so it is critical for the Council to attend this meeting." 

	

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

Why is Buxton upset?  This is good for consumers?  What does he want to change his mind and push this forward?  Wouldn't this just lower the prices to his customers?

Also, this is why we need to be constantly pushing the political message in the states.

Jim

FERC Exceeded Jurisdiction With RTO Order - Consumer Grps 

Aug. 14, 2001 
Dow Jones Energy Service 
(Copyright (c) 2001, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

(This article was originally published Monday) NEW YORK -(Dow Jones)- New England consumer advocates Monday said federal energy regulators overstepped their jurisdiction in ordering the consolidation of the wholesale electricity markets and transmission systems in the northeast U.S. 

The Federal Energy Commission in mid-July directed operators of the power grids in New York, New England and the Mid-Atlantic to merge, as part of a sweeping series of orders designed to put control of the country's transmission system in independent hands. 

Federal law allows the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to require transmission systems to connect, but only at the request of a state regulators, according to a filing made by Maine law firm on behalf of consumer groups, nonprofit energy groups and the attorney general of Massachusetts. 

"The Commission makes no claim in the New England Order that it is acting at the behest of a state commission or public utility, and is, therefore, without authority to mandate the involuntary combination of the Northeastern RTOs," the groups said in their filing, which asked FERC to reconsider its consolidation decision. 

FERC should give the three Northeast grid operators a transition period to evolve into three regional transmission organization, or RTOs, with similar market designs, transmission tariffs and governance structures before requiring them to merge, the filing said. 

The commission directed the operators of the wholesale power grid in New England, New York and the Mid-Atlantic to meet with utilities, generators, trade groups, state regulators and a FERC judge in Washington for 45 days beginning July 19 to outline plans for creating one transmission organization from Washington, D.C., to Maine. The regulators also directed Judge Peter Young to submit recommendation to them 10 days after the conclusion of the talks. 

The commission ordered the consolidation of the Northeast power grid "at breakneck speed" without studying the technical feasibility of creating one RTO and without analyzing the costs and benefits of merging, the consumer groups said in their filing. 

Young has directed meeting participants not to discuss the substance of the negotiations, but sources familiar with the talks said the group is outlining a business model describing how to structure a Northeast RTO without filling in the details. Participants have said, for example, that this regional market should have one transmission tariff and one interconnection standard, but haven't defined what that tariff and standard should be. 

"Many people are very discouraged by the ongoing talks," said Anthony Buxton, an attorney with the Maine law firm that submitted Monday's filing. 

All 300 meeting participants have been gathering in Washington twice a week and have been working on the issues every day outside of those meetings, Young said. Next week, they will break off into smaller groups and begin meeting every day, according to Young and market participants. 

The commission was in turmoil when it issued its RTO decision, as evidenced by Chairman Curt Hebert's resignation last week, and should therefore reconsider its order, Buxton said. 

The consumer groups also asked the commission to allow residential electricity users to have a say in how the unified electricity market in the northeast U.S. will run. Market participants, including consumers, will have an advisory capacity only in this new market and won't be allowed to vote on the rules that govern the market, as they do now, Buxton said. 

This decision contradicted another one FERC issued in 1996 requiring utilities to open their transmission lines to competitors. In that order, the commission encouraged New England to create an independent system operator to oversee the power grid and to give market participants equal say in determining how this regional transmission system and electricity market would operate 

The consumer groups that filed Monday are working to galvanize other organizations representing residential customers in New England, Buxton said. 

"Consumers are going to be at the forefront of a massive attack on FERC for what it's done," Buxton said. 

-By Kristen McNamara, Dow Jones Newswires; 201-938-2061; kristen.mcna <mailto:kristen.mcnamara@dowjones.com>

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

Buxton is not a true consumer advocate - I thought that he was the guy who put MECC's together.  We have a relationship with him.  Why not work our magic.

Jim

Now Jim - You as one of the three (3) smartest energy people in the world should know, You are dealing with a consumer advocate, Not a brain surgeon.  Have you ever met a consuemr advocate that was happy with anything? Seriously, we will try to neutralize.  Hope all is well. Steve

Why is Buxton upset?  This is good for consumers?  What does he want to change his mind and push this forward?  Wouldn't this just lower the prices to his customers?

Also, this is why we need to be constantly pushing the political message in the states.

Jim

FERC Exceeded Jurisdiction With RTO Order - Consumer Grps 

Aug. 14, 2001 
Dow Jones Energy Service 
(Copyright (c) 2001, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

(This article was originally published Monday) NEW YORK -(Dow Jones)- New England consumer advocates Monday said federal energy regulators overstepped their jurisdiction in ordering the consolidation of the wholesale electricity markets and transmission systems in the northeast U.S. 

The Federal Energy Commission in mid-July directed operators of the power grids in New York, New England and the Mid-Atlantic to merge, as part of a sweeping series of orders designed to put control of the country's transmission system in independent hands. 

Federal law allows the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to require transmission systems to connect, but only at the request of a state regulators, according to a filing made by Maine law firm on behalf of consumer groups, nonprofit energy groups and the attorney general of Massachusetts. 

"The Commission makes no claim in the New England Order that it is acting at the behest of a state commission or public utility, and is, therefore, without authority to mandate the involuntary combination of the Northeastern RTOs," the groups said in their filing, which asked FERC to reconsider its consolidation decision. 

FERC should give the three Northeast grid operators a transition period to evolve into three regional transmission organization, or RTOs, with similar market designs, transmission tariffs and governance structures before requiring them to merge, the filing said. 

The commission directed the operators of the wholesale power grid in New England, New York and the Mid-Atlantic to meet with utilities, generators, trade groups, state regulators and a FERC judge in Washington for 45 days beginning July 19 to outline plans for creating one transmission organization from Washington, D.C., to Maine. The regulators also directed Judge Peter Young to submit recommendation to them 10 days after the conclusion of the talks. 

The commission ordered the consolidation of the Northeast power grid "at breakneck speed" without studying the technical feasibility of creating one RTO and without analyzing the costs and benefits of merging, the consumer groups said in their filing. 

Young has directed meeting participants not to discuss the substance of the negotiations, but sources familiar with the talks said the group is outlining a business model describing how to structure a Northeast RTO without filling in the details. Participants have said, for example, that this regional market should have one transmission tariff and one interconnection standard, but haven't defined what that tariff and standard should be. 

"Many people are very discouraged by the ongoing talks," said Anthony Buxton, an attorney with the Maine law firm that submitted Monday's filing. 

All 300 meeting participants have been gathering in Washington twice a week and have been working on the issues every day outside of those meetings, Young said. Next week, they will break off into smaller groups and begin meeting every day, according to Young and market participants. 

The commission was in turmoil when it issued its RTO decision, as evidenced by Chairman Curt Hebert's resignation last week, and should therefore reconsider its order, Buxton said. 

The consumer groups also asked the commission to allow residential electricity users to have a say in how the unified electricity market in the northeast U.S. will run. Market participants, including consumers, will have an advisory capacity only in this new market and won't be allowed to vote on the rules that govern the market, as they do now, Buxton said. 

This decision contradicted another one FERC issued in 1996 requiring utilities to open their transmission lines to competitors. In that order, the commission encouraged New England to create an independent system operator to oversee the power grid and to give market participants equal say in determining how this regional transmission system and electricity market would operate 

The consumer groups that filed Monday are working to galvanize other organizations representing residential customers in New England, Buxton said. 

"Consumers are going to be at the forefront of a massive attack on FERC for what it's done," Buxton said. 

-By Kristen McNamara, Dow Jones Newswires; 201-938-2061; kristen.mcna <mailto:kristen.mcnamara@dowjones.com>

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

FYI.  Please keep this confidential.

Jim

FYI - RE: your statement this morning about Boeing, Raytheon indicated this morning, that on last Friday's conference call with California Manufacturers & Tech. Assn., Boeing told the lobbing group at CMTA they had to prevail with an 8/31/01 retro date and it was apparent that APS ES was their supplier....CLECA probably has the same marching orders from Boeing if they are still members there...

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

I'm taking Sept 3 off - I think it's Labor Day.  Please also note that I am taking off late in September.  Choose the best date to work through for this.

Jim

Well, it looks like I have already hit a road block in scheduling this meeting.  Below are some other dates, please review them and let me know which one's will work with your schedules.  Also, this meeting will be held similar to the last budget meeting.  The meeting will be held in Houston and will begin @ 11:00 AM and conclude by 5:00 PM.

Dates:
September 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 10, 11, 20, 21

Please look these dates over and respond to me ASAP!

Thanks!!!!!!

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Rick would like to hold another budget meeting in September.  Please see the dates below and let me know how many of the dates will work for your schedules

September 25, 26 & 27.

Please get back with me at your earliest convenience.

Thanks

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Pls update my calendar.
MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketing Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: August 14, 2001

RE: August 17th Power Marketing Conference Call
      ?Friday, 11:30 a.m. (EDT) - NOTE DATE AND TIME
       CHANGE

Due to the ongoing FERC RTO settlement conferences, we will hold this week's Power Marketers Working Group conference call on Friday, August 17th, at 11:30 A.M. (EDT).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

August 17, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

?  California
   ?  Rehearing of Refund Order
      ?  Draft to follow
   ?  California Refund Prehearing Conference
   ?  PNW Refund Case

?  New York

?  Alliance

?  NE RTO Settlement Conference

?  SE RTO Settlement Conference

?  GISB Meeting

?  EPSA Legislative & Regulatory Committees Joint Meeting on NAERO
   Legislation: August 20th

Pls put on my calendar.
Linda --please calendar.  Also Susan you should attend if possible.

Please plan on attending a meeting on Thursday, 8/23/01 at 11:30 a.m. to 1:00 p.m. for a presentation by Lloyd Will (location to be announced later).  Lloyd as agreed to present the PJM model of LMP and congestion and how these issues will soon impact the Midwest Markets.

Additionally, I have invited Mike Roan to present a Midwest RTO update. 

This will be an excellent opportunity to come up to speed on a series of issues that will have significant impact to our region.

Lunch to be provided 

Thanks 

Oscar Dalton 

John -

Can you please get with Sue?

thx

I assume you're all over this, Linda.

On the off chance that you haven't seen it.  Feinstein is asking IEP for comments on her draft legislation that would increase regulation of natural gas, define what just and reasonable rates would be and increase refund power on the electric side.  I think we would have some concerns with her proposal.  If you want to pass along our comments to IEP, just get them to me.

Ask Linda Noske to schedule some time for us to go over.  I think it's great. 

Jim

Jim,

I am signing up for some correspondence classes to finish off my Bachelors.  I understand that I need to get you to sign off that yes, I am improving my value to Enron by taking them and yes, Enron is aware, and all that other good stuff.  Should I just send everything to you via interoffice?  Or do you want to talk about it in detail?

Thanks!

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Bob --

Let's discuss today.

Jim

Please find attached a 3rd draft of the Joint Stipulation of Issues.  It attempts to reflect the comments of about 20 of the TFG's participants.

No one has requested a conference call.

Please keep in mind this is a DRAFT that will be circulated to all parties to EL01-10 tomorrow.  It will no doubt be subject to further negotiation.  While it is highly unlikely that all the parties will reach agreement on a Joint Stipulation by the due date on the procedural schedule(i.e., Thursday, August 16), we nevertheless should make an effort to get it out to the other parties as early as possible tomorrow.

Accordingly, please propose only those additional revisions that you feel are critical at this time.  If I have not heard from you by 10:00 a.m. EDT tomorrow, August 15, I will go ahead and serve the other parties with the document conspicuously marked "DRAFT".

(Don't you hate this process?)

Regards,

Patricia Fry Godley
Van Ness Feldman
(202) 298-1940

 - VANDOC_106417_2.DOC 

On what case?

Jim

Please be aware that the latest draft of the reply brief will be sent out early afternoon tomorrow, along with information about a conference call to take place on Thursday to discuss the brief.  Thanks.

Jacqueline R. Java
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
2000 K Street, N.W. Suite 500
Washington, D.C. 20006-1872
ph: (202) 828-5828
fax: (202) 857-2124

Linda -

Pls work with Brian Redmond's asst to have a meeting with me, him, Jean Ryall, and Becky Cantrell.

Thx.

Jim, Brian has been working with Jean Ryall on Texas issues and he assumed she would be the right person for the Pat Wood contact.  He sent her a draft of a letter last night in fact.  (See below).

The PowerPoint presentation is one that he made to TRRC staff.  

He wants to push on both fronts (Texas and Federal) to get more competition in the state.  Said he would like to get together, but he's out Thursday, Friday, Monday and Tuesday.  Linda can get with his assistant and set something up for late next week if you are available.

FYI

 

Jean,

Please find the attached letter to Pat Wood as follow up to our meeting last week.  Please modify with your thoughts and resend.  

Also, should we visit with Max Yzagurie at the Texas PUC?

Regards,
Brian

 

Maybe someone from the Risk Mgmt Working Group would also go?

Jim

FYI in case someone wants to attend (maybe to get some customers?).  I am not sure why it is called "Gas Cost Stabilization" (unless that refers to a producer buying a hedge) since some volatility sends necessary price signals.

The American Gas Association will host a Gas Cost Stabilization Seminar
on September 20-21, 2001 at AGA, 400 N. Capitol St. NW, Washington, DC.
Attendees at this day-and-a-half meeting will learn what caused recent
volatility in natural gas prices and how risk-management tools can
mitigate gas cost volatility.  Speakers will discuss the risks and
rewards of various cost-stabilization techniques.  Regulators and
industry experts will debate regulatory philosophies and practices
regarding volatility mitigation strategies.  The seminar will appeal to
regulators, energy service consultants and lawyers, financial and
investment professionals, supply planners, and gas utility rate and
regulatory experts. Seats are limited.  Please see the attached agenda
and registration materials for fees, hotel arrangements and additional
information.  We look forward to seeing you at this important event.

Catherine
Catherine F. Kazzi
Senior Staff Associate
Regulatory Affairs
American Gas Association
202-824-7233
ckazzi@aga.org < <mailto:ckazzi@aga.org>>

 <<Brochure 3.pdf>>

Jeff --

Please send the invoice to my assistant - Linda Noske - to have her take it through the system.  Her phone number is 713-853-6082.

Thanks,

Jim

Jim,

In trying to clear up some of our outstanding invoices, I contacted the
Enron Accounts Payable Department and they have no record of our May invoice
for $12,500.

They told me to go ahead and send a copy of the invoice directly to them,
but it will expedite things if I include on the invoice your Enron company
name and number and your external identification number. If you could reply
to this message with that info, I'd appreciate it.

If I can answer any questions regarding the invoice, or anything else for
that matter, please don't hesitate to contact me. Thanks.

Regards,
Jeff

Do we want to "represent" EPSA on the Friday panel?

Jim

FYI -- see hearing notices below for two hearings in the Barton Subcommittee next week -- Tues. Sept. 11 on siting, rates and reliability and Fri. Sept. 14 on RTOs, open access and federal jurisdiction.  We will contact EPSA since they have been asked to provide a witness for these hearings.  Will work with our internal and external team on messages to get to subcommittee members before each hearing.
 
John
 
The Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations has scheduled a hearing for Tuesday, September 11, 2001, at 10:00 a.m., in 2123 Rayburn House Office Building. The hearing is entitled "A Review of Federal Bioterrorism Preparedness Programs from a Public Health Perspective." Witnesses will be by invitation only.

The Subcommittee on Energy and Air Quality has scheduled a hearing on Tuesday, September 11, 2001, at 2:00 p.m., in 2322 Rayburn House Office Building. This hearing is entitled "Electric Transmission Policy: Siting, Incentive Rates, and Reliability." Witnesses will be by invitation only.

The Subcommittee on Energy and Air Quality has scheduled a hearing on Friday, September 14, 2001, at 9:30 a.m., in 2123 Rayburn House Office Building. This hearing is entitled "Electric Transmission Policy: Regional Transmission Organizations, Open Access, and Federal Jurisdiction." Witnesses will be by invitation only.

For the latest scheduling information, please visit <http://www.house.gov/commerce/schedule.htm> 

The audio of all Committee hearings are broadcast via the Internet. The Committee's webcasting capacity is limited, so please visit <http://www.house.gov/commerce> 15 minutes prior to the beginning of the event. The free Real Player is also required. ( <http://www.real.com>) Please note that Committee markups are not currently broadcast.

You are currently subscribed to commerce_news5 as: john.shelk@enron.com
To unsubscribe send a blank email to leave-commerce_news5-10417W@docs.house.gov 

Linda --

I thought that Ray set up a daily call regarding the CA and Pacific Northwest Refund litigation at FERC?  It's not on my calendar.  Can you please call Bernadette Hawkins to verify and put on my calendar?

Jim

Linda --

Please find out if Gordon, Mary Lynne, and Steve can meet at 2pm to follow-on to our PX Credit discussions?  If it does, please find a room on 47.

Thanks,

Jim

Pls keep sending these.  I just didn' t know the case.

Jim

Jim -

This is the Entergy source/sink case dealing with control areas that is currently before the D.C. Circuit.  The reply brief is due Friday.  I included you in the original message because Christi Nicolay had included you in an email containing some of her initial comments.  Please let me know if you have any other questions, or if you would like to be left off of further emails re: this case. Thanks.

Jacqueline R. Java
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
2000 K Street, N.W. Suite 500
Washington, D.C. 20006-1872
(202) 828-5828

>>> <James.D.Steffes@enron.com> 08/15/01 08:23AM >>>
On what case?

Jim

    -----Original Message-----
   Sent:   Tuesday, August 14, 2001 6:39 PM
   Please be aware that the latest draft of the reply brief will be sent
   out early afternoon tomorrow, along with information about a conference
   call to take place on Thursday to discuss the brief.  Thanks.

   Jacqueline R. Java
   Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
   2000 K Street, N.W. Suite 500
   Washington, D.C. 20006-1872
   ph: (202) 828-5828
   fax: (202) 857-2124

Here are my comments given my very short review of the NGA Statement.

18.3.4	Demand Response 	GOOD

18.5	Improving Energy Transmission	OK	
	talks about "equal access for all suppliers"  
	even though says "oppose preemption", indicate a willingness to better coordinate

18.6	Regulatory 
	hard to read if the section on "no preemption of state regulatory authority" is good or bad...we don't argue that our model preempts any authority, only that transmission service is best defined by FERC.

Jim
	

Thane --

You are probably already aware but if not, Enron holds an interest in Project Cornhusker (a QF in Cleburne).  There are some issues that may develop with the plant related to its ability or inability to meet specific ERCOT guidelines.  Generation Investments is managing this asset and relations with Brazos Co-op. Their primary concern is that Mirant is Brazos Co-op's QSE and may be interested in playing games with the plant through modification of ERCOT rules. 

Please coordinate with Jean and decide who will call either Rick Hill or Chuck Ward.

Thanks,

Jim

Nothing really - he both had the $ to retire and wanted to spend more time with his family.  No "forcing" out.

Jim

So, saw the story about Skilling leaving Enron. What's the story?

Jennifer -
 
I like your #2 and #3 issues for highlighting.  On the issue of fuel diversity, Enron has been somewhat agnostic.  Please draft some comments and share with Tom Hoatson to submit.
 
Thank you,
 
Jim

Jim:
 
Overall, I do not see any significant problems/omissions in the draft Task Force recommendations.  
 
My suggestion is to submit a specific, brief and informal response (via a letter or e-mail).  However, if desired, I could certainly draft formal, more extensive comments. 
 
Some points for your input:
 
1. The recommendations encourage the development and use of coal and nuclear power (albeit with an emphasis on clean coal technologies and safety, respectively). *Does Enron have an issue with advocating these sources among others as components of a diversified fuel strategy?
 
2.  Although the role of competition and deregulation in PA's success is acknowledged, there is some language supporting government oversight, for example "...it cannot be assumed that deregulated markets are fully matured and can be left completely free from government oversight.  Responsible stewardship of restructuring is vital to the preservation of workable energy markets and a reliable energy supply."  
*I don't see a problem with this, but wanted to highlight it to you.
 
3. The section on natural gas states that as prices are seasonal, consumers are exposed to market fluctuations, but there is no mention of the role of price risk management.  
*I suggest we point out that price risk management tools can play a vital role in mitigating volatility.  Perhaps we want to also send them our recent White Paper on mitigating price risk (attached for your reference). 
 
Please let me know your thoughts.
 
Jennifer
 
 

What was the explicity capacity ($/kw-mo) component by year for PECO in their stranded cost case?  Feel free to call JR.

Jim

Jim:

Below is the response I received from Daniel re: the ICAP component in PECO's stranded costs.  Does this answer your question?  I looked over dockets, etc. before contacting Daniel and hadn't found anything specific to ICAP deficiency charges. 

Jennifer 
My contact, JR Rohrbaugh, called back. He says that ICAP was explicitily included in the market value of the plants in the model.  The yearly market value had an energy componet and a capacity componet with the assumption that the capacity was compensation for installed capacity.  This revenue, less incremental cost of running the plants was the annual cash value of the plants which was then present valued.  That number less the book value was the stranded cost of the generation assets.   Hope this helps.  If Jim wants to talk to JR directly I have his number or e-mail.
>>> <Jennifer.Thome@enron.com> 08/14/01 06:50PM >>>

   Daniel:

   At Jim Steffes' request, I am trying to determine the following - of the
   stranded costs sought by PECO in its original restructuring plan, what
   portion was for installed capacity deficiency charges?  I have read over
   a number of dockets, but haven't found mention of this.  I greatly
   appreciate your assistance.

   Jennifer
   713-345-3550

Daniel Clearfield, Esq.
Wolf, Block, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP
212 Locust St., Suite 200
Harrisburg, PA  17101
(717) 237-7173
(717) 237-7161 fax

Bryan --

Thanks for the info.  I think that a Section 4 would be good to add - who is on each list in a "major" way?  Sort of your analysis of who is the best company to leverage if we are to work a deal?

Jim

JIm:

	Here is the presentation I created with regard to the specific information requested by Steve Kean.  This is what I have accumulated to date.  If anything is left unclear, please let me know before we send it to Steve.

 << File: Numbers for the California solution.ppt >> 

Thank you,

Bryan

I have a call into Jean Ryall to discuss.  Agreed that we need to keep our FERC team in the loop.

Jim

Since this matter involves communications directly with Commissioner Wood, should we involve someone from the DC office?  I know they want to be the clearinghouse for high level communications with FERC.  We should also probably alert Hartsoe, just as an FYI.

Linda - Could you please include Leslie in this meeting if she's available at whatever time you can schedule everybody else.  She is something of a 311 expert and it would be helpful to have her involved in the initial discussion.

Sent:   Wednesday, August 15, 2001 7:25 AM

Cc:     Ryall, Jean; Cantrell, Rebecca W.

Linda -

Pls work with Brian Redmond's asst to have a meeting with me, him, Jean Ryall, and Becky Cantrell.

Thx.

Sent:   Tuesday, August 14, 2001 6:23 PM

Jim, Brian has been working with Jean Ryall on Texas issues and he assumed she would be the right person for the Pat Wood contact.  He sent her a draft of a letter last night in fact.  (See below).

The PowerPoint presentation is one that he made to TRRC staff.  

He wants to push on both fronts (Texas and Federal) to get more competition in the state.  Said he would like to get together, but he's out Thursday, Friday, Monday and Tuesday.  Linda can get with his assistant and set something up for late next week if you are available.

Sent:   Tuesday, August 14, 2001 6:13 PM

FYI

<<overview010801.ppt>> 

Sent:   Monday, August 13, 2001 5:58 PM

Jean,

Please find the attached letter to Pat Wood as follow up to our meeting last week.  Please modify with your thoughts and resend.  

Also, should we visit with Max Yzagurie at the Texas PUC?

Regards,

Brian

<<PatWood.doc>> 

Bob --

Please be on the next RCR call to update.  See Ginger for time.

Jim

I thought I'd pass this along to the RCR committee - I am going to try to get other participants in the Pacific NW refund case to chip in for Seaborn's fees.  As you know, things are moving quite fast. 
Bob (cc Dan):

On August 9th I sent a memo to Dan and Bob re: budget for the Pacific
Northwest hearing. This included a PNW budget of $87,300 through the end of
the hearing September 6th. I noted that we had already spent some time on
PNW issues, including a meeting in Washington, etc. These were outside the
$87K value.

Just as an update, and to avoid any surprises, I thought I would provide Bob
with an update. So far we have spent a total of 206 hours on the Pacific
Northwest issues, through yesterday night. Needless to say, much of this
went into drafting the numerous bits of testimony, plus the data analysis of
the gas/power forwards prices. I also ended up drafting testimony on some
other issues not originally contemplated, including ripple, etc.

On that basis, we have gone through $66,575 of the total budget. I just
wanted to make sure people were OK with this as we still have a very long 9
days left to go before the hearing concludes next Thursday...and I expect we
will be very busy the entire time.

Seabron

This e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is intended only for use by the
addressee(s) named herein and may contain legally privileged and/or
confidential information.  If you are not the intended recipient of this
e-mail, you are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or
copying of this e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is strictly
prohibited.
If you have received this e-mail in error, please immediately notify me at
(617) 354-0060 and permanently delete the original and any copy of any
e-mail and any printout thereof.

Seabron Adamson
Frontier Economics Inc
Two Brattle Square
Cambridge, MA 02138 USA
Ph:  (617) 354-0060
Fax: (617) 354-0640
seabron.adamson@frontier-economics.com

www.frontier-economics.com

Shelby J. Kelley, Esq.
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
2000 K Street, NW  Suite 500
Washington, DC 20006-1872
(202) 828-5859
skelley@bracepatt.com

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTE:
This email message is intended solely for the individual or individuals
named above.  It may contain confidential attorney-client privileged
information and/or attorney work product.  If the reader of this message is
not the intended recipient, you are requested not to read, copy or
distribute it or any of the information it contains.  Please delete it
immediately and notify the sender by return email or by telephone.  Thank
you.

Did all of the amendments pass the Appropriations Comm?  When will a new bill get printed?

Jim

SBX2 78 (Polanco) passed out of the Assembly Appropriations Committee on a
party line vote as amended.  I faxed the amendments to Houston and San
Francisco.

SBX2 39 (Speier), which grants the CPUC broad authority over generation
facilities, passed out of the Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability
Committee.

SBX2 18 (Burton), which establishes a dedicated rate component, passed out
of the Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee.

SBX2 85 (Burton), which prevents the CPUC from adopting rate hikes up to or
above levels in effect prior to the imposition of 10% rate reduction, passed
out of the Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability Committee.

When: Friday, August 17, 2001 4:30 PM-5:30 PM (GMT-06:00) Central Time (US & Canada).

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

 
I have attached a comparison of the revised CDWR Revenue Requirement, along with a comparison with the July 22nd figures.
 
* The total DWR dollars decrease $471.5 million over 2001 and 2002, centered in the periods 3Q 2001 and onward.  The "past problem" actually increases by $1.9 billion (1Q & 2Q 2001).
* PG&E has their share increased $730.1 million over 2002 and 2002, centered in 1Q and 2Q 2001.
* Edison ends up with a significant decrease of $1.199 billion in 2001 and 2002.
 
 
Regards,
 
 
Michael
 
 

From the attached, it looks like the URG decision is being accelerated.

 

From the phone call, there was some trouble opening the attachment.

 

 

Yes.  Also, best to coordinate with Jeff and Sue.
 
Jim

Jim:
 
I would be happy to.  Should I work with Scott on this? 
 
Jennifer

Jennifer -- 

We have about 3 weeks left of the California legislature (mid-Sept).  Do you think you have the time to follow closely the different bills to make sure that we aren't missing something? 

Jim 

Sent:   Thursday, August 16, 2001 5:01 PM 
The Senate Energy Utilities and Communications Committee will take up the 
folling items next week pending approval of the Rules Committee: 

Tuesday, August 21 - 1:30 p.m. 

Informational Hearing: "A Review of DWR's Electricity Rate Agreement" 

Wednesday, August 22 - 1:30 p.m. 

AB 1233 (Pescetti) This bill would prohibit assessment of local transmission 
rates on natural gas if (a) it is delivered to an end-use customer, (b) it 
is delivered through a transmission system owned by another entity  that is 
not interconnected with a local utility transmission system, and (c) it is 
blended with gas supplies produced from an in-state source for the purposes 
of achieving a usable thermal rate.  The bill would require the commission 
to administer this provision in a manner that prohibits any cost shift to 
core customers resulting from the rate exemption required under the bill. 

ABX2 14 (Canciamilla) This bill exempts certain natural gas producers, 
suppliers and transporters from the definition of a public utility as 
described in Public Utilities Code Sections 216, 222 and 228.  Specifically, 
this bill; (1) provides that a public utility does not include a gas 
producer, supplier or transporter if the gas produced is of insufficient 
quality or heating value to make it acceptable for introduction into the gas 
line, plant or system of a gas corporation and if the natural gas is not 
provided for sale to more than five end users, 2)provides that a "gas 
corporation" does not include a producer, supplier or transporter as defined 
in item #1 above, 3)provides that a "pipeline corporation" does not include 
a producer, supplier or transporter as defined in item #1 above (4) 
establishes that entities covered by the exemption from public utility 
status as gas suppliers, producers or transporters are subject to 
jurisdiction of the CPUC with regard to safety, service quality, and 
consumer protection, and 
5)requires these exempt entities to apply the public goods charge to end use 
customers, as applicable. 

ABX2 30 (Dutra) This bill would amend CPUC act to authorize a public entity 
to assume from a public utility the work of relocating utilities that 
relates to a project of the public entity if the public utility defaults on 
executing utility relocation work under a relocation agreement with the 
public entity in connection with a transit or transportation capital 
improvement project, and would authorize the public entity to issue 
contracts with another qualified entity to conduct the utility relocation 
work. The bill would require a public utility to reimburse the public entity 
for the utility's share of the costs of the relocation work in accordance 
with the relocation agreement with the public entity. 

Is it possible for everyone to stay on Rick's Staff meeting (10:30 CST) today to discuss our next steps?  I think that may allow us an opportuntity to set up next steps.

Jim

Do we have alternative reliability language we can get to DOE/FERC? If not, can we develop rather quickly?

This note is to report on two electricity legislative developments: the Aug. 2nd introduction of an anti-RTO bill (or at least anti-mandatory RTOs) and on a meeting I had yesterday afternoon with Andy Black, the policy coordinator for Chairman Joe Barton on the House Energy and Air Quality Subcommittee, to discuss their intentions with respect to electricity legislation this Fall.

1.  H.R. 2814 (Reps. Tom Sawyer (D-OH) and Richard Burr (R-NC))

On Aug. 2nd (the last day Congress was in session before the August Recess), the above named members of the House Energy and Air Quality Subcommittee introduced H.R. 2814, the Interstate Transmission Act.  The legislation is bad because, among other things, it requires FERC to establish transmission pricing policies that provide incentives for voluntary participation and formation of RTOs, with language prohibiting policies that have the effect of forcing transmitting utilities to join RTOs.  Also objectionable is that the bill would "limit" pancaking but at the same time require FERC to establish a "reasonable transition mechanism or period" for additive charges.  The legislation prohibits FERC from conditioning any order upon a transmitting utility being required to transfer operational control of jurisdictional facilities to an ISO or RTO.  The bill would require that participating transmitting utilities must approve the form, structure and operating entity of any RTO.

In addition to the RTO language, the bill has the "old" version of the NERC reliability legislation in it.  The bill also has a PUHCA exemption for RTOs, repeals Federal Power Act sec. 203 on the disposition of property and includes the tax changes that IOUs seek for transfers of property to an independent transmission company.

Barbara Hueter advises that First Energy has its hq in Rep. Sawyer's district.  Rep. Burr is from North Carolina, so perhaps Duke had its utility hat on in working with him.  I am checking into where Duke is on this issue.  Rep. Burr is the Vice Chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee and close to Chairman Tauzin -- so his support for this legislation is significant (see Andy Black comment below).

2.  Andy Black Meeting

Andy is meeting with various trade associations this month to discuss electricity legislation.  He is only meeting with a few companies on a one-on-one basis -- Enron, Reliant, Dynegy and TXU.  His timing is to have a legislative draft for Chairman Barton to review when Congress returns after Labor Day.  If Chairman Barton approves or makes changes, the draft will be circulated to members of the subcommittee and the public for further comment.  The intent is to mark up an electricity bill this Fall so that if the Senate acts on electricity in its comprehensive energy bill, the issue will be ripe for consideration in a House-Senate conference committee.  Here is a run down of my comments and Andy's comments on specific issues.

a.   RTOs

Chairman Barton supports RTOs.  At a minimum, the draft will affirm FERC's authority as the commissioners have requested.  Andy is considering going beyond that to mandate RTO participation.  Not sure he can hold that position in the subcommittee.  He is looking to Enron and others to help them explain and build support for RTOs.  Informed him of our initial informal coalition steps.  However, Andy asked me to look at sec. 3 of the Sawyer-Burr referenced above, which I realized after the meeting is the part that deals with incentive rates and negotiated rates to expand transmission and voluntary RTOs.  I have a call in to Andy to reconcile these statements since the Sawyer-Burr bill is based on voluntary RTOs.  Hopefully, he is thinking of using the incentive and negotiated rate language and NOT the objectionable voluntary RTO aspects.  I will strongly encourage him to "do the right thing" in that regard.

b.   PUHCA

The draft will use the Pickering bill (H.R. 1101).  Told Andy about our concerns with the record keeping provisions of that bill.  Will send him our legislative language to clarify these provisions so that they do not open up all of Enron's records -- even those unrelated to transactions with a regulated utility affiliate.

c.  PURPA

Prospective repeal.  On back up power, they are thinking of requiring that rates for back up power be just and reasonable until there is retail competition in the state.

d.   Interconnection

They have received a proposal from Trigen that Andy says we will like.  I am contacting EPSA to get the details.

e.   Net Metering

They are likely to include the Inslee bill to require "net metering."  I explained our concern that the bill's mandate applies to all retail energy suppliers -- including EES -- even though this should only apply to utilities with an obligation to serve; that it does not make sense to mandate it on service providers like EES (per Jim's helpful comments yesterday).  I need to get more information to Andy.

f.   Transmission Jurisdiction

Thankfully, Andy is NOT going to use those portions of the bill as reported by subcommittee in the last Congress that gave use heart burn on jurisdiction.  Specifically, the draft will not say FERC does not have jurisdiction over the transportation component of a bundled retail sale -- the draft will not get into the bundled/unbundled issue at all.  The draft will bring munis, co-ops and PMAs under the FERC umbrella for transmission jurisdiction purposes.

g.   Siting

On siting, Andy is thinking of some type of mechanism that would give a State one year before federal eminent domain attaches.

h.   Reliability

On a negative note, Andy intends to use the latest NERC reliability language because NERC's version has strong support among the Members of the subcommittee and no other alternative has emerged with political support (i.e., not PJM).  I explained our concerns.  He said our best bet is for DoE or FERC to come forward to seek something other than the NERC version.  He said Members eyes glaze over on reliability with everything else on the plate.

i.   Negawatts

I raised the absence of negawatts on his issue list.  He said he is open to considering it again, but that there was left over political baggage and unresolved issues from when this was attempted during consideration of the "California bill" earlier this summer.

Your questions and comments on the any of the above are most welcome.

Do you want to go to Las Vegas for this trip?

I love you,

Jim

Dear SUMMIT2001 Guest:

ALSTOM ESCA, the Energy Management and Markets Business unit of ALSTOM,
would like to invite you and a guest to attend the second annual energy
summit, SUMMIT2001: The Forum for Power Industry Issues, October 7-9, 2001,
at the Bellagio in Las Vegas.

SUMMIT2000 brought energy and government leaders together to discuss a range
of issues-from technical, to business, to regulatory and legislative.  This
year, SUMMIT2001 will again spark discussion and initiate dialogue about a
range of topics, including:

*	ISOs and RTOs from an organizational, business, and technical
viewpoint
*	Retail System Implementations and their financial impact on an
organization
*	Emerging technologies and trends

On behalf of Alain Steven, President and CEO, and the ALSTOM ESCA team, we
look forward to your participation in this year's event.  Please click on
the link below for more information as well as to register.

<http://www.esca.com/summit>

Should you have any questions, please feel free to call me at 425-503-4197,
or just click "reply" to this message.  We look forward to seeing you in Las
Vegas.

Sincerely,

Kerry Ann Donk
Manager, Public & Media Relations
ALSTOM ESCA

 - winmail.dat 

Can we talk about this protest at 3pm (using the last 30 minutes of our call on Market-Power analysis)?  Also, we need to coordinate this activity with some protests that Janine filed in the Ohio PUC about a failure of implementing a fix for the "native load" exception.

Jim

Can you get a call in number for 3pm? I want to give to Kerry Stroup and Donna Fulton to discuss AEP NEXT STEPS.  Also in the meeting should be Sarah Novosel, Christi Nicolay, Mike Roan.

Jim

Bob & Ray --

Can each of you please put together a short outline of the (a) timeline, (b) key decision points, and (c) potential outcomes of the decision points for the different refund cases?

If possible, having this before today's call would be helpful (but I realize that this may be difficult).

Jim

Paul & Alyse --

If we need help, Sarah is interested.  My recollection is that we had filled the slots.  Please let me know.

Jim

Jim:

I've just been added to the Georgetown recruiting team and was part of the 1st round interview team last year.

Per my conversation with you this evening I would like to participate in the presentation September 18th and/or the 1st rounds on October 8th-9th.  I am a Johns Hopkins University (SAIS) graduate, came throught he Associate organization and am now a Sr. Manager, Business Development in Enron Corp.

Thanks for the opportunity!

Sarah-Joy Hunter
Enron Corporation, Business Development
#(713)-345-6541
sarah-joy.hunter@enron.com

RECRUITING SEASON IS UPON US!!

WE NEED YOUR SUPPORT!

As you know, employing quality recruits has been a key to Enron's continued growth and success and assisting with this effort is everyone's responsibility.  Therefore, we urge each of you to set aside some dedicated time to make our campus recruiting effort successful.  Clearly, on-campus interviewing is the most critical event, but participation in the outings and presentations is also key to our overall message.

Below are the dates that we will be on campus:

Presentation:			Tuesday, Sept 18th, 6:30 - 8:30pm, Carr Barn

Interviews:		

	Reception & 1st Round	Monday-Tuesday, Oct 8th - 9th
	
	2nd Round			Wednesday, Oct 10th

Please e-mail me with your availability. 

Thank you in advance for your support and participation.

Paul LeBeau/Recruiter (X57588)
Alyse Herasimchuk/Recruiting Coordinator (57339)

Linda --

Please work with Jan.

Thx,

Jim

Bob Williams has asked me to schedule a conference call for Monday, August 20, 2001 regarding the PX Credit Recoupment matter.  Please let me know several different time slots that you are available so that we can schedule this at a convenient time to everyone.  Thank you.

Jeff --

Federico is coming to the states to understand how our policymakers deal with the issue of default service.  He is the manager of the Italian default service provider.  Can you please make a presentation next Thursday or Friday about the UI deal?

Thanks,

Jim

Name: Federico

Surname: Boschi

Born in Bolgna on 29 December 1963

Address: Via D'Azeglio n. 63 Bologna Italy

Zip code: 40124 Italy

Tel: +39051581275
Mobile: +393356645158

Study: Graduated in economics on 1995, Bologna University; Thesis in Industrial
Economics on: liberalization of the Italian electricity industry.

Languages:  Italian   mother language
            English   Good
            Spain     sufficient

Business experience (Most relevant);

    July 2001 as of today
             Company:   Acquirente Unico ( a electricity purchasing agency
                        for the whiole Italian captive market)

             Position:   Purchase and sales manager; moreover I'm responsible
 for setting up the risk management office

    July 2000 up to June 2001

             Institution: Autorita' per l'energia elettrice ed il gas (the
Italian energy regulator)
             Position: officer in the electricity area;
             Main tasks: a) stranded costs recovery mechanism; b) scarce
import capacity allocation criteria c)wholesale market rules (code of dispatching
regulation including ancillary services market - including the balancing
market - and congestion management mechanism).

    March 2000 up to June 2000
              Institution: Ministero dell'Industria
              Position: member of the Minister's technical secretary (advising
the Minister on energy issues)

    March 1997 up to June 2000
              Company: AMI Imola (a water, gas, electricity and waste disposal
municipal utility);
              Position: Responsible for strategic planning;

I also wrote articles on electricity regulation (tariffs, wheeling..) in
Italy.

Expectations:
 As I'm responsible for setting up the trading desk and the risk management
office of Acquirente Unico (that is itself a newly constituted company)
I would like to improve my knolegde on these issues (resources and skills
needed and so on); I would like to understand what could be outsourced and
what kind of incentives it requires.

I'm so sorry, That's the best I can do as I'm still on holiday 
Bye 

Federico

__________________________________________________________________
Abbonati a Tiscali!
Con VoceViva puoi anche ascoltare ed inviare email al telefono.
Chiama VoceViva all' 892 800        http://voceviva.tiscali.it

A couple questions --

1.=09Could the company include distribution wires as well, instead of being=
 just a transmission only wires?
2.=09How many shares would a divesting company get?  Could this be more tha=
t 5%?  If so, wouldn't this be over the "control" threshold?

In general, I fully support this type of action. =20

Jim=09

Jim, Sarah and Rick,

=09The following describes the suggestion that I made in our meeting this m=
orning.  This is a strategy which could only be executed in legislation. =
=20

The Problem:

One of the chief difficulties of forming a Transco are the tax consequences=
 of divestiture of assets. The problem was identified in 1995 when we first=
 started talking about a Transco in the West.   If the parties agree in adv=
ance of divesture to combine their assets with others into a new company, t=
he divestiture creates a tax event.  As a result, the Transco's like Allian=
ce or TransConnect have adopted an LLC structure to avoid the tax consequen=
ces of formation.  The problem with the LLC form is the reluctance of the o=
wners to surrender all control of their assets to the Managing Member who h=
as "little skin in the game."  Questions have also been raised by opponents=
 about the fiduciary responsibilities of Managing Member.  Are they to look=
 out of the financial interests of the owners (passive and active)?  All th=
ese issues came up when we were working with various companies in 1999-2000=
 on possible pipe/wire companies.

The Suggestion:

Create a short window during which utilities could divest their assets into=
 a Transco without facing a tax penalty.  Under such a provision, current o=
wners would be allowed to agree in advance to combine their assets to form =
a new company without taxes being levied on the spin off, as long as the ne=
w company was a transmission only company.  The shareholders of the contrib=
uting companies would received publicly traded shares in the new company, s=
o there is no issue of the original company controlling the Transco.  The F=
ederal Treasury is tax neutral, since without the provision the Transco doe=
sn't form.  When the shareholders of Transco sell their shares, the are tax=
able, if the Transco becomes more valuable, then the benefit accrues to Tre=
asury in taxes on the sale of the stock.  With a two year window, the compa=
nies would be faced with a one time opportunity to make the shift and avoid=
 taxes.  This become a trigger for breaking up the vertical integration for=
 which a business case can be made the shareholders of today's owners are b=
etter off.

=09Thanks for listening (reading).

Steve

Agree.

Jim

I don't think the key to effective legislation to continue the opening of the transmission grid is the authority of FERC to order RTOs in itself.   It is the end state that the we hope the RTO orders can deliver that is key.  It would be a more powerful approach to line up the end state model we want for the grid into legislation - rather than fight for the ability to order formation of RTOs - then fight in settlement over what the RTO structures should be.  We should get into legislation the elimination of the fundamental drivers of discrimination that goes on today and what the utlities are trying to continue into the RTO paradigm.  We want:

1. Non-discriminatory transmission control operators - translated into real world terms as a single control area and indepdendent Security Coordinators.

2. A single transmission tariff - or comparable access rules and requirements for all generators and loads.

If the jurisdictional entities are held to these key requirements - then NERC or EISB which has the "authority" over the non-jurisdictional entities would begin to work in our favor. TLR rules, tagging rules, ATC calculations, redispatch - would have to be applied in the same fashion for marketers, IPPs, IOUs, Coops, Munis, BPA/TVA, etc.

These are two of the key differences between the gas industry and the electric industry.  Pipelines were separated from LDCs and producers, and there is no native load exception to inter-state pipeline access.

I think the reliability arguments some may bring up agianst these two fundamental changes are contestable and "winnable".  This should take away the FERC fear of jeopardizing reliability.  

Sarah -

I can't open this.

Jim

 - winmail.dat << File: winmail.dat >> 

Jeff -

Sue called on Friday late and had some issue with the research report that was to go out.  She didn't give me any details.  How do we get to her to discuss.

Jim

What do you guys think?  My idea is to have a short (10 page) presentation that gives a brief update and then make sure that we understand current positions and current projects?  1 hour max.  The four of us would deliver.

Jim

Lets set up a meeting and see how it goes. September is fine. Lets talk next week about format.

Dave --

Hope everything finds you well.   

Rick Hill and Chuck Ward called this week on a matter related to Cornhusker.  I had not heard about the potential financial harm from some ERCOT ISO rule changes until this call. 

This made me think.  It probably makes sense to meet with you and/or your team to make sure that Government Affairs is aligned with your business from a Development, Origination, and Generation Investments perspective.  

I'd like to try and meet at least quarterly to go through your business and to update you on recent regulatory developments.  How about sometime in early September?

Jim

Should you be on this service list?

Jim

FYI,  here is the restricted service list as of the afternoon of August 18,  2001.  You will note that, although I have left phone, fax, and e-mail in  the listing, I have been completely and impartially ruthless in paring everybody  down to two (2) names per party.  There's no other way to get this   mailing list into manageable size. Where I had to choose between two names, I  generally took the first one.  If there is someone else who should be  substituted (e.g. because he or she is apt to be more prompt about making copies  and distributing them around the office) please let me know who to  substitute.  I'm hoping to file this with Judge Birchman on Monday.  
 - restrlist.wpd 

Becky --
 
Thanks for getting this info.

Jim
The Portland office has advised me that they do not sell gas to DWR either.
 
no one in the Houston gas side makes any sales-However you need to check with the Portland office-try calling Chris Foster

good info.

fyi... one of the partners at Marathon is good friends with Angelides, and although they haven't yet connected, he's passing along some good information...

He called Phil's office today and was told that he would be out of town
until Tuesday.  Jim will call back on Tuesday.

Jim did talk with someone familiar with the bond issuance and he told him
that the Treasurer was "stuck between a rock and a hard place."   The
Treasurer's office is aware of the business community's position regarding
direct access but he said the PUC's hands were tied because AB1x directs the
PUC to suspend direct access.

He also told Jim that he had reviewed the correspondence sent from the
California Chamber and was pleased to see that businesses were willing to
pay exit fees for past energy purchases but that they were still concerned
about who would pay for bonds.

Ultimately, he said that direct access, the Edison bailout and other
outstanding energy issues would probably be worked out in a political
compromise.

I spoke to Sue Mara briefly and told her about the AB1x issue and she said
she would send to me a 1-page document regarding suspension of direct access
and the PUC.  Once I receive it, I will forward it on to Jim so he has it
before he speaks to Phil.

I told Jim that AB1x does not mandate when the CPUC has to suspend direct
access.  I also told him that I thought the Treasurer's advisors were being
very short-sighted about the bond issue since businesses that were denied
direct access would probably pull out of California and really shrink the
number of customers left to pay back the bonds.

Great, Sandra -- thanks!  Was Jim able to place a call to Angelides? thx.
kd

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Sandra+20Yamane+20+3CSYamane+40marathon-com+2Ecom+3E+40EN
RON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, August 17, 2001 4:52 PM
   Karen:

   I spoke with Sue Mara and Tracy Fairchild re: Scott Schmidt.  Scott will
   call Tracy directly and make arrangements to fly to Sacto on Tuesday.

            

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

Linda --

I'd rather not use the first week in October.  I may move my vacation to that week.

Jim

Please check the following dates for the budget meeting.  As I'm sure you can tell, I'm still having some scheduling problems.

October, 1, 2, 8,9,10,11 & 12

Please let me know at your earliest convenience which dates would work for you.

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Well, it looks like I have already hit a road block in scheduling this meeting.  Below are some other dates, please review them and let me know which one's will work with your schedules.  Also, this meeting will be held similar to the last budget meeting.  The meeting will be held in Houston and will begin @ 11:00 AM and conclude by 5:00 PM.

Dates:
September 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 10, 11, 20, 21

Please look these dates over and respond to me ASAP!

Thanks!!!!!!

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Rick would like to hold another budget meeting in September.  Please see the dates below and let me know how many of the dates will work for your schedules

September 25, 26 & 27.

Please get back with me at your earliest convenience.

Thanks

Ginger Dernehl
Administrative Coordinator
Global Government Affairs
Phone# 713-853-7751
Fax# 713-646-8160

Susan --

Can you confirm with the desk?  My recollection is that the combination would make sense?  Also, not sure how this "works" with the testimony we've filed to support natural markets?  Maybe Christi can piece that all together or call TCA and get their read.

Jim

 Procedurally, can we support as portion of this filing?  I noted that the NYISO argued that PJM should expand West (PJM can export 6500 MW to West Virginia and Ohio) and South (PJM can export 2500 MW to Virginia) vs the 2500 MW to NY.  Can we support their arguement that the scope of the regional RTO that is currently under a mediation proceeding in Wash, be expanded to at least include Virginia (as we have discussed before) and possible Ohio (also considering the First Energy/GPU merger)? 

Attached is a summary, prepared by IPPNY, of the recently filed request for rehearing made by the NYISO. I understand that a separate request for rehearing was filed by six of the eight NY tranmission owners. NYSEG and RGE declined to sign on and have not filed any rehearing request. 
Member Alert #38-2001
August 15, 2001

NYISO Argues for RTO Filing Reversal

The New York Independent System Operator wants the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) to rethink its July 12 order creating a northeastern Regional Transmission Organization (RTO) that would include New England, New York, and the PJM region.
    In a filing made earlier this week the NYISO argued that the commission order "ignored important reliability, technical and engineering considerations."

    "Failing to consider these factors could result in serious harm to New York," the NYISO filing says. "The NYISO is therefore submitting this rehearing request in order to ensure that the RTO formation effort does not lose sight of the needs of New York's economy, or the well-being of its citizens."

    The NYISO filing also asserts that the commission made "substantial errors"  regarding "several key legal issues."

The NYISO asked the commission to:
? Reverse its decision on the scope and configuration of an RTO.
? Reverse its determination that the entire northeast is a natural market.
? Reverse the mandate that there be a single Northeast RTO.
? Reverse its conclusion that the NYISO isn't independent enough from market participants.
? Reverse its finding that the NYISO's operational authority, tariff filing rights, congestion management, parallel path                            flow procedures, and inter-regional coordination efforts fall short of RTO standards.

The NYISO was joined in its Aug. 14 filing by Central Hudson Gas and Electric, Consolidated Edison, Nigara Mohawk Power Corporation, New York State Electric and Gas, Orange and Rockland Utilities, and Rochester Gas and Electric.

The FERC should clarify that even if the NYISO proposal was deficient in the issue of parallel path flow management and transmission planning that it could still qualify as an RTO because those issues will be resolved by 2004, the NYISO argues.

    The NYISO asked the FERC to either declare it an RTO or permit it to make a compliance filing to fix any deficiencies that would prevent it from reaching RTO status. And finally, the NYISO argues that if FERC continues to insist that there be a single RTO in the northeast, that it should initiate a rulemaking process " so that it may more thoroughly evaluate the technical details, costs, benefits, and implications of various RTO formation operations."

    Currently FERC is conducting a series of hearings on the proposed RTO to outline the issues that have to be addressed.
    
    FERC's July 12 order is "overly simplistic" and ignores policy mistakes in California that " confirm the need for a more thoughtful approach to RTO issues," the NYISO filing says.
    The RTO FERC wants to impose on the northeast would be "electrically and geographically enormous" and include "a number of severe transmission constraints and dense, electrically complex sub-regions" the filing says.

 " A system of this size and complexity has never been attempted before. It is not known whether such a system could be efficiently operated or whether existing ISO software systems would be capable of managing it," the NYISO filing says.

FERC ordered the creation of this super-RTO "without any analysis of the challenges, costs, benefits, and other implications of the single RTO/single market model," the NYISO filing says. "It has declined to evaluate seriously available RTO policy alternatives that could be more efficient."

The NYISO filing also criticizes FERC for insisting that PJM market rules and software be used in this proposed Northeast RTO without assessing how well they will work when applied to New York or the entire Northeast.

"This is an unduly precipitous approach that should be reconsidered on rehearing," the NYISO filing says.

    The three existing ISOs have already committed to implementing standardized market rules and common transaction-scheduling procedures and other "seams" solutions that would result in all the benefits the RTO is supposed to bring, the NYISO filing says . Dumping these efforts will retard RTO development instead of accelerate it, the NYISO argues.

    The FERC order ignores some of the existing physical constraints in the transmission systems that prevent more power flowing between ISOs, the NYISO filing says. Creation of an RTO will not increase inter-ISO trade and there will continue to be three distinct markets in the northeast, the filing says.

    The NYISO filing also argues that the PJM market the FERC is advocating as the model for the northeast could just as easily be considered a part of the Midwest region.  While PJM can export 2250 megawatts to New York it can export 6500 megawatts to West Virginia and Ohio and 2500 megawatts to Virginia, the filing points out.

    In general, while the commission has asserted that there are four natural electricity markets in the United States, it hasn't spelled out the boundaries, the filing says.

    "This is emblematic of the lack of analytical rigor that characterizes the commission's approach to market definition," the filing says. This approach allows Allegheny Energy and SPP utilities, for example, to choose between two RTOs, while northeastern utilities are not offered a choice, the filing says.

    The NYISO also argued against FERC conclusions that the New York operator could qualify as an RTO because it lacked sufficient size, could not achieve effective scope, and wasn't independent enough from its market participants. " These holdings are unlawful, arbitrary and capricious," the filing says.

    FERC is making an unexplained and sudden departure from the principles it establishing in Order No. 2000 that spelled out what an RTO should be, the filing says.  FERC also denied the NYISO and member systems a chance to modify the NYISO RTO proposal to address the concerns the commission raised, the filing say.

    For more information or to obtain a copy of the NYISO filing contact the IPPNY office at 518-436-3749.

     

Diann --

What's the next step?

Jim

 
Diann Huddleson
08/17/2001 01:09 PM
Calvin,  per our discussion,  at the time we returned our commercial customers to utility service earlier this year,  all accounts had accrued credit balances.  PG&E transferred these credits off each account as they were setting them up for utility billing.

These same accounts are now being returned to direct access.  We began receiving the first DA bills from PG&E earlier this month, all with zero beginning balances.  Enron expects that all credit balances will be reinstated on the respective accounts before the next billing cycle.  

Don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions regarding this request.   Page me if you need to.  888.740.8480.

Thanks.  

Diann Huddleson
Director, Services Group
713.853.0584
  

 
Diann Huddleson
08/17/2001 01:17 PM
Diane,  as we discussed,  at the time we returned our commercial customers to utility service earlier this year,  all accounts had accrued credit balances.  SCE transferred these credits off each account as they were setting them up for utility billing.

These same accounts are now being returned to direct access.  We began receiving the first DA bills from SCE earlier this month, all with zero beginning balances.  Enron expects that all credit balances will be reinstated on the respective accounts before the next billing cycle.  

Don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions regarding this request.   Page me if you need to.  888.740.8480.

Thanks.  

Diann Huddleson
Director, Services Group
713.853.0584
  

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Thanks.

Jim,

	I gave Karen Denne a printed copy yesterday and asked for her response.  I have not received it yet, so I plan to bug her on Monday.  When I talked to the editor, I found that PacifiCorp had been asked to write an article in favor of RTO, so there is confusion about what to do with my article.  They also have to drum up funds to publish each issue of the magazine, so I sent them to Kaufman, who got me into this.  I will keep you posted.

Steve

Steve --

Has PR given the go ahead?  Anything else from me needed?

Jim

Jim,
	Enclosed is my outlined for the article on the need for an RTO.  I given the outline to Karen Denne and discussed the article with her.  I also gave a copy to Paul Kaufman.  If you have any suggestions, please send them to me.  I will we working on the article next week.

Steve
 << File: Outline-ProRTO-1.doc >> 

thanks.

Jim

We are getting this fixed.

Jeffrey D. (Dan) Watkiss
Bracewell & Patterson, LLP
2000 K St., N.W.
Suite 500
Washington, D.C.   20006-1872
(202) 828-5851
dwatkiss@bracepatt.con
jdwatkiss@aol.com

>>> "Steffes, James D." <James.D.Steffes@ENRON.com> 08/20/01 09:04AM >>>
Should you be on this service list?

Jim

>  -----Original Message-----

thanks

If I don't get a response by noon today, I plan on calling Calvin.

Diann --

What's the next step?

Jim

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Diann Huddleson
08/17/2001 01:09 PM
Calvin,  per our discussion,  at the time we returned our commercial customers to utility service earlier this year,  all accounts had accrued credit balances.  PG&E transferred these credits off each account as they were setting them up for utility billing.

These same accounts are now being returned to direct access.  We began receiving the first DA bills from PG&E earlier this month, all with zero beginning balances.  Enron expects that all credit balances will be reinstated on the respective accounts before the next billing cycle.  

Don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions regarding this request.   Page me if you need to.  888.740.8480.

Thanks.  

Diann Huddleson
Director, Services Group
713.853.0584
  

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Diann Huddleson
08/17/2001 01:17 PM
Diane,  as we discussed,  at the time we returned our commercial customers to utility service earlier this year,  all accounts had accrued credit balances.  SCE transferred these credits off each account as they were setting them up for utility billing.

These same accounts are now being returned to direct access.  We began receiving the first DA bills from SCE earlier this month, all with zero beginning balances.  Enron expects that all credit balances will be reinstated on the respective accounts before the next billing cycle.  

Don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions regarding this request.   Page me if you need to.  888.740.8480.

Thanks.  

Diann Huddleson
Director, Services Group
713.853.0584
  

Ok. 

Christi --

Please ask each regional RTO heads (all that are being discussed + Mediation) to develop one page memo.  May want a map with current config and a map with FERC model.  Let's plan on doing for September 11 or September 12.  I'll ask Linda Noske to work with Duran's assistant to coordinate.

Also, let's give info on current Interconnection issues.

Finally, Christi, maybe you could develop 5 key regulatory issues.

Jim

I agree with Sarah.  1 page per RTO, other issues, etc.  I am on vacation Thurs 9/27--Mon. 10/1.  Thanks

Jim:

Your proposed format sounds good to me.  It would be very helpful for us to also hear from them what they're doing and where they're going.  In setting up the meeting, if you can schedule it after the first week (September 3-7), that would work better for me.  The Northeast mediation does not end until September 7.

Thanks

Sarah

What do you guys think?  My idea is to have a short (10 page) presentation that gives a brief update and then make sure that we understand current positions and current projects?  1 hour max.  The four of us would deliver.

Jim

Lets set up a meeting and see how it goes. September is fine. Lets talk next week about format.

Dave --

Hope everything finds you well.   

Rick Hill and Chuck Ward called this week on a matter related to Cornhusker.  I had not heard about the potential financial harm from some ERCOT ISO rule changes until this call. 

This made me think.  It probably makes sense to meet with you and/or your team to make sure that Government Affairs is aligned with your business from a Development, Origination, and Generation Investments perspective.  

I'd like to try and meet at least quarterly to go through your business and to update you on recent regulatory developments.  How about sometime in early September?

Jim

Janine --

The other thing that I am thinking is that we don't want to file anything at the FERC without a broad coalition.  At the right time (after we understand the facts and our desired outcomes), let's sit down and discuss how to approach FERC.  I think the timing is right to make a cogent, well-defined argument before FERC but we need to sell this to the FERC before the filing and we need to have Enron as a minor player in the fight.  The FERC is looking to help retail markets.

Jim

Jim, Let me look into this further.  My concern is that the imbalance provisions are something we may have agreed to in the settlements which would make us look bad should we file a complaint.  Jeff Merola has been working on how we can do physical delivery and how we can address this issue.  I know he thinks it is a roadblock, but not necessarily an insurmountable one.  On the other hand, this is another way to focus on the issue of wanting a PJM-type model and perhaps the next step would be to educate ICC Commissioners and Staff on the problem.  If we approcah it as a need for a PJM - type model, it should not antagonize our efforts of working with ComEd at the moment, since they have said they would like help moving in that direction.

Linda --

Can you please pull a copy of the ComEd OATT that would include the calculation of "OPC" mentioned below?  

Janine --

Doesn't it make sense that we are disadvantaged vis-a-vis their own transmission service and should talk to Donna Fulton about a complaint at FERC?

Jim

Jim,
Per your request, below is an email from Chris Townsend explaining the imbalance program.  I plan to call him to get a better handle on the discount issue, but I think that it is useful that marketers can trade imbalances, but the benefit is premised on there being many suppliers.  More to follow when I return.
Janine

Janine --

As you might recall from the memo summarizing the 1999 Edison DST
proceeding, the Illinois Commerce Commission essentially "punted" on the
imbalance issue, instead deferring to FERC.  Attached is the section from
our memo that discussed the imbalance issue.  It is my recollection that the
issue of establishing subaccounts was not addressed.  We will try to confirm
this tomorrow.

As lawyers, please do not hesitate to call or email if we can be of any
further assistance.

> Christopher J. Townsend
> Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe
> 203 N. LaSalle Street
> Chicago, IL 60601
> (312) 368-4039 (direct line)
> (312) 630-6300 (direct fax)
> christopher.townsend@piperrudnick.com
>
		Energy Imbalances

		1.	Jurisdictional Issues

	The ARES Coalition, Alliant, and IIEC argued that the Commission
should address energy imbalances in the proceeding.  Enron and NewEnergy
abandoned this argument after reaching a settlement agreement with Edison.
Staff and Edison argued that charges for energy imbalances are properly
addressed within Edison's OATT and subject to the jurisdiction of the FERC.

	The Commission concluded that in the interest of avoiding protracted
litigation and the harm of delay to retail competition, the Commission would
not address the propriety of FERC's asserted authority over energy imbalance
issues.  The Commission indicated that its deferral to the FERC in no way
"waives its right to assert jurisdiction over energy imbalance service at
some future time."

		2.	Factual & Policy Issues

	Edison proposed an energy imbalance service to retail customers
containing the following provisions:

*	Energy imbalance will be calculated separately for each hour and
settlements will occur on a cash basis for each hour's imbalances;
*	For those RESs whose energy imbalance in an hour is 2% or less, or 2
MW or less, settlement is made at 100% of out-of-pocket costs ("OPC"),
regardless of the net imbalance or the direction of the error;
*
*	Those RESs whose energy imbalances exceed 25% of their own
individual schedules will pay an adder or be charged a discount of 25% of
OPC.  Adjustments are made to avoid double-counting of adders and discounts
applicable to those RESs that are also subject to an adder or discount
below.  These imbalance charges will be phased-in as follows:
*
*	From October 1, 1999 through December 31, 1999 -- No adder  will
apply under this provision.
*
*	From January 1, 2000 through March 31, 2000 -- 25% adder/discount
will apply to those RESs whose imbalances exceed 25% of their schedules 20%
or more of the hours of the month.  If the 20% of the hours are exceeded,
the adder/discount shall apply to all hours.
*
*	Starting April 1, 2000 -- 25% adder/discount will apply to those
RESs whose imbalances exceed 25% of their schedules 10% or more of the hours
of the month.  If the 10% of the hours are exceeded, the adder/discount
shall apply to all hours.

*	Edison also applies a bandwidth to the total net energy imbalance
attributable to unbundled retail load served by RESs.  If the hourly
imbalance caused by all unbundled retail load, excluding PPO load, is within
the 100 MW bandwidth, no RES (except those whose imbalance exceeds ?25%, as
noted below) will be subject to an adder or discount.  PPO load will, in
aggregate, be subject to the same terms and conditions as above, but
imbalance attributable to the PPO will be compared against a 100 MW deadband
separately from all RES load.

*	Edison will permit RESs to trade energy imbalances among themselves,
to offset their imbalances at whatever prices and terms they wish, before
applying a charge for energy imbalance.  According to Edison, this feature
will allow RESs to minimize energy imbalance charges by exchanging
overscheduled megawatt-hours for underscheduled megawatt-hours in the same
hour.  All remaining imbalances will be settled in cash at 100% of Edison's
OPC.  Edison shall make available information on OPC ten days prior to the
opening of the trading window.
*
*	The net retail energy imbalance in excess of 100 MW will be charged
an adder or discount of 10%.  This charge will be allocated among RESs who
are out of balance in the direction of the net and whose imbalance exceeds
their individual deadband.  The allocation will be based on the ratio-share
of the amount by which these individual RESs' imbalances exceed their
individual deadbands.  Any such adder/discount will be billed separately
from charges for any imbalances remaining after trading. Likewise, any
adder/discount attributable to the provisions of Paragraph 3 will be billed
separately from charges for any imbalances remaining after trading.
*
*	Load profiles will be developed using Dynamic Load Modeling with
seasonal adjustments.  Edison will not require the installation of interval
demand recorders for customers of less than 400 kW at this time.
*
*	Energy imbalances will be assumed to be within the bandwidth (i.e.,
no adders/discounts) when the imbalances are due to (1) Edison interruptions
and restorations, or (2) customer force majeure events, that are in each
case material to the RESs' schedule and of which the RES could not
reasonably be aware in sufficient time to adjust the schedule.
*
*	Edison will include a description of the methodology for determining
OPC in its energy imbalance schedules filed with the FERC.

	The IIEC opposed Edison's proposal and requested that the Commission
require Edison to offer an optional imbalance service at the distribution
level.  Blackhawk also opposed Edison's proposal and supported the IIEC
proposal  Alliant also supported Edison being required to offer an energy
imbalance service at the distribution level.  Mid-American opposed any
effort by the Commission to exert jurisdiction on energy imbalances.

	The Commission failed to weigh-in on the energy imbalance issue
consistent with its determination that the FERC is the appropriate forum for
such issues.  The Commission reserved the right to address the issue in some
future FERC proceeding.

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at
http://www.piperrudnick.com
 - C.DTF << File: C.DTF >> 

thanks.

Response to your questions:

1.  I think it would be best if it there were transmission assets only.  Gi=
ven the geographic scale we want to achieve, adding in the distributions sy=
stems is unnecessary and my lead to more perpetuation of the local mentalit=
y.  I don't think you get much of a scale benefit from adding in the distri=
bution systems.  The distribution systems are also likely to remain as supp=
liers of last resort in the event of retail access, which raises complicati=
ons.  It would be equivalent to an pipeline also being an LDC. =20

2.  The divesting company does not get the shares, its shareholders receive=
 them as a direct distribution.  As a result, the old management has no con=
trol over the shares of the Transco.  Several utilities (UtilA, UtilB, Util=
C, etc) agree to simultaneously spin off their transmission into BigTrans. =
 The share holders of UtilA get X shares of BigTrans in exchange for Y shar=
es of UtilA and how hold Y fewer shares in UtilA and X shares of BigTrans. =
 The spin off could also be done as part of a merger.  Both parties agree t=
o spin off their transmission into a common company.  The shareholders woul=
d receive publicly traded hares in both UtilA-BCombine and BigTrans.  The m=
anagements of both companies being separated from each other.  There would =
have to be a conflict of interest standard for the board and management of =
BigTrans, which prohibits any substantial benefit from market operations, j=
ust as we have for any other RTO.

Steve

A couple questions --

1.=09Could the company include distribution wires as well, instead of being=
 just a transmission only wires?
2.=09How many shares would a divesting company get?  Could this be more tha=
t 5%?  If so, wouldn't this be over the "control" threshold?

In general, I fully support this type of action. =20

Jim=09

Jim, Sarah and Rick,

=09The following describes the suggestion that I made in our meeting this m=
orning.  This is a strategy which could only be executed in legislation. =
=20

The Problem:

One of the chief difficulties of forming a Transco are the tax consequences=
 of divestiture of assets. The problem was identified in 1995 when we first=
 started talking about a Transco in the West.   If the parties agree in adv=
ance of divesture to combine their assets with others into a new company, t=
he divestiture creates a tax event.  As a result, the Transco's like Allian=
ce or TransConnect have adopted an LLC structure to avoid the tax consequen=
ces of formation.  The problem with the LLC form is the reluctance of the o=
wners to surrender all control of their assets to the Managing Member who h=
as "little skin in the game."  Questions have also been raised by opponents=
 about the fiduciary responsibilities of Managing Member.  Are they to look=
 out of the financial interests of the owners (passive and active)?  All th=
ese issues came up when we were working with various companies in 1999-2000=
 on possible pipe/wire companies.

The Suggestion:

Create a short window during which utilities could divest their assets into=
 a Transco without facing a tax penalty.  Under such a provision, current o=
wners would be allowed to agree in advance to combine their assets to form =
a new company without taxes being levied on the spin off, as long as the ne=
w company was a transmission only company.  The shareholders of the contrib=
uting companies would received publicly traded shares in the new company, s=
o there is no issue of the original company controlling the Transco.  The F=
ederal Treasury is tax neutral, since without the provision the Transco doe=
sn't form.  When the shareholders of Transco sell their shares, the are tax=
able, if the Transco becomes more valuable, then the benefit accrues to Tre=
asury in taxes on the sale of the stock.  With a two year window, the compa=
nies would be faced with a one time opportunity to make the shift and avoid=
 taxes.  This become a trigger for breaking up the vertical integration for=
 which a business case can be made the shareholders of today's owners are b=
etter off.

=09Thanks for listening (reading).

Steve

Any thoughts on the NERC budget?

Jim
TO: NERC Board of Trustees
    Stakeholders Committee
    Regional Managers
    Standing Committees

Ladies and Gentlemen:

The NERC 2002 draft Budget is posted (in Acrobat 5.0) on the following
web site for your comments:

 www.nerc.com/naero/budget.html

Comments are due by September 14, 2001. Please let me know if you have
any questions.

Sincerely,

Julie Morgan

John --

Do you know when Enron started discussions with these customers?

Jim

1.  Jack in the Box (Jack in the Box's name cannot be used without their prior consent) ;
   2.  BD Biosciences;
   3.  Ball Corp.
   4.  TABC -- Toyota;
   5.  Raytheon;
   6.  Burger King (Batla Franchises);
   7.  Northrop;
   8.  Toys r' US; and
   8.  Wendy's

The following originators are responsible for the deals set forth above:

1.  Michele Sorensen  (562) 901-3807 -- Jack in the Box & Burger King (Batla Franchises);
2.  George Waidelich  (925) 543-3500 -- BD Biosciences & TABC Toyota
3.  Rob Rice                    x58065               -- Ball Corp.
4.  Mark Allen                  x58926               _ Raytheon
5.  Mike Moore               x39668               _  Northrop
6.  Scott Porter                x31842              _   Toys r' US
7.  Rick Campbell          x54530              _  Wendy's

Please note that the originators I have spoken do not want their customer's to be contacted without being consulted.

Hope this helps.  If I hear of any other customers who have signed or renewed after July 1 I will notify you.

John McMullan

 

Janine --

What's the gas delivery tariff on CGE for generation services?  Do they have a standard service?  Do they have a good generator interconnect agreement on the power side?

Jim

Fyi...

CIncinnati Gas and Electric Company has filed for a $700 million rate increase which is enormous given the size of their company.  They are claiming that they need to replace their current low pressure gas system with a high pressure gas system and are looking to amortize the costs over ten years as opposed to the usual twenty years.  They plan to allocate the cost of this primarily through doubling the customer charge.  One of theories behind this rate increase is that Cinery wants to expand its business as an Exempt Wholesale Generator by building more gas fired turbines and it needs the high pressure gas to serve those turbines.  The concern therefore is whether captive ratepayers might be cross-subsidizing a competitive activity.

Sorry.  Pls let me know the outcome.

Jim

Dave --

I'll look at today.  Is there an RCR?

Jim

Jim,

Attached to this message is a copy of the document that Kim Curry had composed for EPMI to file with FERC today (8/20) in regard to on-going price mitigation in the WSCC.  I have added a couple comments to Kim's document for consideration.

I would appreciate it if you could review this attachment and let me know if you have any questions relating to either our filing of comments or of the content.  FYI, our comments line up with those being made PGE and other parties in the Northwest.

Kind Regards,
Dave

Kim,

Great job!  I really like the comments and like what you have done with the material I had sent to you.

I have added a coupe comments for yours and the groups consideration.  The only other thing I was wondering about was what do you think about adding your "alternative" price recommendations in the footnote on page 4 to the body of the document at the end of the first section "Summary of Comments"?

I have attached my comments for your review.  I'll be in Portland on Monday morning and can be reached on my cell at 415.794.8740.

Kind Regards,

Dave

 << File: comments dfp.doc >> 

We have attached our draft of EPMI's above-referenced comments.  If you have any revisions or edits, please contact us!   The filing deadline for this document is Monday, August 20.

Kimberly A. Curry
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P
2000 K Street, N.W.
Suite 500
Washington, D.C. 20006
(202) 828-7623 (phone)
(202) 857-2107 (fax)
kcurry@bracepatt.com

 - comments.doc << File: comments.doc >> 

I am not attending.

Jim

Christi --

Can you please send any and all summaries of the RTO Orders mandating Mediation for NE and SE to Vicki Sharp?  Also, please include any other information that is helpful to understanding these issues.

Thanks,

Jim

I found this on the CPUC web site.

 

FYI.

Let me make sure I understand this.  Prior to April 2002, the UDCs want the=
ir QF costs to be as low as possible, since this will cause the PX credit t=
o be lower and thus the positive CTC higher.  However, beginning April 2002=
, they pray for just the opposite -- the greater their QF costs, the more t=
hey can collect from DA customers to help pay for the QFs.
=20
I truly hope I have misunderstood you, else my brain may explode.
=20
=20

Steve --=20

As Sue highlights below, when people talk about stranded costs ending no la=
ter than 3/31/02, they are only speaking about generation-related stranded =
costs.  Above market costs for QFs will be "collected" from DA customers fo=
r some time into the future.  Wanted to make sure that this was clear.

Jim=20

Cc:     Gorny, Vladimir; Bradford, William S.; Kingerski, Harry; Savage, Go=
rdon; Tribolet, Michael=20
An update from the meeting we had with SCE on August 9:  SCE said that it h=
as TEMPORARILY stopped charging CTC because it doesn't know what to charge =
for DWR. Meanwhile, it continues to keep track of the dollar flows through =
the TCBA and the new account set up for DWR.  Once the CPUC decides on the =
DWR's revenue requirement, SCE expects that it will charge generation-relat=
ed CTC again.  There is also continuing CTC related to QF contracts that wi=
ll return (and goes beyond 3/31/02) once QF contracts are above the "market=
".  SCE is also considering filing a petition with the CPUC to get guidance=
 on all these matters. Once the CPUC rules on SCE"s advice letter approache=
s, SCE plans to go back and re-bill begining with Jan 18 (it used some diff=
erent PX credit approaches early on and switched to this approach for bills=
 going out June 4). I didn't ask the question about calculating CTC back to=
 Jan 18.  I guess if the DWR rev req is retroactive and leaves room for CTC=
, they will bill it.  The other twist I had forgotten about is that they ha=
ve a one-half cent charge added to the embedded gen rate of 10.27 cents (ma=
king it about 10.77 cents) that collects the $400 million that was uncollec=
ted while the CPUC played around with a rate design for the three cent surc=
harge.  The half cent addition is for 12 months.

Cc:     Gorny, Vladimir; Bradford, William S.=20

I wanted to summarize the conclusions from our meeting on Wednesday, August=
 8th.  Please let me know if I have misrepresented anything. =20

Below is a description of four proposals which may help resolve issues asso=
ciated with PX credits or mitigate Enron's exposure to PX credits.  Steve S=
wain has the responsibility for evaluating each proposal, and his goal is t=
o have recommendations for EWS/EES management on August 14th. =20

Current Issues:=20
1)  The methodology for calculating PX credits after January 18 is undeterm=
ined (SCE and PG&E have implemented different methodologies)

2)  Applicability of the 1 cent surcharge to direct access customers (PG&E =
is passing thru to DA customers, SCE is not)=20
3)  Impact to Enron if  FERC implements  retroactive changes to the CAL PX =
clearing prices from Oct 2, 2000 thru January 18th which result in revised =
PX credits=20

4)  Recoupment of outstanding PX credits against future payments for T&D=20
5)  Uncertainty surrounding future tariffs (CTC or other pass through charg=
es), making it difficult to hedge price risk in forward positions

6)  Large uncollected receivables from both PG&E and SCE=20

The four proposals are as follows:=20

SCE Recommended Approach=20
        This approach assumes no PX (or PE) credit effective from January 1=
8, 2001 forward.  Mary Lynne and Diann will work with Steve to quantify the=
  gross PX receivable (as billed by each utility)  which would  be reversed=
.   This approach will ensure that only charges for T&D (no    generation/c=
ommodity costs, CTC charges, or surcharges for CDWR, including the 1 cent) =
 will be applicable to Direct Access customers. =20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        1) Assurances that no surcharges for CDWR will be passed through to=
 EES or EEMC=20
        2) SCE will support our historical PX  credit receivable as an "all=
owable claim" at a minimum and would provide additional credit support if p=
ossible. =20

        3) PG&E will support Enron's recoupment argument=20
        4) Both utilities will immediately reinstate the Cumulative Credit =
Balances on utility bills and agree to a netting arrangement at the utility=
 parent   level.=20

        5) Both utilities agree to not adjust the historical PX credits, if=
/when an adjustment of historical PX clearing prices is mandated by FERC=20

        Other consideration:=20
        Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concer=
n re CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

PG&E Recommended Approach=20
        This approach assumes the PX calculation methodology effective Janu=
ary 18, 2001 would include an "avoided cost"  component.  This avoided cost=
 =20

        component would include, owned generation, QF purchases, actual CDW=
R purchases for the utility, bilateral purchase contracts, and ISO purchase=
s.        This resulting "avoided cost" would be used in lieu of the PX cle=
aring price in the old PX formula through March, 2002.    If the actual CDW=
R purchase  costs are not included, then the surcharge (along with the embe=
dded gen costs)  should be included in the calculation. =20

       =20
        Enron would request the following:=20
        Same as above=20

        Other Consideration:=20
        Enron  would continue to be exposed to "price" risk attributable to=
 the actions of the utility at a minimum through March, 2002.  This would h=
amper     Enron's ability         to hedge the positions in the retail port=
folio.=20

Hybrid Approach=20
        This approach assumes that the PG&E approach is applicable from Jan=
uary 18, 2001 through September 1, 2001 and that the SCE approach is       =
  applicable from September 1st forward.   This approach might be necessary=
 as a compromise for both utilities to provide their support of the proposa=
l.=20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        Same as SCE and PG&E approach=20

        Other considerations:=20
        Ability to hedge price risk in the retail portfolio, without concer=
n re CTC or other surcharge amounts. =20

Enron Model=20
        This approach assumes we continue to support a market based (NP15 a=
nd SP15) calculation methodology for the PX credit.  =20

        Enron would request the following:=20
        It is unlikely we would receive any level of cooperation from eithe=
r PG&E and SCE.   The consensus from legal, regulatory, and EWS commercial =
is        the probability of getting this approach approved is low.   Howev=
er, understanding this amount, at a minimum, can be used to help defend the=
 "value"    Enron is foregoing in order to reach agreement with the utiliti=
es and CPUC.

        Other considerations:=20
        This approach would give Enron the ability to hedge "price" risk, b=
ut this is somewhat offset with  incremental credit exposure associated wit=
h the     actual collection of the PX credit.

Again, please let me know if this does not clearly represent what we conclu=
ded in Wednesday's meeting.=20

Thanks,=20
Wanda Curry=20

I wanted to make sure that everyone is on the same page related to utility costs in California.  These costs may be (will be?) collected  from some utility customer, potentially including direct access customers.

Bucket #1	Utility Undercollection Feb 1, 2000 Through Jan 18, 2001

About $12.0 Billion (this money includes our Negative CTC amounts).  Should be financed through corporate debt.  No securitization.

Enron's Position:	Bundled service on Jan 1, 2001 pays fixed c/kwh

Bucket #2	CDWR Cost from Jan 5, 2001 through Bond Issuance or March 31, 2002

About $12.5 Billion  (about $10 Billion for spot purchases and $2.5 Billion for long-term buys)

Enron's Position:	Dedicated Rate Component (DRC) for all residential and small customers.  Larger customers are assigned direct responsibility for the Undercollection on c/kwh.  Balancing account for holding Utility even.  

Bucket #3	Prospective Generation Costs for Bundled Service Post March 31, 2002

URG 	= $40/mwh (retained generation and bilateral contracts)
CDWR 	= $120/mwh
QF 	= $100/mwh  

TOTAL 	= URG*%sales + CDWR*%sales + QF*%sales
	= $90/mwh

Bucket #4	AB1890 Non-Generation Stranded Costs

Bucket #5	AB1890 Generation Stranded Costs

Let me know how this turns out.  If you need a contact, let me know.

Also, everyone should be aware about an aggregation project under Phyllis Anzalone.  EES legal has found a loophole to the time restrictions on electricity contracts and the appropriations risk that we need to check out.

Jim 

I will.

Thane -- Doug said that the TX PUC staff was asking about an EES contract at the meeting you all had in Austin last week.  Can you please find the appropriate EES lawyer to follow up on this?  (You may want to call Jim Steffes about what was asked.)  Thanks.

Ray --

Let's discuss on today's Refund call. =20

Jim

It seems to me that FERC's July 25 Order required Judge Birchman to make
findings about the exact amounts owed by each buyer to each seller.  The
proposal to establish methodologies does exactly that, among other things.
Therefore, it seems to me that it needs to be part of the the pending
California proceedings.

That is not to say, however, that it should not also be part of the
Chargeback proceedings under the April 6 FERC order.  It should also be
applicable to those proceedings.

Therefore, we need to develop a strategy to make it part of both
proceedings.  Timing is obviously critical, and I am soliciting the
Chargeback movants' views on that subject along with the substance of the
proposal.  I would like to point out that I have learned from the settlemen=
t
proceedings before Judge Wagner that we must submit the proposal early in
the proceedings to ensure that they are considered and can have an impact.

I sent an email to Ron Carroll letting him know that I am available for a
conference call at the following times:

Weds Aug 22 after 11 am Pacific time,
Thurs Aug 23 prior to 1 pm Pacific time,
Fri Aug 24 anytime except 1130 am to 2 pm Pacific time

Please let me know when we can discuss this further.  Thanks for your help.

Pls print and hold for my Thurs meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Jim
In addition to the motion, Sam Behrends also prepared the attached memo, at our request, with his thoughts about how we may want to shop this at FERC.  We should discuss these strategy issues as well during the call on Thursday.
 
Sarah

sounds good.

I agree with Steve.  We should join in the response to oppose the request for stay. 

In order to remain consistent with our message in the rest of the region, supporting FERC order, I suggest we join in the response. SM  

Steve or Joe -- Is there a reason that politically we would not want to join in a response against the North Carolina Utility Commission's request to stay the SE RTO mediation?  At least some others (Electricities) is planning to oppose, so it will not go unopposed if Enron doesn't join in.  From a pure FERC filing perspective, I have reviewed and totally disagree with the NCUC's request and would be happy to support FERC.  (DUE 8/28)

Thanks

As you may know, while several state Commissions have sought rehearing of
FERC's July 12 orders initiating the RT-100 mediation, the NCUC accompanied
its rehearing application with an August 13 motion to stay that Order.
ElectriCities, via Jim Horwood of our firm, is planning to file on August 28
in opposition to that motion, on the grounds that a single RTO for the
Southeast is well worth attempting to achieve through mediation and that the
GridSouth record belies the NCUC's claims of surprise.  A multiparty
opposition by multiple transmission customers and others would be helpful in
keeping RTO unification on track.  Accordingly, we invite you all to
consider joining in our opposition (draft to be circulated in advance of the
August 28 due date but not yet written) or filing an opposition of your own.
If you're sufficiently interested in joining such a motion to want an
advance draft for confidential review, please let me know who should get it,
along with any special considerations on timing.

Guys --

I agree that we need to file at FERC.  But we need to also get in the field with a strong message supporting FERC ASAP in the Southeast.  I'd rather go down swinging.  Maybe a least find out the objections of the parties across the region (including PUCs, stakeholders, etc.).

What about building a short schedule?  Maybe coordinate with DC office on key members?

Jim

good job.

To All,

Attached is a clean version of the comments to be filed with FERC today (8/20) relating to the WSCC-wide price mitigation.  

Highlights:

EPMI requests that the caps be removed, using arguments that caps are not beneficial to development of a robust market in the west.
If - a cap is necessary we suggest an alternative where the highest cost unit in the entire west set the price.
Price certainty - we explain how the market needs price certainty and that the price cap with the potential for changing hourly is detrimental to a functioning energy market
We point out the lack of independence of the CAISO and their board.  The fact that the ISO operates with the vested interest of CA and not the entire west.
Marketer cost recovery - we describe the current problem where marketers are excluded from "above-the-cap" bidding and justification. 

FYI, our comments line-up closely with those being filed by PGE and other PNW entities, so the Commission will be getting a consistent message from many WSCC entities - remove the cap.

I have briefed Tim on the content of the filing and Ray has spoken to Kim Curry of Bracewell/Patterson and approved this be filed on our behalf today 8/20.

Any questions or concerns, please contact me.

Kind Regards,

Dave

 << File: COMMENTS_final draft.doc >> 
Guys:

Attached is the latest draft, which incorporates dave's edits.  I have forwarded a copy of this draft to Coral as well, to see if they would like to join on.  I have attached this draft in WordPerfect  because we are having a little trouble over here at Bracewell converting documents from WordPerfect to Word.  If you have any trouble opening this document, please let me know.

 - COMMENTS.WPD << File: COMMENTS.WPD >> 

I wanted to make sure that everyone is on the same page related to utility costs in California.  These costs may be (will be?) collected  from some utility customer, potentially including direct access customers.

Bucket #1	Utility Undercollection Feb 1, 2000 Through Jan 18, 2001

About $12.0 Billion (this money includes our Negative CTC amounts).  Should be financed through corporate debt.  No securitization.

Enron's Position:	Bundled service on Jan 1, 2001 pays fixed c/kwh

Bucket #2	CDWR Cost from Jan 5, 2001 through Bond Issuance or March 31, 2002

About $12.5 Billion  (about $10 Billion for spot purchases and $2.5 Billion for long-term buys)

Enron's Position:	Dedicated Rate Component (DRC) for all residential and small customers.  Larger customers are assigned direct responsibility for the Undercollection on c/kwh.  Balancing account for holding Utility even.  

Bucket #3	Prospective Generation Costs for Bundled Service Post March 31, 2002

URG 	= $40/mwh (retained generation and bilateral contracts)
CDWR 	= $120/mwh
QF 	= $100/mwh  

TOTAL 	= URG*%sales + CDWR*%sales + QF*%sales
	= $90/mwh

Bucket #4	AB1890 Non-Generation Stranded Costs

Bucket #5	AB1890 Generation Stranded Costs

I think this makes alot of sense.  Who would cover PA and NJ at retail - you?

Jim

Jim - In an effort to more efficiently participate in the DC meetings with respect to the NE RTO, I would like Tom Hoatson to lead my teams effort.  I believe he has a solid understanding of each of the ISO's/Pools, and can call upon Allegretti, Fromer and Staines as needed.  Any thoughts? SM

Linda --

Please arrange a good time tomorrow or Thursday to talk with Aleck.

Jim

As I discussed earlier with Rick, sasha Jacob is leaving GPC at the end of the month to join another firm.  sash is particularly valuable becuase of his impeccable connections with Jim Wilson (the Minister of energy) and the staffers on the government side of the Legislature.  What I wouldn't mind talking through with you is the continuing need for assistance re the media here, as Tom McLaren proposes. I think we need it and Peter Varley would be good to work with in that regard - he is the Premier's former Press Secretary and has conections with the major Toronto dilies that have proved helpful. 

Aleck:

Further to our phone call, as promised I am sending you this e-mail to
confirm our interest in ensuring that Enron Canada can secure the consulting
resources it requires at the current time to ensure an expeditious and
assured opening of Ontario's electrical power market. As well, as you know
we have superior resources in Alberta and elsewhere to augment your
government relations, media and public affairs resources.

I would like to meet with you today or early Wednesday to discuss an amended
going-forward task assignment for GPC, given the likelihood of assigning the
Queen's Park contact program to Sasha, or his new firm. I would ask that
should you be successful in concluding an engagement agreement with Sasha or
his firm that you inform us and I will have our in-house counsel confirm the
removal of any restrictive covenants that Sasha has with GPC that would
prevent him from doing consulting work with you.  

While the contact program you want Sasha to work on is key to your
objectives, it is nonetheless only one element of a comprehensive campaign,
so whatever your arrangements with Sasha or his firm may be, we see GPC's
critical areas of support as follows.

	*	GPC would continue to provide strategic advice on the
overall program to secure Enron Canada's market opening in Ontario,
including advice to you on the Queen's Park Contact Program. Assuming that
you will be working with Sasha to execute the Queen's Park contact program,
we still believe that our assessment of the situation will be very valuable,
particularly with the opposition parties and for giving you an independent
back channel to gauge your success. 

	*	GPC would also provide advice to you on the management of
other important stakeholders, such the municipal utilities, major power
consumers, consumer and environmental/social advocates and others who may
slow down or derail the market reforms.

	*	Regarding the opposition parties, we endorse your strategy
of maintaining the current support of the Official Opposition Liberals. GPC
is well positioned to assist in this political arena. It should be separated
from the government program in our view if possible.

	*	The media will also perform a pivotal role in shaping the
public's understanding of the issue. In this respect, we would recommend
that GPC's Peter Varley assist you. Our approach would be to ensure that the
major media outlets in key government constituencies are targeted to have an
accurate and favourable response to Enron Canada's position. Ideally, we
would work to ensure that these outlets are proactively supportive of the
market opening in their respective editorial positions and that Enron is a
preferred media contact. This would enable you be in a better position to
shape the media debate. To accomplish this we would recommend both a
proactive and reactive approach - i.e., media plan, contact program, program
delivery and day-to-day monitoring and rapid response (Aleck this is much
like we did for project Stanley).

	*	GPC would also develop all collateral materials for all
audiences including the media, government, regulators and market
stakeholders. This would include briefing notes, Q&A, media releases, policy
papers etc.

	*	Outside Ontario, there are other concerns, including some
current issues underway in Alberta, which Enron Canada should be alerted to
from time to time and GPC can help you understand those concerns as they
arise and assess the value of strategic intervention.  
	
As we discussed, I will be the overall account manager for GPC and I
strongly recommend that you, Sasha and I meet as a team twice a month to
coordinate our efforts and to exchange intelligence.  

I have also reviewed our current contractual arrangement with you (our
letter agreement from 08 June 2000) and I believe a new contract is not
required as our current contract would seem to be appropriate. It sets out a
comprehensive set of deliverables which covers all the points I have
outlined above, and an agreed understanding between you and me on a budget
will fit within the terms of that contract.

Once again Aleck, thanks for your support and patience and, as you can tell,
we value your business very highly. 

I will call you to set up a convenient time to meet to ensure this overview
is consistent with our discussions and also to review with you the members
of the GPC team.

Tom McLaren
Executive Vice President
GPC International
416 598 0055
tmclaren@gpc.ca
website: http://www.gpcinternational.com

*******************************************************************
This email message has been swept by MIMEsweeper
for the presence of computer viruses

Ce courrier a fait l'objet d'un balayage antivirus au moyen
du logiciel MIMEsweeper
*******************************************************************

Thanks for doing this.  

Jim
Jim, we are handling this for Lisa, plus the intervention in support for Enron Global Markets in the Calypso Pipeline proceeding.  However, I wanted to make sure you saw this as being within our job scope since EGM is a separate organization from ENA and EES.  I understand that Lisa used to use outside counsel to file her FERC pleadings, but I don't know why she changed.
 
Let me know if you want to discuss.  Thanks.
 
 
Becky:  please file a plain vanilla intervention in this docket for Enron LNG.   THANKS!!

Probably not.  Thanks.

Jim

I will work that out with Tom.  Do you see  the RTO matters taking up all of Tom's time? I didn't, however you may have a better handle.  The two are linked pretty closely. SM

I think this makes alot of sense.  Who would cover PA and NJ at retail - you?

Jim

Jim - In an effort to more efficiently participate in the DC meetings with respect to the NE RTO, I would like Tom Hoatson to lead my teams effort.  I believe he has a solid understanding of each of the ISO's/Pools, and can call upon Allegretti, Fromer and Staines as needed.  Any thoughts? SM

When: Tuesday, August 21, 2001 4:00 PM-4:30 PM (GMT-06:00) Central Time (US & Canada).
Where: eb47

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

PLEASE ATTEND IF POSSIBLE.

Latest information on CPUC Decision --

Commissioner Bilas filed an Alternative Draft for the CPUC that would:

*	hold DA suspension and have the CPUC conduct hearings that would work out details including impact on bonds and phasing ending of DA,
*	resolved issues related to credits and payments of Negative CTC, and
*	hold hearings dealing with bottoms-up ratemaking for DA.

This is effectively an updated version of the alternate that Bilas put out last time the CPUC considered this issue.  It is a long-shot that this alternative would be approved.  

Our current information is still that the CPUC will vote to suspend DA as of Sept 1.

Jim

Please see me.

Thx.

Jim,

I prepared this report for the month of Sept.  Does this format work for you?  If so, Paul will complete it (or have it completed) for the rest of the Western Group.

Alan 
 

John --

How about I take the "delay" side for $200?

Jim

Latest information on CPUC Decision --

Commissioner Bilas filed an Alternative Draft for the CPUC that would:

*	hold DA suspension and have the CPUC conduct hearings that would work out details including impact on bonds and phasing ending of DA,
*	resolved issues related to credits and payments of Negative CTC, and
*	hold hearings dealing with bottoms-up ratemaking for DA.

This is effectively an updated version of the alternate that Bilas put out last time the CPUC considered this issue.  It is a long-shot that this alternative would be approved.  

Our current information is still that the CPUC will vote to suspend DA as of Sept 1.

Jim
[Lavorato, John]  I bet you 100 bucks they delay the decision. 
[Lavorato, John]  

I think that we should support the effort.  I would not get into the specifics in any region or the specifics of the proceedings.  This should be an opportunity for Enron to "spin" its message - RTOs help us help our customers....

Jim

Given that we're in the process of identifying influential stakeholders, this appears to be a good opportunity to clarify and deliver our message.  Jim do you agree we should help Jeannie?  

Jim and Janel -- Do you want me to respond to Jeannie on this?  Do we want to write this up in an Enron customer paper article right now?
Thanks much.
Christi, hi -- we spoke about a month ago. I'm working with Michael Burr to pull together an article for our customers on what's going on with RTOs. I know you and Sarah have been involved in the hearings, and that we don't want to comment during this 45-day period. But we will publish in late September and I feel Mike really needs your input in a couple of areas:

1. Why are the states and the proposed RTOs fighting FERC's order so fiercely? And why won't the RTOs being proposed work?
2. There is some confusion as to whether RTO formation is still voluntary. Is it?
3. Can you suggest any source within FERC who can articulate the commission's thinking?
4. Do you see a likely scenario or timetable emerging?

This article is a great chance to talk to our customers about this issue. Please let me know if you can provide some help.

Thanks,
Jeannie

Jim,
	Is this the decision you are looking for?

 

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

sounds good.

The structure of an independent market monitor is arising in the RTO proceedings.  These are some thoughts:

Market monitor should have the ability to monitor the activities of the RTO and the markets.  For example, if the RTO is a transco, it is appropriate for the MM to review whether the RTO is doing something potentially problematic in planning, ATC calcs, etc.
MM should only have the ability to recommend changes to market structure, possible penalties, etc.  MM should not have the ability to issue a penalty to any one without first going to FERC.  It is possible that the MM could ask for FERC pre-approval to issue "penalties" or remedies for certain conduct.  The example that comes to mind is the $1000 price cap in PJM.  It has been approved at FERC and if someone bids above it, the MM could reduce the bid to $1000 without going to FERC again.
MM has no authority that FERC does not have.  (I have heard some (outside of Enron) people state that the MM should have authority to do things that FERC could not do.)
Market participants should always retain their right to go to FERC before providing documents in response to an MM request and should retain right to go to FERC even if there is an arbitration clause (should not be required to agree to binding arbitration).
Ultimately, FERC staff could provide the MM function.

Let me know any comments ASAP please (since I have comments due on this Friday for the SE RTO).  Thanks.

Why have exit fees and limit to open enrollment?

Jim

The following are some of the proposed amendments to SBX2 78, in concept.
The amendments were developed by the Administration and Assembly Democratic
leadership and have not been finalized, nor have they been run past the
Senate in full detail.  It is unlikely that the Assembly will take the bill
up this week.

Direct Access: SBX2 78 will contain the final DA provisions from ABX2 82
which are located in Water Code Section 80110.  The amendments, in short,
provide that customers may switch during open enrollment periods provided
that there is enough head room and in proportion to the customer class.  The
Assembly has apparently convinced the Treasurer that DA can exist provided
there are non-bypassable charges and specified exit fees.

Threshold: The payment threshold will be lowered to 20 kw for 100% of the
undercollection despite the Senate's objections.  Lowering the threshold to
20 kw will probably force some of the liberal Democrats off the bill but
will bring even more of the moderate Democrats on to the bill.

Tax Refund: SCE will keep the $400 million projected tax refund and not have
that amount applied towards the bonding amount.

Easements: The easements are currently in the bill, however, they may need
to come out in order to secure moderate Democratic votes.

Renewable Portfolio Standard:  The RPS from ABX2 82 will be included in SBX2
78.

Right now I'd let the FERC make that call.  If asked, Enron believes that incorporating Fla into the Southeast makes great sense for Florida consumers - more access to low cost markets, etc.  Why is the fight ours?  Let's keep it alive before FERC but not make it a big push for Enron.

Jim

Jim - What is your position regarding Fla in the SE RTO?  Do we want to fight the fight with the Fla. PSC or are we willing to accept Fla as a stand alone at this point, and let things sort out in the rest of the SE first.  I believe Staines thinks that we will lose ground in Fla rolling them up into the SE RTO?  I probably agree with that statement and also believe we will rattle the Fla PSC's cage with little or no chance of winning the argument.  Thoughts? SM

What happened?

Jim

Apparently the link to the Senate website which contains information on
today's Senate Energy Committee hearing does not work.  Therefore, I have
cut and paste the document and attached it to my e-mail.

INFORMATIONAL HEARING

Proposed Rate Agreement Between The California Department
Of Water Resources And The California Public Utilities Commission

State Capitol, Room 2040

August 21, 2001
1:30 p.m.

I. Opening Comments

Senator Debra Bowen, Chairwoman
Senate Energy, Utilities & Communications Committee
Senator Bill Morrow, Vice-Chairman
Senate Energy, Utilities & Communications Committee
II. Panelists
Stan Dirks
California Department of Water Resources
Chris Warner
Pacific Gas & Electric
Gary Schoonyan
Southern California Edison
Jim Hay
San Diego Gas & Electric
Mike Florio
The Utility Reform Network
Dave Morse
Office of Ratepayer Advocates
Dan Carroll
California Industrial Users
Douglas Heller
Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer Rights
Bill Julian
California Public Utilities Commission

BACKGROUND
At the peak of California's electricity crisis, two of California's
investor-owned utilities were financially unable to purchase electricity on
behalf of their customers. AB 1x (Keeley), Chapter 4, Statutes of 2001,
authorized the California Department of Water Resources (DWR) to begin
buying power on behalf of the customers of those two utilities and San Diego
Gas & Electric ratepayers, as well as to issue bonds to finance such
purchases. DWR wasn't authorized to utilize the credit of the state to back
those purchases. Instead, it was authorized to recover the money needed to
pay for its electricity purchases through electric rates charged to
consumers and to perform is own "reasonableness review" of those costs. The
California Public Utilities Commission's (CPUC) discretion to perform a
reasonableness review is rarely abrogated (an exception being the costs of
collective bargaining agreements), but AB 1x made an exception in this case
for two basic reasons: First, if the CPUC decided to preclude certain power
costs from being passed along to ratepayers, the effect would be to simply
shift those costs from ratepayers to taxpayers. Second, the goal of a
reasonableness review, which is to create an incentive to do the best
possible job, on behalf of the ratepayers could be accomplished through DWR'
s accountability to ratepayers. The theory was the political process would
provide the check on DWR's activities much in the same way customers provide
a check on the activities of a municipal utility.

To fulfill its obligations under AB 1x, DWR spent $7.6 billion through May
2001. That money was originally loaned from the General Fund. In addition,
the state obtained a short-term bank loan of $4.3 billion to help pay for
ongoing electricity purchases. That short-term loan, the outstanding debt
owed to the General Fund, and the difference between actual electricity
costs and electricity rates paid to DWR will all be financed through a $12.5
billion bond offering, which was authorized by SB 31x (Burton), Chapter 9,
Statutes of 2001, and may take place as early as October. DWR has stated
that the bond offering is contingent upon the CPUC taking a number of
actions on August 23, 2001, one of which is to approve the DWR-constructed
Rate Agreement (Agreement) between DWR and the CPUC.

The Agreement provides the irrevocable contractual and enforceable assurance
that the CPUC will allow DWR's electricity power purchase costs to be
recovered in a timely manner. Specifically, the Agreement:

Creates a Rate Covenant where the CPUC acknowledges DWR's right to recover
its self-determined revenue requirement as specified;
Defines DWR's revenue requirement to include the repayment of the bonds, the
cost of DWR's electricity procurement, including the long-term contracts,
administrative, consulting and legal costs, and the cost of demand
management programs;
Requires the CPUC to establish rates to allow recovery of DWR's revenue
requirement within 30 days or 90 days, as determined by DWR;
Authorizes DWR to take the CPUC to court to enforcement its provisions.
DWR has stated the Agreement is an essential element to obtaining the bond
financing. J.P. Morgan, the senior managing underwriter for the DWR bonds,
has similarly stated that without the Agreement, the bonds won't be viewed
as investment grade quality, thereby jeopardizing the bond issuance.
The Agreement is currently being considered by the CPUC. A number of
parties, including small and large consumer groups who will be responsible
for paying the rates, along with the investor-owned utilities, have
commented on DWR's proposed Agreement and raised a number of concerns. The
Treasurer has offered some suggested amendments to the Agreement to try and
answer some of the concerns without impairing his ability to sell the bonds.

Issues & Questions The Committee May Wish To Consider

Must an Agreement be Signed?

AB 1x permits the CPUC to enter into a rate agreement with DWR, but such an
agreement is not required by the statute. Given the irrevocable nature of
DWR's proposed Agreement, is it necessary for the CPUC to approve the
agreement, or will some other, less binding agreement suffice? One alternate
approach to the Agreement is SB 18xx (Burton), which provides a dedicated
rate to pay for the bonds and specifies exactly what DWR may include as a
part of its costs. SB 18xx passed the Senate 35-2 on July 20, 2001, and is
pending at the Assembly desk.

Public Review

DWR's revenue requirement, at least as it pertains to power purchase costs,
bond repayment, and associated administrative costs, clearly isn't subject
to CPUC review or adjustment pursuant to AB 1x. Rather than have an
independent party like the CPUC review its efforts, AB 1x envisioned that
public review and accountability would motivate DWR to do the best possible
job to get the best value possible for ratepayers. However, the Agreement
neither contemplates nor provides for public review, which has raised
concerns from a number of parties about what costs beyond the cost of buying
power DWR is attempting to pass along to ratepayers as a part of the
Agreement.

Scope of Revenue Requirement

AB 1x specifically permits DWR to cover the cost of the bonds, power
purchases, and associated administrative costs. The Agreement submitted by
DWR to the CPUC for adoption allows DWR to recover much more than those
costs, including the cost of demand management programs and legal,
consulting, and technical services. By including such costs in the
Agreement, these costs are subject to neither legislative nor public review.
The demand management programs have historically been the purview of the
CPUC. (The California Independent System Operator has attempted this year to

create and administer some of these programs with mixed success.) However,
DWR has no background in demand management and no public process for
considering and approving such programs. Given the lack of a public process
and DWR's lack of expertise on demand management programs, is it appropriate
to allow DWR to include the unknown costs of these programs in the
Agreement?

30 and 90 Day Review

The Agreement requires the CPUC to review and implement rates which allow
DWR to recover its revenue requirement within 90 days, or 30 days if DWR
finds that an expedited change is necessary. This is an extremely short
window of time for the CPUC to analyze any DWR request and provide for full
public review and comment.

Auditing

DWR's revenue requirement will be tens of billions of dollars which will be
paid for exclusively by the ratepayers of the state's investor-owned
utilities. Despite the fact that billions of dollars will be changing hands,
the Agreement fails to include an auditing requirement to ensure that
appropriate revenues are provided to DWR, that surplus revenues are returned
to ratepayers, and that there is ongoing monitoring of DWR's accounts.

Court Challenges

The purpose of the rate agreement is to facilitate the issuance of the bonds
to repay the General Fund and the short-term loan. It's possible that some
party may challenge this Agreement or any of the other related CPUC
decisions (i.e. establishing the DWR revenue requirement, creating a
servicing agreement between DWR and the utilities, etc.), in either federal
or state court. How will such a challenge effect the issuance of the bonds?

Contract Renegotiation

The DWR contracts, negotiated at the height of the energy crisis, are viewed
by some as expensive. The state and ratepayers would certainly be better off
if those contracts can be renegotiated based upon current circumstances. The
Agreement binds the CPUC to set rates sufficient for DWR to recover its
revenue requirement, including the cost of the contracts it has already
signed. Does the signing of this Agreement diminish DWR's ability or
incentive to renegotiate any of the contracts? Does it eliminate any
incentive DWR has to negotiate the best possible price on any future
contracts that it may sign, since the costs of those contracts won't be
subject to review or adjustment?

John & Louise --

I wanted to make sure that you were aware that FERC has ordered natural gas sellers to provide monthly reporting for transactions relating to California.  We are, of course, seeking for FERC to modify its decision.  Given the politics surrounding California energy markets, it is unlikely that FERC remove in whole the reporting obligation.  Govt Affairs has talked with the West gas team about this new obligation and how we respond.

If you have any questions, please call.

Jim

Attached is a draft of our rehearing request on the order FERC issued in RM01-9 requiring sellers of gas into California to file information on their sales, transport, and purchases.  The rehearing request restates our arguments in response to the NOPR  that (1) permanent, formal reporting requirements are not appropriate to address a temporary problem and are beyond the scope of the Commission's powers under the Natural Gas Act and (2) the commission significantly underestimated the burden of the reporting requirements as well as the responding parties' ability to comply.  We also request that the reports, if they must be submitted, be due 45 days after the end of the month instead of the required 30 days.
Please provide any comments or suggestions you may have on this draft to either myself (713-853-5840) or Leslie (505-623-6778) by COB Wednesday (8/22).  
 

Thanks.

Makes sense.

Jim

I think this would be a good course for Melinda to take.  If you agree, I can suggest it to her if you'd like.

Effective Negotiating - September 4 & 5, 2001
in EB552    Cost:  $950.00

Effective Negotiating is an intensive two-day seminar that teaches strategies, tactics, techniques, and psychological insights that provide you with the tools to make better Win-Win agreements.  The skills learned can be applied immediately.  These skills are taught through a hard-hitting, fast paced presentation that is enjoyable and educational.

For enrollment, login to our website (<http://elm.enron.com>), if you have problems logging in or questions, please call 713 853-0357.

Please see PG&E response.

Jim

Jim, I spoke with Mike Alexander, PG&E, last night.  Their legal team met yesterday afternoon regarding our request.   He expects we will receive a response from Peter Ouberg today or tomorrow.  They are saying that the credits are listed as part of Schedule F of their bankruptcy filing and cannot be reinstated.  Mike also commented that they do not view this as a billing dispute and will refer us to Rule 22, Section L. 2. e &f, ESP responsibilities.

Janet Covington, SCE, said their legal and credit team are crafting a response.  She did not have a feel for how SCE will view our request.  I think it might be a good time to contact Steve Kean.

Let me know if you have questions.

Ok.  How about breakfast on Thursday?

Jim

Jim,

Per our call today, let's try to meet Mr. Turnure for a meal or a drink.  I will be in around 4 p.m. on Tues and will leave @ 6 p.m. on Thurs.

GAC

Alan -

Appreciate your thoughts.

Jim

Jim,

I thought you might be interested in the attached 3-pager.  I leave it
to you to let me know if you'd like to talk further, or get together
when you are in town.

Best of luck

--Jim

 <<Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc>> 
 - Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc <<Concept Piece_FERC Analysis.doc>> 

Thanks for the info.  Will be in touch.

Jim

Jim, I spoke with Mike Alexander, PG&E, last night.  Their legal team met yesterday afternoon regarding our request.   He expects we will receive a response from Peter Ouberg today or tomorrow.  They are saying that the credits are listed as part of Schedule F of their bankruptcy filing and cannot be reinstated.  Mike also commented that they do not view this as a billing dispute and will refer us to Rule 22, Section L. 2. e &f, ESP responsibilities.

Janet Covington, SCE, said their legal and credit team are crafting a response.  She did not have a feel for how SCE will view our request.  I think it might be a good time to contact Steve Kean.

Let me know if you have questions.

Jennifer --  Please review and discuss with me if you think there could be "financial" products placed on top of this Utility service - ie, could we get a customer to agree to this and then offer a swap to fix their rate?

Jim
 
 
FYI:
You seen this?
 
Best,
Jeff
Attached is "PACIFIC GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY'S REAL-TIME PRICING PROPOSAL, SUBMITTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH ORDERING PARAGRAPH 3 OF DECISION 01-08-021", which was filed with the CPUC on Friday, August 17, 2001 and was served by placing it for collection and mailing to:  All Parties of Record In A.00-11-038, et al.

Patricia Kokason 
3-6668 

 

Fine with me.  I finish up with an EES Op Comm meeting at about 10am.

Jim

I'll be in Houston Monday.  I thought I might drop by around 10 to say hello if that's convenient.

Best,

Pat

Amr- 

You may want this.

Jim

Just to make everyone aware there is a database that is now being offered through E-Source, on a trial basis, that monitors country, regulatory, economic, environmental, legal and operational risk for about 185 different countries. The database claims that it helps its users to determine the quality of conditions and level of stability encountered by investors in each country. 
There is a specific Energy Section. That provides information and analysis on country risk, laws and regulations, industry overviews, and breaks down different parts of the countries energy sector. There is also some environmental analysis. The link to this section is:
http://www.worldmarketsonline.com/servlet/cats?ID=0&subSite=WEO&fromDate=20010822&pageContent=dup&refresh=true
The other section is Country Analysis and Forecast which provides information on many different types of risks and issues faced when investing in a country. The link is:
http://www.worldmarketsonline.com/servlet/cats?ID=0&subSite=WMCAF&pageContent=dup

Thanks,

Gavin Dillingham
Environmental Specialist
Enron Corp.
Gavin.Dillingham@enron.com
713-345-5961

Is this our responsive testimony?  Jim

By early Saturday afternoon, the Steering Committee plans to circulate to the TFG draft testimonies that are being developed jointly by PowerEx, PPl Montana and Enron for filing on Monday, August 27.  These testimonies are strucured as a suite, each complementing the other.  The witnesses filing these testimonies will be Dr. Richard Tabors (PowerEx), Dr. Scott Jones (PPL), Dr. Samuel Van Vactor (Enron), and Dr. Seabron Adamson (Enron).

The sponsors of these testimonies invite TFG member comments and suggestions for improving the drafts.  However, in order for your comments to be considered, they will need to be received no later than 3:00 PM ESTon Sunday, August 26.  All comments and suggestions need to be in writing and can be faxed (not E-mailed) to me at 202-857-2131.  If your suggestion is in the nature of an addition (rather than simply an edit), please write it out as you would propose we incorporate it.  Sorry that we cannot be more flexible, but you all understand the schedule that we are operating under.  Thanks

Jeffrey D. (Dan) Watkiss
Bracewell & Patterson, LLP
2000 K St., N.W.
Suite 500
Washington, D.C.   20006-1872
(202) 828-5851
dwatkiss@bracepatt.con
jdwatkiss@aol.com

Becky --

Thanks for the update.  I think that maybe you should take 1 hour to walk through the deregulation history of pipelines?  Maybe INGAA has some nice history?

Jim

This is the schedule so far for Mr. Formaggio, who has asked to meet with someone in Enron to understand more about the general operation of a big pipeline (dispatching, the nomination and balancing operation, the allocation of measurement, and other major aspects of third-party-access implementation, including OBAs with interconnecting pipelines).

He was scheduled to arrive this afternoon, and will be staying at the Hyatt Regency.  

Thursday, 8/23

9:00 through	Arrive at Enron.  He was given either Ginger Dernehl or myself as initial contacts.  
   Lunch	Advise John Buchanan of arrival (X.37429).  
	John will come to 47 to escort Mauro down to 41 for presentations by Lynn Blair and others about ETS gas logistics.
	Then Mauro will meet with Dannis Bellard for a tour of Gas Control.

3:30-4:30	Meet with Julie Gomez, VP of Long-Term Fundamentals-Gas

Friday, 8/24

11:00-12:00	Meet with Rick Shapiro and Jim Steffes, Government Affairs-The Americas

I am trying to arrange a meeting also with George Smith, either at about 2:00 on Thursday or on Friday morning.  He is a manager in the EWS logistics area who could talk about pipeline operation from the shipper perspective.

Amr --

Please take the first stab at two presentations (for each business unit) that would lay out what our key issues and decisionmaking process for these issues.

Jim

What do I do?

Jim

Please do not reply to this e-mail.

You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iBuyit Payables in-box 
that is past due.  Please login to iBuyit Payables and resolve this invoice as soon as possible.

To launch iBuyit Payables, click on the link below:
http://iBuyitPayables.enron.com
Note:  Your iBuyit Payables User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iBuyit Payables user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://sap.enron.com/sap_doclib/user/file_list.asp?cabinet_id=265

Need help?
Please contact the ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.

If you are in Europe, please contact European Accounts Payable at +44 20 7783 7520.

I am worried if we give the MM "penalty" ability - especially before the fact.  This feels alot like the NYISO implementing some market remedies.  FERC can act quickly to abuse if it is found.
 
Jim

Some additional issues we're hearing in the Northeast:
 
1.  Some people think the MM should be a separate entity -- a separate company/LLC/corp that monitors everyone, including the RTO.    We have not taken a position on this either way.  Others are pushing this a lot.
 
2.  Some people have advocated that the MM have section 205 rights.  We have opposed this.
 
3.  Christi, with regard to your example of the MM having "penalty" authority, I agree with your example but would be careful in regarding this type of MM authority has "penalty" authority.  I see this more as implementing a FERC order, and we don't want to go down the slippy slope of saying that some types of "penalties" may be appropriate.
 
Sarah

Agree with Christi. 

The structure of an independent market monitor is arising in the RTO proceedings.  These are some thoughts: 

Market monitor should have the ability to monitor the activities of the RTO and the markets.  For example, if the RTO is a transco, it is appropriate for the MM to review whether the RTO is doing something potentially problematic in planning, ATC calcs, etc. 
MM should only have the ability to recommend changes to market structure, possible penalties, etc.  MM should not have the ability to issue a penalty to any one without first going to FERC.  It is possible that the MM could ask for FERC pre-approval to issue "penalties" or remedies for certain conduct.  The example that comes to mind is the $1000 price cap in PJM.  It has been approved at FERC and if someone bids above it, the MM could reduce the bid to $1000 without going to FERC again. 
MM has no authority that FERC does not have.  (I have heard some (outside of Enron) people state that the MM should have authority to do things that FERC could not do.) 
Market participants should always retain their right to go to FERC before providing documents in response to an MM request and should retain right to go to FERC even if there is an arbitration clause (should not be required to agree to binding arbitration). 
Ultimately, FERC staff could provide the MM function. 

Let me know any comments ASAP please (since I have comments due on this Friday for the SE RTO).  Thanks. 

This gets at some of the buckets of $$ that may or may not be charged to DA.  We continue to try and pull together the facts surrounding the potential surcharges to ensure that the book is properly marked.

Jim

The following is a summary of the Direct Access provisions in the bill language released this afternoon reflecting the deal that Davis cut with Assembly.  Things are very fluid and these provisions could change significantly. 

I was just informed by the large business customers that they just met with the Davis' and Hertzberg's staff and the staff have agreed to amend the DA provisions to make them considerably more favorable for customers and suppliers.  They also said that favorable provisions with respect to self-gen would also be added to the bill. They said that these new amendments could come out as early as tonite or tomorrow morning and that the bill may be heard tomorrow.

Note:  In addition to the DA provisions, the bill also includes provisions that 1) explicitly recognize the PX Credit as part of Edison's undercollection, and 2) permit Edison to pay debts associated with the negative PX credit. (The bill does not authorize Edison to pay power suppliers, however, and leaves that portion of Edison's debt for Edison's management and shareholders to address.)

Summary of Direct Access provisions:

The program would begin January 1, 2003.
It's unclear what would happen to DA between now and January 1, 2003.  Presumably, the decision to suspend, or not, between now and then would stay with the California PUC.
90 days after the effective date of the bill, and every 6 months thereafter, DWR would provide information to the PUC showing the net short position.
Every 6 months, the PUC would hold an open season permitting customers to switch to DA.
20 KW-and-above customers would have 60 days to decide to switch once the PUC has announced the open season; under 20kw customers would have 180 days.
Customers who switch to DA would be responsible for paying 1) the customer's proportionate share of the utility's undercollection and 2) the customer's proportionate share of DWR's receivables (if any) for power previously delivered by DWR (but not yet fully paid for by customers).
In addition, if the number of customers who elect to choose to go DA in the open season exceeds the net short, then DA customers will have to pay their proportionate share of any DWR stranded contract costs.
If the number of DA customers does not exceed the net short position, then no stranded contract cost fees would be assessed.

Best,
Jeff

Hope --

I will be attending the Board Meeting.  Sorry I am so late.  Linda Noske will be finalizing my plans.

Thanks,

Jim

[IMAGE]
 
[IMAGE]
 
MEMORANDUM
 
TO:     Members of the CAEM  Board of Directors
BY:      Jeff Mangold, Vice President of Administration
RE:     September Meeting - - RSVP Requested
Date:  August 22, 2001
 
The next meeting of the CAEM Board of Directors will be held on the afternoon of Wednesday, September 12, at the Grand Hyatt Hotel in Washington, DC. 
 
We will begin the meeting with a luncheon at 12 noon. The substantive session will be from 1 to 5 p.m. Following the Board meeting on Wednesday, you are invited to join with members of the DISCO of the Future Forum for an evening reception and dinner, including a guest speaker, beginning at 6:30. Board members are invited to join in the substantive session of the DISCO Forum on Thursday, September 13. A complete agenda and meeting materials will be forwarded to you shortly.
 
At this time we would request your RSVP for three events:
- The Wednesday Board Meeting
- The Wednesday evening reception and dinner
- The Thursday meeting of the DISCO of the Future Forum
 
We also remind you of the international convention ongoing in Washington at the same time as our meetings, and the need to make hotel reservations as soon as possible. No rooms remain at the Grand Hyatt.
 
It is still possible to reserve a room in the CAEM block at the nearby Wyndham Hotel (see below). Just inform the Wyndham staff that you are part of the Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets group when requesting a reservation. If you should decide to arrange lodging at a different hotel, please do so quickly as there is limited availability in all surrounding hotels.
 
If you have any questions or require any assistance at all, please contact Hope Duncan at 202.739.0134 or Jeff Mangold at 703.729.2710. We are looking forward to seeing you on September 12.
 
Information on the DISCO of the Future Forum, as well as our recently released report on gas deregulation, can be found on our newly redesigned website, www.caem.org << File: www.caem.org >> 
 
Hotel Information:
 
Grand Hyatt Hotel
1000 H Street NW
Washington DC 20001
Phone: 202.582.1234 or 1.800.233.1234
Fax: 202.637.4781
Website: http://washington.hyatt.com/wasgh/index.html << File: http://washington.hyatt.com/wasgh/index.html >> 
 
Wyndham WashingtonDC
1400 M Street NW
Washington, DC 20005
Phone: 202.429.1700 or 1.877.999.3223
Fax: 202.785.0786
Website: http://www.wyndham.com/Washington_DC/default.cfm << File: http://www.wyndham.com/Washington_DC/default.cfm >> 
 
 
 - image001.gif << File: image001.gif >> 
 - image002.jpg << File: image002.jpg >> 

Any way to work on (1) moving to 4/1/02?

Jim

The following is a summary of the Direct Access provisions in the bill language released this afternoon reflecting the deal that Davis cut with Assembly.  Things are very fluid and these provisions could change significantly. 

I was just informed by the large business customers that they just met with the Davis' and Hertzberg's staff and the staff have agreed to amend the DA provisions to make them considerably more favorable for customers and suppliers.  They also said that favorable provisions with respect to self-gen would also be added to the bill. They said that these new amendments could come out as early as tonite or tomorrow morning and that the bill may be heard tomorrow.

Note:  In addition to the DA provisions, the bill also includes provisions that 1) explicitly recognize the PX Credit as part of Edison's undercollection, and 2) permit Edison to pay debts associated with the negative PX credit. (The bill does not authorize Edison to pay power suppliers, however, and leaves that portion of Edison's debt for Edison's management and shareholders to address.)

Summary of Direct Access provisions:

The program would begin January 1, 2003.
It's unclear what would happen to DA between now and January 1, 2003.  Presumably, the decision to suspend, or not, between now and then would stay with the California PUC.
90 days after the effective date of the bill, and every 6 months thereafter, DWR would provide information to the PUC showing the net short position.
Every 6 months, the PUC would hold an open season permitting customers to switch to DA.
20 KW-and-above customers would have 60 days to decide to switch once the PUC has announced the open season; under 20kw customers would have 180 days.
Customers who switch to DA would be responsible for paying 1) the customer's proportionate share of the utility's undercollection and 2) the customer's proportionate share of DWR's receivables (if any) for power previously delivered by DWR (but not yet fully paid for by customers).
In addition, if the number of customers who elect to choose to go DA in the open season exceeds the net short, then DA customers will have to pay their proportionate share of any DWR stranded contract costs.
If the number of DA customers does not exceed the net short position, then no stranded contract cost fees would be assessed.

Best,
Jeff

Steve --
 
Thanks.  Looks good.  Some thoughts for you to consider:
 
1.    Not sure that Impact #1 makes sense to present.  No real reason to set CTC = 0 c/kwh on Jan 5 (CalPX was still in operation).  I think that Impact #2 better captures the idea.  Also, probably not good to use the term "CTC Eliminated".  Maybe should say "CTC = 0 c/kwh".  Given the CPUC's March 27 Order, the Utilities have a claim for additional generation related stranded costs until March 31, 2002.
 
2.     In calculating Impact #2, what did you use as the Jan 19 - Aug baseline?  Did you calculate the hit of ($104.5) from actual bills or based on our DJ Index model (there is a fundamental difference in likelihood based on the baseline)?  Also, I assume that the Feb - Aug timeframe was relatively low because EES and EEMC had most of their load on bundled service.
 
3.    Probably should discuss in a footnote the different models for PX Credit calculation and most specifically the PG&E Adjustment.  Also, may be interesting to have the $ impact of the PG&E Adjustment (the rate adjustment to re-capture their previous mistake).  I think that this is something we need to go into the CPUC to fight pretty quickly.
 
4.    Should Impact #4 and Impact #5 apply to SCE's loads?  In column 4 it looks like it does.  SCE is not currently hitting our bills with this surcharge.
 
5.    Probably better to model Impact #5 as of Oct 1 not Sept 1.
 
6.    Can you break out the volumes for "vintage" contracts versus "retail gen with passthru" contracts?  You haven't shown anything for (a) Utility Undercollection costs or (b) CDWR bond fees.  These costs may hit our vintage contracts.
 
Jim

The attached file is the latest version, go to SUMMARY page.  I still have some finalizing to do on the format/info to present, would appreciate comments, feedback, etc.  As you will see, we have veered some from our initial task of looking at "SCE" and "PG&E" method, mainly b/c I have come to believe, based on info from Sue Mara and other sources, that SCE does not intend to eliminate the CTC -- they have merely stopped calculating it for now until they can get some guidance from CPUC.  Nevertheless, if the CTC were to be eliminated, the impact is shown in the model summary.
 
I plan to speak some with Belden as soon as he gets in tomorrow AM, and then we can proceed to talking with Whalley, et al.  Thanks....

Pls work into my calendar.

Jim
Margaret Allen would like to schedule a 45 minute meeting with you on either Monday, August 27, between 9am and 2pm or on Tuesday, August 28, between 9am and 1pm.  The subject of the meeting will be the GENIE project - to get your feedback on the portal. Please forward me the time and day of your choice and we will try to accommodate your needs.  Your participation is greatly appreciated.  Thank you    

	GENIE is the internal name of the project that includes forums, daily content pushes and 	web casts. The first forum is on Energy Policy in Oct, but we are launching two portals in 	early Sept. Margaret was hoping to walk you through it and get your take. Also, there is a 	discussion in the Dec. forum on online exchanges, so she wanted to discuss that with 	you as well. 

I'd be happy to come to the meeting on Sept 5.  I'd rather stay close to the bldg for the reception.

Jim

Hello Jim,

Our Department is planning a Recruiting Offsite.  With this offsite we would like to include our Executive Team Leads.  

Had a couple of questions to ask:

1)  Would you be available for our recruiting kick-off meeting on September 5, from 2-5?
2)  Would you be willing to come to Jillians or would they rather stay close to the building, there is a reception that would follow.

If you are available please save the date.

Please let me know.  

Paul L./Recruiter

John --

Look at the letter from CAEM below.  They want us to sign on.  Not sure that Enron adding its name is the best idea.  Also, are the sections listed the right ones?  Maybe we can change this without our name.

Jim

FYI.  Please find attached a letter to the editor that I submitted today
to the Washington Post on their three-part series on electricity
restructuring.  While the series was informative and pointed to some
serious problems, I thought it was too doom and gloom.  I would be
interested to hear your comments on the attached.

We need to do a better job at telling the positive side of the story on
competition.

I also have attached the letter that the Leadership Council on Energy
Competition will be sending to the President shortly.  Over 50 leaders
have already made a commitment to sign.  If you have not done so
already, please "sign it" by sending an e-mail to me with your current
title and contact information.  As you can see in the letter,
individuals with organizational affiliations -- but not necessarily the
organizations themselves -- are signing onto the letter.

Jamie

Jamie Wimberly
President
CAEM

 - Washington Post Letter.doc 
 - Letter To The President -- FINAL DRAFT.doc 

Please process this request.

Jim

Joan Stransky is requesting access to the below role(s) and its pending your approval.  Please email your response to SAP Security.  If you have any questions, please contact her/his supervisor.

FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING ROLES:
   1. Add FN AP Invoice Processing-CORP

User's Current Access:
Std End-User profile for basis and prntg
HR Local Time Keeper - CORP HR
HR EMployee ESS CATS Enterprise HR
FN FI Consolidated Viewer-CORP

Thank you,
ISC SAP Security (Eva)

The following request information was recently submitted...

REQUESTOR INFORMATION:

   Business Unit:                CORP
   Cost Center:                  103246
   Company Code:                 001
   Business Unit for Roles:      CORP
   Other Business Units:
   SAP ID:                       p00500449

GENERAL INFORMATION:

   Supervisor:                   James Steffes
   Supervisor Telephone Number:  853 7673
   Employee Name (Last,First,M): Stransky, Joan. F.
   Employee Location:            EB4736B
   Employee Telephone Number:    853-7431
   Employee Email Address:       joan.stransky@enron.com
   Job Title:                    Admin Asst
   SAP User Type:                Enron Employee

   Business Reason:              
   I have been asked to support Becky Cantrell and Melinda
   Pharms in timekeeping and invoice coding.

VIEWER ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING ROLES:
   1. Add FN AP Invoice Processing

PROJECT SYSTEM ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

JOINT VENTURE ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

MATERIALS MANAGEMENT / PURCHASING ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

CENTRALIZED ROLES (LIMITED TO SPECIFIC PERSONNEL):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES (HR PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES - TIMEKEEPERS:
   1. Add  HR Local Timekeeper

HUMAN RESOURCES - BENEFITS (BENEFITS PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES - PAYROLL (PAYROLL PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

Susan --

Please take the lead on coordinating our response.  Thanks.

Please see the attached summary of the notice of proposed rulemaking recently issued by FERC which proposes to revise the transactional reporting requirements for public utilities (including power marketers).  EPSA will be hosting several discussions and probably preparing comments (which are due October 5).  We need to discuss whether Enron wants to file its own comments.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

 << File: RM01-8 summary.doc >> 

Paul --

How is everything going?  Wanted to make sure that I hadn't been unresponsive to the project.  Anything critical that you need from me?  Please let me know.

Jim

Agree.  Would be good to have the utilities' answer in graphic form (17+ RTOs) versus FERC's model on a side-by-side.  Discussion of the TCA work on natural markets to support FERC.

Jim

I just wanted to second Sue's motion about the idea of a map to demonstrate the visual and substantive clarity of FERC's Super RTO model.  The map could be augmented with information on how those regions come closer to be aligned with actual power needs and flows.  I recall attending an EPSA conference for congressional staff soon after I arrived (June or so) which showed the crazy quilt-like map of the then-proposed RTOs that just looked unworkable.  The simplicity of the Super RTO model -- combined with some basic power idea -- will be a powerful lobbying tool.

Janel----as you know, most of the interaction on RTOs that I have had is with the Governors, and more specifically the western govs, so my comments are directed to them, but I think these suggestions could work for other influencers as well.
 
RTOs are not a readily understandable issue for a governor who has 50-100 issues every week to cover, nor is there a natural constituency that would politically support a governor getting involved, nor is it an issue that they care about---they just want the lights to go on and their voters to have moderate prices and reliability and for the energy crisis to go away if they perceive that it is affecting them.  Those that know a little bit about the RTOs are following their incumbent utility lead in opposing a west wide RTO, they are invoking the "states rights" mantra, and they don't want to be in the same  playground as California. 
 
I would suggest that we need materials/information (probably a power point of 5-8 pages)as follows:
 
    1  A description of the RTOs and generally what our position is, in plain english, in 3 sentences or less.
 
    2.  A minimum of 2 or 3 analogies to a well designed RTO.  The analogies need to be fleshed out...ie, cover all objections and questions.  The one that comes to mind is Eisenhower and the federal highway system--when/how it happened; who protested and why they were wrong; how great the highway system was for the economy and quality of life, etc.  Governors need something they can use as a sound bite and something they understand well to use as an analogy.  They do not want to look stupid, and most of them know little about energy, and so we need to give them something very simple to use as their underlying reasoning for supporting our position.
 
    3  Identify and describe only the the 2 or 3 most important, specific issues that we need to see addressed in the RTOs---native load exemption gone/congestion management solutions/timing or whatever Steffes and team identify.
 
    4. Specifically set out what the objections of other parties would be to the governor supporting our position on those 3 issues identified.  (this is key in making sure that they trust our information, and it also makes sure that they are prepared to answer the objections)  Specifically set out what the answer is to overcome those objections.
 
    5. Provide positive effects of a governor agreeing with the 2 or 3 issues--why he/she should  take our position ie better reliability, more transmission or generation will be built if system is truly open, keep them from getting screwed by California, etc.
 
    6.  somewhere in here we also need a very simple map so they can visualize what RTOs are.
 
 
 
 
    
 
    
 
    

Today I contacted our friends at Frontier Economics and at Tabors Caramanis about developing a set of talking points and leave-behinds for future RTO meetings (outside of the mediation process) with Governors, State Legislatures, Utility Commissioners and Members of Congress.  
 
In order to adequately provide us with the materials we need, both firms are interested in getting a better idea of the following:
 

who (which individuals) are raising concerns about the RTO Concept that FERC/Enron are advocating 
what specifically are the arguments these critics are making against the single, mandatory RTO concept? 
What are the priority issues that need addressing in your regions?  (We'll probably have to develop different documents depending on who we are talking with).

Each of you contacted me this week about wanting to meet with various policymakers in order to address their concerns and deliver our message.  Before you schedule your meetings, I think it's important to arm you with materials that can be left behind that summarize and/or outline your arguments for a single RTO.  Your feedback is important so PLEASE send me an email by Thursday outlining the feedback you've recently received and topics that you want Frontier Economics and TC to address.
 
Time is of the essence so please send me whatever thoughts you have so that I can forward to FE and TC.  
 
Thanks!  

 

Please give me your comments before the meeting.

Jim

     

713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

FYI
All,

Here is the latest version, summary page only.  Let me know if you have questions, comments.  Thanks...

 

Hey,  maybe here for our anniversary.

Jim

look up  www.langdonhall.ca

thanks.

look up  www.langdonhall.ca

Thanks.  By the way, it is only a "suggestion".  

I know that I can push pretty hard at times but it's only because I believe that both of you can handle it.  You're both doing fabulous jobs.  Of everything going on, I never worry about the NE and SE RTO mediations because I know that you guys are going to get everything possible for Enron.  Keep up the great job!!!!

Thanks for everything,

Jim

CONFIDENTIAL

EPSA letter to ALJ.  Please note the timetables proposed are consistent with Jim's "suggestion" this morning.

UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
BEFORE THE
FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION

Regional Transmission Organizations	)	Docket No. RT01-100-000

The Electric Power Supply Association (EPSA) has welcomed the opportunity to give you input during the Southeast mediation proceeding.  EPSA and its members would like to thank you and your team for taking time from the proceeding, to share your insights, hear our views, and answer our questions.  We now want to provide you with additional input from generators and marketers in the form of proposed milestones and deadlines regarding continued FERC involvement after the mediation.  We recognize your schedule and hope these brief points will be appropriate prior to your receipt of responses to the strawmen. 

FERC's Continued Involvement
EPSA strongly supports FERC's continued involvement in the development of one Regional Transmission Organization (RTO) for the Southeast.  EPSA believes such continued involvement is critical to achieving RTO market operations in the Southeast as soon as possible.  We cannot overestimate the damage to market efficiency and consumer benefits that result from continued delays to full competition, a problem that plagues the entire country. It was very encouraging to hear of your support for this involvement and desire to get input from market participants regarding how this can be done after the 45-day settlement period has ended.  EPSA would like to make procedural suggestions for the post-mediation period that would include continued Commission involvement that is deemed critical to the formation of a single Southeast RTO.  We hope that the following suggestions are helpful when you are developing your report to the Commission on the mediation results.

The Southeast Power Grid model will be an evolutionary process following the end of the mediation.  Several issue areas are still likely to be the focus of significant debate and will require a collaborative process that the stakeholders will remain responsible for establishing.  Resolving these issues and more importantly, their associated details, will be critical to the enduring success of the eventual Southeast Power Grid.

The Commission's continued involvement is critical to the formation of a seamless power grid.  Additionally, regional market participants can benefit from first-hand FERC input on previous rulings from other regions.  This can help prevent any future Southeast Power Grid filings from attempting to establish rules, protocols, and plans that are contrary to Commission precedent.  Moreover it prevents disagreements between stakeholders on specific points from stalling the process, and potentially resulting in a deficient filing.  Potentially FERC will incur added costs of travel and staff time; however, filings that follow FERC's current thinking will more than offset these costs.

The Commission's presence in the process going forward will prevent any future delay by providing ongoing dialogue between regulators and market participants.  This will shortcut the time-consuming sequence of: (1) internal negotiations; (2) filing; (3) filing response and, hopefully, obviate the need for going through the sequence repeatedly.  FERC presence will also help prevent parties from becoming polarized in their views during negotiations without feeling a need to compromise. 

Future stakeholder meetings in the Southeast Power Grid process will work best by involving two FERC staff representatives and to avoid ex-parte concerns, EPSA recognizes that any meeting attended by Commission staff must be publicly noticed. These Commission staff representatives need to be knowledgeable of the Southeast process and can serve as back-ups to one another.  Consequently if a situation arises where one staffer cannot participate in a meeting, the alternate should be able to stand in as a proxy for the other Commission representative.

The mediation process will have its value increased if the Commission's staff representatives are empowered to correct procedural problems that emerge in the process as it moves forward.  For example, if the Commission's staff finds that meeting minutes do not reflect stakeholder decisions or consensus on a given issue or they are not being disseminated to process participants in a systematic manner, they can ensure that problems are rectified.  Making expedient changes as the subsequent process unfolds after the 45-day mediation period is over will confirm that the successes of the mediation continue and that parties continue to work collaboratively.  

Staff involvement will give the Commission the ability to monitor the process during the post-mediation period.  If questions arise during post-mediation period, staff can supply on-the-spot answers or coordinate with senior staff to get answers to the parties quickly.  The efficiency of this established feedback channel ensures that negotiations between parties do not bog down and hinder the completion of the overall process over a single issue.  Moreover, the presence of Commission staff assists in maintaining a cooperative approach between the parties, as is evidenced in our mediation process.

Having Commission representatives in the field for the Southeast Power Grid process can prove valuable as a way for FERC to continue to engage state public utility commissions and remain responsive to their concerns as details about the Grid organization get refined.  The involvement of state commissions is integral to the success of more competitive wholesale markets in the Southeast.  A FERC presence going forward will allow federal and state regulators to confer on the benefits to consumers of successful competitive wholesale and, ultimately, retail power markets.  State regulators' comfort level could be increased if the process continues with an ongoing FERC presence.  

Proposed Milestones and Deadlines
The following schedule still assumes some form of convergence between the existing structures.  EPSA continues to believe that a single Southeast RTO can be formed in a timely manner, that will provide certainty to the market, steadily reduce business risks for those who have and will invest in the Southeast, and provide consumers with the quickest path to a cost-effective market structure * all while maintaining the reliability of the existing system.

		Sept.6, 2001	Begin post mediation process and resume RTO development

Sept. 30, 2001	Section 205 Filing consistent with mediation settlement reached

Oct.1, 2001	Start stakeholder input process: identification or Advisory Committee establishment

Nov.1, 2001- Dec. 31, 2001	Start and complete selection of Board, immediately followed by selection of Market/System Administrator

Dec. 15, 2001	Filing with Commission on completed consensus
(Order 2000 op. date)	documents and status report

Feb.1, 2002	File with Commission any outstanding organic documents

Mar.1, 2002	Market Monitor Selection process completed

Apr. 2002	Commission Response 	 

Mar.- Jun. 2002	Asset Transfers, Staff established

Jun. 2002	RTO becomes operational, with Day 1 market system

Dec. 15, 2002	Day 2 market system implemented
(Order 2000 Requirement)

We appreciate your taking the time to hear our suggestions.  We have great confidence in your command over these proceedings and that they will lead to a single competitive market for power in the Southeast.

Cool.  Sending messages in real-time.

Jim

Congrats team

Linda --

Pls print out for me. Thx.

Enron Corp. and its subsidiaries (the "Company") are exposed to market, cre=
dit, operational and liquidity/funding risks in the normal course of its bu=
siness activities.  The Enron Corp. Board of Directors approved a new Risk =
Management Policy (the "Policy") on August 14, 2001.  This Policy establish=
es a framework under which the Company's exposure to risks shall be evaluat=
ed, managed and controlled, and pursuant to which capital will be allocated=
 and preserved.  The Policy focuses on four major types of risk: (a) market=
 risk; (b) credit risk; (c) operational risk and (d) liquidity/funding risk=
.  These risks shall be managed on a portfolio basis for standard transacti=
ons via various market risk limit structures and credit approval processes,=
 and for non-standard transactions via the Transaction Approval Process and=
 the Guarantee Approval Process.   This Policy provides an overview of vari=
ous risk measurement tools and limits to be applied to these risks, and the=
 roles and responsibilities for the key participants of the risk management=
 framework. =20

Management and employees are responsible for complying with the risk manage=
ment policies and procedures addressed in this Policy, available at http://=
home.enron.com/resources.  Following an initial transiton period, various i=
ndividuals within the key functions participating in the Company's risk man=
agement framework will be required to sign a Compliance Certificate, an exa=
mple of which is attached to the Policy as Appendix H.

If you have any questions, please contact Cassandra Schultz, cassandra.schu=
ltz@enron.com, 713-853-0429 who will put you in touch with the appropriate =
Risk Assessment & Control representative.  Note: this is a confidential pol=
icy, not for distribution to anyone outside of the Company without specific=
 authorization from the Chief Risk Officer.

FYI.  California is playing games with the market again.

Jim

Since Congressman's Ose's been asking FERC alot of questons about what the ISO, DWR, etc. have been up to, perhaps he could write a "Dear FERC" letter saying "here's what I'm hearing, it sounds serious and you need to investigate, pronto, and get back to me ASAP with your conclusions."

Best,
Jeff

Everyone,

This is hot news showing that the CAISO/CDWR relationship is even more cozy than we thought.  I am not sure how to best use this information, but this scam needs to be brought to the public's and FERC's attention.

1.  According to two sources, the CAISO is helping to bail Gov. Davis out of his high-priced CDWR long-term power contracts by purchasing CDWR's excess energy as an "Out Of Market" purchase---instead of purchasing real-time energy from the CAISO's Supplemental Energy auction as required by the CAISO Tariff.  The costs of purchasing this high-cost power is being charged to Scheduling Coordinators who are largely unaware of the CAISO's surreptitious transactions.

2.  This sweetheart deal violates the CAISO Tariff, which requires the CAISO to buy energy from its Supplemental Energy (Real-Time) auction first.  CAISO Tariff, Dispatch Protocol section 8.6.2 (d).  Only after the CAISO has used up the Supplemental Energy  bids, can the CAISO buy Out Of Market ("OOM") energy.  If the CAISO were following the Tariff, CDWR's excess energy would be treated as an uninstructed deviation and CDWR would be paid the clearing price for Supplemental Energy---which is often as low as $0.00.  Therefore, under the Tariff the CAISO could have paid CDWR the same price paid to other SCs, but instead is buying it at a price agreeable to CDWR.  

3.  By ignoring Supplemental Energy bids in favor of CDWR power, the CAISO is able to manipulate the price it pays for energy in the Supplemental Energy market.  Low CAISO demand for Supplemental Energy drives down prices.  The clearing price for Supplemental Energy has often been as low as $0.00.  Therefore, the CAISO gets to keep all excess energy on the grid for free.  If CDWR was not getting preferential treatment, its energy would be treated as excess energy, and it would get little or nothing for it.

4.  While there is no evidence that Gov. Davis has directed the CAISO to buy from CDWR first, this behavior clearly benefits Davis.  Absent the CAISO's purchases of CDWR's excess energy, CDWR would be forced to sell its energy at a huge loss in the open market (just like many other suppliers).  The media has been been making hay out of Davis's strategy of buying high and selling low.  Therefore, Davis and CDWR benefit by being able to offset some of their losses under the long-term contracts.  Of course, they are only able to offset their losses through a back-door deal with the CAISO.

5.  The costs of this expensive CDWR power are being passed through to unwitting Scheduling Coordinators who, frequently seeing 10-minute Ex Post prices of $0.00, expect that the cost of imbalance energy will be close to $0.00.  These SCs are in for a big surprise.  According to one source at Sierra Pacific, the CAISO charged him as much as $400/MWh for imbalance energy.  (Where is the price mitigation here?)

6.  Who benefits under this scam?  Davis and CDWR.  Who loses under this scam?  In-state generators who are currently obligated to sell to the CAISO; Scheduling Coordinators who overgenerate or that have negative imbalances; consumers who end up paying higher prices for energy.

7.  Sources:  Our client representative from the CAISO has confirmed this practice and "the Friday Burrito," an industry insider publication mentioned it also.

8.  Here is the quote from the Friday Burrito:

"There is another problem that is being introduced by the long-term contracts. The ISO is utilizing the DWR contracts as Out of Market (OOM) calls, thereby forcing the contract energy into the grid ahead of the supplemental energy bids in the balancing energy ex post (BEEP) market. As one of our faithful observers told me, "The ISO will be billing some DRW/CERS long-term contracts to SCs as OOM energy. This has been confirmed by the ISO. This means there is no real-time price transparency. We may see an hourly ex-post price of, say, $15, but this will bear no resemblance to the eventual Real-Time settlement price. There is no way to estimate what the OOM charge was as the ISO doesn't post that information. The implication is that parties buying real-time energy will wait 90 days before theyhave any idea of the price. This sort of price uncertainty is completely contrary to the FERC's goals of creating open, transparent markets." 
9.  Here is the e-mail from our CAISO representative:

Issue highlighted in blue lettering. This is being researched internally and
an ISO response on how these transactions are being handled should be
forthcoming, I would think. 

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Can you send me a copy of the 'Burrito' that we were discussing, or at
least outline in an e-mail the name of the person who has written about
CERS and what was published?   What is the official name of this
newsletter?  I have seen them in the past (Harvey Hall used to get it
and sent a couple to me), but I haven't seen it for a long time.

Also, to recap our telephone discussion:  the charges assessed to the
Market in Charge Type 487 are determined by CERS, and are being
collected by the ISO on behalf of CERS, to cover the cost of contracts
that CERS has signed for energy purchases? and 487 pricing/charges have
do direct relationship to the Inc and Dec prices charged or paid to
those who inadvertently over- or under-schedule?  Please clarify that I
have understood this correctly.

Thanks a lot for your assistance.

Caroline

10.  Here is an e-mail from the intrepid and vigilant Kit Blair, in Volume Management, who first brought this scam to my attention.
Steve,
	Here is a summary of what we have learned regarding how the CAISO is handling 487.  Kent at Sierra Power inquired to me why he was being charged 487, (487 is the charge code the CAISO uses when it has to go out of market, and purchase power that exceeds $150.00/mwh, 481 is the charge code they use to credit it back), for the same hours and intervals that both the INC and DEC prices were zero.  This was obviously very peculiar and nobody in VM knew the answer. So Caroline posed the question to Keoni at the CAISO.  His response was this:  that the CAISO is charging 487 regardless of the INC and DEC prices, to cover the forward market contracts signed by CDWR and CERS.  In effect, they are ignoring their tariff that states they are supposed to purchase power at the lowest price, and are in effect trying to recover costs for CDWR and CERS.   

-Kit

Sweetie --

Here is the address.

Scott Karro
200 West 26th Street
Apt. PHJ
New York, NY  10001

I love you.

Jim

Info on the SCE response.

Jim

fyi -- this just came across my screen.
 
Janet.Covington@sce.com on 08/24/2001 11:44:53 AM
Diann,

Your billing dispute has been reviewed and SCE has determined that all
charges were correctly calculated. New accounts were established as a
result of the change in direct access status and financial relationship and
all amounts are properly due and owing.

Please feel free to contact your Account Manager Matt Pagano should you
require assistance with regard to payment.  These bills are due and payable
and subject to further collection activity which may include Late Payment
Charges and/or reversion to dual billing if they remain unpaid.

Please feel free to call me if you have any questions regarding this
matter.

Janet L. Covington
Account Manager
ESP/AMS Services Division
SSID Administration Bldg., First Floor
7300 Fenwick Lane
Westminster, CA  92683
Phone: 714-895-0198 (54198)
Fax: 714-895-0347 (54347)
janet.covington@sce.com

                    "Diann
Janet, I think I've cleaned this thoroughly.  Let me know if you find
discrepancies.  Thanks.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

Janet,

With reference to the bills listed on the attached, pursuant to Rule 22 and
Rule
10A we are disputing that any charges are properly due and owing on these
accounts.  Each of these accounts has a credit balance.  We are therefore
withholding payment.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls 
 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

I wanted to make sure that you had seen the language Jeff references that 1) explicitly recognize the PX Credit as part of Edison's undercollection, and 2) permit Edison to pay debts associated with the negative PX credit  in the earlier e-mail.  Call me with any questions.

Jim  

Received the following additional information late yesterday from Speaker Hertzberg's chief of staff regarding Direct Access in the legislation working its way through the Assembly.  He relayed the information during an informational hearing that an Assembly committee had on the bill yesterday in Sacramento.  See previous note attached below for more a detailed description of DA provisions in the bill:

A new print of the bill is likely to be issued today.
With respect to DA, the Governor is apparently responsible for the temporary suspension of DA in the bill.
Assembly Ds and other market participants lobbied him hard, explaining that, since the bill covers all costs of bonds and DWR contracts through "exit fees," there is no reason to suspend DA. 
The Governor is resisting hard, stating that "he wants time for the market to stabilize."
So it looks like the Governor's plan is to 1) have a bill that provides for Direct Access as of 1.1.03 and 2) have the PUC "temporarily suspend" DA from September 1 to 1.1.03.
We're continuing to work with with business customers to eliminate, or significantly shorten, the suspension.
The bill apparently will also have amendments stating that any customer who has switched by August 23, 2001 (yesterday) will not be responsible for any DWR going forward contracts.  The customer will have to pay for any power consumed that DWR purchased on the IOUs' behalf between Jan 17 and the date of the switch.
The bill apparently will require that any customer switching between yesterday and Sept 1 be responsible for DWR going forward contracts (though details of how that would work were not clear).
The stated reason for wanting to insert an amendment on the August 23rd date is to prevent a "rush" to Direct Access between now and Sept 1.
There are currently NO efforts to break or othewise dissallow any contracts signed prior to Sept 1.
Finally, the bill apparently will also give self-generation priority over Direct Access in each "open season." The bill would set aside 250 MW of the short position each year for customers to do self gen.  If the self gen is not subscribed, the MWs would go to DA.
The bill, including these amendments and other amendments related to other issues, is supposed to be released today.
The bill will be heard in the Assembly committee on Monday afternoon.
We continue to work with the business customers to improve the DA and self gen provisions.
It remains unclear whether there is sufficient support for the bill to pass the Assembly.  
The politicians are very reluctant to pass any "Edison bail out bill" and the political pressure not to vote on any "bailout" is significant and growing.  But the Governor is working the bill very hard.
Mirant is actively working against the bill.  
Mirant is passing around a poll allegedly showing that any member that votes for a "bailout" could lose re-election.  Mirant is also distributing a letter implicitly threatening to take Edison into involuntary bankruptcy if the bill passes.
The bill also has to make it through the Senate.  Our lobbyist had a conversation yesterday with the Senate President, John Burton, who said flatly that "he's not doing anything."  But there is much to trade in the final weeks of the session, and the possibility of Burton doing a deal is 50-50.
With respect to the bill's provisions preventing Edison from paying wholesale providers with the "dedicated rate component" included,  Edison representatives at the hearing yesterday announced that Edison intends to issue first mortgage bonds to pay the suppliers.  Edison also said that, under the Assembly version of the bill, Edison believes that it would have the borrowing capacity to issue the first mortgage bonds.

More info to follow as it becomes available.  If anyone has any questions, don't hesitate to contact me.

Best,
Jeff

The following is a summary of the Direct Access provisions in the bill language released this afternoon reflecting the deal that Davis cut with Assembly.  Things are very fluid and these provisions could change significantly. 

I was just informed by the large business customers that they just met with the Davis' and Hertzberg's staff and the staff have agreed to amend the DA provisions to make them considerably more favorable for customers and suppliers.  They also said that favorable provisions with respect to self-gen would also be added to the bill. They said that these new amendments could come out as early as tonite or tomorrow morning and that the bill may be heard tomorrow.

Note:  In addition to the DA provisions, the bill also includes provisions that 1) explicitly recognize the PX Credit as part of Edison's undercollection, and 2) permit Edison to pay debts associated with the negative PX credit. (The bill does not authorize Edison to pay power suppliers, however, and leaves that portion of Edison's debt for Edison's management and shareholders to address.)

Summary of Direct Access provisions:

The program would begin January 1, 2003.
It's unclear what would happen to DA between now and January 1, 2003.  Presumably, the decision to suspend, or not, between now and then would stay with the California PUC.
90 days after the effective date of the bill, and every 6 months thereafter, DWR would provide information to the PUC showing the net short position.
Every 6 months, the PUC would hold an open season permitting customers to switch to DA.
20 KW-and-above customers would have 60 days to decide to switch once the PUC has announced the open season; under 20kw customers would have 180 days.
Customers who switch to DA would be responsible for paying 1) the customer's proportionate share of the utility's undercollection and 2) the customer's proportionate share of DWR's receivables (if any) for power previously delivered by DWR (but not yet fully paid for by customers).
In addition, if the number of customers who elect to choose to go DA in the open season exceeds the net short, then DA customers will have to pay their proportionate share of any DWR stranded contract costs.
If the number of DA customers does not exceed the net short position, then no stranded contract cost fees would be assessed.

Best,
Jeff

Jim --

I was wondering if you would like to meet with Alan Comnes and me to discuss your thoughts on market power mitigation on Thursday, Sept 13 at 7:30am in DC?

Let me know.  Alan and I are in DC for some other discussions.

Jim

Eric --

Please give me a call.  I would probably recommend that you sign a new contract with Dick given that we did not intend to renew his option year.

Jim

Jim,

I'm responsible for Asset Development in Enron Transportation Services.  Joe Hartsoe advises that Gov't Affairs has a consulting agreement with Dick Ingersoll for certain regulatory support activities.  I'd like to retain Dick to support commercial activities currently underway and, with your consent, have him bill against the existing agreement with Gov't Affairs.  I would outline the tasks + deliverables for him to complete in call-off letters.  Dick would continue his practice of submitting monthly invoices to Bernadette Hawkins, who could liase with Susan Wadle, my assistant, to validate charges and cost centers.

I understand that Dick's consulting agreement expires in October.  I plan to renew with him going forward.  

Please advise how you wish to proceed.

Regards,

Eric Gadd

FYI

The below presentation has good data on TX transmission - planned transmiss=
ion lines etc.

Stacey Bolton
Environmental Strategies
Enron Corp
713-853-9916 direct=20
713-303-2632 cell=20
sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
=20

Attached is the Power Point preesentation I made to TREIA.  Sorry this took=
 so long getting out.  Busy trying to support transmission construction.  T=
hanks Ken D.
 =20
 - ERCOT Transmission Treia.ppt

I agree with Bob that the reporting issues are important.  I also think that focusing on the "lessons learned" from the NE RTO and SE RTO mediation would be interesting.  Have people from different industry groups discussing their views of where the mediations concluded (assuming we are finished by October).  Any outstanding issues between EPSA members and between EPSA and other parts of the industry could be discussed.

Thanks,

Jim

I'll certainly give it more thought, but I think that a discussion of
reporting requirements would be timely.  The NOPR on power transaction and
contracts is out there, but has not got much attention yet due to the press
of California issues and the RTO negotiations.  Also, on October 1, entities
selling gas in California have to make their first monthly report to FERC on
purchases, sales, and transportation contracts.  Additionally, the DOE has
changed some of its annual reporting requirements.  In all cases,
confidentiality is an issue, and I believe that it is handled differently
for each of these reports.  A discussion of all these requirements from a
practical "how to" or "do's and don'ts" perspective might not be sexy, but
it would be useful to us preoccupied regulatory slugs...

Do either of you have any suggestions for topics to focus on at the
Regulatory Affairs Committee Meeting in October?  At the last meeting we
talked about market-based rate issues; the one before that, gas issues.  We
had thought of a "dialogue" with some senior FERC staff and a few of our
members about big picture issues, but haven't been able to organize it.  We
could try that again.  Or, what about interconnection issues or information
collection/disclosure, since those seem to be rocketing up FERC's priority
list.  Any suggestions?

No truth from what I know.

What about this rumor about a worldwide merge between Enron and El Paso?

LM
 
Gisela Schwalm
08/23/2001 08:43 AM
http://ei-sp-data01/biblioteca/relatorio/edicoes_2001/rr1710.pdf

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

A couple of points --

1.	The language in the relief indicates that we are trying to "determine the validity and amount of PX Credits owed to EES and EEMC".  Is this correct?  Isn't our primary goal in this complaint to (a) have the Utility return the net credit to our bills and (b) to allow for recoupment againts all non-generation related charges?

2.	Throughout the document the idea of "T&D charges" is used.  I assume that this is shorthand for all non-generation related charges?  We pay CTC and public purpose costs as well as T&D.

3.	Not sure if CPUC regulates the ESPs.  The filing makes this case in the first paragraph.

Thanks,

Jim

 Attached is a preliminary draft of a motion to the Bankruptcy Court for relief from stay in connection with the commencement of proceedings at the PUC.  Please favor us with your comments at your earliest convenience.

Also, when convenient, Carl would like to schedule a conference call to further define this motion and the next steps.

Sanford Kingsley
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1119
skingsle@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - EnronNot.DOC << File: EnronNot.DOC >> 

Fine.  

Dick and I have worked out exactly the hours for my group that he will work through mid-Oct.  Why not have Dick submit his charges for your group directly to your assistant?  Bernadette is in DC and having these charges running around the country may cause great confusion.  Finally, since I have not looked at his contract lately, I assume that in using this contract to move forward immediately we are not creating any other obligations with Dick?

Thanks,

Jim

Jim,

I intend to sign a new contract and become the primary point of contact.  This will probably take several weeks to complete.  I want to use the existing agreement to mobilise services immediately.

Eric --

Please give me a call.  I would probably recommend that you sign a new contract with Dick given that we did not intend to renew his option year.

Jim

Jim,

I'm responsible for Asset Development in Enron Transportation Services.  Joe Hartsoe advises that Gov't Affairs has a consulting agreement with Dick Ingersoll for certain regulatory support activities.  I'd like to retain Dick to support commercial activities currently underway and, with your consent, have him bill against the existing agreement with Gov't Affairs.  I would outline the tasks + deliverables for him to complete in call-off letters.  Dick would continue his practice of submitting monthly invoices to Bernadette Hawkins, who could liase with Susan Wadle, my assistant, to validate charges and cost centers.

I understand that Dick's consulting agreement expires in October.  I plan to renew with him going forward.  

Please advise how you wish to proceed.

Regards,

Eric Gadd

Way to go!!!  

Jim

I have heard through EPSA the following "confirmations" to the NERC Stakeholder Committee.   These are the "customer" segments, of course, there are Utility, Muni, Coops, Canada, etc. members as well.  These names are uniffocial in that I have not seen an official notice/roster from the NERC office, but should be noticed shortly:

Marketer - Jose Bestard, Vice President, Government Affairs - Enron

Marketer - Craig Lsser, Senior Vice President, External and Regulatory Affairs - Mirant
		(an unknown in the NERC arena, Mirant of course is the former SoCo unaffiliated marketer, I have seen Miranat 			members participate in EPSA working groups)

Generator - Steve Gililland, Senior Vice President of Asset Management - Duke-Energy NA
		(a former NERC BOT member, Mike Gildea of Duke works closely with other EPSA members)

Generator - David McMillan, Director, System Optimization - Calpine

		(a former NERC CPWG(pre-MIC) member, former MidWest ISO staffer, former HL&P employee)

As you know, the Stakeholder Committee is an advisory body to the Independent Board of Trusteess.  The scope of its activites include but is not limited to NERC Budget approval - which is growing from a 2001 amount of $12.3 million to a proposed 2002 $13 million.  These seats are for 2 year terms.  

I was wondering if someone from our trading desk would take the lead?  Not necessarily someone from Govt Affairs.

Jim

This is a "kick-off" for more NERC work.  It is by no means the end - of course.
Although what somea out of it may not get stakeholder approval, it will at least have to stand the rigors of busget approval by the stakeholders. 

Are we sending anyone?

Jim
You are invited to participate in one of three workshops designed to
solicit input into training issues which will help NERC understand what
operating and marketing personnel feel they need in the way of training
programs and study materials.

Attached is the announcement and registration form. The announcement is
also posted at the following NERC web site:
http://www.nerc.com/~filez/workshops.html

Let me know if you have any questions.

Sincerely,

Glenda Rodriguez

Please note there is still room available for all three workshops.
 - Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.doc << File: Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.doc >> 
 - Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.pdf << File: Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.pdf >> 

Are we ready?  I thought that we were still moving through the process.

Jim

TODAY!!!!!!

 Bob --

When should we file our complaint at the CPUC?

Jim

fyi -- this just came across my screen.
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Janet.Covington@sce.com on 08/24/2001 11:44:53 AM
Diann,

Your billing dispute has been reviewed and SCE has determined that all
charges were correctly calculated. New accounts were established as a
result of the change in direct access status and financial relationship and
all amounts are properly due and owing.

Please feel free to contact your Account Manager Matt Pagano should you
require assistance with regard to payment.  These bills are due and payable
and subject to further collection activity which may include Late Payment
Charges and/or reversion to dual billing if they remain unpaid.

Please feel free to call me if you have any questions regarding this
matter.

Janet L. Covington
Account Manager
ESP/AMS Services Division
SSID Administration Bldg., First Floor
7300 Fenwick Lane
Westminster, CA  92683
Phone: 714-895-0198 (54198)
Fax: 714-895-0347 (54347)
janet.covington@sce.com

                    "Diann
Janet, I think I've cleaned this thoroughly.  Let me know if you find
discrepancies.  Thanks.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

Janet,

With reference to the bills listed on the attached, pursuant to Rule 22 and
Rule
10A we are disputing that any charges are properly due and owing on these
accounts.  Each of these accounts has a credit balance.  We are therefore
withholding payment.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls << File: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls >> 
 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls << File: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls >> 

Lisa -

I would recommend that you send Mike Day the language to clarify #3.

Jim

they are changing 1.
yes to 2.
3 i need help with.

A couple of points --

1.	The language in the relief indicates that we are trying to "determine the validity and amount of PX Credits owed to EES and EEMC".  Is this correct?  Isn't our primary goal in this complaint to (a) have the Utility return the net credit to our bills and (b) to allow for recoupment againts all non-generation related charges?

2.	Throughout the document the idea of "T&D charges" is used.  I assume that this is shorthand for all non-generation related charges?  We pay CTC and public purpose costs as well as T&D.

3.	Not sure if CPUC regulates the ESPs.  The filing makes this case in the first paragraph.

Thanks,

Jim

 Attached is a preliminary draft of a motion to the Bankruptcy Court for relief from stay in connection with the commencement of proceedings at the PUC.  Please favor us with your comments at your earliest convenience.

Also, when convenient, Carl would like to schedule a conference call to further define this motion and the next steps.

Sanford Kingsley
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1119
skingsle@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - EnronNot.DOC << File: EnronNot.DOC >> 

Alan --

Here is the original note for your update.

Jim

Please see the attached preliminary outline that contains milestones achieved so far and future activities in the California Refund proceeding.  With more time, we will flesh this out to provide additional detail.  Thanks,  Ray

 

 

Bob & Ray --

Can each of you please put together a short outline of the (a) timeline, (b) key decision points, and (c) potential outcomes of the decision points for the different refund cases?

If possible, having this before today's call would be helpful (but I realize that this may be difficult).

Jim

Lynne --

This appears fine.  Thanks.

Jim

I am projecting a total budget of about $5.4 million,  a $1 million increase over 2001.  The major increases are for salaries, consultants in the regulatory, public affairs and environmental areas, legislative advertising and a senior executive meeting in the Spring.  Assuming the budget is approved, I am planning to recommend raising the current cap on Board member dues of $150,000 to $175,00, a 17% increase.  Is that something you can live with?  Please let me know.

I also sent the same message to Rick, but I had your wrong address the first time.

Pat --

Please keep Jean Ryall and Thane Twiggs in the loop on these activities.  Specifically, they need to let the desk know before we take any formal actions.  

Thanks,

Jim
fyi
fyi

I will get with Hamb and Patrick to strategize before we take any definitive action.  This may be an opportunity to negotiate access to systems that have been previously blocked.
We believe the interface between the AREP (Reliant and TXU Energy Services) and the utility may constitute a violation of the respective utility Code of Conduct.  However, my initial thought is to insist that we have the same access to the data that TXU and Reliant use for their statistics and product offerings.  I have contacted both the utility and the energy services company (only Reliant so far) to find out how our IT folks can obtain the same data.  As expected, Reliant has been less than willing to answer the question directly.  I have left voice mail with the Regulatory VP twice.  He gets one more chance.

Here are the sites.

  https://www.reliant.com/SolutionsPortal/MainPage/1,1964,,00.html

https://www.txuesgateway.com/portal/

Janet,

I placed a called into Pat in Reg. Affairs and he  is currently investigating this issue and the possible infractions to the Code of Conduct.  My experience in govt. affairs warrants full investigation..

Will keep you posted
Ed

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Janet R Dietrich
08/24/2001 11:46 AM
I pulled up TXU Energy Services' website and did a little browsing. Do you think the retail energy services group is utilizing information re: customer accounts that the regulated utility has? i.e. consumption data, current pricing, etc? If so, isn't this illegal under the electricity Code of Conduct rules in Texas? If any end user in TU's territory could access that type of information through the retail website, I would think it would be a problem.

Any thoughts?

Harry -- Can you please review and provide input on comments?  Especially a=
s it relates to keeping open the San Diego market.
=20
Jim

FYI.  We should discuss.
=20
Best,
Jeff

Yesterday, SDG&E filed a motion for adoption of an electric procurement cos=
t recovery mechanism and for an order shortening time for parties to file c=
omments on the mechanism.  The attached email from SDG&E contains the motio=
n, an executive summary, and a detailed summary of  their proposals and rec=
ommendations governing procurement of the net short energy requirements for=
 SDG&E's customers.  The utility requests a 15-day comment period, which me=
ans comments would have to be filed by September 10 (September 8 is a Satur=
day).  Reply comments would be filed 10 days later.

The filing provides the following discussion of direct access:

  _____ =20

"Developing the net short requirements of consumers depends on the extent t=
o which they might be served instead by third party providers. The level of=
 direct access will affect these net short requirements. At present, there =
is substantial uncertainty concerning the future disposition of direct acce=
ss and third party supply of retail customers that jeopardizes creation of =
an optimal plan. This uncertainty has the potential for increasing costs to=
 San Diego retail customers as a result of unnecessary over- or under commi=
tments. To resolve this uncertainty, the Commission needs to coordinate dir=
ect access with resource planning, at least on an interim basis. SDG&E disc=
usses below how to provide for this coordination.=20

As the retail market matures, SDG&E expects that direct access elections wi=
ll gain stability and will not be characterized by severe volatility. That =
stability will allow planners to make reasoned assumptions on direct access=
 and rely on them in developing a procurement plan. However, today, direct =
access is subject to substantial uncertainty. Before the high prices of the=
 summer of 2000, approximately 20% of SDG&E's retail load had elected direc=
t access. By the beginning of 2001, direct access had reduced by nearly hal=
f. More recently, SDG&E has seen an increase in direct access, perhaps as a=
 result of two factors: first, would direct access customers be able to avo=
id paying a share of CDWR contract costs, and second, would the state suspe=
nd direct access, as appears to be permitted under ABx-1 1. Furthermore, th=
e legislature is considering legislation that would permit direct access, a=
nd other bills that would encourage municipal aggregation of load. The effe=
ct of this latter bill is similar to direct access, but it could cause larg=
e quantities of load to leave or return to the system quite abruptly.=20

These events illustrate the need for added coordination between direct acce=
ss and resource planning. The necessary coordination could come by using an=
 open enrollment period each planning cycle under which direct access elect=
ions take place. During that enrollment period, the utility is provided inf=
ormation on the amount of load electing direct access (or municipal aggrega=
tion) and the length of the direct access commitment. This open enrollment =
period would last for 90 days and commence 180 days before SDG&E is schedul=
ed to submit its procurement plan. Customers over 20kW would make commitmen=
ts to service by suppliers other than SDG&E of at least 5 years. Smaller cu=
stomers would make minimum one year commitments. These commitments and the =
use of a specific enrollment period would provide SDG&E with the informatio=
n it needs to plan to meet net short requirements and minimize the risk of =
over- or under-commitment.=20

In order to ensure an orderly process that protects consumers, change of se=
rvice would not occur until the commission ruled on the procurement plan, a=
nd, to the extent that the commission determined that excessive direct acce=
ss placed an unreasonable burden on utility customers, it could choose to l=
imit direct access. Those electing to leave utility procurement would pay a=
n exit fee to cover the costs of commitments made by CDWR and utility retai=
ned generation committed to those customers in order to protect remaining c=
ustomers. As a result of this change, SDG&E would not plan to provide commo=
dity service to departing customers. Customers returning from direct access=
 prematurely would be subject to a re-entry fee and to spot energy pricing,=
 again to protect those customers who did not elect to switch.
=20
Coordinating direct access with the planning process, at least for a near-t=
erm period, is important to ensuring a reasonable procurement plan."

  _____ =20

The filing also briefly discusses competitive default supplier role:

  _____ =20

"When the State embarked on industry restructuring, one purpose was to take=
 advantage of the benefits that competitive markets can provide. Although C=
alifornia's experience with markets has not been as anticipated, it is stil=
l possible that a disciplined application of the market with adequate regul=
atory oversight can offer advantages to consumers. In fact, some states hav=
e undertaken to use the competitive market to meet customers' net short req=
uirements. For example, in parts of Pennsylvania, the State decided to auct=
ion off a piece of the procurement obligation to the competitive market. Ca=
lifornia may decide that it wants to do the same type of thing. If a portio=
n of the net short is auctioned off in this manner, from a planning standpo=
int, it should be treated the same as direct access: SDG&E will need adequa=
te notice and information to facilitate its planning for any net short posi=
tion remaining to be served, and the same use of exit fees and re-entry fee=
s should also apply."

  _____ =20

There are a number of issues here which I think WPTF may want to comment up=
on, as we have dealt with many of these issues in previous filings.  Please=
 let me (and others) know if you agree.
=20
Dan

Law Offices of Daniel W. Douglass
5959 Topanga Canyon Blvd.  Suite 244
Woodland Hills, CA 91367
Tel:   (818) 596-2201
Fax:  (818) 346-6502
douglass@energyattorney.com

<<A.01-01-044 Procurement Plan(v1).DOC>> <<A.01-01-044 Exc. Summary(v1).DOC=
>> <<A.01-01-044 Motion(v1).DOC>>=20

_________________________________

Darleen Evans

Sempra Energy - Law Department

619-699-5056

devans@sempra.com <mailto:devans@sempra.com>

See last bill.

Jim
The following energy bills will be heard today.

SBX2 78 (Polanco/Sher), SCE MOU, will be heard by the Assembly Energy, Costs
and Availability Committee upon adjournment of the Assembly Transportation
Committee (approximately 2:30 p.m.) in room 437.  Late Friday, Assemblyman
Hertzberg informed his caucus that the Assembly may take this measure up on
the floor as early as today.  Because floor session is currently scheduled
for 11:00 a.m. this would require the Assembly to reconvene late this
afternoon, however, this has not been scheduled and such an action would
likely interfere with several Assembly fundraising events this evening.

SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott), windfall profits tax, will be heard by the Assembly
Revenue and Taxation Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 126.

SB 532 (Sher), renewable portfolio standard, will be heard by the Assembly
Natural Resources Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 447.  This measure would
require DWR and/or the IOUs to purchase specified amounts of renewable
energy.

Jennifer --

Can you get a copy of the SBX2 1 and provide short synopsis?

Thanks,

Jim

The following energy bills will be heard today.

SBX2 78 (Polanco/Sher), SCE MOU, will be heard by the Assembly Energy, Costs
and Availability Committee upon adjournment of the Assembly Transportation
Committee (approximately 2:30 p.m.) in room 437.  Late Friday, Assemblyman
Hertzberg informed his caucus that the Assembly may take this measure up on
the floor as early as today.  Because floor session is currently scheduled
for 11:00 a.m. this would require the Assembly to reconvene late this
afternoon, however, this has not been scheduled and such an action would
likely interfere with several Assembly fundraising events this evening.

SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott), windfall profits tax, will be heard by the Assembly
Revenue and Taxation Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 126.

SB 532 (Sher), renewable portfolio standard, will be heard by the Assembly
Natural Resources Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 447.  This measure would
require DWR and/or the IOUs to purchase specified amounts of renewable
energy.

Janel got something on this from PRI.  Not sure about how much media it got.

Jim

I pushed for this to come out by Monday or Tuesday last week.  Looks like theydid it. Did it get any play?  Karen, should I be pushing for more media attention by PRI?

To Funders of the PRI Study;

The following press release was sent out today at the request of Enron.
FYI

gba

A short analysis that indicates who would face the brunt of this bill (Enron?) and the mechanism ($/mwh or % of income)?

Jim

The most recent bill is at:  http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx2_1_bill_20010820_amended_asm.pdf 

An Assembly Ctte. summary can be found at: http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx2_1_cfa_20010820_113804_asm_comm.html

Let me know if you would like hard copies, or if you want my own analysis.

Jennifer

Jennifer --

Can you get a copy of the SBX2 1 and provide short synopsis?

Thanks,

Jim

The following energy bills will be heard today.

SBX2 78 (Polanco/Sher), SCE MOU, will be heard by the Assembly Energy, Costs
and Availability Committee upon adjournment of the Assembly Transportation
Committee (approximately 2:30 p.m.) in room 437.  Late Friday, Assemblyman
Hertzberg informed his caucus that the Assembly may take this measure up on
the floor as early as today.  Because floor session is currently scheduled
for 11:00 a.m. this would require the Assembly to reconvene late this
afternoon, however, this has not been scheduled and such an action would
likely interfere with several Assembly fundraising events this evening.

SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott), windfall profits tax, will be heard by the Assembly
Revenue and Taxation Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 126.

SB 532 (Sher), renewable portfolio standard, will be heard by the Assembly
Natural Resources Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 447.  This measure would
require DWR and/or the IOUs to purchase specified amounts of renewable
energy.

Donna & Becky --

Do you have any good points of reference on the history of natural gas restructuring?

Jim

Hi Jim- 

A lot of visitors that Jennifer and I tour are not familiar with Enron and even less familiar with our history and what started the gas commodity industry.  Given your expertise 
and knowledge of natural gas, I was hoping you would be able to recommend article(s)/book(s) and/or spend about 20 minutes with Jennifer and I to help us better understand the history of the natural gas industry, what problems and inefficiencies exited to bring on deregulating the industry and how gas became a commodity.  

Your help would be greatly appreciated.

Thank you.
Carrie Rob?rt
Manager, Enron Corporate Marketing
713-853-3522
carrie.a.robert@enron.com

I've sent out some feelers on a good book.  I'll look around my desk etc.

Jim

Hi Jim- 

A lot of visitors that Jennifer and I tour are not familiar with Enron and even less familiar with our history and what started the gas commodity industry.  Given your expertise 
and knowledge of natural gas, I was hoping you would be able to recommend article(s)/book(s) and/or spend about 20 minutes with Jennifer and I to help us better understand the history of the natural gas industry, what problems and inefficiencies exited to bring on deregulating the industry and how gas became a commodity.  

Your help would be greatly appreciated.

Thank you.
Carrie Rob?rt
Manager, Enron Corporate Marketing
713-853-3522
carrie.a.robert@enron.com

I didn't calendar (or at least I don't remeber).  When will this happen?

Jim

I see you have already calendared, so I have RSVP's for you to Loreyna Garcia this a.m.

Please arrange on my schedule.

Jim

Dear James:
 
Wattage Monitor has partnered with the  Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets to provide the DISCO of the Future  Executive Survey. We'd like your opinion! 
 
As part of the survey launch, we're asking  energy executives like you to complete the survey with us over the phone.  Not only do we want your responses to the questions but we're hoping to have  your feedback on the survey itself, too. You'll be assisting in the development  of policy recommendations for the DISCO of the Future.
 
Please email (jgotch@wmonitor.com << File: mailto:jgotch@wmonitor.com >> ) or call  (415-387-8841) me to schedule a time to participate in the survey. The  following appointments are available:
 
Tuesday, August  28th (Pacific Standard Time): 
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Wednesday,  August 29th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Thursday, August  30th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Tuesday,  September 4th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
The survey is approximately 20 questions and  is scheduled in 45 minute intervals to ensure we have time to review the  questions with you and allow for any discussion that might arise. We will cover  general topics like your existing business policies, activity and opinions  of the DISCO of the Future. 
 
If there is a time that fits your schedule  better, please contact me and I'd be happy to make additional appointments.  Please feel free to forward this email to  any additional people you believe would be interested in participating as  well.
 
Thank you for your help.
 
Regards,
 
Jamey  Gotch
 
Jamey M. Gotch
Marketing  Manager

 - Blank Bkgrd.gif << File: Blank Bkgrd.gif >> 

Call Ozzie Pagan.

Jim

Hi Jim - 

The Mayor's office wants someone from Enron to speak at the Rebuild America kick-off for approx. 10 to 15 min. on Enron's energy conservation efforts.  Can you recommend someone in Enron that works in this area, like fuel cell development.  The event is Oct 4th and the Assistant Secretary of Energy Efficiency and Renewable Energy and Dept of Energy, David Garman will be attending.  

Thank you for help.
Carrie Rob?rt
Manager, Enron Corporate Marketing
713-853-3522
carrie.a.robert@enron.com

Lamar --

I have received the list of the clients from John McMullen.  The key push is Legislative and AReM PR is not involved.  We need the customers to call the Gov and key Legislators.

Jim

Jim,

My apologies for the delayed response, however, I was on vacation when you sent the original note.  I spoke to Sue Tuesday or Wednesday of last week and she was going to send me the contacts info at AReM's  PR office so that we could put the customer's in direct contact with that individual.  As you have seen I have requested contact information from Origination and Service Management, however, I would still like to have the PR contact's info in case we have a customer only willing to speak directly to AReM's PR.  

Let me know if that is something you can provide.  

Regards

Lamar --

It is critical that every customer in California that switched (signed new or renewal customer) during this year.  We need a contact person for each account.  The key to securing a better date is to have the customers push the Governor and the Legislature and the CPUC.

We are able to provide phone numbers and contacts through our trade groups.

Jim

Dave --

With EES' push into serving smaller customers, the issues in this situation -- potential affiliate abuse and unfair sharing of information -- will become more important.  When EES focused on national outsourcing, this was less an issue because our products crossed many jurisdictions.  

This issue, of course, is especially important in recently opened or opening markets as the affiliates try and secure large market share.  We are also watching for these activities in places like MI, VA, and OH.  

Jim

 
Janet R Dietrich
08/27/2001 02:15 PM
Just fyi...
 
Eric Letke
08/26/2001 07:35 PM
Sent by:	Eric Letke
I will get with Hamb and Patrick to strategize before we take any definitive action.  This may be an opportunity to negotiate access to systems that have been previously blocked.
We believe the interface between the AREP (Reliant and TXU Energy Services) and the utility may constitute a violation of the respective utility Code of Conduct.  However, my initial thought is to insist that we have the same access to the data that TXU and Reliant use for their statistics and product offerings.  I have contacted both the utility and the energy services company (only Reliant so far) to find out how our IT folks can obtain the same data.  As expected, Reliant has been less than willing to answer the question directly.  I have left voice mail with the Regulatory VP twice.  He gets one more chance.

Here are the sites.

  https://www.reliant.com/SolutionsPortal/MainPage/1,1964,,00.html

https://www.txuesgateway.com/portal/

Janet,

I placed a called into Pat in Reg. Affairs and he  is currently investigating this issue and the possible infractions to the Code of Conduct.  My experience in govt. affairs warrants full investigation..

Will keep you posted
Ed

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Janet R Dietrich
08/24/2001 11:46 AM
I pulled up TXU Energy Services' website and did a little browsing. Do you think the retail energy services group is utilizing information re: customer accounts that the regulated utility has? i.e. consumption data, current pricing, etc? If so, isn't this illegal under the electricity Code of Conduct rules in Texas? If any end user in TU's territory could access that type of information through the retail website, I would think it would be a problem.

Any thoughts?

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

We need to let Jeff Richter and Tim Belden understand the implications of this for current book of business.

Jim

Jim:

I've taken a look at both the Sher bill (SB 532) and the 2nd version of SB 78.  The Sher bill has substitute language that is identical to SB 73 -- establishing an RPS for both new and existing sources.  I have several concerns (large percentage of new...1/2 of TX requirement in first year.... unclear REC program.....mandatory bilateral purchase of renewable power output scheduled into CA ISO or LADWP)  and am crunching numbers with Jenn to get an idea the likely impact ($s and mWh).  Will get the numbers and analysis by late morning.

Stacey

Stacey Bolton
Environmental Strategies
Enron Corp
713-853-9916 direct 
713-303-2632 cell 
sbolton@enron.com <mailto:sbolton@enron.com>
 

See last bill.

Jim
The following energy bills will be heard today.

SBX2 78 (Polanco/Sher), SCE MOU, will be heard by the Assembly Energy, Costs
and Availability Committee upon adjournment of the Assembly Transportation
Committee (approximately 2:30 p.m.) in room 437.  Late Friday, Assemblyman
Hertzberg informed his caucus that the Assembly may take this measure up on
the floor as early as today.  Because floor session is currently scheduled
for 11:00 a.m. this would require the Assembly to reconvene late this
afternoon, however, this has not been scheduled and such an action would
likely interfere with several Assembly fundraising events this evening.

SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott), windfall profits tax, will be heard by the Assembly
Revenue and Taxation Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 126.

SB 532 (Sher), renewable portfolio standard, will be heard by the Assembly
Natural Resources Committee at 1:30 p.m. in room 447.  This measure would
require DWR and/or the IOUs to purchase specified amounts of renewable
energy.

Vicki --

Along with everything else, this bill continues to be discussed.  We don't think this is a high probability, but wanted you to be aware (and more importantly, this is California).  I'll keep you up to date.

Jim

SBX2 1 (Soto/Scott) Senator Soto offered extensive amendments to the bill
immediately prior to today's hearing.  Because the staff did not have time
to review the amendments the bill was held over until Thursday.  Some of the
amendments remove municipal utilities, self cogeneration and QFs from the
provisions of the bill.

Jason --

Dinner is at 5pm at the house.  We are catering from Eatzi's.  Casual dress is preferred.

See you then.

Jim

Jim, 
Thanks for the call.  I'll plan on coming by on Sunday, 9-2-01 @ 5pm.  Is it at the house?  BBQ? dinner dress?  I always want to look in top form for my buddy's birthday.....Jason
Jason Riley 
NOVOFORUM
10370 Richmond Ave #200
Houston , Texas  77042
832.201.3120 office 
<mailto:jason.riley@novoforum.com << File: mailto:jason.riley@novoforum.com >> > 
See us at: http://www.novoforum.com << File: http://www.novoforum.com >>  
Novoforum (Latin for "New Markets") provides e-business infrastructure for manufacturing and energy companies.  Novoforum creates competitive advantage for its clients through cost-efficient solutions that enable supply chain integration and collaboration with their key customers, suppliers and service providers. 

Janine --

If we have draft tariff language, I'd push pretty hard.

Jim

On Friday, I participated in ICC Chairman Mathias' Roundtable on the state =
of competition in Illinois.  One of the questions he asked was what the ICC=
 could do to improve competition in Illinois.  I commented that the ICC cou=
ld commence an investigation on the balancing rules of the various utilitie=
s, having pointed out the problem's with ComEd's and the fact that the othe=
r utilities are even worse.  He expressed concern over ICC jurisdiction and=
 opined that to the extent that it impacts retail transactions and adversel=
y affects retail competition, the ICC is within its jurisdiction to order t=
he utilities to file an amended OATT before FERC for FERC's approval.  I pl=
an to follow-up with a letter to him and all the Commissioners and would li=
ke feedback as to how hard I should push on this.  Should the ICC look into=
 balancing (to which I give a less than 50% probability) we would have to b=
e prepared to participate.  I think it would be highly worth the effort, es=
pecially as far as Illinois Power is concerned, however, I would like some =
feedback as to your views in order to guage how hard to push this.

Thanks,
Janine

I will be setting up a conference call for later today to discuss our latest view on developments in the California market.  If anyone has any specific questions before then, please call me at 713-853-7673.

Jim

The California PUC
Loretta Lynch held a press conference in Sacramento today to discuss changes to the Commission's previously released proposal regarding Direct Access and the rate agreement between the PUC and DWR.
In the amended proposal discussed and distributed today, Direct Access would end retroactive to July 1.  Customers with contracts executed as of July 1 would would remain Direct Access customers.

The Legislature
The Assembly version of the Senate MOU (SB 78) has not yet been reviewed and voted on in the Committee.
It is scheduled to be reviewed and voted on at 6:30 PM PDT today.
Amendments on Direct Access were released this afternoon (based on negotiations between Davis' office and business customers):
Customers who have consistently been DA since May 2000, including those "involuntarily" returned to bundled service, would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts, and DWR-related exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have consistently been on DA between May 2000 and Jan 17, 2001 would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts and DWR-realted exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have been on DA between Jan 17, 2001 and August 24, 2001 would be exempt from exit fees related to DWR forward contracts, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customer's leaving after August 24th would not qualify for exemptions.
There is considerable work underway to make the August 24th date the deadline for contract execution, rather than the date by which the customer must be DASR'd, in order to qualify for the exemptions.
Direct Access would not be suspended, however, until 90 days after the bill is signed by Davis (if he signs it), i.e., the "effective date" of the bill.
So anyone going to Direct Access between Aug 24 and the effective date would not qualify for any exemptions.
After the 90-day period, DA would be suspended until 1.1.03.
Self-gen in service consistently from May 200 to August 24 would be exempt from Edison's undercollection and DWR charges.
Self-gen that submitted an application to the Energy Commission by August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line.
Self-gen that comes on line after August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line, but the total number of exempt MWs in this category would be limited to 250 MWs per year, on a first-come-first-serve basis.
At least 30% of any increases in net short due to increases in demand would be reserved for self gen.

We need a model for the entire Midwest independent of the ability to change=
.

Jim

At this point we dont have draft language and we dont have a settlement wit=
h language that allows us to push the way we can in Ohio.  My thought was t=
o push for an investigation and see within that context how far we could go=
.  At a minimum, if a hearing were to be granted, I think we could end up i=
mproving the balancing rules for IP, CILCO, etc.  Com Ed has the most favor=
able provisions and could end up being the model.  In my discussions with J=
eff Merola and Rogers Herndon, they can work with this however it is not op=
timal.  They need to do a transaction in order to figure out where the bugs=
 are.

Janine --

If we have draft tariff language, I'd push pretty hard.

Jim

On Friday, I participated in ICC Chairman Mathias' Roundtable on the state =
of competition in Illinois.  One of the questions he asked was what the ICC=
 could do to improve competition in Illinois.  I commented that the ICC cou=
ld commence an investigation on the balancing rules of the various utilitie=
s, having pointed out the problem's with ComEd's and the fact that the othe=
r utilities are even worse.  He expressed concern over ICC jurisdiction and=
 opined that to the extent that it impacts retail transactions and adversel=
y affects retail competition, the ICC is within its jurisdiction to order t=
he utilities to file an amended OATT before FERC for FERC's approval.  I pl=
an to follow-up with a letter to him and all the Commissioners and would li=
ke feedback as to how hard I should push on this.  Should the ICC look into=
 balancing (to which I give a less than 50% probability) we would have to b=
e prepared to participate.  I think it would be highly worth the effort, es=
pecially as far as Illinois Power is concerned, however, I would like some =
feedback as to your views in order to guage how hard to push this.

Thanks,
Janine

2pm works for me.

Jim

Sorry to keep switching times on you but how does everyone's calendar look tomorrow, wed., 1-4?  (i don't think we will need more than an hour).

FYI.  It would be helpful for you to be on this call.

Jim
Please plan to attend a critical meeting to discuss California Issues today:

	Tuesday, 8/28
	12:00 noon - 1:00 p.m.
	EB 8C1

	Dial-in #:  1-847-413-3181
	Passcode:  7816787

lunch will be provided.  I will followup this email with telephone calls to each Admin.

Thank you,
Sharon

The meeting to discuss California issues today has been set at:
	
	12:00 noon - 1:00 p.m.
	EB 8C1

	Dial-in #:  1-847-413-3181
	Passcode:  7816787

I will be setting up a conference call for later today to discuss our latest view on developments in the California market.  If anyone has any specific questions before then, please call me at 713-853-7673.

Jim

The California PUC
Loretta Lynch held a press conference in Sacramento today to discuss changes to the Commission's previously released proposal regarding Direct Access and the rate agreement between the PUC and DWR.
In the amended proposal discussed and distributed today, Direct Access would end retroactive to July 1.  Customers with contracts executed as of July 1 would would remain Direct Access customers.

The Legislature
The Assembly version of the Senate MOU (SB 78) has not yet been reviewed and voted on in the Committee.
It is scheduled to be reviewed and voted on at 6:30 PM PDT today.
Amendments on Direct Access were released this afternoon (based on negotiations between Davis' office and business customers):
Customers who have consistently been DA since May 2000, including those "involuntarily" returned to bundled service, would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts, and DWR-related exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have consistently been on DA between May 2000 and Jan 17, 2001 would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts and DWR-realted exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have been on DA between Jan 17, 2001 and August 24, 2001 would be exempt from exit fees related to DWR forward contracts, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customer's leaving after August 24th would not qualify for exemptions.
There is considerable work underway to make the August 24th date the deadline for contract execution, rather than the date by which the customer must be DASR'd, in order to qualify for the exemptions.
Direct Access would not be suspended, however, until 90 days after the bill is signed by Davis (if he signs it), i.e., the "effective date" of the bill.
So anyone going to Direct Access between Aug 24 and the effective date would not qualify for any exemptions.
After the 90-day period, DA would be suspended until 1.1.03.
Self-gen in service consistently from May 200 to August 24 would be exempt from Edison's undercollection and DWR charges.
Self-gen that submitted an application to the Energy Commission by August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line.
Self-gen that comes on line after August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line, but the total number of exempt MWs in this category would be limited to 250 MWs per year, on a first-come-first-serve basis.
At least 30% of any increases in net short due to increases in demand would be reserved for self gen.

Here is another file.

 pretty up-to-date, but not absolutely so.

With everything else going on, it has been hard to develop the monthly report for ENA management.

I'd like to re-start this report and provide an update at the beginning of September.

While I am aware of some efforts, I am sure that I don't know about everything that is critical and on-going.  

I need get a list of projects that your teams are working on for Deal Support, Regulatory Risk, and Advocacy.  I am truly at a loss for current deals that Government Affairs is supporting and our expectation of closing dates.

For each project, I need lead Government Affairs person, financial impact (our your best guess), background and key issues, and strategies and next steps.

This list does not need to be exhaustive, but simply the major activities currently underway.

Thanks - I appreciate your help,

Jim

FYI
The meeting to discuss California issues today has been set at:
	
	12:00 noon - 1:00 p.m.
	EB 8C1

	Dial-in #:  1-847-413-3181
	Passcode:  7816787

I will be setting up a conference call for later today to discuss our latest view on developments in the California market.  If anyone has any specific questions before then, please call me at 713-853-7673.

Jim

The California PUC
Loretta Lynch held a press conference in Sacramento today to discuss changes to the Commission's previously released proposal regarding Direct Access and the rate agreement between the PUC and DWR.
In the amended proposal discussed and distributed today, Direct Access would end retroactive to July 1.  Customers with contracts executed as of July 1 would would remain Direct Access customers.

The Legislature
The Assembly version of the Senate MOU (SB 78) has not yet been reviewed and voted on in the Committee.
It is scheduled to be reviewed and voted on at 6:30 PM PDT today.
Amendments on Direct Access were released this afternoon (based on negotiations between Davis' office and business customers):
Customers who have consistently been DA since May 2000, including those "involuntarily" returned to bundled service, would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts, and DWR-related exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have consistently been on DA between May 2000 and Jan 17, 2001 would be exempt from charges for Edison's undercollection, DWR's forward contracts and DWR-realted exit fees, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customers who have been on DA between Jan 17, 2001 and August 24, 2001 would be exempt from exit fees related to DWR forward contracts, provided that the PUC finds that no additional stranded costs are created for Edison's remaining customers.
Customer's leaving after August 24th would not qualify for exemptions.
There is considerable work underway to make the August 24th date the deadline for contract execution, rather than the date by which the customer must be DASR'd, in order to qualify for the exemptions.
Direct Access would not be suspended, however, until 90 days after the bill is signed by Davis (if he signs it), i.e., the "effective date" of the bill.
So anyone going to Direct Access between Aug 24 and the effective date would not qualify for any exemptions.
After the 90-day period, DA would be suspended until 1.1.03.
Self-gen in service consistently from May 200 to August 24 would be exempt from Edison's undercollection and DWR charges.
Self-gen that submitted an application to the Energy Commission by August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line.
Self-gen that comes on line after August 24 would be exempt from DWR charges beginning the date that the self-gen comes on line, but the total number of exempt MWs in this category would be limited to 250 MWs per year, on a first-come-first-serve basis.
At least 30% of any increases in net short due to increases in demand would be reserved for self gen.

FYI

TO:	NERC ROSTER
	STANDARDS LISTSERVER GROUP
	OPERATING MANUAL OWNERS
	SYSTEM OPERATOR TRAINERS

The following documents were approved by the Operating Committee for
interim implementation July 12, 2001 through November 15, 2001, and are
posted in the NERC Operating Manual:

1.  Policy 5, "Emergency Operations," Sections B and C
2.  Appendix 1D, "Time Error Correction Procedures"
3.  Appendix 3A4, "Required Tag Data"
4.  Appendix 9C1, "Transmission Loading Relief Procedure," Version 2b
5.  "Interchange Transaction Reallocation During TLR Levels 3a and 5a
Reference Document" (Posted as an Appendix for public comment)
6.  "Transactions Using Firm Transmission Service during TLR 3b
Reference Document"  (Posted as an Appendix for public comment)

View or download the documents from the following NERC web site:

http://www.nerc.com/~oc/opermanl.html

Please let me know if you have any questions. Thanks.

Barbara S. Bogenrief
Secretary-Operations

FYI.  Please coordinate going forward with EPSA.

Jim
Last week, EPSA met with EIA to discuss a revised Alternate Electric Power Data Confidentiality Policy proposal.  The following are EIA's changes to the original Alternate Policy proposal circulated by EPSA on August 2.

The following items would be held confidential:

EIA - 423: cost of fuels (not previously collected by EIA)
Purchase price would also still be held confidential, as noted on the original Alternate Policy.  EIA-423 basically duplicates FERC Form 423.

EIA-906: fuel stocks (currently held confidential)
Stocks was originally "crossed out" on the Alternate Policy, but it is now back on the list of data items to be held confidential.

EIA-826: energy service provider data on sales, revenues and number of customers
Under the original Alternate Policy, regulated utilities and wires companies would have also been able to keep this same information confidential.  Now it will only be data submitted by ESPs that will be held confidential.  However, please note that EIA-861 collects this same data from ESPs and that data will be released on an annual basis.

EIA-767: Under the revised Alternate Policy, no data submitted on the 767 will be held confidential
This is a change from the original Alternate Policy.  The original Alternate Policy includes estimated useful thermal output, plant financial information, cooling system costs, etc. as data to be held confidential.  The data will now be released 12 months after year-end.

EIA-860: Maximum tested heat rate (currently confidential)
No change from original Alternate Policy.

EIA-861: No data submitted on the 861 will be held confidential
No change from original Alternate Policy.

EIA-411: No data submitted on the 411 will be held confidential.
No change from original Alternate Policy.

EIA-412: Generator plant costs and expense data only for unregulated plants (not previously collected by EIA)
No change from original Alternate Policy.

I've attached a copy of the original Alternate Policy in case you need it.

Please forward any comments on these changes to me no later than noon Eastern Time on Friday, August 31.

EIA anticipates a Federal Register Notice on or around September 7.  There will then be a 30-day comment period on the proposal submitted by EIA to OMB.  We will notify you when the Federal Register Notice is issued.

Mary Hutzler, Acting Administrator at EIA, has expressed an interest in meeting with EPSA and its members to further discuss these issues.  If there is an interest in EPSA arranging a meeting for members in Washington, D.C. during the next few weeks, please let me know as soon as possible.

If you have any questions, please let me know.

Thanks again for all of your help!

Samantha

Samantha M. Slater
Manager of State & Regional Affairs
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 New York Avenue, N.W.
11th Floor
Washington, D.C.  20005
Phone: 202-628-8200
Fax: 202-628-8260
E-mail: sslater@epsa.org

 - Confidentiality.doc 

Here is the Proposed Decision.  Appreciate any thoughts you have on how to fight or when.

Jim

The pressure on the PUC is getting strong.  Could be a move by Davis' office to get folks to support the Assembly bill as a preferrable alternative to the July 1 date now included in the PUC draft.

Best,
Jeff

Attached is proposed deicison from ALJ Barnett suspending DA as of July
2001. Comments are due Sept. 4 by 10:00 a.m.
Attached is the revised draft decision of ALJ Barnett in A.98-07-003 et al.
This draft decision is on the Commission's September 6, 2001 agenda.  

Comments are to be filed on September 4, 2001 by 5:00 pm.  However, an
electronic version must be served no later than 10:00 am on that date to
those persons who have electronic addresses.  

Appendix A of the draft decision is the June 12, 2001 three page memo to
"Interested Parties--DWR Power Purchase Program" from the State Treasurer,
Dept. of Finance, and DWR.  That document in PDF format will be available
shortly at the Commission's website, along with the revised draft decision.

John S. Wong 
ALJ - CPUC 
<<Formatted Direct Access DD.doc>> 

Bob --

Pls send Alan the overviews you and Ray put together earlier - thanks.

Jim

As I talked with Jim yesterday, Belden would like a short overview of the refund proceedings:  schedule, key issues, etc.

If you can pass on whatever you have I can prepare such a memo.  Or let me know and I can call Fergus.

Thnks.

GAC

Bob --

Pls update me with all parties Ripple claims on this afternoon's call - Alan you should get on (4:30 Houston time).

Jim

I am attaching a memo I prepared - Steffes did a bulletized version that we'll forward.  Also, I send the schedule and summary/update of current status
 << File: watkiss-fergus M E M O R A N D U M.doc >> 
As I talked with Jim yesterday, Belden would like a short overview of the refund proceedings:  schedule, key issues, etc.

If you can pass on whatever you have I can prepare such a memo.  Or let me know and I can call Fergus.

Thnks.

GAC

I want to do this today.

Jim

THE FOLLOWING CALL HAS BEEN RESCHEDULED FROM A DAILY CALL TO THREE DAYS PER WEEK, MONDAY, WEDNESDAY & FRIDAY, AT 5:30 PM (EDT),
 4:30 PM (CDT) AND 2:30 PM (PDT).  The dial-in number will remain the same:  1-888-296-1938, Host Code:  524906, Participant Code:  955164.

Please contact Bernadette at (202) 466-9147 if you have questions.

Thanx
	At the request of Jim Steffes, we are canceling the above referenced call today @ 4:30 p.m. (CDT).  We will re-start with tomorrow's meeting and discuss filings, etc. at that time.

	Should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact either Jim Steffes or myself at (713) 853-6082.  Also, please notify me if I have missed anyone.

	Thank you!

Angie -

I will be traveling and unable to attend.  Hope everyone has a great time.

Jim

Just a reminder that we are going to have a REAL Closing Party this Thursday to celebrate Enron's short lived (but profitable) existence as a Peaker Plant owner.  Anyone that had anything to do with the Peakers (cradle-to-grave) is invited.  As the original invitation highlighted, the celebration will be held at Farrago's (we have the whole back room), which is located several blocks southwest of Enron at the corner of Gray and Bagby.

The party will start 6:00 pm and go until 10:00 pm (or whenever everyone wants to leave). Attire is casual.    

It should be a lot of fun and a great time for everyone to catch up.  If you haven't already RSVP, please do so to my assistant, Angie Collins (33347)

Se you all Thursday night.

Directions to Farrago:

Take Smith to Bagby make a right
Go 2 blocks, Farrago will be on your left at Bagby/Gray
Parking:  Valet (free)

 

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

scary.

 
Jessie Jackson has added former Chicago democratic congressman Mel Reynolds to the Rainbow/PUSH Coalition's payroll. Reynolds was among the 176 criminals excused in President Clinton's last-minute forgiveness spree. Reynolds received a commutation of his six-and-a-half-year federal sentence for 15 convictions of wire fraud, bank fraud & lies to the Federal Election Commission. He is more notorious; however, for concurrently serving five years for sleeping with an underage campaign volunteer. 
- 
This is a first in American politics: An ex-congressman who had sex with a subordinate and won clemency from a president who had sex with a subordinate, then was hired by a clergyman who had sex with a subordinate. His new job? Youth counselor. 
God Bless America. 

Sue --

What were the figures for the two months prior? 

Jim

These are utility figures as of the end of July 2001.  Only 3% load is DA

 <<July DASR counts.xls>> 

Here is the CPUC Report on DASRs submitted in July.  It appears this is what
we are fighting.

Rebecca

Should we include Becky Cantrell on these calls?

Jim

FYI.

Stephanie and I met with Jeff Dasovich in San Fransisco on Friday.  Jeff understands that he can play an important/strategic role in assisting ENA West Gas in understanding the regulated issues for Gas... There is no doubt that ENA has spent most of our resources in power ( and for good reason) however we need to re focus energy on gas related structures. 

To facilitate this effort, Jeff has offered to focus some more of his time and effort on coordinating some of the key commercial issues related to California.  Jane and Stephanie need to create a priority list that represents West Gas issues and "Hot Button" or action items. Once created we can work with Jeff on action items.  In addition to this immediate need, Jeff will join our conference call's/meetings ( or attend where possible).  The next session I have on my calendar is Thurs Sept 5 @ 2:30.  

I trust this initiative will further enhance an already effective procedure. If there are any questions, let me know.

regards, 

Barry Tycholiz  

I don't understand why you were denied access.  Did we improperly file?  Call me.

Joan,

Per Judy knepshield, you have been denied access to the requested AP role.  Please be advised that we are closing remedy ticket 562317.

Thank you,
ISC SAP Security

Denied A/P Access for processing.

Judy Knepshield

Joan Stransky is requesting access to the below role(s) and its pending your approval.  Please email your response to SAP Security.  If you have any questions, please contact her/his supervisor.

FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING ROLES:
   1. Add FN AP Invoice Processing-CORP

User's Current Access:
Std End-User profile for basis and prntg
HR Local Time Keeper - CORP HR
HR EMployee ESS CATS Enterprise HR
FN FI Consolidated Viewer-CORP

Thank you,
ISC SAP Security (Eva)

The following request information was recently submitted...

REQUESTOR INFORMATION:

   Business Unit:                CORP
   Cost Center:                  103246
   Company Code:                 001
   Business Unit for Roles:      CORP
   Other Business Units:
   SAP ID:                       p00500449

GENERAL INFORMATION:

   Supervisor:                   James Steffes
   Supervisor Telephone Number:  853 7673
   Employee Name (Last,First,M): Stransky, Joan. F.
   Employee Location:            EB4736B
   Employee Telephone Number:    853-7431
   Employee Email Address:       joan.stransky@enron.com
   Job Title:                    Admin Asst
   SAP User Type:                Enron Employee

   Business Reason:              
   I have been asked to support Becky Cantrell and Melinda
   Pharms in timekeeping and invoice coding.

VIEWER ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING ROLES:
   1. Add FN AP Invoice Processing

PROJECT SYSTEM ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

JOINT VENTURE ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

MATERIALS MANAGEMENT / PURCHASING ROLES:
   No roles in this area were selected.

CENTRALIZED ROLES (LIMITED TO SPECIFIC PERSONNEL):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES (HR PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES - TIMEKEEPERS:
   1. Add  HR Local Timekeeper

HUMAN RESOURCES - BENEFITS (BENEFITS PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

HUMAN RESOURCES - PAYROLL (PAYROLL PERSONNEL ONLY):
   No roles in this area were selected.

Amr & Janel --

Please add these people to your lists.

Jim

Jim,
	I know that your group is following the RTO - ISO issues in Washington and wanted to know if we could be added to your distribution list on these updates?  Also, if there is anything we could help you with on this issue we would happy to do so.  We are also looking at FERC and their short list for the 5th appointee.  As you know, it is still very preliminary, but as soon as we get more information we will pass it on.  Hope all is going well and let me know if there is anything else we can do.

Thanks,
Kristin
x39510

Richard, etal  --

Attached is the complaint that EES intends to file tomorrow against SCE related to the recoupment of our Negative CTC.  As you aware, after returning our customers to DA recently, our billing department was expecting that the past Negative CTCs would be returned to our customer's accounts - this has not happened nor after conversations with SCE will it occur.  

This complaint is the next step in the process of attempting to recoup these funds.  Primarily EES does not want to pay for Utility charges for our customers while an outstanding Negative CTC balance is due.

One key risk with filing this Complaint is that SCE may consolidate this case with the earlier Complaint that is currently on hold.  Probably not too big of a downside.

We will be paying the bills into the CPUC for holding until the resolution of the Complaint.

Any questions or issues please let me know.

Jim

 - X27336.DOC 

I'll discuss tomorrow with Bob.

Jim

Can you guys handle this in my absence
Dan:

(cc Richard Sanders and Gary Fergus)

I have a document by someone named Marty Howard, who I believe may be
associated with Portland General. The document was sent to me by Richard
Tabors. According to the email Howard used to work for McCullough.

After a very brief read through, I think it tries to show that the
statistical link between prices in CA and the PNW was WEAK in peak hours. I
suppose they are trying to show that the "contagion" effect from California
show not be an issue? I have some problems from an initial read with the
econometric analysis, but I have not yet reviewed it fully.

However, it also leaves open the very possibility that was discussed earlier
on the call. If there is a refund, and it is based on some notion of "PNW
prices", it could be a very large one. I think we need to consider this
issue quite carefully.

Seabron

This e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is intended only for use by the
addressee(s) named herein and may contain legally privileged and/or
confidential information.  If you are not the intended recipient of this
e-mail, you are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or
copying of this e-mail, and any attachments thereto, is strictly
prohibited.
If you have received this e-mail in error, please immediately notify me at
(617) 354-0060 and permanently delete the original and any copy of any
e-mail and any printout thereof.

Seabron Adamson
Frontier Economics Inc
Two Brattle Square
Cambridge, MA 02138 USA
Ph:  (617) 354-0060
Fax: (617) 354-0640
seabron.adamson@frontier-economics.com

www.frontier-economics.com

David --

I will cover for meeting and let you know if anything happens.

Jim

	Jim,  nice to finally meet you today.  I will not make the 5 Sept meeting as I will be at a customer in South Carolina.  Are you able to attend?  Thanks, David

Please save the date!

Recruiting season is almost here and the Analyst/Associate Program has been working hard to make this the best year ever.

We would like to invite all executive leads to a kick-off meeting on September 5th from 2:00 P.M. to 5:0 P.M. at the Doubletree Granger B.  The event will be only for the Executive Leads and the Analyst/Associate recruiting staff.  

If you plan to attend, please RSVP to Dolores Muzzy at ext. 36245 or by e-mail to Dolores.Muzzy@ENRON.com <mailto:Dolores.Muzzy@ENRON.com>.

We look forward to seeing you all there.

I plan on attending.

Jim Steffes

Please save the date!

Recruiting season is almost here and the Analyst/Associate Program has been working hard to make this the best year ever.

We would like to invite all executive leads to a kick-off meeting on September 5th from 2:00 P.M. to 5:0 P.M. at the Doubletree Granger B.  The event will be only for the Executive Leads and the Analyst/Associate recruiting staff.  

If you plan to attend, please RSVP to Dolores Muzzy at ext. 36245 or by e-mail to Dolores.Muzzy@ENRON.com <mailto:Dolores.Muzzy@ENRON.com>.

We look forward to seeing you all there.

Sarah --

Two issues that we should work on -- First Energy discusses CBM (not sure of their position) and MAPSA deals with ICAP.  My recollection is that ICAP will not be addressed at this time?  Seems to me that we should  try and propose some resolution or at a minimum a separate proceeding to mediate this issue before 1/1/03?  What do you think?  On CBM, now is the time for FERC to get rid of this discriminatory practice.

Jim

Attached is my summary of the requests for rehearing of FERC's July 12, 2001 orders in the Northeastern RTO proceedings.  If you would like any further information, please let me know.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

 

This is the list of the parties opposing the NERTO and their arguments.  

Jim

Attached is my summary of the requests for rehearing of FERC's July 12, 2001 orders in the Northeastern RTO proceedings.  If you would like any further information, please let me know.

Susan Lindberg
713.853.0596

 

My only addition would be to strengthen the answer to #5 - RTOs, even if fo=
rmed, do not explicity resolve the question of the Native Load Exception.  =
I think that this is critical to highlight if this issued is raised.
=20
Jim

Please see Lou's email below.  It's rather lengthy, and we will be working =
with him to help him prepare for oral argument, but to the extent any of yo=
u have the time or inclination to read his questions and add your thoughts,=
 your comments would certainly be welcome.
=20
Thanks
=20
Sarah

See comments below

Please think about the following:
=20
In a 20-minute Supreme Court argument [the limit will be strictly observed]=
, one needs to be ready to answer questions of all sorts, but one cannot co=
unt on being able to make more than 2-3 points, and each of them needs to b=
e clear from the first sentence; points that require development don't work=
.  In light of that:
=20
1.    Should I plan to spend any minutes on the "New York" side of the case=
, i.e., arguing that *all transmissions over the grids are in interstate co=
mmerce and FERC has jurisdiction whether the ensuing sale is wholesale or r=
etail*?  On the one hand, the "NY issue" is more important to Enron than th=
e "Enron issue"; on the other hand, my sense is that we are way ahead on th=
e NY issue after the briefs, and the SG will likely do a good job on it in =
argument.  My sense is that I should be prepared, if necessary, to utter so=
mething like the starred portion of the first sentence of this paragraph, a=
nd to defend it against any questions, but should not otherwise plan to get=
 into these issues.=20
We should probably also have a canned sentence ready to address NY's wacky =
preemption argument, which the one that it relied on most heavily in its op=
ening brief.
=20
2.    I think my most important tasks are to make clear that (i) this case =
is about FERC's power to require nondiscriminatory access to the interstate=
 grids (and not about rates or state regulation of retail sales) and (ii) i=
t is important to the nation that FERC have such power.  I need to make the=
se points quickly and vividly, in a way that the Justices will carry away. =
 That is going to be hard, because theoretical abstractions are not vivid, =
examples take too long to develop and provoke quarrels about details, and m=
etaphors are generally too inexact.  Please consider whether I am right abo=
ut the two points being most important, and think about how to make them.
 I think these points are the most important, along with making the Court c=
omfortable with the idea that if they adopted our position they would not b=
e turning upside down a federal/state regulatory division that's been in pl=
ace for 60 years. =20
=20
3.    Although in a formal sense our case turns on the Chevron issue (plain=
 language, no ambiguity, hence no room for discretion), my instinct (but I =
am not at all sure about this) is that I should not plan to devote time to =
these matters.  First, they are covered well in the briefs.  Second, whethe=
r one sees "ambiguity" does not really depend on staring at the language bu=
t on understanding what "transmission in interstate commerce" necessarily c=
overs in the present age.  In other words, the way to win the Chevron point=
 is to win the points in the previous paragraph.  Hence I ought to prepare =
to get the word "unambiguous" in there somewhere in the middle of a sentenc=
e, and defend it if necessary, but not do more.  Does this seem right?=20
I think it's worth giving a little more attention since this is the key iss=
ue below and, ultimately, the issue on which the Court must rest its decisi=
on.  We don't want to lose the trees for the forest.  That said, since we'v=
e dealt with it at length in the briefs, I don't know that we need much mor=
e than a reminder of the issue and the arguments:  FERC asserts that sectio=
n 201(b) does not unambiguously determine whether transmission bundled with=
 retail sale is a transmission or a "sale of electric energy at wholesale".=
  It concluded that such transmission is a sale.  The D.C. Circuit erroneou=
sly held that FERC's interpretation was permissible.  But transmission does=
n't stop being transmission merely because it is sold together with generat=
ion:  it is both transmission and a necessary component (query whether "com=
ponent" is the best word to use) of a retail sale.  Therefore, under the cl=
ear language of section 201(b), jurisdiction over all transmissions, includ=
ing transmissions bundled with retail sales, is vested in FERC.
=20
On the related point of NY's position that the wholesale/retail bright line=
 applies to transmission:  in particular light of NY's interpretive gymnast=
ics in its reply (re: 201(a), at p.6), isn't a good one-liner simply that i=
f Congress intended to limit FERC's transmission jurisdiction to transmissi=
ons for wholesale, then s. 201(b) would read "The provisions of this subcha=
pter shall apply to the sale of electric energy at wholesale and all associ=
ated transmissions" (or something to that effect)?
=20
Note:  this issue opens the door to discussion of, among other things, whet=
her the exclusive purpose of section 201(b) was to fill the Attleboro gap; =
and questions about the structure of the FPA, e.g., the relationship betwee=
n 201(b) and 211/212, 206(d), etc.
=20
4.   What do I do in argument with LP&L?  I find the NGA parallel very comp=
elling, and IF the Court decides to go with us it will have no problem citi=
ng and following that case.  On the other hand, the argument does not seem =
to have persuaded anybody but our team (not CADC for example).  On balance,=
 I am inclined to say "The Court has already decided this issue under the p=
arallel provision of the NGA" and use some time to press that point.  One r=
eason for doing so is that in general it will be much EASIER for the Court =
just to affirm FERC and CADC than to push thru the complexities and agree w=
ith us, but LP&L gives them both a precedent for overruling FERC on its own=
 jurisdiction and a comparatively easy way thru the case.=20
Agreed.  =20
=20
5.  I need to understand why FERC's powers and plans to create regional tra=
nsmission organizations do not fully solve the problem.  I need to get a de=
tailed understanding of the facts, and a one-sentence answer to why there i=
s still a problem.    =20
The primary answer in our reply is that Order 2000 does not require RTOs, i=
t only encourages their voluntarily formation; and that there's no indicati=
on that monopolists will give up their market power unless compelled.  (p. =
19)
=20
6.  Most important:  What other points (in addition to 2 and 4) does anyone=
 think I need to be sure to make?  Even more important, what points made by=
 NY, SG, EEI, California are most likely to trouble the Court and provoke q=
uestions?  Which of them should I plan to answer even if I get no question?
We might also need to address whether our position runs against 60 years of=
 history:  Didn't the states regulate all aspects of bundled retail sales u=
ntil Order 888?  Does our position mean that FERC historically abdicated it=
s responsibility and the states were regulating without authority?  What is=
 the effect of section 201(a) if not to allow states to continue to regulat=
e the matters that they regulated in 1935?  This may be an issue to broach =
only if the Court indicates interest, though, since I think it's the toughe=
st one for us to answer.
=20
We might also reconsider our position that unbundling is merely an accounti=
ng issue.  It seems to me that reversing the position we took in our initia=
l brief will basically hedge our bets:  it makes our affirmative argument a=
 little harder (since we can't simply say that it's crazy to base FERC's ju=
risdiction on an accounting technique), but it also makes NY's argument har=
der, since they can't simply say that but for a change in the accounting fo=
r electric service the states would still be regulating interstate transmis=
sions for retail sale.  This would also dovetail with some of the other bri=
efs that made a strong argument that unbundling is a major change in electr=
ic service necessary to support competition among generators, and something=
 over which the states have never exercised jurisdiction.
=20
 Thanks to all for thinking about this.

sounds good.

We're testing the first edition of the conversion of the Project Tracking database in it's evolution from Notes to Oracle.  I'd like to meet with the two of you to make sure we're still interested in the current structure and purpose.  If we want to make changes/enhancements to the system, it's most efficient to do it now while we're still in development.  By copy of this message, I'm requesting that Gus coordinate with Ginger and Linda to schedule some time for us to review the system during the first or second week of September.

Thanks!

Harry --

I think that this makes alot of sense.  I like working through AReM on this=
 as much as possible. =20
=20
When is the next deadline?
=20
Jim

Summary first, comments second.
=20
Short read of SDGE proposal:

Plan establishes procurement and recovery strategy for SDGE as standard off=
er provider post Jan 1, 2003.  Procurement plan would be submitted annually=
 for PUC approval with ongoing discussions to allow modifications to plan a=
s needed.=20
Supply side of plan comes from URG (SONGS, QFs, PGE and other bilateral con=
tracts - about 1/4 of total requirement), state resources (DWR and CPA), an=
d market purchases (short and long term, fixed and variable, peaking) in th=
at order.  -     SDGE takes no responsibility for administering state-owned=
 resources.  Takes only what is needed and not obligated to take anyting mo=
re.  Long term products procured through RFPs.=20
-    Most details of portfolio kept confidential, except load forecast and =
RFP process.=20
Demand side of plan is load forecast, net of DA load.=20
-     DA load is identified through 90 day open enrollment period that star=
ts 180 days before procurement plan is submitted.  Over 20 kW customers com=
mit to 5 year departure.  Smaller customers commit to 1 year departure. =20
-    Departing customers pay exit fee for DWR and URG costs.  Premature ret=
urns pay re-entry fee and spot pricing.
-    Departures not official until PUC rules on the procurement plan.=20
Cost recovery through a PCAM (Procurement Cost Adjustment Mechanism).  Two =
components - energy (including ancillary services), and a balancing account=
 adjustment component.
-    each component is adjusted monthly.=20
Other policy gems thrown out for discussion:
-    State must maintain strong procurement role; e.g. administer DWR contr=
acts, consider combining generating assets under State portfolio management
-    PA-style auction of standard offer, with departing customers treated t=
he same as DA.

Direction of comments (through AReM would seem fine):

Departure should not be limited to open enrollment periods.  During open en=
rollment, certain amount of load, at least amount that would be supplied by=
 market purchases, should be designated as fee-less.  During other times, d=
eparture is permitted with appropriate exit fee.=20
Appropriate exit fee must be based on truly unavoidable costs and have not =
already been recovered through AB 1890 CTCs.=20
Re-entry fee should only be required if returning customer wants PCAM.  Oth=
erwise, customer gets spot price and there is no fee.=20
5-yr and 1-yr commitment periods mean nothing and should be eliminated.  Re=
turning customers get spot price or buy their way into PCAM.=20
Pricing data used for PCAM should not be confidential.  Customers should kn=
ow their risk exposure when buying PCAM - what's the portfolio, term of con=
tracts, pricing volatility, etc.  Otherwise customer is kept in dark, not k=
nowing pay they are paying for.=20
Long term solution is auction or similar disposition of customers to market=
.  Solution is not for state to take over power plant management.

Sue - let's you and I talk first.  Is AReM going to comment?

=20
=20
=20

Harry -- Can you please review and provide input on comments?  Especially a=
s it relates to keeping open the San Diego market.
=20
Jim

FYI.  We should discuss.
=20
Best,
Jeff

Yesterday, SDG&E filed a motion for adoption of an electric procurement cos=
t recovery mechanism and for an order shortening time for parties to file c=
omments on the mechanism.  The attached email from SDG&E contains the motio=
n, an executive summary, and a detailed summary of  their proposals and rec=
ommendations governing procurement of the net short energy requirements for=
 SDG&E's customers.  The utility requests a 15-day comment period, which me=
ans comments would have to be filed by September 10 (September 8 is a Satur=
day).  Reply comments would be filed 10 days later.

The filing provides the following discussion of direct access:

  _____ =20

"Developing the net short requirements of consumers depends on the extent t=
o which they might be served instead by third party providers. The level of=
 direct access will affect these net short requirements. At present, there =
is substantial uncertainty concerning the future disposition of direct acce=
ss and third party supply of retail customers that jeopardizes creation of =
an optimal plan. This uncertainty has the potential for increasing costs to=
 San Diego retail customers as a result of unnecessary over- or under commi=
tments. To resolve this uncertainty, the Commission needs to coordinate dir=
ect access with resource planning, at least on an interim basis. SDG&E disc=
usses below how to provide for this coordination.=20

As the retail market matures, SDG&E expects that direct access elections wi=
ll gain stability and will not be characterized by severe volatility. That =
stability will allow planners to make reasoned assumptions on direct access=
 and rely on them in developing a procurement plan. However, today, direct =
access is subject to substantial uncertainty. Before the high prices of the=
 summer of 2000, approximately 20% of SDG&E's retail load had elected direc=
t access. By the beginning of 2001, direct access had reduced by nearly hal=
f. More recently, SDG&E has seen an increase in direct access, perhaps as a=
 result of two factors: first, would direct access customers be able to avo=
id paying a share of CDWR contract costs, and second, would the state suspe=
nd direct access, as appears to be permitted under ABx-1 1. Furthermore, th=
e legislature is considering legislation that would permit direct access, a=
nd other bills that would encourage municipal aggregation of load. The effe=
ct of this latter bill is similar to direct access, but it could cause larg=
e quantities of load to leave or return to the system quite abruptly.=20

These events illustrate the need for added coordination between direct acce=
ss and resource planning. The necessary coordination could come by using an=
 open enrollment period each planning cycle under which direct access elect=
ions take place. During that enrollment period, the utility is provided inf=
ormation on the amount of load electing direct access (or municipal aggrega=
tion) and the length of the direct access commitment. This open enrollment =
period would last for 90 days and commence 180 days before SDG&E is schedul=
ed to submit its procurement plan. Customers over 20kW would make commitmen=
ts to service by suppliers other than SDG&E of at least 5 years. Smaller cu=
stomers would make minimum one year commitments. These commitments and the =
use of a specific enrollment period would provide SDG&E with the informatio=
n it needs to plan to meet net short requirements and minimize the risk of =
over- or under-commitment.=20

In order to ensure an orderly process that protects consumers, change of se=
rvice would not occur until the commission ruled on the procurement plan, a=
nd, to the extent that the commission determined that excessive direct acce=
ss placed an unreasonable burden on utility customers, it could choose to l=
imit direct access. Those electing to leave utility procurement would pay a=
n exit fee to cover the costs of commitments made by CDWR and utility retai=
ned generation committed to those customers in order to protect remaining c=
ustomers. As a result of this change, SDG&E would not plan to provide commo=
dity service to departing customers. Customers returning from direct access=
 prematurely would be subject to a re-entry fee and to spot energy pricing,=
 again to protect those customers who did not elect to switch.
=20
Coordinating direct access with the planning process, at least for a near-t=
erm period, is important to ensuring a reasonable procurement plan."

  _____ =20

The filing also briefly discusses competitive default supplier role:

  _____ =20

"When the State embarked on industry restructuring, one purpose was to take=
 advantage of the benefits that competitive markets can provide. Although C=
alifornia's experience with markets has not been as anticipated, it is stil=
l possible that a disciplined application of the market with adequate regul=
atory oversight can offer advantages to consumers. In fact, some states hav=
e undertaken to use the competitive market to meet customers' net short req=
uirements. For example, in parts of Pennsylvania, the State decided to auct=
ion off a piece of the procurement obligation to the competitive market. Ca=
lifornia may decide that it wants to do the same type of thing. If a portio=
n of the net short is auctioned off in this manner, from a planning standpo=
int, it should be treated the same as direct access: SDG&E will need adequa=
te notice and information to facilitate its planning for any net short posi=
tion remaining to be served, and the same use of exit fees and re-entry fee=
s should also apply."

  _____ =20

There are a number of issues here which I think WPTF may want to comment up=
on, as we have dealt with many of these issues in previous filings.  Please=
 let me (and others) know if you agree.
=20
Dan

Law Offices of Daniel W. Douglass
5959 Topanga Canyon Blvd.  Suite 244
Woodland Hills, CA 91367
Tel:   (818) 596-2201
Fax:  (818) 346-6502
douglass@energyattorney.com

<<A.01-01-044 Procurement Plan(v1).DOC>> <<A.01-01-044 Exc. Summary(v1).DOC=
>> <<A.01-01-044 Motion(v1).DOC>>=20

_________________________________

Darleen Evans

Sempra Energy - Law Department

619-699-5056

devans@sempra.com <mailto:devans@sempra.com>

Please arrange on my schedule.

Jim

Dear James:
 
Wattage Monitor has partnered with the  Center for the Advancement of Energy Markets to provide the DISCO of the Future  Executive Survey. We'd like your opinion! 
 
As part of the survey launch, we're asking  energy executives like you to complete the survey with us over the phone.  Not only do we want your responses to the questions but we're hoping to have  your feedback on the survey itself, too. You'll be assisting in the development  of policy recommendations for the DISCO of the Future.
 
Please email (jgotch@wmonitor.com ) or call  (415-387-8841) me to schedule a time to participate in the survey. The  following appointments are available:
 
Tuesday, August  28th (Pacific Standard Time): 
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Wednesday,  August 29th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Thursday, August  30th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
Tuesday,  September 4th:
9:00 - 9:45am
10:00 - 10:45am
11:00 - 11:45am
1:00 - 1:45pm
2:00 - 2:45pm
 
The survey is approximately 20 questions and  is scheduled in 45 minute intervals to ensure we have time to review the  questions with you and allow for any discussion that might arise. We will cover  general topics like your existing business policies, activity and opinions  of the DISCO of the Future. 
 
If there is a time that fits your schedule  better, please contact me and I'd be happy to make additional appointments.  Please feel free to forward this email to  any additional people you believe would be interested in participating as  well.
 
Thank you for your help.
 
Regards,
 
Jamey  Gotch
 
Jamey M. Gotch
Marketing  Manager

 - Blank Bkgrd.gif 

John -

I think that Sue is still on vacation.  Jeff may be able to help.

Jim
Sue --

Just checking to see if there is any new word from IEP on the draft Feinstein legislation you had sent earlier.  I have quietly alerted others in town -- such as EPSA and INGAA.  NGSA -- the group that represents the natural gas producers -- is aware and sending comments to her this week.  We have heard conflicting reports about whether she still intends to pursue the legislation -- at least on a stand alone basis -- and how much of a priority should will place on it in relation to other energy issues.  I intend to call her energy staffer next week to sit down before the Senate Energy Committee resumes votes in September.  Any news on this issue would be helpful.  Thanks in advance.

Sorry.  I've been swamped trying to save direct access for the ingrates in CA.  I'll get it right out to you by fax.

Sue --

Jim forwarded your e-mail on the Feinstein legislation (draft).  While she has talked about her interests conceptually in various hearings and meetings, we have not yet seen draft legislative language or more details.  If you have draft language or more details (which it sounded like from your e-mail), please forward and we can discuss.  Thanks for your assistance.

John

John -

Can you please get with Sue?

thx

I assume you're all over this, Linda.

On the off chance that you haven't seen it.  Feinstein is asking IEP for comments on her draft legislation that would increase regulation of natural gas, define what just and reasonable rates would be and increase refund power on the electric side.  I think we would have some concerns with her proposal.  If you want to pass along our comments to IEP, just get them to me.

 Bob --

When should we file our complaint at the CPUC?

Jim

fyi -- this just came across my screen.
 
Janet.Covington@sce.com on 08/24/2001 11:44:53 AM
Diann,

Your billing dispute has been reviewed and SCE has determined that all
charges were correctly calculated. New accounts were established as a
result of the change in direct access status and financial relationship and
all amounts are properly due and owing.

Please feel free to contact your Account Manager Matt Pagano should you
require assistance with regard to payment.  These bills are due and payable
and subject to further collection activity which may include Late Payment
Charges and/or reversion to dual billing if they remain unpaid.

Please feel free to call me if you have any questions regarding this
matter.

Janet L. Covington
Account Manager
ESP/AMS Services Division
SSID Administration Bldg., First Floor
7300 Fenwick Lane
Westminster, CA  92683
Phone: 714-895-0198 (54198)
Fax: 714-895-0347 (54347)
janet.covington@sce.com

                    "Diann
Janet, I think I've cleaned this thoroughly.  Let me know if you find
discrepancies.  Thanks.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

Janet,

With reference to the bills listed on the attached, pursuant to Rule 22 and
Rule
10A we are disputing that any charges are properly due and owing on these
accounts.  Each of these accounts has a credit balance.  We are therefore
withholding payment.

(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)
(See attached file: SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls)

 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls 
 - SCE_DA_Bills_081701.xls 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

I wanted IR and PR to be aware that within the next few days  the PG&E Bankruptcy team will file with the Judge Enron's current claim.  We intend to ask the Judge to Lift the Stay so that we can file at the CPUC a complaint to recoup our current receivable.  I'm not sure what our public statements have been and as soon as we prepare the filing, I'll let you know.

If anyone has any questions, please give me a call.

Thanks,

Jim

Jamie --

Thank you for keeping me in the loop on your activities.  While I am always supportive of more public statements pushing competition, neither I nor Enron can sign on to the letter.  

First, I am concerned that having Enron sign on will distract from your messages.  Enron is a "hot button" in DC and will change the proper focus.

In addition, I would argue that the recommendation for a national commission is out of place with the current timing of FERC and Congressional action -- which is imminent -- while a commission would delay action on the Hill and at FERC, thus supporting the forces against competition.  Let's not study this too much - we know what to do.  Move away from the commission.

Also, I'm not sure how providing federal grant money only to states that promote competition supports our efforts.  Making GA pay for PA is a distraction from the main fights at FERC and on the Hill.

Finally, I would guess that more funds to FERC and other agencies will only be used to increase enforcement against those in the industry.  While Enron wants markets that work well, the core problem is that we haven't deregulated enough - not that markets aren't working. 

Also, I don't know where the recommendation numbers from the Bush/Cheney plan came from -- I think it was an earlier document -- there are no such numbers in the final printed version of the report that I have.

If you want to talk, please let me know.

Thanks,

Jim

Are we sending anyone?

Jim
You are invited to participate in one of three workshops designed to
solicit input into training issues which will help NERC understand what
operating and marketing personnel feel they need in the way of training
programs and study materials.

Attached is the announcement and registration form. The announcement is
also posted at the following NERC web site:
http://www.nerc.com/~filez/workshops.html

Let me know if you have any questions.

Sincerely,

Glenda Rodriguez

Please note there is still room available for all three workshops.
 - Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.doc 
 - Fall 2001 System Operator Workshop.pdf 

Amr --

I'd like this as well.

Jim

Sounds very good.

Rick:

I would like to suggest that "Risk Analytics" to provide you with an assess=
ment of the "New Risk Management Policy" by the end of the coming week (Aug=
ust 31st).=20

I hope that this is fine with you.

Brgrds

AI

Enron Corp. and its subsidiaries (the "Company") are exposed to market, cre=
dit, operational and liquidity/funding risks in the normal course of its bu=
siness activities.  The Enron Corp. Board of Directors approved a new Risk =
Management Policy (the "Policy") on August 14, 2001.  This Policy establish=
es a framework under which the Company's exposure to risks shall be evaluat=
ed, managed and controlled, and pursuant to which capital will be allocated=
 and preserved.  The Policy focuses on four major types of risk: (a) market=
 risk; (b) credit risk; (c) operational risk and (d) liquidity/funding risk=
.  These risks shall be managed on a portfolio basis for standard transacti=
ons via various market risk limit structures and credit approval processes,=
 and for non-standard transactions via the Transaction Approval Process and=
 the Guarantee Approval Process.   This Policy provides an overview of vari=
ous risk measurement tools and limits to be applied to these risks, and the=
 roles and responsibilities for the key participants of the risk management=
 framework. =20

Management and employees are responsible for complying with the risk manage=
ment policies and procedures addressed in this Policy, available at <http:/=
/home.enron.com/resources>.  Following an initial transiton period, various=
 individuals within the key functions participating in the Company's risk m=
anagement framework will be required to sign a Compliance Certificate, an e=
xample of which is attached to the Policy as Appendix H.

If you have any questions, please contact Cassandra Schultz, cassandra.schu=
ltz@enron.com <mailto:cassandra.schultz@enron.com>, 713-853-0429 who will p=
ut you in touch with the appropriate Risk Assessment & Control representati=
ve.  Note: this is a confidential policy, not for distribution to anyone ou=
tside of the Company without specific authorization from the Chief Risk Off=
icer.

With everything else going on, it has been hard to develop the monthly report for ENA management.

I'd like to re-start this report and provide an update at the beginning of September.

While I am aware of some efforts, I am sure that I don't know about everything that is critical and on-going.  

I need get a list of projects that your teams are working on for Deal Support, Regulatory Risk, and Advocacy.  I am truly at a loss for current deals that Government Affairs is supporting and our expectation of closing dates.

For each project, I need lead Government Affairs person, financial impact (our your best guess), background and key issues, and strategies and next steps.

This list does not need to be exhaustive, but simply the major activities currently underway.

Thanks - I appreciate your help,

Jim

I am not sure if we have a claim to "PX Credits".  Our claim is to the negative residual of Bundled less the PX Credit = Negative CTC.

Jim

I enclosed blacklined versions of the riders for the proofs of claim for EES, EEMC and EPMI.  I also enclose the riders for the ECC and ENA claims, which have not changed from the versions circulated last night.

Please let me know your comments as soon as possible.

Ben Young

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 
 - ridertoE.DOC << File: ridertoE.DOC >> 

Ray --

FYI.  Some information on how we are talking about the claims in the Bankrupcty case.

Jim

I enclosed blacklined versions of the riders for the proofs of claim for EES, EEMC and EPMI.  I also enclose the riders for the ECC and ENA claims, which have not changed from the versions circulated last night.

Please let me know your comments as soon as possible.

Ben Young

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 

Include on the report.

Jim
Jim - This is the SDS deal we pulled of with NUI worth approx. $200,000.  By way of background, EES had lost the original bid in spring 2001.  They contacted me in July to see what, if any, information was available as to why we lost the bid.  Most of the info is not public and hence was n/a. EES had won the bid last year and NUI kept our info confidential as well.  With a minimal amount of time and through my relationship with Maloney, NUI agreed to an Off Tariff deal with us giving us our original terms and conditions.  They also agreed to eliminate the SDS volumetric limitations for future bids.  SM

Steve,  

The NUI/EES Letter of Agreement for the "SDS" storage service has been signed by both Enron and NUI.  September gas is scheduled for delivery to NUI.  This service will ensure that certain customer types will receive firm gas all winter.  Kenneth Maloney, of Cullen and Dykman, was helpful and responded quickly to my submitted draft comments, as well as returning a signed copy via fax.  

Your opinions, suggestions, and direct involvement with NUI on my behalf have proven invaluable in the resolution of this matter.  I want to thank you (perhaps personally on your next Houston trip) for your efforts.  I also want to share this email with others here on the gas desk that may have been unaware of your participation.
Again, many thanks.

Sincerely,

Paul Tate   

It's on my calendar.  Unless I need to be in California, I'll go to DC.
 
Jim
 

Hi Jim, 
 
Just wanted to let you know that Intellibridge will be meeting with Linda and team in DC on Sept 6 at 2pm. Several of the Intellibridge analysts will be attending and we would love to have you. Hope you can make it! 
 
Thanks, MSA

Janel --

This paper has two great maps that highlight the Utilities' model for RTOs =
and the FERC's current proposal.  Would be great to build this into some DC=
 and other political coverage.

Jim

The August issue of Short Circuits looks at the transmission grid and the l=
argest investor owned utility holding companies.

=20

Rita Hartfield
Phone:  713-853-5854
Fax:  713-646-4702
Cell:  713-504-5428
Rita.Hartfield@enron.com

Did our $MM Supreme Court attorneys have any heartburn?

Jim

Sarah Novosel asked me to re-send this document.

  

Here is the file.  While there are some quotes, remember that the analytics were never taken to the final decimal.  We were mainly trying to make a political point.

Jim

 

Jean --

What is Doug going to say?  Do we have the right messages?  What about the retail issues in Texas?  Have we considered these?

Jim

Doug wants to come to Austin and meet with legislators and regulators. I am setting up meetings for him next week.  
 
The purpose of the Wednesday 9/5 meeting that I requested is to get input from everyone involved with issues in Texas prior to the legislative hearing on Friday, 9/7.  There are numerous issues and we need coordination among the group. 
 
Christi, I will ask Bevin to find a date for a meeting with Doug, Mike, EES traders, EES/ENA attorneys and the regulatory group working on Texas issues for early September as you suggested.  Meanwhile, are the rest of you available at any time on Wednesday 9/5 and can you get your list of issues (requested in the earlier email) prepared and sent to me by late Tuesday?   Thanks, Jean  

I cannot meet on Wed. 9/5 because I have to write the marketer response to the SE RTO (due by COB and I have to incorporate all marketer comments).  Also, Doug Gilbert Smith is not available on Wed afternoons.  Let's plan for  the next week if possible.  Thanks and please get input from Doug for the pre-hearing meeting.

It would be great if we could meet on Wednesday, Sept. 5th.  
 
On Friday, Sept. 7th the electric restructuring oversight committee is holding an interim legislative hearing regarding ERCOT/market issues.  Invited testimony only; invited to testify are ERCOT and the Chairman of the PUC.  On Thursday, we are having a pre-hearing meeting with Rep. Wolens and Senator Sibley to brief them on the issues we would like addressed at the hearing on Friday.  
 
First, could everyone please forward a list of the issues that you are working on in Texas?  Second, are there any specific issues or questions you would like to have legislators ask of ERCOT or PUC Chairman?  Could I have both of these lists by Tuesday.  If I can get this information from you, the briefing of legislators will be more meaningful which will make the hearing more meaningful.    
 
Please let me know if you can meet on Wednesday.  Thanks, Jean  

Doug Gilbert-Smith talked with me today about some issues in ERCOT.  I think it would be beneficial to have a 1/2 day or so meeting in Houston with all of our Texas team, bringing in Doug and the EES traders and EES/ENA attorneys after we have chatted first.  If ok with all of you, I'll have my assistant set it up early Sept.

Vicki & Evan --

Please see the e-mail trail below.  The PAPUC has assessed EES $147,000 for its costs.  We intend to protest.  Do you have any idea of who this bill would go to?

Jim

I will talk with Kevin on Tuesday (we have traded phone calls) and get this done.  I may need some help in identifying who in EES might have the assessment and fax it to Kevin.  I will keep you informed.

Tom/Steve -- Janet Moore (the ENA attorney) is on vacation, so cannot handle.  I do not know if Enron has received the assessment, but in an abundance of caution, this objection probably needs to be filed on Tues. 9/4 (per Kevin Moody).  Please call me if one of you knows about this and can take care of it, otherwise I'll get it done on Tues.

Jim --do you know who at EES may have gotten this.  MAIN THING IS THAT THE VERIFICATION NEEDS TO BE DONE--CURRENTLY IN TOM HOATSON'S NAME.  (Also, may need an RCR)
Thanks.  Christi wk 713-853-7007   home 713-853-7007

Christie, below is the message I sent to Tom. Attached are the objections. I'll call you Tuesday morning to see where things stand on this.
____________________________________

Tom, the PaPUC has recently assessed gas marketers for the regulatory expenses for the PUC, the OCA and the OSBA. Enron Energy Services' assessment for all three is $147,277.

Unless you tell us to the contrary, we assume that you want us to file objections to the assessments. Attached are objections that we have prepared. Can you please fax us a copy of the assessment notice Enron received? We believe the assesments may have been received around 8/19-8/21.

Objections must be filed within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the assessment notice.  The 15-day objection period begins on the date the certified mail return receipt is signed.  If the 15th day falls on a weekend or a legal holiday, the last date for filing is extended to the next business day.

The statutes require the assessments to be paid within 30 days of receipt, even though objections are filed.  The payments must be made "under protest" in order to be refunded under the statutory procedure, which we believe is inadequate.

We are attempting to avoid the payment obligation thru a preliminary injunction request in Commonwealth Court, but we have no assurance that the court will act before the 30th day for payment.  If not, the assessment must be paid under protest.  If necessary, we will provide a cover letter for the protest payment to the PUC.

Please call me if you have any questions or comments. Thanks.

Kevin J. Moody, Esq.
Wolf, Block, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP
212 Locust Street, Suite 300
Harrisburg, PA  17101
(717) 237-7187
(717) 237-7161 (fax)

This electronic message contains information from the law firm of Wolf, Block, Schorr and Solis-Cohen LLP that may be privileged and confidential.  The information is intended to be for the use of the addressee only.  If you are not the addressee, note that any disclosure, copy, distribution, or use of the contents of this message is prohibited.

Tom --

There does appear to be some intelligence gathering going on at the CPUC.  You should speak with legal about the inquiry.  Clearly the CPUC has a right to ask anything they want - it is my understanding is that our customers have a confidentiality clause in their contract that prohibits them from responding.

Jim

Jim, et al,

Interesting e-mail from UC.  Apparently the PUC is implying to UC that DASRs
submitted after July 1 need to be associated with a contract executed prior
to July 1.  Is this consistent with our intell?  Can they make these
inquiries?  Please advise.

Tom

Linda --

Can you please get a copy of the report below "Spending Wisely on Private Hubs" for me?  If it costs $$, I don't want it.  Thanks.

Jim

 
Due to email problems last week, this message is being re-sent.  If this is a duplicate, please disregard.
eSource now offers free 
Broker Research and First Call Notes from Intelligence Data.  Analyst Reports  on Enron, the energy industry, competitors, broadband, and telecom are continually updated and available here. 
Obtain password and view reports  at  http://esource.enron.com/hot_topics.asp
and 
eSource is pleased to offer a valuable report issued by Forrester Research entitled 

"Spending Wisely on Private Hubs ". 
Issued July, 2001 
Valued at $2,000, the report is available for free viewing and download until September 12, 2001,  
by all Enron employees and business units.
 This report details ways to determine private hub strategy based on the six key drivers of hub payoffs. 

Download report at  http://esource.enron.com/hot_topics.asp

***
Visit eSource's Hot Topics page often for more reports, services, announcements and news.

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

Jennifer -
 
Please make sure that Vicki gets regular updates of both bills.  Thanks.

Jim

Jim:
 
It looks like the second "windfall tax" bill (ABX2 1 - Corbett) may be heard as early as tomorrow (see Scott's message below).  Among other things, this bill:
 
- Creates a Tax on Excess Gross Receipts from Electrical Energy Distribution and imposes the tax on the person making the first sale of electrical power in CA for consumption.
 
-Establishes a three-tiered tax system.  The measure of the tax is the amount by which the gross receipts from the sale exceed the amount that would have been received if the sale had been made at a specified price (base price) - the "excess gross receipts" (ESRs).  
 
-Sets the initial base price at $60/MWhr
 
*Have you been in touch with Vicki Sharp regarding this bill (in addition to the other windfall tax bill we summarized for her - SBX2 1)?  I can send her a summary of the Corbett bill, if you would like.
 
Jennifer
 
 

Jennifer,

 

Unfortunately.  It is ABX2 2 however and I would expect the bill to  be heard as early as tomorrow.

 

Scott

Sent: Wednesday, September 05,  2001 11:46 AM

Thanks.  I just saw the revised ABX2 1 (Corbett) windfall tax  bill.  According to the Web, it was revised and is on its way to a 3rd  reading.  Is it correct that it has been changed to require a simple  majority and thus may be passed more quickly?  

 

I will pass on your response to our commercial folks...

 

Thanks, Jennifer

 

 

Sent: Tue 9/4/2001  12:21 PM 

Cc: 

Jennifer,

To the best of my knowledge, Enron has  not produced a document outlining the

implications of the windfall profits  tax bills. The opposition letter which

Enron provided me, dealt solely with  the constitutional issues.  What has

been conveyed to me unofficially, is  that several of the companies will

likely sue if one or both become  law.  With respect to 2, supposedly Corbett

is reviewing potential amendments to  make hers a simply majority vote bill

in order to move it.

I will look at the revised matrix  shortly.

Scott

Sent: Tuesday, September 04, 2001 9:50  AM

Cc: Steffes, James D.

        Scott:

        I have updated the attached matrix that: 1) reflects  legislative

developments I read about in today and  Friday's trade mags; 2)

highlights the bills that seem of  particular importance to Enron.

        Please review and let me know your input.  Again, the goal is  to

identify the key bills and review them  regularly during the Tuesday and

Thursday CA calls.

        Also, are you aware of whether we have analyzed the  implications

of and differences between the two  windfall profits tax bills (ABX 2 2 -

Corbett and SBX2 1)?    Our retail folks are very

interested in the tax issue, and I have  been asked to provide them with

updates and information.

        Thanks,

        Jennifer

         <<matrix 9-4.xls>>

This e-mail is the property of Enron  Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and

may contain confidential and privileged  material for the sole use of the

intended recipient (s). Any review,  use, distribution or disclosure by

others is strictly prohibited. If you  are not the intended recipient (or

authorized to receive for the  recipient), please contact the sender or reply

to Enron Corp. at  enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all

copies of the message. This e-mail (and  any attachments hereto) are not

intended to be an offer (or an  acceptance) and do not create or evidence a

binding and enforceable contract  between Enron Corp. (or any of its

affiliates) and the intended recipient  or any other party, and may not be

relied on by anyone as the basis of a  contract by estoppel or otherwise.

Thank you.

 - winmail.dat <<winmail.dat>> 

Christi --

Fine work. Looks like we are moving forward in the SE.  

A couple of discussion points.    I am still not so much in love the LMP as this paper makes it seem you are (I don't believe there is a perfect solution).  Also, the document is not consistent relating to Control Area consolidation.  For instance, the issue around CA or RTO with tagging makes no sense if there is only one CA - the RTO.  This is important to highlight to the ALJ.  The easiest way to solve the problem is to do away with the archaic systems of the old world.  Also, I still don't fully understand why we are happy that the SAC gets to pick the IMA.  I personally despise the concept of a SAC - never has worked when times get tough.  Also, no real discussion (or maybe I missed) of timing to implement - next phase?

Anyway, great work in the mediation.  Keep pushing these guys from the South.  

Thanks,

Jim

CONFIDENTIAL TO THE SE RTO MEDIATION

Attached is the Marketer Sector response (largely written by Enron) to the current proposals.  The judge's report to FERC will be filed publicly on Monday.  Enron will have the opportunity to file an Enron-only response to her report.

 << File: MarketerfinalSERTO.doc >> 

Thanks for everyone's input for the response!

Jeff --

See below.  Does this fit into Mary's responsibilities?  Let me know.

Jim
FYI.  Can Mary Schoen help us out on this stuff.  We need to first evaluate the rulemaking against our interests, then determine whether IEP can handle it for us.  

A number of things are falling through the cracks --Dave Parquet's siting concerns is one of them.  I have had NO time to work on this stuff-- any suggestions? ANother one is EES's need to file data with the CEC -- I just realized I was waiting for something from EES months ago and never followed up. I'm sure there is more. 

Recently, the CEC initiated a Rulemaking on siting.  The purpose is to
review and rewrite the Commisison's Rules related to siting of new
generation.  As the Siting Committee has failed to convince the full
Commission of how best to proceed, the Commission is scheduling a Business
Meeting on Sept . 12 to discuss this matter and, presumedly, provide the
Commission direction.

Attached is a staff report laying out the issues.

IEP is monitoring this matter through its Regulatory Committee.  Presently,
staff plans to attend the meeting.  Comments on the staff report prior to
the Business meeting on the 12th,  as well as comments on other matters
related to the Commission's Rules regarding siting, would be advantageous.

IEP is interested in hearing from company's willing to fund a stronger
intervention (i.e. the development of comments, etc.) than mere presence at
the Business meeting.  Please contact Steven Kelly ASAP if your company is
interested in IEP developing comments on this matter.

Thought you should see this.

Jim

The Commission issued a draft decision yesterday (September 4) on DWR's
revenue requirement.  While the Commission had been scheduled to vote on the
revenue requirement at tomorrow's (September 6) meeting, the vote has been
postponed to allow for comments on the PD.  Comments are due on September
11th.  Cmmr. Lynch stated at her press conference held today that it  was
her intent to vote on the PD no later than the next regularly scheduled
Commission meeting on September 20th, and perhaps earlier if a continuation
meeting can be scheduled.

The PD approves the entirety of DWR's requested revenue requirement of $12.6
less the costs of certain demand side management programs which are not
included as "authorized costs" under AB1X.  The PD does not follow DWR's
approach of a pro rata allocation of the revenue requirement among the three
UDCs.  Rather the PD follows a "cost of service" approach.  The PD allocates
DWR's energy procurement costs on a geographic basis, depending on whether
the energy is delivered over facilities in northern California or Southern
California (Transmission Path 15 is the line of demarcation).  Energy
sources procured north of Path 15 are allocated to PG&E customers and those
procured south of Path 15 are allocated to SCE and SDG&E customers.  The
result of such allocation is to have 54% of DWR costs allocated to PG&E, 33%
to SCE and 13% to SDG&E.  Each of the UDCs are then allocated the same
percentage of bond proceeds.  In revenue requirement terms this means that
for the period of January 17, 2001 through December 31, 2002, PG&E is
allocated $6.53 billion; SCE is allocated $4.01 billion and SDG&E is
allocated $1.53 billion.

Along with the revenue requirement allocation, the PD adopts a DWR charge
for each UDC.  The UDCs are directed to begin dispersing payment to DWR
based on the relevant DWR charge for each kWh sold by DWR to the UDC's
customer.  For PG&E this charge is 13.99 cents/ kWh; for SCE the charge is
10.03 cents/kWh; and for SDG&E the charge is 9.02 cents/kWh.  The PD also
notes that given the fact that PG&E's DWR charge is  !3.99 cents it may need
to remit to DWR an additional 4  cents for each kWh that was provided to its
customers by DWR since June 1 until this order becomes effective.

As for the necessity of raising PG&E and SCE rates to account for the DWR
revenue requirement, the PD states that such a determination cannot be made
until a decision on the revenue requirement for the UDCs' retained
generation is issued.  That proposed  decision is due out later this month.

If you have any questions or would like a copy of the order, please contact
me.

Jeanne Bennett 

Should we talk about the implications for the PX Credit given this PD?  I am guessing that this would significantly alter the calculation for PG&E - moving DWR from $60 to $140.  

Do we want to file comments on how this should than resolve the PX Credit process?

Jim

The Commission issued a draft decision yesterday (September 4) on DWR's
revenue requirement.  While the Commission had been scheduled to vote on the
revenue requirement at tomorrow's (September 6) meeting, the vote has been
postponed to allow for comments on the PD.  Comments are due on September
11th.  Cmmr. Lynch stated at her press conference held today that it  was
her intent to vote on the PD no later than the next regularly scheduled
Commission meeting on September 20th, and perhaps earlier if a continuation
meeting can be scheduled.

The PD approves the entirety of DWR's requested revenue requirement of $12.6
less the costs of certain demand side management programs which are not
included as "authorized costs" under AB1X.  The PD does not follow DWR's
approach of a pro rata allocation of the revenue requirement among the three
UDCs.  Rather the PD follows a "cost of service" approach.  The PD allocates
DWR's energy procurement costs on a geographic basis, depending on whether
the energy is delivered over facilities in northern California or Southern
California (Transmission Path 15 is the line of demarcation).  Energy
sources procured north of Path 15 are allocated to PG&E customers and those
procured south of Path 15 are allocated to SCE and SDG&E customers.  The
result of such allocation is to have 54% of DWR costs allocated to PG&E, 33%
to SCE and 13% to SDG&E.  Each of the UDCs are then allocated the same
percentage of bond proceeds.  In revenue requirement terms this means that
for the period of January 17, 2001 through December 31, 2002, PG&E is
allocated $6.53 billion; SCE is allocated $4.01 billion and SDG&E is
allocated $1.53 billion.

Along with the revenue requirement allocation, the PD adopts a DWR charge
for each UDC.  The UDCs are directed to begin dispersing payment to DWR
based on the relevant DWR charge for each kWh sold by DWR to the UDC's
customer.  For PG&E this charge is 13.99 cents/ kWh; for SCE the charge is
10.03 cents/kWh; and for SDG&E the charge is 9.02 cents/kWh.  The PD also
notes that given the fact that PG&E's DWR charge is  !3.99 cents it may need
to remit to DWR an additional 4  cents for each kWh that was provided to its
customers by DWR since June 1 until this order becomes effective.

As for the necessity of raising PG&E and SCE rates to account for the DWR
revenue requirement, the PD states that such a determination cannot be made
until a decision on the revenue requirement for the UDCs' retained
generation is issued.  That proposed  decision is due out later this month.

If you have any questions or would like a copy of the order, please contact
me.

Jeanne Bennett 

I wanted to re-confirm that you are covering?

Thanks,

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: September 5, 2001

RE: EPSA Comments on Public Utility Filing Requirements
      NOPR
       ?Conference Call on Friday, September 7th, 2:30 p.m.
        EDT

In preparation for our call on FERC's NOPR on Revised Public Utility Filing Requirements, below is an agenda of issues for discussion.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA call.

1. What is currently filed?
      ?Aggregated data
      ?Delayed disclosure
      ?Current data requirements vs. current data filed

2. What does the NOPR expect to be filed?
      ?All transaction data (?)
         ?Short-term, spot transactions
         ?Longer-term bilateral transactions

3. Balancing information availability vs. protecting
    confidentiality

      ?Aggregation
      ?Delay of data release
      ?Confidential treatment of data
      ?Amount of sensitive information-size of portfolio
      ?Comparison of gas reporting requirements-commodity prices vs.
       transportation services

4. Harmonizing filing requirements

      ?EIA
      ?NERC
      ?FERC
      ?ISOs

Please set up a meeting on Monday with Becky.

Thanks

Jim, please see me about this issue.  As you can see, Leslie and I have been working extensively with Stephanie Miller for the last few weeks as she is trying to find a way to get rid of our 200,000 MMBtu/day of Block 2 capacity on El Paso.  In fact, I provided Stephanie an analysis of the regulatory history as far back as last March, even before we signed up for the capacity.  You will probably be getting some questions about it from Barry or maybe even Lavarato before too long since getting rid of this asset is very high on their priority list.  I wanted you to be up to speed on our input so far.

The CPUC was heavily involved in the settlement and their interest is making sure that northern CA has access to the SJ supplies.  Their concern is not the same as PG&E's.  And to the extent anything is agreed to, reopening the settlement is an enormous can of worms, and I don't think we want to go there.  We would have to be able to structure a side deal to where PG&E and SoCal are in agreement that the recall rights they got in the settlement can be waived.

Steph - Leslie and I were just talking about this, and one thing we need to keep in mind is that any attempt to modify the PG&E recall rights would almost certainly be opposed by the CPUC, especially if it was to benefit Enron.  

I thought you understood from my email and phone call that I was going to track down El Paso's interpretation of the 24 hours recall rights.  Regulatory treatment of the 58 million by PG&E is a CPUC issue.  I just talked to Becky and I don't have a good response to the question of whether our capacity could replace expansion capacity in light of the dueling recall rights, but I will think about it and talk to Becky some more.

As to the 24-hour recall, I can only tell you what the FERC order says, I have no special knowledge of how El Paso and the parties intended the 24 recall to work.  The order is fairly terse, and just says "and if it so recalled (by PG&E), that Enron may further recall the capacity for its own use in the PG&E  service territory upon 24 hours notice."  The language says to me that you can recall it 24 hours before you want to use it.  However, I can call El Paso and find out how they interpret it.

As to the "traditional rate making" valuation of the $58 million, I have to confess I don't understand what you mean.  PG&E paid the 58 million as part of a negotiated settlement.  Typically that is part of a black box settlement, meaning that revenue dollars are not tracked to particular costs.  We can pull the settlement and see if it stipulates some sort of treatment, but I would doubt it.  If your question relates to how PG&E is tracking that expense in a regulatory sense, perhaps Jeff Dasovich can find out. 

When is the 24 hour notice on re-recall effective - 24 hours from the day of recall (varies depending on term) or 24 hours before the recall is supposed to start?

How would you value what's left of the $58 million that PG&E paid based upon traditional rate making policies? I believe there are at least 5 years left on the term of the settlement.

Please call if you have any questions,

Regards,

Stephanie

Here is a short memo.  do you need more?
 << File: Stephaniememo.doc >> 

We you able to pull together a clear, definitive conclusion on how the RE-recall rights work?
I was not able to - hence my mission for greater clarification of specifics....

I looked over all the orders and the contracts and I agree with both of your interpretation of the recall rights of Block II.  PG&E did not make a very smart deal for $58 million.
Page 12 talks about Recall rights - good discussion but still short on re-recall rights.

This guy runs a small think tank / TV and radio program that tries to push competitive ideas.  He is very pro telecom and energy dereg.  Not sure if this is something that makes alot of sense for Enron, but thought I'd get your spin.  I'll follow up with you.

Jim

We produce political/public affairs television programs which air in state capitols. Currently we are in Pennsylvania and Ohio, expanding into NJ, Md and DE. The disruptive technology is this: the real target of the TV show is the guest, not the audience. Lobbyists have trouble scheduling time with politicians and regulators, and when they get on the schedule lobbyists have time getting genuine intellectual focus from government decision makers. We don't have trouble with either. Every politician and appointee wants to be on television, they always say yes. When they ask us what the topics will be, and we mention something like telecommunications competition or electricity deregulation they want briefing material which they actually study in order to do well on television. In addition by inviting journalists and radio and television commentators as members of out panel we have the same effect on them.
 
In short:
 
Step one: identify gov't decision makers that our sponsors want to influence
Step two: invite them on the program and, in doing so, develop rapport with their key staff members on the relevant issues
Step three: send briefing materials and/or give a briefing in person before the the taping
Step four: towards the end of a show in which the Newsmaker has largely been bragging about his/her policy agenda
Step five: steer the conversation to sponsor selected topics, framing the issue in such a way as to make it very difficult for the guest to resist the conclusions suggested by the host.
Step six: take the statement of support for the position we favor e.g. tort reform, privatization, deregulation, tax cuts, etc. (which by the way we almost always are able to get from the guest on the air) and in addition to airing along with the airing of the rest of the show, we digitize it and send it out to legislators, regulators and the proper beat reporters via email making it almost impossible for the newsmaker to back off later.
 
Current sponsors: Medical Society, Hospital Association, State System of Higher Education, Manufacturers Association, Cornell Corrections, AT&T.
Levels: 25K, 50K, 100K per year for Pa; 15k for Ohio (one level only).
 
This is an amazingly simple, elegant and direct way to influence policy makers and opinion molders and we do not have an energy-oriented firms in partnership with us. Enron and Newsmakers are a very good fit.
 
I'll be in touch,
 
p.s. Sponsorship can be done in ways that are not visible if you prefer, via intermediaries, if you are publicity shy.
 
Jerry Bowyer
Pennsylvania Newsmakersseen across the state on these television stations: www.jerrybowyer.com/coveragemap.php     
The Jerry Bowyer Programon WPTT radio in Pittsburgh, 1360am: www.1360wptt.com/bowyer 
Focus on the Issueson Cornerstone Television
Audio clips from these programs can be heard at www.jerrybowyer.com/audio.php  
412.771.2282 phone
412.771.2363 faxjerrybowyer@home.com    
 

Thanks for the material.  I am discussing internally.  Will keep confidential.

Jim

We produce political/public affairs television programs which air in state capitols. Currently we are in Pennsylvania and Ohio, expanding into NJ, Md and DE. The disruptive technology is this: the real target of the TV show is the guest, not the audience. Lobbyists have trouble scheduling time with politicians and regulators, and when they get on the schedule lobbyists have time getting genuine intellectual focus from government decision makers. We don't have trouble with either. Every politician and appointee wants to be on television, they always say yes. When they ask us what the topics will be, and we mention something like telecommunications competition or electricity deregulation they want briefing material which they actually study in order to do well on television. In addition by inviting journalists and radio and television commentators as members of out panel we have the same effect on them.
 
In short:
 
Step one: identify gov't decision makers that our sponsors want to influence
Step two: invite them on the program and, in doing so, develop rapport with their key staff members on the relevant issues
Step three: send briefing materials and/or give a briefing in person before the the taping
Step four: towards the end of a show in which the Newsmaker has largely been bragging about his/her policy agenda
Step five: steer the conversation to sponsor selected topics, framing the issue in such a way as to make it very difficult for the guest to resist the conclusions suggested by the host.
Step six: take the statement of support for the position we favor e.g. tort reform, privatization, deregulation, tax cuts, etc. (which by the way we almost always are able to get from the guest on the air) and in addition to airing along with the airing of the rest of the show, we digitize it and send it out to legislators, regulators and the proper beat reporters via email making it almost impossible for the newsmaker to back off later.
 
Current sponsors: Medical Society, Hospital Association, State System of Higher Education, Manufacturers Association, Cornell Corrections, AT&T.
Levels: 25K, 50K, 100K per year for Pa; 15k for Ohio (one level only).
 
This is an amazingly simple, elegant and direct way to influence policy makers and opinion molders and we do not have an energy-oriented firms in partnership with us. Enron and Newsmakers are a very good fit.
 
I'll be in touch,
 
p.s. Sponsorship can be done in ways that are not visible if you prefer, via intermediaries, if you are publicity shy.
 
Jerry Bowyer
Pennsylvania Newsmakersseen across the state on these television stations: www.jerrybowyer.com/coveragemap.php << File: http://www.jerrybowyer.com/coveragemap.php >>     
The Jerry Bowyer Programon WPTT radio in Pittsburgh, 1360am: www.1360wptt.com/bowyer 
Focus on the Issueson Cornerstone Television
Audio clips from these programs can be heard at www.jerrybowyer.com/audio.php << File: http://www.jerrybowyer.com/audio.php >>  
412.771.2282 phone
412.771.2363 faxjerrybowyer@home.com << File: mailto:jerrybowyer@home.com >>    
 

Good info.  I like the Reg Orig plays.  Amr should track our success.

Jim

fyi.

Attached is the first draft of our intervention in the Georgia Power rate case.
 << File: Georgia Power Case3.doc >> 

Our goals are to get:
Georgia Power's weather risk transferred to the market through purchase of weather hedges, in lieu of GP's proposal to refund a portion of above normal weather revenues in exchange for supposedly bearing downside weather risk (for EGM, principally);
Disclosure of new capacity contracts whose costs are proposed to be recovered through a new automatic capacity recovery mechanism, to help our own ability to hedge existing retail positions (for EWS);
Application of an earnings test that would limit when the capacity cost recovery mechanism goes into place, to help keep down rate increases on our existing retail positions (for EWS);
A reduction in GP's ROE if the automatic capacity recovery mechanism is approved; to limit rate increases on our existing retail positions (for EWS).

Andy and Mark, please give me your suggestions.  I will schedule follow-ups as needed.  Mark, I have talked to Gary Taylor and he is working up some hedge examples that will be very useful.  Also, Bob Frank and I had a very general discussion with Dynegy about our issues.  They have intervened in this case also and may be supportive.  Do you have any objection to sharing our views with them?  They could be very helpful.  

Mike, I think this is the first rate case where Enron is intervening in a closed state (Georgia).  It's certainly likely other parties will want to know our interests.  Most of the retail position is from Springs, Owens Corning, Quebecor, Rich, and Simon.  Another half-dozen contracts also have positions there.  I want to make sure you have no objection to Enron's participation.  Any suggestion on how best to characterize our interest would be great.

We have four weeks before this must be finalized so there is time.  But hearings start next week for GP's witnesses so any immediate feedback in terms of direction, etc. would be great.

Thank you.

Jim --

I'll be staying downtown.  Once I finalize my plans, I'll get in touch to finalize our meeting.  You're right about our thinking - probably just to get a feel for some ideas, nothing formal.

Thanks,

Jim

Jim--

Thanks for getting back to me.  I can make 7:30 AM next Thursday.  Are
you at a hotel in DC or surroundings?  It would probably make the most
sense for me to meet you there; we can talk over coffee, or else let me
know what would be convenient for the two of you.

If you are truly interested in this topic, and in any sort of hurry, we
can prepare a more detailed preliminary proposal in short order; but I
am guessing that you are not there yet, and we can just talk about it
next week.  There are a couple of different ways you could proceed; it
might even be interesting to combine forces with other market players
through EPSA.  So there's both the substance and the process to think
about.  I look forward to hearing your thoughts on the subject.

--Jim Turnure
Principal, Energy Group
ICF Consulting
9300 Lee Highway
Fairfax, VA 22031
(703) 934-3617 office
(202) 423-6583 cell

Lisa --

I don't have any funds for this.  Sorry.  

Jim

Mike, Linda, Dave and Jim,

We received a request from the Alliance to Save Energy (www.ase.org) for Enron to be a Vice Chair of the annual dinner on October 24, 2001 in DC.

-- Enron is a member (Associate) of ASE

-- Enron has been a Vice Chair for the previous 9 years  

-- The letter of invitation was sent to Ken Lay on July 3, 2001.

-- The Vice Chair level is 10 K and covers the cost of a table. 

-- This year's award recipients are Gov. Pataki (R-NY) and the ESCO Industry - Enron would be eligible to receive the award as part of the industry group at the dinner.

-- Senators Bingaman and Jeffords and Rep. Boehlert are expected to give out the awards.

Invitations are going to print first thing tomorrow morning and will list the Vice Chairs to date -- but we can commit to the Vice Chair level after the print deadline and we will be recognized at the event.

-- There is also an opportunity for Enron to speak at their Associate's policy seminar on Oct. 25, Energy Secretary Abraham has been invited to be the keynote speaker at the seminar.

Please let me know if you would be willing to pay for, our contribute to, the cost of the table/Vice Chair level.

Please see the invite below.

Thanks and I apologize for the short notice.

-Lisa

> 
> July 3, 2001
> 
>  
> Dr. Kenneth L. Lay
> Chairman
> Enron
> P.O. Box 1188
> Houston, TX 77251-1188
>  
> Dear Ken:
>  
> On behalf of the Alliance to Save Energy, we invite you to become a Vice
> Chair of the 2001 Evening with the Stars of Energy Efficiency reception
> and dinner to be held on Wednesday, October 24, 2001 from six until ten in
> the evening in Washington, DC.  We are extremely pleased this year to
> honor:
>  
> *        The Honorable George E. Pataki, Governor of the State of New York
> - Charles H. Percy Award for Public Service for the Governor's strong
> support and promotion of energy efficiency. He has personally championed
> the purchase of Energy Star products and created one of the largest public
> benefit funds for energy efficiency programs in the nation.
>  
> *        The ESCo Industry - Star of Energy Efficiency Award for its
> collective success in bringing performance-based energy efficiency
> contracting to energy consumers worldwide.
>  
> *	Howard S. Geller, Former Executive Director of the American Council
> for an Energy Efficient Economy - Star of Energy Efficiency Award for his
> twenty years of leadership at ACEEE.
>  
> The benefits of becoming a Vice Chair include:
>  
> *	A table for you and nine guests at the Awards Dinner;
> *	Invitation to our private VIP reception prior to the dinner;
> *	Participation at the following day's Energy Efficiency Policy Summit
> (details to follow); and
> *	Prominent mention of your company on programs and invitations.
>  
> With energy problems and energy efficiency opportunities at the forefront
> of our nation's agenda, the Alliance deserves your support more than ever.
> It is 
> 
> 
> unique in that it is our nation's only bipartisan, nonprofit organization
> that allows business executives to join with government, environmental and
> consumer leaders to promote energy efficiency. By becoming a Vice Chair,
> you will honor those who have made outstanding contributions to energy
> efficiency, and support the Alliance's efforts to ensure that energy
> efficiency remains a key element of our national energy strategy. A
> $10,000 contribution is required for a Vice Chair designation.
>  
> This event will be a wonderful opportunity to meet members of the energy
> community.  We expect an audience of over 300, including members of
> Congress, CEOs, White House and other Bush Administration officials, as
> well as staff from federal agencies, and the press. 
>  
> We hope you will show your dedication and support for the Alliance's
> energy efficiency programs by joining us for this stellar evening with
> America's business and government leaders dedicated to promoting energy
> efficiency. Should you have questions, please call Leslie Cordes, Director
> of Corporate and Program Development at (202) 530-2211.
>  
> Thank you for your consideration.
>  
> Sincerely,
>  
>  
>  
>  
> Jeff Bingaman                                                   Dean T.
> Langford
> Chairman, Alliance to Save Energy                    Co-Chair, Alliance to
> Save Energy
> United States Senator                                       President
> OSRAM SYLVANIA Inc.
>  

Jose - thanks.  Also, feel free to send to JoAnn Hill in Houston.

Jim

Robin. I completed both last week. Where should I send the forms for Human Resources?

Jose

For the report.
Jim:

In Washington, we're primarily working on advocacy, which you're pretty familiar with.  Do you need more information -- we can summarize quickly if you'd like us to, but it's pretty much RTO mediation, RTO efforts in midwest, California and Pacific Northwest refunds.  Going forward, we have the Show Cause motion, possible affiliate NOPR, Supreme Court oral argument in October, other possible FERC proceedings such as interconnection policy, mandatory RTO participation, etc -- its just not defined yet.  Also, Tom Briggs continues to work with the Germany guys on an Eon strategy in the U.S.

Also, from the legislative side, you should ask John Shelk about what's expected this fall.

The only commercial deal we're involved in now (that I can think of) is Donna's Gas Storage Monetization proposal.  I'll ask her to send you more information on that.

Let me know what else you need.

Sarah

With everything else going on, it has been hard to develop the monthly report for ENA management.

I'd like to re-start this report and provide an update at the beginning of September.

While I am aware of some efforts, I am sure that I don't know about everything that is critical and on-going.  

I need get a list of projects that your teams are working on for Deal Support, Regulatory Risk, and Advocacy.  I am truly at a loss for current deals that Government Affairs is supporting and our expectation of closing dates.

For each project, I need lead Government Affairs person, financial impact (our your best guess), background and key issues, and strategies and next steps.

This list does not need to be exhaustive, but simply the major activities currently underway.

Thanks - I appreciate your help,

Jim

 
Gary & Ray --
 
Some people at Enron would like to get a feel for how much the CalPX and CAISO wholesale prices will change (% and/or $/mwh) with the FERC refund process.  Can we discuss on Monday's call?
 
Thanks,
 
Jim

Susan --

Please put in an RCR to discuss ASAP (probably next week).

I think that the key issue involves the inclusion of financial transactions.  Need a solid message from industry that this is inappropriate - which EPSA members are filing this info?

Jim

Today's EPSA conference call was well-attended and the participants seemed to agree that the status quo (i.e., making relatively limited paper filings of transactional information) is much preferable to the more extensive electronic posting that FERC is proposing.  Admittedly, though, some of what FERC is proposing seems to be justified -- for example, the FPA requires every public utility to show rates and charges in the form prescribed by the Commission, which gives the Commission a lot of latitude.  

The basic conclusion was that EPSA's filing should make the point that FERC should be able to find a way to meet its Section 205-c obligations in a way that is not potentially commercially damaging to market participants.  Also, FERC may be overreaching in requesting data that does not pertain to physical transactions.  Additionally, there was some discussion of requesting confidential treatment of the information to be posted.  EPSA will draft comments with the assistance of outside counsel, Dickstein Shapiro.  A draft will be circulated and if any of you are not on the EPSA distribution list I will make sure you get a copy.

Elizabeth and others, we have already discussed the importance of Enron weighing in separately in this proceeding.  Since comments are due October 5, I believe at this point it would be prudent to call our outside counsel so that we can begin the drafting process.

SSL

Some thoughts from Bob Williams.

Jim

We are considering four courses of action:  a suit against Gray Davis for tortious interference with contract; a suit for an injuntion against the AG; a letter of to our customers; and a letter to the press from one of our customers.  

California counsel is researching whether under California law state officials can be sued for tortious conduct.  The answer depends upon whether the State has waived its sovereign immunity that would normally protect it from such suits.  We may not have a definitive answer to this question until Monday.  If California law does provide for such a waiver, we could sue the Governor and the State for tortious interference with conduct.  

An additional obstacle to enjoining the AG is that the California statutes give the AG broad authority as to how he conducts an investigation.  Still, if we can get evidence that the AG's investigator is making untrue or misleading statements or engaging in some other misconduct (we would need an affidavit from a customer as proof), we could go into court to complain that the AG is abusing his authority.

A letter to our customers could cause Davis and Lockyer to back off.  Neither wants negative reports about them circulating among California businessmen (who they primarily see as potential campaign contributors).  The letter would lay out the "truth about the California energy crisis and Davis/Lockyer's misguided and politically-motivated search for a scapegoat."  We could perhaps use Judge Kobayashi's statement in the Dunn subpoena proceeding that the California energy crisis was "created in part by all arms of the California government" to support our case.  We could also use published reports (if verifiable) about the DWR's imprudent purchases of power, and cast the AG's investigation as an attempt to divert attention from Davis/Lockyer's lack of any success in addressing the the crisis.  We could thank our customers for not being swayed by the demagogery and rhetoric, and for continuing to be our business partners.  We would want this to be positive in tone.

A fourth response would be a letter from one (or more) of our customers to a newspaper complaining about the harassment by the AG's office.  This letter could make some of the same points as the letter from us to our customers. 

We are still thinking of other approaches.  We will have the answers to the legal questions buttoned up by Monday at the latest.  Please call me with any questions or comments (x52402).
 

I have already asked Bob to look into this.  

 
David W Delainey
09/06/2001 12:27 PM
Vicki/Mark, the harrassment of EES's customers in California continues at great pace - it seems like I am getting messages like this everyday.  Can we get a restraining order/sue the government, etc.

This is going to start hurting business soon and is clearly a witch hunt....

Regards
Delainey
 
Dan Leff
09/06/2001 11:54 AM
David Tagliarino, Enron Sports Marketing Group, received a call today from John Yee, CFO of the SF Giants.  David, John and I got back on the phone this morning.  Following is a summary of our discussion:

John Yee, CFO, SF Giants, received a letter from the CA AG's office requesting their cooperation in an "....investigation concerning Enron....".  (John will fax that letter to me and I will circulate it)
John called the AG's office per their request in the letter received
The AG's office was digging for a bunch of information:
total MWH consumed
contract start date
term of contract
general questions about T's & C's
whether Enron had cancelled the contract
who was supplying electricity
copies of the agreements and letters of communication from Enron to the SF Giants
John was generally responsive and indicated that Enron has been great, has honored its contract, still has a contract in place, etc.
John pushed back on supplying any more information without a written request from the AG's office, and then also indicated that they would only supply what was required by law
The AG's office responded by indicating that they may have to subpoena the Giants
John will wait and see what the AG's office does
He will keep us in the communication loop and make sure that we have copies of the communication from the AG's office

Thanks - Dan

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Please let the right person know that I will be on vacation.

Jim

 
Map:
 <a HREF="http://www.mapquest.com/cgi-bin/share?sdw2o2p9g0wdc8wg">http://www.mapquest.com/cgi-bin/share?sdw2o2p9g0wdc8wg</A>

  

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>
<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

Thanks.  Fully agree.  I figure Sarah's already committed to #2.

Jim

Jim -- You asked for 5 key issues:

1.  Get FERC to approve the large RTOs that include good independent RTO at top with LMP/financial rights congestion management (auction of rights, no day ahead balanced schedule requirement)
2.  Win Supreme Court case 
3.  Get good legislative language (or kill bad bills)
4. Continue opening retail opportunities for EES and EPMI
5. Good outcome in California 

Charles --

After our conversation today, I thought that I'd outline some Q&A topics for you to consider --

1.	How does NERC define "security"? (important to differentiate between national security and system security).
2.	What is NERC's role in national security?
3.	Will RTOs degrade national security?  system security?
4.	What does Enron think about calls to restrict access to network information such as transmission maps?
5.	Does Enron oppose additional emphasis on securing electricity infrastructure?

This Q&A should not be released to the public.  I think this is just to make sure that all of Govt Affairs is on the same page and our DC team has good answers to hard questions.

Thanks.

We need to discuss in our Tuesday Call.

1) Who is the intended audience of these points? NERC? or outside NERC about NERC?  The message has to be tailored to the audience.

There are people in various places DOE, NERC, NIPC, some utilities, that feel empowered by the events. We do not want to belittle their concerns, we want to expose them to ridicule when they do not use their brain,

NERC is still the only game in town, We need to guide them to be truly impartial in the electric utility restructuring, but also be ready to expose the abuse of their Information monopoly position.

Do we work from within? or launch our missiles to attack their standing?

What is the role of the MIC in regards to this issue within NERC?

2) Central Repository of Data. I wanted to discuss this point to determine if we should lobby to strengthen this system or let it die through neglect?. The key is that the institution that hold access to this information has power.

3) Actions with DOE. The one that was more concerning to me, is the perspective of some coordinators to "play it conservatively"; I interpret it as, refusing to schedule some market transactions.

4) RTOs. Tom Bowe of PJM blasted the NERC staff  at the meeting when he got hold of the Energy Daily article.

Jose

 << File: NERC Sept 11- AJR-JB Comments.doc >> 

Charles,

Some comments.  I removed some words I though made NERC look too respectable/official, embellished some of your points, added a section on RTO security risk, and added some stronger "chastisement" words at the end.  They may be too strong, but I think the paper needs to be assertive.  Out of curiosity, is there an intended audience?  If it is NERC, maybe the more passive approach is preferable, but if it is anyone else, then maybe the aggressiveness would be a good thing. I think we want to make sure the audience finishes by looking at NERC and shaking their head in disgust, rather than sighing and shrugging their shoulders.  Of course, that could backfire and make us look like we're unfairly attacking NERC without any provocation, especially given the esoteric nature of some of our points.

Thoughts?

Andy Rodriquez
Regulatory Affairs - Enron Corp.
andy.rodriquez@enron.com
713-345-3771 

Per Rick, I have drafted the attached.  

 << File: NERC Sept 11.doc >> 

Guys --

We need to quickly put together some talking points on how to respond to AEP's request for delay until 2003.  My understanding is that AEP in Texas is wholly outside of ERCOT (if wrong - please inform).  

AEP needs only to file a good amendment to the FERC OATT (or SPP needs to do it for them) ASAP.  My basic model for provisioning of energy for retail competition in non-ERCOT Texas is that delivery to the border of the OATT provider (for instance delivering a into-Entergy product into Arkansas and paying for losses would be sufficient for delivery into the Woodlands).

Jean was going to call Luiz to get this issue on the burner.

Thanks

I'm on my way to DC.  Please ask my asst to set a good time to call with you on Wed.

Thanks

meeting was set for wed but will need to change.   There are many meetings on TX.  are you in today, how can I reach you

Jim --

Just trying to follow-up on the next meeting?  Any news?

Unless Jean hears otherwise, I don't think that Enron needs to be doing anything that conflicts with the key policy arrangement on the marketer being the customer of record for the T&D services.

Jim

Jim:

David Gross, who is representing The New Power Company before the Texas PUC regarding the tax issue on T&D services, is asking whether Enron plans to submit anything to the PUC on the tax issue before tomorrow's Open Meeting.

I checked the PUC's agenda for that meeting and did not see the tax issue listed, however, TXU, Reliant and Entergy have all filed requests with the PUC to have the tax issue considered at tomorrow Open Meeting.

What can I tell The New Power Company?

Ron

In my opinion this is not beneficial to EES at all.  We have been following this issue through our Retail Market Subcommittee and all REPS are not happy with this process.  We are now required to calculate, collect and remit all taxes related to T&D charges.  We also take a hit on Gross receipts tax.  Jim, you should call and talk to Ron Adzgery.  Thanks.

Nancy A. Hetrick
Enron Corp.
Director, Government Affairs
Phone:  712-366-3399
Pager:   888-912-1426

Ron and Jeff. 

I spoke briefly with Jim Steffes this morning. Please do not proceed with any further efforts in this regard until we hear from Jim, Nancy or someone from their team.  It may be the Comptroller's position is beneficial to EES's business and we don't want to support or pursue a contrary position.  

beth 

Jean/Jim:

Jeff Fischer and I in EES Tax have been working with Nancy Hetrick regarding the question of whether REPs will be responsible for administering Texas taxes on T&D services.

As you may have heard, at the request of a number of investor owned utilities, the Texas Comptroller of Public Accounts has initially ruled that REPs will be responsible for administering the taxes.  This conclusion was based upon the assumption that the REPs are purchasing the T&D Services from the TDU and then reselling the services to their customers.

After a number of REPs objected to that ruling, the Comptroller's office agreed to reconsider.  We believe the Comptroller is worried about doing something that will have a serious impact on deregulation in Texas, so she is passing the question off to the Texas PUC by requesting that the PUC determine whether REPs purchase and resell T&D Services.

The New Power Company raised this issue with the PUC recently and at last count TXU and Entergy had filed responses of their own.  A number of tax representatives from several REPs thought it might be good to show the PUC this is a significant issue for all independent REPs.

Attached for your review and comment is a draft of a proposed letter to the PUC regarding this matter.  Nancy suggested we send the letter to you for your comments and to get clearance for EESI to sign the letter.  Thank you for your assistance with this.

Ron

 << File: Texas PUC tax response - revised.doc >> 

What does Mike Roan think??  Also, will they help pay for our "natural market study" in the SE??

Jim

Mirant is proposing to complete a study of the costs and benefits of a Midwest RTO.  They filed a similar study for the Northeast and Chairman Pat Wood commented at the recent FERC meeting that it was very useful and that further studies should be done.  Mirant is presenting its study in a public meeting at the Commission on Thursday.  

The MW study is expected to cost approximtely $75,000 and Jim Mayhew of Mirant has asked for other marketers/gens to join in the study - both put their name on it and pay for a portion of the costs.  Is this something that we would be interested in participating in?

Ray --

Wanted to make sure that you had seen the note Sanders sent around?  I think that we should discuss today on the 4:30 call.

Jim

Lisa --

Give me a call about this and Item #1 below.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Gas Issues Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            John Orr, Gas Issues Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Sr. Manager of Policy

DATE: October 1, 2001

RE: October 4th Gas Issues Conference Call
      ?2:30 p.m. (EDT)

We have scheduled a conference call of the Gas issues Working Group on Thursday, October 4th, at 2:30 p.m. (EDT).  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563.  Ask for the Jack Cashin/EPSA Call.  An agenda is outlined below.

October 4, 2001 Conference Call Agenda

? September 26th FERC Meeting
   ?NOPR on Affiliate Rules (RM01-10)
   ?El Paso 637 Compliance Technical Conference denial of rehearing
    (RP00-336, CP01-90)
   ?Energy Infrastructure

?Other FERC Issuances
   ?Investigation of PG&E Transmission Northwest and Shippers (RP99-518)
   ?Texas Gas Rate Settlement (RP00-260)

?Items Pending FERC Action
   ?ANR filing Requesting Clarification of Negotiated Rates (RP99-301)

?Other Items

?Next Call

Please print and ensure that Jose Bestard has this info.

Jim

TO: Board of Trustees

Ladies and Gentlemen:

We are taking a new approach to the agenda and background material for
the Board meeting.

The agenda and action item pages only for each agenda item appear in one
document, with electronic "links" to the associated background material.
This document is now posted at
http://www.nerc.com/~filez/botagenda-101501.html. Links to the
individual background material are also available at this site so you
can access any and all of them for viewing or download, as you wish.

We will also post a complete agenda package, with all action item pages
and associated background material, for those that want the entire
package in one file.

Please let us know if you have any questions or have problems viewing
and downloading any part of the agenda.

Sincerely,

Julie Morgan

p.s. The agenda and background material for the Stakeholders Committee
meeting will be available in a single document, with just references (no
electronic links) to those items that appear on the Board agenda.

Have we done my travel for NERC meeting in Vancouver?

Jim

TO:	Stakeholders Committee
	NERC Observers
	Technical Steering Committee
	Regional Managers
	Invited Guests

Ladies and Gentlemen:

This is a reminder that the cut-off date for hotel room reservations for
the October 15, 2001 Stakeholders Committee meeting is tomorrow,
September 21.

If you have not made your reservation, please do so as soon as possible.
I cannot guarantee availability beyond tomorrow. The meeting
announcement letter with all the details can be found at
http://www.nerc.com/committees/.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Sincerely,
Julie Morgan

Looks good.  Why doesn't EPSA propose a timeline for the FERC to order?  This could be a signal that we only want one "rule change" date.  Also, maybe we can build in Kevin's argument about uncertainty hurting liquidity and market dynamics right now.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group
       Southeast RTO Generators and Marketers

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy
            Jack Cashin, Sr. Manager of Policy

DATE: October 1, 2001

RE: EPSA Second Draft Comments on the Southeast
      Mediation Report by Judge McCartney

Attached are the second draft comments on the Southeast Mediation Report prepared by Judge McCartney and issued on September 10, 2001 (Docket No. RT01-100-000).    EPSA comments that FERC's continued involvement in the Southeast RTO process is needed, outlines a suggested schedule of milestones and deadlines, and consolidates the primary points that the generator and marketer sectors have previously submitted to the Judge.

Comments on the Mediation Report are due at FERC on Tuesday, October 9th.   Please forward any comments or proposed changes to the draft to Jack Cashin at jcashin@epsa.org no later than the close of business on Thursday, October 4th so that we can make this filing in a timely manner.  If you have any questions or concerns, please contact Jack at 202-628-8200.

 - SE-Mediation Report Comments2.doc 

The statements.

Jim
MEMORANDUM

TO: Legislative Affairs Committee
       Regulatory Affairs Committee
       NAERO Working Group

FROM: Scott Weiner, Legislative Affairs Committee Chair
             Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
             Mark Bennett, Senior Manager of Policy
             Donn Salvosa, Manager of Government Affairs

DATE: September 25, 2001

RE: NERC Statements on Impact of Security Threats on RTOs

The attached e-mail in Microsoft Word form contains statements that NERC made during a recent meeting with members of the national press.  The statements concern NERC's view of the implications of terrorist threats for FERC's " Four RTO policy" set forth in its July 12th Order.  The statements also may bear upon the effort to establish a new standards setting organization, particularly the possibility that NERC's responsibilities could be shifted to EISB.  Also attached is an article containing the views of R.J. Rudden Associates, Inc. that discusses the risks associated with centralizing control center operations.

Specifically, NERC representatives informed the press that on September 11 "the grid was the target of an insidious cyber attack that shut down some facilities...from an information administration standpoint."  They noted that this resulted in service denials, although it is not clear whether they indicated where or how much.  This event was attributed to the so-called "NIMBA virus".

NERC's statements suggest a new strategy to preserve the role they've played not only in security matters, but possibly other aspects pertaining to "reliability standards."  They warn against any immediate transition to fewer RTOs as envisioned in FERC's July 12th Order.  Moreover, it is likely that NERC will argue that, given its expertise and experience, recent events make transitioning to a new standards organization (EISB?) ill advised.

It is unclear what, if any, impact all this may have on RTO development, the legislative effort to establish a new reliability standards body or the NERC Board's consideration of pending reform proposals at its October meeting.  However, we can expect security related issues to be included in future discussions of these matters.

Please provide your reactions to the NERC statements to Mark Bennett at 202-628-8200 or mbennett@epsa.org

 - Mark.doc 
 - R.doc 

Rick --

You indicated that NERC disavowed their discussions with the press about national security and RTOs to NB (I may have misheard you).  I think these attachments would prove otherwise.  Finally, I'm sure that RJ Rudden is just fronting for Southern.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Legislative Affairs Committee
       Regulatory Affairs Committee
       NAERO Working Group

FROM: Scott Weiner, Legislative Affairs Committee Chair
             Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
             Mark Bennett, Senior Manager of Policy
             Donn Salvosa, Manager of Government Affairs

DATE: September 25, 2001

RE: NERC Statements on Impact of Security Threats on RTOs

The attached e-mail in Microsoft Word form contains statements that NERC made during a recent meeting with members of the national press.  The statements concern NERC's view of the implications of terrorist threats for FERC's " Four RTO policy" set forth in its July 12th Order.  The statements also may bear upon the effort to establish a new standards setting organization, particularly the possibility that NERC's responsibilities could be shifted to EISB.  Also attached is an article containing the views of R.J. Rudden Associates, Inc. that discusses the risks associated with centralizing control center operations.

Specifically, NERC representatives informed the press that on September 11 "the grid was the target of an insidious cyber attack that shut down some facilities...from an information administration standpoint."  They noted that this resulted in service denials, although it is not clear whether they indicated where or how much.  This event was attributed to the so-called "NIMBA virus".

NERC's statements suggest a new strategy to preserve the role they've played not only in security matters, but possibly other aspects pertaining to "reliability standards."  They warn against any immediate transition to fewer RTOs as envisioned in FERC's July 12th Order.  Moreover, it is likely that NERC will argue that, given its expertise and experience, recent events make transitioning to a new standards organization (EISB?) ill advised.

It is unclear what, if any, impact all this may have on RTO development, the legislative effort to establish a new reliability standards body or the NERC Board's consideration of pending reform proposals at its October meeting.  However, we can expect security related issues to be included in future discussions of these matters.

Please provide your reactions to the NERC statements to Mark Bennett at 202-628-8200 or mbennett@epsa.org

 - Mark.doc 
 - R.doc 

Paul --

Can we have a phone call with our Reg team on Friday to make sure that everything is a-ok?  I want one final run through.  If yes, please let me know by phone and I'll ask Linda Noske to set up the call.

Also, I owe you a call on Sue / Jeff.  Are you in Thurs?

Jim

 - 081401 Granite II Memorandum.doc << File: 081401 Granite II Memorandum.doc >> 

Here is my proposed budget.

Jim

 

Mike Roan and Tom Hoatson would be the best.

Jim

Dave, Jim, Steve

I talked to Belden and he is looking forward to the meeting next week.

He is interested in talking about market structure.  He recommends that we get someone who really understands the PJM market structure.  I suggested Mike Roan in an earlier email to Dave and would reiterate my suggestion that we invite him or someone else who knows PJM.

He also wants to discuss our RTO Week position at the meeting.  If that's too late, we should talk to him in advance of next Wed.

That's it for now,

Alan C.

 << File: Western Regional Governmental Affairs meeting 10_9 and 10.doc >> 

David F. Perrino
Director, Government Affairs
Enron Corporation
101 California Street, Suite 1950
San Francisco, CA  94111
Phone: 415.782.7801
Fax: 415.782.7854
Mobile: 415.794.8740

Lynnette --

Please talk with Pat Keene about Nevada.  Some customers will have access.

Jim

 << File: Dan Leff update.ppt >> 
713-853-9287 
888-703-0309

Please make sure this discussion is incorporated into the Monthly Report

Leslie Lawner, Becky Cantrell and I met with Dan Larcamp at FERC yesterday =
to discuss the marketing affiliate issue.  He agreed with the latest press =
reports that the upcoming rulemaking NOPR, expected to be voted out in Sept=
ember, would not make major structural changes to the industry.  The curren=
t document is up to the Commission level and the Commissioners are clearly =
considering the alternatives now.  Larcamp said he expected a broadening of=
 the current market affiliate rules structure to include all corporate enti=
ties.  He did specifically mention that the Commission is not comfortable w=
ith the link between financial and physical transactions and the possibilit=
y for manipulation of market prices in one market (financial) to affect pri=
ces in the other market (physical).  He also expects the Commission to blen=
d the gas and power rules, using the best practices of each.  Any NOPR that=
 is issued will of course have comment dates to allow Enron and all industr=
y participants to comment on any proposed rule changes.

Larcamp indicated that he did not think there were pervasive afilliate disc=
rimination issues in the industry, but said that the Commission needed to a=
ct due to the political pressures they got from the Hill, etc.  The El Paso=
 case is top on everyone's mind and is of special concern because it affect=
s the California market, both gas and power.=20

Larcamp indicated that he is just now learning what a "Pat Wood" Commission=
 is going to want.  He indicated that Wood has closer ties to the producer =
community than either of the two former Chairmen.  He therefore expects  th=
at the Commission will be responsive to that sector in taking a relook at t=
he affiliate rules.  However, Larcamp did mention that the only meeting tha=
t he had previously had on the affiliate issue was with the INGAA group (Jo=
e Hartsoe went with them).  It is not clear whether the producer community =
has lobbied this issue at the Commissioner level.

We discussed strategy with Dan, how to let the Commission feel more comfort=
able with the marketing affiliate issue.  He suggested that he had gained a=
 lot by visiting the trading floors (including Enron's).  He thought the Co=
mmissioners and their immediate staffs would benefit from similar visits. =
=20

We specifically raised the issue of market prices, and talked about tranpor=
tation costs not equalling basis differentials.  We stated that our markete=
rs believed that the prices in the market were determined by market factors=
 in the specific areas of delivery rather than basin costs plus transport c=
osts.  Dan did indicate some agreement with this concept and thought that m=
ore education at the Commissioner level would be very worthwhile.

If you have any questions, call Leslie, Becky or me.

This is a non-ERCOT Texas utility.

Jim

No, I don't know anything about it.  What state is the PUC hearing in?  If Texas, then Jean Ryall's group would cover.  If LA, ARK, etc., then Janine Migden's group would cover.  The coordination comes from our group keeping Jean and Janine in the loop on the wholesale issues and they are to let us know about retail where necessary.  Thanks.

Susan, Chirsti

Question: Who in our group deals with the interfaces between Wholesale Competition (E.g. RTO, SPP) and Retail Competition?

I am asking because Jean Ryall called me asking about our involvement in an upcoming PUC hearing (this coming Friday), where some SPP members have filed a petition requesting further delays in retail competition in light of the ongong discussions on RTOs.

I asked Jean to send more information. There is nothing on the SPP website alluding to this hearing. Do you know anything about it?

Tks

LM 

Rick --

Belden is in Houston next Wednesday and a number of the Western team is going to visit with him about current status and issues.  Also, he wants to get more info on the PJM model. 

Congress has re-scheduled the hearing on Reliability for the same time.  Can you attend the Belden meeting in Houston (Presto is coming for the PJM model discussion)?  

Jim

Dave --

Do we have a strong preference for what DSTAR utilities should do?  I think that we want to communicate with OMTR and others at FERC to push a single RTO in the West (leaving CA) outside.  Also, having the Transco originally within the RTO West makes alot of operational sense and should not limit the economics of the Transco.

Jim

To All,

Below is a message from Jack King the Chair of the DSTAR Board, which describes the dissolution of the DSTAR board due to the withdrawal of funding from the PTOs in the region.

The information I received on Wednesday from Cary Deise of APS was, on Monday the PTOs voted to withdraw funding of DSTAR (as noted below).  The big 5 in the region, APS, TEPCo, PNM, SRP and WAPA have, or plan, on signing a Memorandum Of Understanding to file with FERC on October 12 a complete tariff to form a for-profit TransCo called WesCo, or WestTrans, which will be based on the documents that we have been reviewing.  Cary noted that there are several possibilities for the proposed TransCo, one was to join TransConnect in the northwest and join RTO West, simply join RTO West, or develop their own compliant RTO.  Below Jack King states that the PTOs would be forming a for-profit RTO, that was NOT the impression I got from APS.  

I will keep you posted of any developments.  If you have any questions, please feel free to give me a call.

Kind Regards,

Dave

Subscription Option #1 -- Document Distribution Mailing List

Message from Jack King, Chair of the Desert STAR Board of Directors:
I have been informed by the Transmission Owners that they plan to move
forward with a filing at FERC in the near future to create a for-profit
Regional Transmission Organization (RTO) and that they do not intend to fund
any future activities of Desert STAR.  Without funding, the Desert STAR
Board of Directors feels that it has no choice but to start dissolving
Desert STAR.
On behalf of the Board of Directors, I would like to thank all of the
stakeholders for their support of Desert STAR and to wish all stakeholders
the best of fortune in this evolving environment.

QUESTIONS?
...About a document?  Please send and email to:
docadministrator@dstarnet.com <mailto:docadministrator@dstarnet.com>
<<mailto:docadministrator@dstarnet.com>>.
...About your subscription to this mailing list?  Please email:
listmanager@dstarnet.com <mailto:listmanager@dstarnet.com>
<<mailto:listmanager@dstarnet.com>>.

WANT TO UNSUBSCRIBE?
Please send a blank email to:  dstarwdoc-request@dstarnet.com
<mailto:dstarwdoc-request@dstarnet.com> and type the word "Unsubscribe"
into the subject line.

Thank you.

<http://www.dstarnet.com>

Rick --

Please see attached.  Lot's of $$ from CA.

Jim
 Attached is the revised preliminary Origination Report.  TCV values will be added tomorrow.

Ron Bertasi - There are $1,058,223 in Agency Fees for gas that is currently allocated to Third Party Sales.  I will follow up with you tomorrow to allocate correctly.  According to RGS, $743,224 of the fees should be allocated to deals closed by Lowney.

 

Thanks Dave.  The critical things for us to take-away are the key priorities for the Desk moving forward.  On this, I want to make sure that Kevin and Tim are comfortable with the evolving process of implementing RTOs - Option 1: wait till completely ready or Option 2: start with basic and "improve".

Thanks,
 
Jim

Dear All,
 
Attached to this message is the agenda outline for our meeting in Houton TX on Wednesday, October 10 beginning at 8 AM.
 
I have arranged with Linda Noske for a continental breakfast to be available so we can get started promptly at 8AM and as Christi has noted, lunch will also be provided.  Any questions, please contact me.  
 
Kind Regards,
 
Dave

Becky --

My only question is one of emphasis.  Are points 3&4 the key for Barry T.?  If so, should we move them up higher?  Also, why the very lenghthy discussion of pooling points?  The length makes the points after that discussion hard to appreciate.  Maybe a list of bullet points up front?

Jim

Please review the attached filing and provide any comments you may have by COB Friday, 10/5.  

The filing is ENA's comments on El Paso's proposal for receipt point allocation, focusing on discussions at the two technical conferences in the proceeding.  Also, it may be that, based on further discussion with certain other shippers, we will modify our statement in Item No. 1 to to support a different version of the method for allocating receipt point rights, but only if there is strong opposition to our method.  We don't want FERC to select the method that El Paso proposed originally.

   << File: RP00-336-002 Conf Comments Drft8.doc >> 

Should we add a Project titled "Interconnection NOPR" for Susan Lindberg?

Jim

Susan --

Can we sit down tomorrow or Monday for 30 minutes to discuss.  Maybe at 11am Friday.  Want to get an idea of the timing and our position.

Thanks,

Jim

See pages 2 and 3 of the attached draft; includes overview section drafted by Sam Behrends.

I am not certain that Sam Behrend's attachment went through to you all last night.  Attached is a copy of the current version of the document (it includes Sam's overview).

Thanks,

Cathy

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Please put on my calendar and arrange travel/hotel.

Thanks

Attached is a revised agenda/registration for EPSA's Fall Membership Meeting, Octl 23-24.  Specifically, the times of the Legislative Affairs, Public Affairs, Executive Committee and Board of Directors meetings on Oct. 24 have changed.  The fundraiser scheduled for Oct. 24 has been canceled.  If you have any questions, please let me know.

Laurie Martin
Director of Meetings & Membership
EPSA
lmartin@epsa.org
Phone: 202-628-8200 ext. 121
Fax: 202-628-8260

 - Registration form.doc 

Rick --

I see that Amr has taken over the Fundamentals Group.  The fiefdom grows!!!!  

Jim

Colleagues:

This is a quick note to let you know that with the help of GA Information (Elizabeth Linnell), the Fundamentals Group is starting to populate the functioning ISO Regulatory database.  The structure of the database (which will remain open to incorporate any of your suggestions)  is outlined below (it includes the latest comments from Christi and Thane).
 
The target customer group of this product is the traders either directly (by having access to the database) or,  and preferably,  via you in the field.   

The final product will be in Excel format, that through MS Access it should enable you to create a very flexible comparative reporting mechanism. An example would be a report on the rules of conflict resolution process across all the functioning ISO's in the country, and so on.  

The time table of this project in two phases is as follows:

Phase One:  It shall end by October 12th and shall include the following ISO's.
		ISO				Contact			
1.	PJM				Guillermo Canovas	(713) -345-8946
2.	California			Alberto Levy		Caracas: (58-212)-902-7811
3.	New England			Amr Ibrahim		(713)-853-3037)

Phase Two: It shall end by November 12th, and shall include the following:
4.	ERCOT				Amr Ibrahim.
5.	New York ISO			Amr Ibrahim  (tentative).

Linda Lawrence is kind to help us with a support database in which all the seminal documents for each ISO are kept so that to allow you to check the original document if you would like to substantiate, or challenge,  the findings of the database.        

The second stage of the project is to link it to the current RTO process.  However, this is a slightly different issue, and shall be communicated to you as it becomes more stable.  

I shall keep you posted with progress, meanwhile, please let me know if you have any question.

Best regards

AI

Ray --

I think that this is about the CalPX bankruptcy.  Any issues?  Can you please get with PGE to make sure we are on the same page?

Jim

By the way, who is Al referring to when he sais Doug is working with "Enron Central" and who has he contacted re:  "Enron guidance."  Sheesh.  

see additional note from Doug Nichols.

This is the latest status on Howard's effort - PGE is included in the "in favor" group in Howard's message - but both Al and I have since let him know he should not include us as being "in favor" unless and until we've coordinated this with Enron - I'm relying on you to do that.  Time is very short - Howard needs to be moving on this now if he has any shot at all of influencing the outcome.  While I agree the message ought to be delivered, I'm not optimistic there is time for the legislature to do anything else at this point.  If nothing else, it would be good let the decision makers know that their plan may not have the hoped for result, so they can't say no one told them.  dn
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                               

Doug and I have been debating wether there might be a broader Enron plan to support the legislation even with the 1 billion shortage to sellers.  We're still trying to get Enron guidance on this.  Possibly we'd rather have an expensive solution instead of no solution.  I'm traveling with my  cell phone all of tomorrow and Doug is working on Enron Central.  Please stand by in terms of adding our name to the agressive list. Sorry for the mixed signals.  al

>>> "Howard J. Weg" <hweg@pgwlaw.com> 08/28/01 09:35PM >>>
I have not heard back from all members of the Unofficial Committee regarding
my email dated August 27, 2001 with respect to the proposal to contact the
Governor and Legislators regarding the pending legislation on SCE.

Some have suggested that the message needs to be stronger and others have
suggested that the message is too strong.  Our Ex Officio members BPA and
WAPA want it to be clear that they are not involved in any way with
addressing the state government on this or other issues.  As you know, I
want very much to reach as broad of a consensus on this action as is
possible, and to protect the interests of all members.

Virtually all members agree that a bankruptcy case for or litigation against
SCE would probably not be a good thing and we do not want to advocate for
bankruptcy or litigation.  After all, the Unofficial Committee was organized
to provide a different approach generally.  The purpose of contacting the
Governor and the Legislature is to let them know that the legislation they
are now considering, which leaves SCE about $1 billion short on the proposed
financing to pay creditors, may cause some other sellers to take precipitous
action in filing an involuntary petitition or initiating litigation or
arbitration that could delay or prevent the financing at even the lower $2.9
billion level, which will adversly affect SCE and all creditors generally.
We should point out that not all sellers are in agreement on what action
will be taken. The message is not intended to threaten anything and it is
not necessarily designed to stop legislation altogether, only legislation
that might actually make the situation worse for all sellers and SCE.

The tone of the presentation, if we make one, will be low key, non
threatening, and in the spirit of helping the legislature and the Governor
design a package that will avoid the bankruptcy, litigation and other
alternatives that others might be forced to consider if the bill is passed,
leaving the energy sellers out in the cold.

If there remain some members of the Committee that are not willing to be
associated with the message outlined above, then I propose that we give such
members the alternative of remaining members of the Unofficial Committee and
allowing us, if asked, to identify any such members that prefer not to be a
part of the message although they want to support an approach that avoids
litigation and bankruptcy for SCE.  I understand that the LADWP and Coral
Power would like this approach adopted.

As I explained in my prior email, it has been suggested that the proposed
bill that leaves SCE short by a billion dollars will likely pass after Labor
Day and before the Sept 14 adjournment.  That is why timing is important.
Those of you that have not responed, please respond.  Those of you that were
concerned that the message was unclear, please review this email and
consider or reconsider your positions, as the case may be.

As of right now, there are only 11 votes: 9 in favor and 2 against.  The
polls are still open so please let me know your position.

You should be aware that the City of Glendale notified me that it determined
that actual or potential conflicts of interest with the Unofficial Committee
required it to resign from the Unofficial Committee.

Mary --

As we discussed, please find a list of our project team leads on on-going wholesale matters.  

Thanks,

Jim
713-853-7673

 

Could you please find out what group Carlos works with and pass him some information?

Thanks,

Jim

Hello Jim, I was wondering if you could help me in finding the current outlook in deregulation in the following states: 

NC, SC, WI, MS, GA, TN

I don't need any elaborate research, as this is only for some estimates in current position values for origination purposes.  The month and year of estimated dereg will do.  Thanks in advance for your help.  

Carlos Wheelock

Info you wanted.

Jim

Hi Jim -- I'm showing that Dan is under a 3-year agreement which expires on 6/12/02.  Please let me know if you need additional information.
Thanks.
Jo Ann

Jo Ann --

Do you know if Dan Staines has an active Employment Contract?

JIm

Thanks for the info.  Not sure what we're doing.  I'll pass this along.

Jim

Jim;  wanted to drop you a quick note {met you during the associate PRC process with Sutton} to inquire about your Admin. vacancy.  Is it open?  Any pre selected candidates you have in mind?  The reason I'm asking is that I have a potential ..................yeah, it's my daughter!  She has been working in HR {recruitment} for almost a year.  Unfortunately, they have started the process of "right-sizing" and even though she has yet to be affected, I'm not sure how long that will last.  She is 23 and has a great personality, but you'd expect to hear that from her dad.  Her supervisor is Meg Wysatta who reports into Will Davies.  Meg has informed me that Tracy does a great job, but they are trying to automate their process.  
If you get a minute, drop me a note. 
                                                                                             Thanks,
                                                                                                  Bob
Tracy wanted to experience the corporate life before finishing school..... she is probably a first semester junior and now fully understands the importance of completing her education.

Please consider this candidate for the position.

Jim

Jim;  wanted to drop you a quick note {met you during the associate PRC process with Sutton} to inquire about your Admin. vacancy.  Is it open?  Any pre selected candidates you have in mind?  The reason I'm asking is that I have a potential ..................yeah, it's my daughter!  She has been working in HR {recruitment} for almost a year.  Unfortunately, they have started the process of "right-sizing" and even though she has yet to be affected, I'm not sure how long that will last.  She is 23 and has a great personality, but you'd expect to hear that from her dad.  Her supervisor is Meg Wysatta who reports into Will Davies.  Meg has informed me that Tracy does a great job, but they are trying to automate their process.  
If you get a minute, drop me a note. 
                                                                                             Thanks,
                                                                                                  Bob
Tracy wanted to experience the corporate life before finishing school..... she is probably a first semester junior and now fully understands the importance of completing her education.

Probably want to talk with Jay Lewis and other product leads?  I'll get some names.

Jim

Met with Jake Thomas (Origination) and Paul Choi (Mid-market).   It looks like we have concurrence on the ENA side of the house.   How do we run the traps on the EES side (i.e., Guy Devault, Jeff Ader, and whoever??)?  

I'd like to go to Nevada next week (thursday,friday time frame) and start meeting with the Commission and OCA.    

Did you attend?  Did we file comments?  

Jim

Tom: What's the point of ths State hearing? Aren't these all issues/questions that FERC has already decided or will decide in the course of ruling on the Business Plan? Is there anything that Maryland can do other than pursue its rehearing request at FERC and then move to the courts?

See the notice below regarding a hearing at the Maryland PUC next Wed and Thurs to discuss the Northeast RTO.  Note the items that the parties are requested to comment on.  Comments are due tomorrow but we got an extension until Monday (we received a copy of the notice at a PUC yesterday and it also appeared that many other parties at the hearing saw the notice for the first time yesterday).  I assume we want to participate and comment.  To that end, if we have a "canned" presentation prepared that discusses the benefits of the RTO (even if it is in Powerpoint format) we could submit this as our comments and use it during the hearing.      

 
The Maryland Public Service Commission has issued a notice requesting  comments on issues surrounding the Northeast RTO. These comments are due  Thursday, September 27th. I have gotten an extension until Monday,  October 1st for filing. 
The Maryland, D.C., Virginia and Delaware Commissions have all petitioned  FERC to rehear its July 12th Order on the RTO. FERC has granted  rehearing and anticipates issuing its Order on Rehearing on October  31st. 
The Maryland Commission will be holding a legislative hearing on Wednesday,  October 3rd at 11:00 a.m. and Thursday, October 4th at  10:00 a.m. The parties have been asked to file comments on the following  issues:
1. Cost Benefit Analysis.
2. Potential energy market savings and the distribution of those benefits  through the three ISO regions.
3. Cost of developing new computer programs and systems along with the risks  associated with implementation of new systems and business rules.
4. Specific examples of successful and unsuccessful introductions of new  energy markets, software, and business rules.
5. Affect on reliability from changing business rules.
6. Impact on transmission rates from uniform transmission pricing.
7. Cost of infrastructure development and the time frame required for  successful infrastructure transformation.
8. Information on current energy flows between regions.
9. Guidelines to be used to identify and implement best practices. 
10. Examples of successful and unsuccessful mergers between energy management  organizations.
This Commission notice is dated September 20th. It was not  e-mailed or faxed to any party and I have yet to receive a copy via mail. I  received a copy of this notice from the Executive Director TODAY while I was  attending a hearing before the Commission.
Please contact me immediately if you would like to submit comments, and I  strongly urge that we do.
I will be in hearings most of tomorrow morning, so please send me an e-mail  as well as leave me a voice mail, either at the office or on my cell phone.
Office: 410-974-9000
Cell: 410-371-6919
CHANTEL

 - Sandie  Turner.vcf << File: Sandie  Turner.vcf >> 

Thanks for the info.  We need to push for other good load programs in PJM a=
nd New England.

Jim

Jim: I have participated in a number of calls with Jeff and his team over t=
he past few weeks regarding this deal, goving over the details of how NY's =
demand response programs work, reviewing draft contracts, and putting him i=
n touch with appropriate ISO staff when even more detailed followup was nee=
ded. I see little likelihood of NY's demand response programs being elimina=
ted over the next few years given the increasingly tight supply situation t=
he state faces and the long lead time for permitting and bulding new genera=
tion, and the great success these programs achieved this past summer. (Most=
 folks credit the 600 MW produced by NY's day-ahead and emergency demand re=
sponse programs with keeping the lights on in the northeast during the earl=
y August heat wave.) Only the day-ahead incentive program has a risk of not=
 being continued beyond October 2003, it's current expiration date. However=
, even there, there is likely to be pressure to extend it for an additional=
 year or two. With respect to potential RTO impacts, in our discussions wit=
h PJM, they have stated that at a minimum they would allow NY to continue i=
ts demand response programs in the new Northeast market on day 1, even if t=
hey differed from the rest of the region.Further, PJM would even consider m=
aking the NY programs applicable throughout the region on day 1 if that was=
 what the market participants in the region wanted to do.=20

Howard -

Have you and Jeff Brown talked about the MG deal?  I want to make sure that=
 you understand fully and appreciate any issues / concerns.

Thanks.

Before I send this Louise, I'd like your thoughts.  The element that drives the EA # higher than I would have thought is the large number of people who are working on RTO and NERC only matters.  I've made a decision to assign these people to EA rather than spread to EES.  I could change if you think appropriate.

Thanks,

Jim

 

Lisa -

Please include G. Canovas in these discussions going forward.

Thanks.

We had a short conference call on Friday to discuss next steps with respect to the FERC's NOPR on affiliate standards.  We will be having another call on Friday to identify the issues which Enron should address in its comments (Geriann will be arranging for the call).   Please be prepared to offer your assessment of which issues require our attention.   Leslie and Tom will be drafting the comments, with Leslie focusing on gas issues and Tom on electric.  

The Notice was published in the Federal Register on September 27th.   Our comments are due on November 19th. 

If you're unable to make the call, please forward an email with your list of issues.  I look forward to talking to you on Friday.

Lisa

Any other news?

Jim

we are working up a PGE to PGE Service agreement internally now.

Jay.

>>> Lawner, Leslie 08/22/2001 9:11:25 AM >>> 
Any updates on the amendments to the pipeline application?

Sure.

Jim

I am having lunch on Tues. 10/16 with Matt LaRoque, customer service of GridSouth.  11:30 meet in lobby of Enron Building (he will call me from downstairs).  Do you want to go?

I think it's a fair statement that Enron doesn't currently support the Bart=
on language.  On this issue, I would argue that any penalty imposed should =
remain the purview of FERC and its procedures.

Jim

Christi,

No, my concern was more of an organization like "NERC" imposing financial p=
enalties on a grid user.  I thought our postion was that an RTO through its=
 tariff rules or FERC could impose any penalties, but not a reliability org=
anization.=20

Thanks,

Dave

I do have a concern from the standpoint that users are ultimately at the sc=
heduling mercy of the operator.  The operator can cut our schedule.  Perhap=
s this is referencing something like reserves, where a user/load serving en=
tity may have gone under the reserves and it gets some penalty?

Christi,

Does=20

"Section 216(e)(1) authorizes an electric reliability organization to impos=
e a penalty on the user or owner or operator of the bulk power system if it=
 finds, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, that the user or own=
er or operator violated a reliability standard.  Section 216(e)(2) provides=
 for notice to FERC of penalties imposed by an electric reliability organiz=
ation, and authorizes FERC to affirm, set aside or modify any penalty impos=
ed by an electric reliability organization.  Section 216(e)(3) authorizes F=
ERC to assign enforcement of reliability standards to regional transmission=
 organizations.  Section 216(e)(4) authorizes FERC to enforce reliability s=
tandards and impose penalties on user or owner or operator of the bulk powe=
r system if FERC finds, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, that th=
e user or owner or operator has violated or threatens to violate a reliabil=
ity standard and this action affects or threatens to affect reliability of =
the bulk power system.  Section 216(e)(5) authorizes FERC to take such acti=
on as is necessary or appropriate against an electric reliability organizat=
ion"=20

Give us heartburn?=20

Just wondering,

Dave

Susan --Can you check with Ben Jacoby and Fletcher Sturm on the TVA parts a=
nd with Rogers Herndon on the retail consumer aggregation parts.
West guys--BPA is discussed in this.

Attached are: (1) highlights summary; (2) section-by-section summary; and (=
3) almost 150 pages of leg text (PDF doc) on Chairman Barton's draft electr=
icity restructuring bill.  The RTO and bundled/unbundled sections will be p=
rovided "soon" (they day) (I am meeting with Mr. Barton's staff in a half h=
our), but there are "voluntary RTO" provisions in the incentive pricing sec=
tion since they lifted that language from Burr-Sawyer legislation.  Mr. Bar=
ton has publicly said his addedum will mandate RTO participation at some po=
int; I should know more after the meeting.  The draft below addresses a var=
iety of issues, including TVA, BPA, etc., among others, that we also care a=
bout.  There is a retail consumer aggregation feature toward the end.  If y=
ou could look at the summary and section-by-section and let me know particu=
lar areas of interest/concern for further review that would be helpful.  Ba=
rton is taking comments through this week and next week.

 << File: BartonDraftHighlights092101.doc >>  << File: BartonDraftSecBySec0=
92101.doc >>  << File: discussion draft september 21.PDF >>

Mike --

Let's discuss.  I don't want to overextend our involvement to all regional reliability councils and all working groups. If the MAPP RTC is critical, let's understand why and staff as best we can.

Jim  

Bill, what was your participation and how did you interact with the Enron folk that work MAPP?  Do you think its worthwhile continuing a presence and if so do you have any material that will assist us manage the transition.....

cheers
MR
Mike,
I am currently a voting member of the MAPP RTC. I am no longer able to participate with this group. If you have someone in mind to replace me on this group, please do so immediately.

Thank you,
Bill Rust

Jim --

Do have a final copy for my files?  I assume that we submitted?

Jim

I agree with John Shelk to not attack the CBO report.

While the CBO again and again relies upon academic studies to state that ge=
nerators "may" have withheld power, the basic argument is that "DEREGULATIO=
N ITSELF NOT FAIL; RATHER, IT WAS NEVER ACHEIVED."   In addition, the paper=
 states that "MUCH OF THE BLAME FOR CALIFORNIA'S ELECTRICITY CRISIS ATTACHE=
S TO THE STATE'S RESTRUCTURING PLAN -- BUT NOT TO ITS OBJECTIVE, ELECTRICIT=
Y DEREGULATION."

In addition, California's response of "DIRECTLY INTERVENING IN THE MARKET -=
- A RESPONSE THAT COULD PROVE COSTLY TO ELECTRICITY CONSUMERS AND TAXPAYERS=
."

I hope that we can use this to persuade FERC that they are missing the boat=
 on the Refund case.  The CBO has now stated publicly that the fundamental =
market conditions and the State's poor plan and actions created the financi=
al and political crisis.  The CBO finds that "WHOLESALE ELECTRICITY PRICES =
WERE HIGHER THAN THEY PROBABLY WOULD HAVE BEEN IN A TRADITIONALLY REGULATED=
 MARKET OR A MORE FULLY DEREGULATED MARKET"..because "FEATURES OF THE RESTR=
UCTURING PLAN LIMITED THE RESPONSIVENESS OF THE SUPPLY AND DEMAND SIDES OF =
THE ELECTRICITY MARKET."

Seems to me that we need to devise a strategy to get this message out (toge=
ther with our details of the policy failures).  This CBO report clearly und=
ercuts the "political" arguments of the Davis administration who had every =
opportunity to fix the plan and who has now not only bought into horrible l=
ong-term contracts but has passed through 100% of the high costs to consume=
rs.

Jim=20

Subject to receiving more information, my recommendation is not to make a "=
federal case" out of the CBO report.  In other words, we should be aware of=
 Dave's comments and concerns, but I would not suggest we contact CBO or an=
ything like that.  If others think some response is needed, this is the typ=
e of thing EPSA should do, if done at all.  We should refrain from carrying=
 water for the generators.  The report is being written up favorably in the=
 trade press I have seen, largely because the CBO report says that what Cal=
ifornia did was NOT deregulation and thus the crisis was not caused by dere=
gulation.  That "60,000 feet" view is worth a mint politically and while th=
ere are parts of the report that we differ with, I think its value far outw=
eighs its blemishes.

John,

My take on the paper is that is wasn't particularly flattering to the gener=
ators/suppliers.  It also paid little attention to the issues that FERC had=
 addressed and that the ISO did not implement.  It is reasonably sound as f=
ar as "history of the formation" is concerned but some of their statements =
and conclusions I have to take issue with. =20

Off the top of my head, they use the term "idle".  In my mind as a utility =
person, idle means available but just not running.  As they apply the term,=
 they use it to describe any unit not running, either because it was forced=
 off or was off for maintenance, I realize it's only a word, but it carries=
 many different inferences, mostly unfavorable.  Early in the document they=
 refer to possible abuses of market power and the generators withholding su=
pply to manipulate the price.  They never substantiate this claim.  In fact=
 as they proceed though the rest of the paper they build up a good case sho=
wing how a series of circumstances actually lead to shortages and high pric=
es, but if a busy staffer only read the beginning they never would have und=
erstood the full picture.  They also don't really touch on the lack of supp=
ly side response.  According to Greg Conlin, the President of the P{UC when=
 AB1890 in CA was designed, was a key part to the equation, they spend litt=
le, if any time discussing how this part of the puzzle never developed.  Th=
ey also give insuffucient explaination of the "per-se" reasonablness clause=
....There are other more specific instances I can send to you at a later ti=
me.

I left my notes on the document back in my office, I can give you a summary=
 early next week if that's OK.  I am currently fact gathering about PJM and=
 NYISO congestion models with Steve Walton for RTO West...

Thanks,

Dave

Like most sources of information in DC, folks on the Hill pick and choose t=
hose that support their pre-conceived policy notions.  Having said that, th=
e CBO is a respected source of information.  I read the summary and have th=
e full report in my "to read" stack.  The summary actually made the report =
sound largely favorable from our perspective.  It wouldn't hurt to have a l=
ittle more detail on the problems with the report as you see them so we can=
 decide whether we need to do anthing or just be ready should a CBO witness=
 testify at a hearing. =20

John

John,

How much weight and influence do papers published by the CBO have with poli=
cy makers there in DC?  I have some concerns about the general tone and som=
e of the conclusions contained in the report.  If these papers draw little =
attention, then , no harm, no foul.  But if policy makers tend to draw from=
 these papers, then perhaps we need to correct or address some of the issue=
s raised in this report.

Thanks,

Dave

Talk with John Shelk in our DC office.

Jim

Jim,

Last week some time I had been on the distribution of a paper published by =
the CBO entitled, "Causes and Lessons of the CA Electricity Crisis".  In re=
viewing this paper several things struck me.  The paper is not particularly=
 accurate, they make unsubstantiated claims of market power abuse, they ign=
ore the lack of implementation of demand-side response programs that were s=
upposed to be a integral part of the AB1890 and they use inappropriate term=
s, such as "Idle" when describing plants that were unavailable because of m=
aintenance or repair.

My reason for writing is to ask you, how politically influential is a paper=
 like this?  Are papers published by the CBO looked at as the authority on =
problems, especially with those associated with the problems experienced in=
 CA?  And if so, because of some of the mis-representations it contains, do=
 we want to develop a fact sheet for our folks in DC to use to refute some =
of the claims made in this paper?

Thanks,

Dave

David F. Perrino
Director, Government Affairs
Enron Corporation
101 California Street, Suite 1950
San Francisco, CA  94111
Phone: 415.782.7801
Fax: 415.782.7854
Mobile: 415.794.8740

Today after the Hearing I attended lunch with John Anderson and Phil Harris.  One of the primary points of discussion involved what to do to respond to the NERC legislative efforts?

Basically we agreed that a straightforward delegation of authority over reliability to FERC made sense for all of the groups.  Agreeing to that, the idea is to review the Bingaman language and see if our groups could agree to that language.   

I think that internally Enron is already there???  John Shelk, if you could pls send out the language to everyone on this e-mail to get agreement that would be very helpful.

I'll let you know how we next proceed.  If anyone has any problems, please let me know.  

Thanks.

Lisa --

Who should I send this guy to?  Tim Battaglia?

Thanks.

Hey, Jim! 
  How are you and Marianna and Grace doing?  Well, I hope!  I don't know if Jason has mentioned to you that Roger and I have been living in Birmingham, Alabama - no, not in a trailer.  Roger moved here with work last November, and I finally caught up with him early this summer.   
   In the meanwhile, he has left the company he was working for, and we are looking at moving back to Houston.  Roger has spent the last six years in the recyclable steel (steel scrap) trading business as a trader.  We have noticed that Enron is involved in steel trading, as well as coal trading - two areas in which Roger would be very interested pursuing possible opportunities.  I was wondering if you would be able to provide us with a couple of potential contact names of people who work directly over those areas.  I hope I am not putting you on the spot.  We just believe that it would be much more fruitful to be able to make contact in that manner.  If you are not comfortable doing that, I would certainly understand. 
    In any event, please drop me a line and let me know how you are doing!  It has been a while.  Was the sailing trip with Jason and Shea the last time I saw you?  That was pretty fun!  I hope Jason hasn't sold the boat.  If we ever do get back to Houston, I would love to do that again.  I haven't talked to Jason since July - when we were able to go to lunch.  I'm hoping he and Shea are still making a go of it.  They would make a great pair!  Anyway, I hope to hear from you soon!  Thanks!   Lisa  

Lisa --

I haven't forgotten about trying to find a name.  Was on vacation in early October.  I will ask around for the right name.  

Hope Roger and you are doing well.  Grace is keeping Marianna and me very busy - she's now 19 months and pretty much runs the whole house.  

Talk with you soon, 

Jim

Hey, Jim! 
  How are you and Marianna and Grace doing?  Well, I hope!  I don't know if Jason has mentioned to you that Roger and I have been living in Birmingham, Alabama - no, not in a trailer.  Roger moved here with work last November, and I finally caught up with him early this summer.   
   In the meanwhile, he has left the company he was working for, and we are looking at moving back to Houston.  Roger has spent the last six years in the recyclable steel (steel scrap) trading business as a trader.  We have noticed that Enron is involved in steel trading, as well as coal trading - two areas in which Roger would be very interested pursuing possible opportunities.  I was wondering if you would be able to provide us with a couple of potential contact names of people who work directly over those areas.  I hope I am not putting you on the spot.  We just believe that it would be much more fruitful to be able to make contact in that manner.  If you are not comfortable doing that, I would certainly understand. 
    In any event, please drop me a line and let me know how you are doing!  It has been a while.  Was the sailing trip with Jason and Shea the last time I saw you?  That was pretty fun!  I hope Jason hasn't sold the boat.  If we ever do get back to Houston, I would love to do that again.  I haven't talked to Jason since July - when we were able to go to lunch.  I'm hoping he and Shea are still making a go of it.  They would make a great pair!  Anyway, I hope to hear from you soon!  Thanks!   Lisa  

Sarah & Christi --

Let's make sure that we get our comments together prior to the phone call.  How about a phone call at 8:30 am CDT on Friday?  Also, probably don't need everyone on the EPSA call so maybe we should organize our participation?

Pls let me know.

Jim

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee
       Power Marketers Working Group

FROM: Jim Steffes, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
            Bob Reilley, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
            Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: October 10, 2001

RE: DRAFT Leave-Behinds for RTO Week
      -Conference Call FRIDAY, October 12th, 11:00 a.m. EDT

Based on discussions last week, several members suggested that EPSA create "big picture" leave-behinds for RTO Week at FERC.  EPSA has drafted bullet points for the leave-behinds, designed to follow the workshop agenda for the week.

We will be holding a conference call on Friday, October 12th, at 11:00 a.m. EDT to prepare for RTO week and discuss the draft leave-behinds.  To access the call, dial 1-800-937-6563 and ask for the Julie Simon/EPSA call.   If you have any questions, comments or suggestions, please contact Julie Simon at 202-628-8200 or jsimon@epsa.org.

Attachment

 - bare essentials.doc 

Bryan --

a.	A good resource for you.
b.	Also, if anything is intersting, may want to add.  Key would be MI, NV, and VA discussions.

Jim

Those of you on this e-mail list might recall that several weeks ago I was on a quest for information on retail open access ...in every state.  

I have since learned of a website that ENA Legal has had outside counsel prepare that contains an impressive amount of information on the topic.  It includes compliance requirements, summaries of the relevant law, and much more.  I have not studied the website in any detail but have been told that it has been customized for EPMI.  Am forwarding it to you in case you might find it useful in the future.

SSL

As discussed!
Janet

Attached please find a memo describing the first quarter updates that are now 
reflected on the website.  Please note that the login password has been changed 
as follows:

http://web-2.interliant.com/llgm/enron/llgm.nsf
user name:  llgm
password:   astros

If you have any questions or have trouble accessing the site, please give me a 
call.  Please also distribute the new login to members of your team who are not 
listed on the distribution above.
SC
Sandy Cofer
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, LLP
1000 Louisiana, Suite 1400
Houston, Texas 77002
direct dial: 713.287.2002
fax: 713.287.2100
==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, 
including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be 
conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  
The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this 
e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.
==============================================================================

Pls include on the report.

Jim
Jim:

Please find attached the report for the month of September, 2001 for Risk Analytics Group.  Please let me know if you have any question.

Brgrds

AI
3-3037

 
With everything else going on, it has been hard to develop the monthly report for ENA management.

I'd like to re-start this report and provide an update at the beginning of September.

While I am aware of some efforts, I am sure that I don't know about everything that is critical and on-going.  

I need get a list of projects that your teams are working on for Deal Support, Regulatory Risk, and Advocacy.  I am truly at a loss for current deals that Government Affairs is supporting and our expectation of closing dates.

For each project, I need lead Government Affairs person, financial impact (our your best guess), background and key issues, and strategies and next steps.

This list does not need to be exhaustive, but simply the major activities currently underway.

Thanks - I appreciate your help,

Jim

Do you want to do this?

Jim

Jim,

Thanks for getting back to me.  Betsy's dance card is too full, so she's had to decline.  Regardless, your insights would be quite useful and welcome.  Please let me know as soon as you do whether or not you can participate.

Lynne

"Steffes, James D." wrote:

> Lynne --
>
> I am very sorry that I have not yet responded to your e-mail.  I am
> trying to firm up my calendar.  Not sure that Excelon and Enron will
> differ greatly on the key lessons learned.
>
> I should know by mid-week (if you haven't already filled the slot).
>
> Jim Steffes
> 713-853-7673
>
> >  -----Original Message-----
--
Lynne Kiesling, Ph.D.
Director of Economic Policy
Reason Public Policy Institute
www.rppi.org
lynnek@rppi.org
RPPI is a non-partisan public policy think tank promoting choice, competition, and a dynamic market economy as the foundation for human dignity and progress

 

Pls include on the Monthly Report

Please update with other info.

Jim

 

Pls incorporate as appropriate into our presentation.

Jim

Please update with other info.

Jim

 

I will be out of town.

Here are the other files.

Jim

I enclose the final versions of the riders to the proofs of claim.  We are proceeding to file these today.

Bennett G. Young
One Embarcadero Center, Suite 400
San Francisco, California 94111
(415) 951-1167
byoung@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - ridertoE.DOC 
 - RIDERTOE.DOC 

Per our conversation today --

1.	Sue Mara is working with AReM to (a) work on an alternative vehicle for DA - the Bowen bill, (b) get the "taking" argument for retroactive CPUC action to Norm Plotkin and Richard Katz, (c) call APS Energy Services to motivate Boeing, (d) getting AReM active on the date issue.

By the way, Sue Mara heard that the CPUC has received "hundreds" of letters related to the CPUC decision.

2.	Everyone should be working to get customers focused on messaging to the (a) Governor's office and (b) trade associations.

KEY MESSAGES:	1.	Don't have the CPUC Make Wrong Decision Tomorrow
			2.	SB78 can work if DA Suspension Date = Sept 1.01 or Later
			3.	Setting this DA Suspension Date Does NOT Mean that Customers Will Escape Fair Surcharges

I am putting together a gameplan right now for who to call and the messages.

3.	I called Sandra Yamane (at Marathon Communications) re: CEO contacts.  Once I receive the list, we'll make a decision on how to proceed with that group.

4.	Hedy is working to get Hertzberg (and any others) to call the CPUC and seek another delay.

5.	Mike Day - can you please draft language to use on the Assembly floor to "fix" SB78 per our interests.  Hedy & Bev, who should support the amendment?  Don't we need a member to carry the provision?  Wouldn't it be better if we had CMTA or the CA Restaurant Association?  Is this possible?

6.	Scott Govenar is calling Boeing's lobbyist to get them "interested".

Thanks everybody.  Keep up the great work!!!

Jim

Hey,

Tell your mom I'll call her this weekend.  I plan on being at your mom's house the whole day (I don't want to impose..but I'm sure she won't mind)  I don't have to go to the dentist on Friday so I'm free the whole day lets do something.  I'll call you on sat.  

go noles,

-Joe 

Any more news on next week? Are you still flying in at 10:00 pm. I want to let mom know a little in advance if you want to go to Vero.  I cannot believe Larry Dierker resigned, although he probably would have been fired anyway.  This Saturday is full of great games and of couse I have to work until 2:00, ridiculous.  Later
   

That is your call.  I can't read your mind.  I think,  I'm doing the right thing for my son win or lose!  I'm sure you or dad would do the same thing if you were in my shoes.  I have not talked to her at all, so I don't know what her reaction will be.  She seems to like you....

-me

I guess in the scheme of things one of the reasons you try not to go to
trial is to prevent this from happening.  Plus it takes a long time to
prepare for the case and it looks like your attorney wants to win.  Do you
want me to call Tonya and explain to her that going forward things are not
going to be pretty.  I think I can do this in a gentle and concerning way.
Or should I not be involved?
Love,
Mom

What's up?

I will be coming in town the weekend of Nov 1st - Nov 4th.  I hope you don't have plans for that Saturday.  I'll find out today if I can get him for the whole day (12:00 to 7:00) If things workout I would like to take him to Vero for the day.  So I was thinking you could go with me to pick him up and we could spend the day and night in Vero?  Let me know what you think?  My sister will probably also come (just for the day).  As soon as I find out I'll let you know.

Anyway,  how are things down there?  Last weekend I went to Austin for the UT and Colorado game (Austin is an awesome place!!!)

-Joe

Bird, where you in town this weekend? I talked to your sister for a little while and she said you might be coming into town.  
The Astros are good.  What's going on with Peyton? I am sure Tonya is being reasonable again. 
Christopher M Bedford 
Sr Agency Field Specialist 
561-627-4164*227 
Cell:561-373-9346 mailto:christopher.m.bedford.gt2r@statefarm.com << File: mailto:christopher.m.bedford.gt2r@statefarm.com >>  

Are you still at work?

I'm in a really boring meeting. Please email me!  Tell mesomething good 
Heather Kroll 

Good Morning Jonda,

Please send a reply fax to Miryam and let Tonya now the reason my own son does not know me better is because she won't let him see his own father.  As for the visitation, I hope this will soon end with her making all of the decisions but in the mean time I will talk to my family to see what is best.  I know if I choose to see him on Sunday, I would need to see him in the morning from 9 to 12:00. My flight is @ 5:30 and I'm 3 hours away from the airport.  I will let you know sometime this afternoon or first thing in the morning.

Thank you,
-Joe

Dear  Joe:
 
See the attached email  from Miryam Mitchell at Stewart Gagnon's office.  Please let me know if you  agree to their suggested visitation times.  If you need to fly out earlier  on Sunday which would prevent you having him until 4:00, I'll explain that to  Miryam and suggest 1:00 to 7:00 on Saturday and 1:00 to 3:00 on Sunday.  Or  1:00 to 6:00 on Saturday and 12:00 to 3:00 on Sunday.  Let me know which  you prefer.
 
It appears that Tonya is  willing to give you increased access to Payton as he gets older and as he gets  to know you better.  I know this has been a frustrating process for  you.  I think (it is not my legal opinion since I'm not an attorney) that  it would be beneficial to request an extra hour or two at each visitation so  that we work up to overnights.  I know it can't be soon enough for you, but  small steps are always an improvement in the right  direction!!
 
Let me know about the  visitation and where you want to meet Tonya.  At your hotel?  Will you  be taking him out of Merritt Island?
 
Jonda
 
Tonya does not agree to  1 - 8 on Saturday and also from 1 - 3 on Sunday.
 
However, she's willing  to make a compromise suggestion as follows:
 
The visitation on   Saturday from 1 - 4 and again from 6 - 8 is a total of 5 (five) hours.   Rather than Joe having to  pick up Payton twice and deliver him twice on Saturday, Tonya  suggest that Joe take Payton from 1:00 to 6:00 p.m. on Saturday, and again from  1:00 to 4:00 p.m. on Sunday.
 
She would also like  written confirmation of exactly where Joe wants to meet to pick up Payton and  exactly where he will deliver Payton back to her.
 
Tonya also like to know, if Joe accepts the  5-hour visitation on Saturday, whether Joe intends to take Payton outside  of Merritt Island, and if so where.  It is not her intent to prevent Joe's  doing so, she simply wants to know if Payton is going to be traveling out of  town.
 
Can we agree on the  foregoing?

ME TOO...BUT WE WOULDN'T BE WATCHING THE GAME!  WHERE SHOULD WE STAY?  RUDY IS COMING UP ON SATURDAY AND I'M LEAVING ON SUNDAY MORNING!

Sometimes. I'm supposed to turn it off, but messages usually store until I turn it on. I land around 2:30 and have a two hour drive after that. 

Are you going to the game?  I am soooo jealous. Wish I could go with you...
Heather Kroll

NO YOGA FOR ME....AND I'M GOING TO AUSTIN!!  CAN'T WAIT... CAN YOU STILL GET MESSAGES WHILE ON THE FLIGHT?

Sitting in the Pres. Club waiting for my flight. You never responded to my yoga question!  Are you going to Austin?
Heather Kroll

NO....WHAT'S UP?

: (
Heather Kroll

http://www.gotlaughs.com/funpages/bin2.cfm

NOPE..I'M NOT A CHICK! OR RUDY

THE AOL (I.M.) PLEASE

you know, the phone works too.  you don't like to talk on the phone, do you?

NOTHING....WHAT IS YOUR IM??? THIS IS WACK

WHY? WHAT DID I DO?
Heather Kroll

loser
 give me a call when you get this..

NOTHING....WHAT IS YOUR IM??? THIS IS WACK

WHY? WHAT DID I DO?
Heather Kroll

I'M YELLING AT YOU

WHY ARE YOU WRITING IN ALL CAPS!?
Heather Kroll

WHAT ARE YOU DOING?

Have you ever been to Austin?  It's wonderful.  Think about it.  50,000 students, half of them co-eds. . .

I'm looking out for you.

The question back to you is, "Do you want to go with us?"

H

Do you want me to go?

Thanks for the update. Did he bring any friends home?  I was a good girl last night. I'll probably go for awhile tonight. We'll see. Are you going to austin with us this weekend?
Heather Kroll

this is so funny

-me

http://www.gotlaughs.com/funpages/bin2.cfm

Do you want me to go?

Thanks for the update. Did he bring any friends home?  I was a good girl last night. I'll probably go for awhile tonight. We'll see. Are you going to austin with us this weekend?
Heather Kroll

Good Morning,

Rudy was out of control last night!  Are you going out tonight?  I'm going to power mart @ 2:45  till 5:00 then to the 4 seasons for Reliant party...then to Calpine's party @ 7:00!  Are you going to go with us?  Now that you know what I'm doing im sure you be there.... 

-me

Wow. So I didn't go to hot yoga and you didn't answer our calls to come meet us. What's up with that?  Should I take it personally?

H
Heather Kroll

BABY..........	

I understand!  I'll just tell my sweet little niece, she gets nothing for her birthday!!   She will be crushed!!!   

What about hot yoga?  I haven't been since Monday a week ago and I can't keep blowing it off.  It's about the only exercise I get!  Besides, what time do you usually leave every day?  3:00?  Some of us have to work a little later.

H

Its Dana....you know how that works!   Go shopping with me tonight!

Come on!!

So Billy Braddock just got his blackberry.  What's your boss say about you getting one?

Its Dana....you know how that works!   Go shopping with me tonight!

Come on!!

So Billy Braddock just got his blackberry.  What's your boss say about you getting one?

Good Morning,

So, you've been thinking about me!  I like to see that....  I don't have one of those pagers.  I went to the game yesterday and I didn't go back to the office.  Boy do we stink, kind of like UT!  Anyway, what time do you get in to H-town?  Have a safe trip!

-me

So no messages from you all day long. Out of sight, out of mind I guess. 
Heather Kroll

I was thinking that about you....  And my shirt is good looking like me!!!!!!!! How could you miss that

Damn I didn't notice your shirt!  I can't believe I missed an opportunity to tease you!  Do you need fashion advice?  Yes I'm on my way to VA. Presto was giving away tix today to the game. Ask him. I'm getting the feeling you only like me for my connections. 

H
Heather Kroll

Good Morning,

Did she ever call you back?  I tried to call you yesterday where were was everyone?

-me

She is still the mother of your child so please try and rise above.  This is
in Payton's best interest.  What goes around comes around in life.
Especially when you do the right thing.  Always remember that.

Of course.... Your thinking about me right now aren't you!!!  I don't blame you....

I'm so funny!

-me

Airport. Sitting in the presidents club, watching baseball, waiting on my flight. Miss me?

H
Heather Kroll

Thanks for the compliment on my shirt today.....everyone gave me one but you!  Are you on your way to Virginia?  Hey can you get tickets to the baseball game???  Come on your a Big Wheel in @ Enron.  When do you come back?

Have a save trip

-me

So Doug Gilbert Smith has a blackberry. Why don't you?

H
Heather Kroll

Hello Jonda,

I know your getting ready to go on vacation and I just wanted you to know that I called the credit card companies and had them mail me my YTD statements.  They would not fax it.  So, I would just attach a letter saying were waiting on the companies or leave it blank (N/A).

Anyway, she sent me another e-mail and I have not replied to any of them just to let you and Mr. Fulenweider know.  Have a great vacation..you deserve it!!

-Joe

Hello, I just wanted to say I hope your weekend  went well.  Payton is growing like a weed.  He is now tickalish.   He also has learned how to scream, now that's about all he does.  He has a  walker and he loves to sit in it and just talk away.  He is such a happy  baby, everyone enjoys him and loves to see him, he's so pleasant.   
 

where are you?

So Doug Gilbert Smith has a blackberry. Why don't you?

H
Heather Kroll

Its all coming together now.... I haven't checked my messages yet (I'll do that now just to make sure your telling the truth).  As for the bet, we did bet $20 (your co-worker Mac bet me $50)  

What does BTW mean?  You're a dork.......

-me

Don't be so touchy!  I was only teasing. BTW, I tried to call you Sunday but you never left me your number. I left you 2 messages at work. Actually it was you who blew me off, thanks a lot. ; )

I'm off to Virginia late this morning so I may not see you. 

You are done on double or nothing, but I thought the bet was $20. I'm just a lowly originator, I can't afford big trader bets!

And my name automatically comes in at the bottom of a message.  

Heather
Heather Kroll

Good Morning,

Are you mad at me or what?  Using an exclamination point and your full name.... I thought it was cool of me to write you last night.  I guess you thought different.  

Anyway, the Longhorns are the worst....Tell you boy Mac he owes me a Grant($50)  and you and I will go double or nothing on the Florida State V.S. Miami!  How does that sound?

I'll talk to you later, have a nice day. (and smile....)

-me

Ask your boss to get you one of these. You're not a part of my cost center!

H
Heather Kroll

Let me know when you get back and we will meet up for a drink(have Suz set it up)  Have a safe trip

-me

Thanks for the insight.  Hopefully, we will be able to set something up.

I didn't really think FPL was going to have something, but it doesn't hurt to try.  I am now trying to find someone I can network with or through at Progress Energy, formerly Florida Power.  Don't have a cousin there do ya??  Just kidding...

But seriously, when your schedule allows, I would love to buy you a drink as a thank you.  You have been great.  
BP

It will go along way with her..trust me (she'll think your making an effort)  As for FPL, I don't think they have much of an operation in the Tampa area.  The corp office is in Juno Beach.

-me

Dear you-
I will give her a call tomorrow.  My boss is leaving earlier than me on Thursday, so maybe I could meet with her then.  Thanks for the suggestion.
Beth

If your going to be in Ft. Lauderdale this week try to set up a time to meet with her....that would be my advice!

-me

I sent her an email thanking her and answering her questions. I will follow-up with a phone call later this week when I get back from Fort Lauderdale-have to go there for work. 

On a sidenote-it was good to see her questions.  I have decided to re-format my resume to make the Enron piece more consistent.  Although Enron people appreciate adaptability and changing roles, I understand non-Enron people may interpret that as NOT being able to hold a job.  It gave me some good insight.

Okay-let me know if you have any other thoughts.  I have to join the LONGEST conference call in the world in a couple minutes.  Cheers,
Beth
I would call her...  Not today (its a holiday) but tomorrow........(954) 765-2090

-Joe

Hey Joe-
I will send the answers to your Mom directly, but the reason I have moved around at Enron is b/c I was in the associate program. As you know, we rotate every six months.  The reason I am looking for something new in Florida is because that is where my boyfriend is and since we are talking about getting engaged, we both think it would be much more successful if we lived in the same place (just kidding).  Thanks again and I hope you enjoyed yourself in Vegas.
Beth

Good Morning Beth,

Sorry I didn't get back in touch with you last week, but I was in Las Vegas.  If you would could you please answer these questions or If you want you can call my mother directly (its your call).  Let me know what you decide...  Have a nice day.

-Joe

Joe,
I have a couple questions.
1. Why is she looking for a new job?
2. She does not seem to stay very long in one position.  I would question
why?

Her resume looks great but I sense something with her that you need to
convince me otherwise before I forward to Personnel.
Love,
Mom
I have Alyssa with me for three days.  She talked about you all night last
night.  I'm not sure why. She really wants you at her birthday party.  I
told her you would see her on Friday.

It will go along way with her..trust me (she'll think your making an effort)  As for FPL, I don't think they have much of an operation in the Tampa area.  The corp office is in Juno Beach.

-me

Dear you-
I will give her a call tomorrow.  My boss is leaving earlier than me on Thursday, so maybe I could meet with her then.  Thanks for the suggestion.
Beth

If your going to be in Ft. Lauderdale this week try to set up a time to meet with her....that would be my advice!

-me

I sent her an email thanking her and answering her questions. I will follow-up with a phone call later this week when I get back from Fort Lauderdale-have to go there for work. 

On a sidenote-it was good to see her questions.  I have decided to re-format my resume to make the Enron piece more consistent.  Although Enron people appreciate adaptability and changing roles, I understand non-Enron people may interpret that as NOT being able to hold a job.  It gave me some good insight.

Okay-let me know if you have any other thoughts.  I have to join the LONGEST conference call in the world in a couple minutes.  Cheers,
Beth
I would call her...  Not today (its a holiday) but tomorrow........(954) 765-2090

-Joe

Hey Joe-
I will send the answers to your Mom directly, but the reason I have moved around at Enron is b/c I was in the associate program. As you know, we rotate every six months.  The reason I am looking for something new in Florida is because that is where my boyfriend is and since we are talking about getting engaged, we both think it would be much more successful if we lived in the same place (just kidding).  Thanks again and I hope you enjoyed yourself in Vegas.
Beth

Good Morning Beth,

Sorry I didn't get back in touch with you last week, but I was in Las Vegas.  If you would could you please answer these questions or If you want you can call my mother directly (its your call).  Let me know what you decide...  Have a nice day.

-Joe

Joe,
I have a couple questions.
1. Why is she looking for a new job?
2. She does not seem to stay very long in one position.  I would question
why?

Her resume looks great but I sense something with her that you need to
convince me otherwise before I forward to Personnel.
Love,
Mom
I have Alyssa with me for three days.  She talked about you all night last
night.  I'm not sure why. She really wants you at her birthday party.  I
told her you would see her on Friday.

If your going to be in Ft. Lauderdale this week try to set up a time to meet with her....that would be my advice!

-me

I sent her an email thanking her and answering her questions. I will follow-up with a phone call later this week when I get back from Fort Lauderdale-have to go there for work. 

On a sidenote-it was good to see her questions.  I have decided to re-format my resume to make the Enron piece more consistent.  Although Enron people appreciate adaptability and changing roles, I understand non-Enron people may interpret that as NOT being able to hold a job.  It gave me some good insight.

Okay-let me know if you have any other thoughts.  I have to join the LONGEST conference call in the world in a couple minutes.  Cheers,
Beth
I would call her...  Not today (its a holiday) but tomorrow........(954) 765-2090

-Joe

Hey Joe-
I will send the answers to your Mom directly, but the reason I have moved around at Enron is b/c I was in the associate program. As you know, we rotate every six months.  The reason I am looking for something new in Florida is because that is where my boyfriend is and since we are talking about getting engaged, we both think it would be much more successful if we lived in the same place (just kidding).  Thanks again and I hope you enjoyed yourself in Vegas.
Beth

Good Morning Beth,

Sorry I didn't get back in touch with you last week, but I was in Las Vegas.  If you would could you please answer these questions or If you want you can call my mother directly (its your call).  Let me know what you decide...  Have a nice day.

-Joe

Joe,
I have a couple questions.
1. Why is she looking for a new job?
2. She does not seem to stay very long in one position.  I would question
why?

Her resume looks great but I sense something with her that you need to
convince me otherwise before I forward to Personnel.
Love,
Mom
I have Alyssa with me for three days.  She talked about you all night last
night.  I'm not sure why. She really wants you at her birthday party.  I
told her you would see her on Friday.

I would call her...  Not today (its a holiday) but tomorrow........(954) 765-2090

-Joe

Hey Joe-
I will send the answers to your Mom directly, but the reason I have moved around at Enron is b/c I was in the associate program. As you know, we rotate every six months.  The reason I am looking for something new in Florida is because that is where my boyfriend is and since we are talking about getting engaged, we both think it would be much more successful if we lived in the same place (just kidding).  Thanks again and I hope you enjoyed yourself in Vegas.
Beth

Good Morning Beth,

Sorry I didn't get back in touch with you last week, but I was in Las Vegas.  If you would could you please answer these questions or If you want you can call my mother directly (its your call).  Let me know what you decide...  Have a nice day.

-Joe

Joe,
I have a couple questions.
1. Why is she looking for a new job?
2. She does not seem to stay very long in one position.  I would question
why?

Her resume looks great but I sense something with her that you need to
convince me otherwise before I forward to Personnel.
Love,
Mom
I have Alyssa with me for three days.  She talked about you all night last
night.  I'm not sure why. She really wants you at her birthday party.  I
told her you would see her on Friday.

I could have told you it was a waste of time.  Were not dealing with a sane person.  She is an idiot!!!

Yes.  you need to document this for the attorney.  The judge will not like
this

Good Morning Beth,

Sorry I didn't get back in touch with you last week, but I was in Las Vegas.  If you would could you please answer these questions or If you want you can call my mother directly (its your call).  Let me know what you decide...  Have a nice day.

-Joe

Joe,
I have a couple questions.
1. Why is she looking for a new job?
2. She does not seem to stay very long in one position.  I would question
why?

Her resume looks great but I sense something with her that you need to
convince me otherwise before I forward to Personnel.
Love,
Mom
I have Alyssa with me for three days.  She talked about you all night last
night.  I'm not sure why. She really wants you at her birthday party.  I
told her you would see her on Friday.

Hey Mom and Dad,

This is Beth's resume.....  Do you know anybody who is looking for someone at this time?

-me

Hi Joe-
I am Suzette's friend-the one looking for jobs (on the sly of course) in the greater Tampa and/or St. Petersburg area.  She had suggested I send my resume to you for potential contacts at FPL and Bank of America.  

I am currently in the associate program but have a 'unique' concentration.  I was hired into the marketing track and have focused mainly on those areas here at Enron.  Let me know if you have any questions for me-here's a recent copy of my resume which includes my latest rotation.  Thanks and I look forward to hearing from you.  Regards,
Beth Peters
office: 713-345-6313
mobile: 713-410-0705

 

I will get you all the information you need and try to fill that out the best I can.

-Joe

Joe,

If you would be so kind as to bring your address book and/or a list of
family and friends, including addresses and phone numbers, of those who have
knowledge of this situation, especially your mom and sister and anyone who
had firsthand knowledge (not just things you've told them, but things they
knew or experienced) of the issues in this case.  For instance, a coworker
might know things you've told while all this has been going on, but a common
friend or neighbor would have more significant knowledge.

Also, if you would go through the Interrogatories and take a stab at
answering the questions that you have answers to, it will save you a lot of
attorney fee time.

Thanks!
Jonda

Thank you,

cell phone# 713-899-0954 and home# 713-802-9262 (the cell phone is the best
way to get in touch with me)

I'll see you tomorrow have a nice day,

-Joe

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 12:36 PM
   Joe-

   I can't guarantee what time he will call today, but it will have to be
   between appointments.  As he will be at a seminar all next week, his
   appointments were scheduled VERY tight this week, along with three days
   of
   depositions which have been scheduled for over 2 months.  It may not be
   until this evening.  He has your work and cell phone numbers.

   Jonda

   -----Original Message-----
   I will be there tomorrow at 3:45....  Do you know about what time Mr.
   Fullenweider will be calling so I can give you the phone number.  I
   leave
   work around 3:30.  Whatever time is best for him!

   Thanks again,

   -Joe

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
   ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 12:28 PM
      Joe,

      Can you come Tuesday at 3:45 to meet with me?

      I have given Mr. Fullenweider a message to call you in the interim.

      Jonda

      -----Original Message-----
      Jonda,

      I understand Mr. Fullenweider has meeting but after what Tonya put me
      and
      my family through last week we would like some answers and action.  I
      have
      cut off all communication with her and now she is sending me emails
      (trying
      to act like nothing happened) I'm sure her lawyer is telling her to
   do
      that
      so she can say she has been keeping me informed of my son. (I will
      forward
      them to you)  I am very upset and I'm sure you can understand why, I
      really
      think there is something really wrong ( I just have that feeling or
   she
      is
      mentally unstable )  How can she be aloud to keep me from my son?

      Anyway,  If I can't meet with Mr. Fullenwerider can you and I meet to
   go
      over the discovery responses and does this mean were going to a jury
      trial?
      Why are they aloud to ask these questions and are we doing the
   something
      to
      Tonya?  I don't understand....

      I can't get out of leaving on Thursday, this is a business meeting
   for
      work
      (not pleasure)  I can come Today, Tuesday and Wednesday anytime after
      3:30.
      I hope that helps

      Thanks again,

      -Joe

          -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
      ENRON.com]

         Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 10:59 AM
         Dear Joe,

         I'm sorry but I have Mr. Fullenweider scheduled in back-to-back
         meetings,
         hearings and depositions this week.  I might be able to arrange a
      short
         telephone conference today or tomorrow.  Otherwise, his deposition
         schedule
         may clear up on Wednesday and Thursday depending on how the Judge
      rules
         at a
         hearing tomorrow morning.  If the depositions get reset by the
   Court,
      I
         could fit you in on Wednesday or Thursday.

         I absolutely must visit with you this week about your discovery
         responses
         because I will be out of town next week and they are due next
   Friday.

         Jonda

         -----Original Message-----
         Good Morning Jonda,

         I would like to met with Mr. Fullenweider today if that is
   possible?
         I'm
         going out of town Thursday thru Sunday of this week.  I think it
   is
      very
         important that I speak with him as soon as possible.  Please let
   me
      know
         if
         today is good for him.  Thanks again,

         -Joe

             -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
         ENRON.com]

            Sent:   Sunday, September 30, 2001 12:18 PM
            Dear Joe,

            Would it be possible for you to come in one  day next week at
      about
         3:00
            p.m. to go over your discovery responses?   Alternatively, you
      could
            come in two days at 4:00 p.m.  On Thursday, I  leave early for
   my
         son's
            soccer practice.  Perhaps Tuesday and Friday would  be good for
         you???
            Jonda L. Stowell
            Legal Assistant
            The Fullenweider Firm
            4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
            Houston, TX  77027
            (713) 624-4100  Telephone
            (713) 624-4141 Facsimile
             e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com

   **********************************************************************
         This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant
      affiliate
         and
         may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use
   of
      the
         intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or
   disclosure
      by
         others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended
   recipient
      (or
         authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the
   sender
      or
         reply
         to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and
   delete
         all
         copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto)
   are
      not
         intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or
      evidence
         a
         binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of
   its
         affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may
      not
         be
         relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or
      otherwise.
         Thank you.

   **********************************************************************

Thank you,

cell phone# 713-899-0954 and home# 713-802-9262 (the cell phone is the best way to get in touch with me)

I'll see you tomorrow have a nice day,

-Joe

Joe-

I can't guarantee what time he will call today, but it will have to be
between appointments.  As he will be at a seminar all next week, his
appointments were scheduled VERY tight this week, along with three days of
depositions which have been scheduled for over 2 months.  It may not be
until this evening.  He has your work and cell phone numbers.

Jonda

I will be there tomorrow at 3:45....  Do you know about what time Mr.
Fullenweider will be calling so I can give you the phone number.  I leave
work around 3:30.  Whatever time is best for him!

Thanks again,

-Joe

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 12:28 PM
   Joe,

   Can you come Tuesday at 3:45 to meet with me?

   I have given Mr. Fullenweider a message to call you in the interim.

   Jonda

   -----Original Message-----
   Jonda,

   I understand Mr. Fullenweider has meeting but after what Tonya put me
   and
   my family through last week we would like some answers and action.  I
   have
   cut off all communication with her and now she is sending me emails
   (trying
   to act like nothing happened) I'm sure her lawyer is telling her to do
   that
   so she can say she has been keeping me informed of my son. (I will
   forward
   them to you)  I am very upset and I'm sure you can understand why, I
   really
   think there is something really wrong ( I just have that feeling or she
   is
   mentally unstable )  How can she be aloud to keep me from my son?

   Anyway,  If I can't meet with Mr. Fullenwerider can you and I meet to go
   over the discovery responses and does this mean were going to a jury
   trial?
   Why are they aloud to ask these questions and are we doing the something
   to
   Tonya?  I don't understand....

   I can't get out of leaving on Thursday, this is a business meeting for
   work
   (not pleasure)  I can come Today, Tuesday and Wednesday anytime after
   3:30.
   I hope that helps

   Thanks again,

   -Joe

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
   ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 10:59 AM
      Dear Joe,

      I'm sorry but I have Mr. Fullenweider scheduled in back-to-back
      meetings,
      hearings and depositions this week.  I might be able to arrange a
   short
      telephone conference today or tomorrow.  Otherwise, his deposition
      schedule
      may clear up on Wednesday and Thursday depending on how the Judge
   rules
      at a
      hearing tomorrow morning.  If the depositions get reset by the Court,
   I
      could fit you in on Wednesday or Thursday.

      I absolutely must visit with you this week about your discovery
      responses
      because I will be out of town next week and they are due next Friday.

      Jonda

      -----Original Message-----
      Good Morning Jonda,

      I would like to met with Mr. Fullenweider today if that is possible?
      I'm
      going out of town Thursday thru Sunday of this week.  I think it is
   very
      important that I speak with him as soon as possible.  Please let me
   know
      if
      today is good for him.  Thanks again,

      -Joe

          -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
      ENRON.com]

         Sent:   Sunday, September 30, 2001 12:18 PM
         Dear Joe,

         Would it be possible for you to come in one  day next week at
   about
      3:00
         p.m. to go over your discovery responses?   Alternatively, you
   could
         come in two days at 4:00 p.m.  On Thursday, I  leave early for my
      son's
         soccer practice.  Perhaps Tuesday and Friday would  be good for
      you???
         Jonda L. Stowell
         Legal Assistant
         The Fullenweider Firm
         4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
         Houston, TX  77027
         (713) 624-4100  Telephone
         (713) 624-4141 Facsimile
          e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com

   **********************************************************************
      This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant
   affiliate
      and
      may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of
   the
      intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure
   by
      others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient
   (or
      authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender
   or
      reply
      to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
      all
      copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are
   not
      intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or
   evidence
      a
      binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
      affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may
   not
      be
      relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or
   otherwise.
      Thank you.

   **********************************************************************

I will be there tomorrow at 3:45....  Do you know about what time Mr. Fullenweider will be calling so I can give you the phone number.  I leave work around 3:30.  Whatever time is best for him!

Thanks again,

-Joe

Joe,

Can you come Tuesday at 3:45 to meet with me?

I have given Mr. Fullenweider a message to call you in the interim.

Jonda

Jonda,

I understand Mr. Fullenweider has meeting but after what Tonya put me and
my family through last week we would like some answers and action.  I have
cut off all communication with her and now she is sending me emails (trying
to act like nothing happened) I'm sure her lawyer is telling her to do that
so she can say she has been keeping me informed of my son. (I will forward
them to you)  I am very upset and I'm sure you can understand why, I really
think there is something really wrong ( I just have that feeling or she is
mentally unstable )  How can she be aloud to keep me from my son?

Anyway,  If I can't meet with Mr. Fullenwerider can you and I meet to go
over the discovery responses and does this mean were going to a jury trial?
Why are they aloud to ask these questions and are we doing the something to
Tonya?  I don't understand....

I can't get out of leaving on Thursday, this is a business meeting for work
(not pleasure)  I can come Today, Tuesday and Wednesday anytime after 3:30.
I hope that helps

Thanks again,

-Joe

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Monday, October 01, 2001 10:59 AM
   Dear Joe,

   I'm sorry but I have Mr. Fullenweider scheduled in back-to-back
   meetings,
   hearings and depositions this week.  I might be able to arrange a short
   telephone conference today or tomorrow.  Otherwise, his deposition
   schedule
   may clear up on Wednesday and Thursday depending on how the Judge rules
   at a
   hearing tomorrow morning.  If the depositions get reset by the Court, I
   could fit you in on Wednesday or Thursday.

   I absolutely must visit with you this week about your discovery
   responses
   because I will be out of town next week and they are due next Friday.

   Jonda

   -----Original Message-----
   Good Morning Jonda,

   I would like to met with Mr. Fullenweider today if that is possible?
   I'm
   going out of town Thursday thru Sunday of this week.  I think it is very
   important that I speak with him as soon as possible.  Please let me know
   if
   today is good for him.  Thanks again,

   -Joe

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
   ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Sunday, September 30, 2001 12:18 PM
      Dear Joe,

      Would it be possible for you to come in one  day next week at about
   3:00
      p.m. to go over your discovery responses?   Alternatively, you could
      come in two days at 4:00 p.m.  On Thursday, I  leave early for my
   son's
      soccer practice.  Perhaps Tuesday and Friday would  be good for
   you???
      Jonda L. Stowell
      Legal Assistant
      The Fullenweider Firm
      4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
      Houston, TX  77027
      (713) 624-4100  Telephone
      (713) 624-4141 Facsimile
       e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com

   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

This one too..

 

This was sent last night....

I just wanted you to know that we made it home safe  this weekend.  Payton is doing very well.  He is so smart and  happy.  He sent you a package on Firday since he did not get to see you  Thursday night, he hopes you enjoy it.
 

Jonda,

I understand Mr. Fullenweider has meeting but after what Tonya put me and my family through last week we would like some answers and action.  I have cut off all communication with her and now she is sending me emails (trying to act like nothing happened) I'm sure her lawyer is telling her to do that so she can say she has been keeping me informed of my son. (I will forward them to you)  I am very upset and I'm sure you can understand why, I really think there is something really wrong ( I just have that feeling or she is mentally unstable )  How can she be aloud to keep me from my son?

Anyway,  If I can't meet with Mr. Fullenwerider can you and I meet to go over the discovery responses and does this mean were going to a jury trial?  Why are they aloud to ask these questions and are we doing the something to Tonya?  I don't understand....

I can't get out of leaving on Thursday, this is a business meeting for work (not pleasure)  I can come Today, Tuesday and Wednesday anytime after 3:30.  I hope that helps

Thanks again,

-Joe

Dear Joe,

I'm sorry but I have Mr. Fullenweider scheduled in back-to-back meetings,
hearings and depositions this week.  I might be able to arrange a short
telephone conference today or tomorrow.  Otherwise, his deposition schedule
may clear up on Wednesday and Thursday depending on how the Judge rules at a
hearing tomorrow morning.  If the depositions get reset by the Court, I
could fit you in on Wednesday or Thursday.

I absolutely must visit with you this week about your discovery responses
because I will be out of town next week and they are due next Friday.

Jonda

Good Morning Jonda,

I would like to met with Mr. Fullenweider today if that is possible?  I'm
going out of town Thursday thru Sunday of this week.  I think it is very
important that I speak with him as soon as possible.  Please let me know if
today is good for him.  Thanks again,

-Joe

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Jonda+20Stowell+20+3Cjls+40fullenweider+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@
ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Sunday, September 30, 2001 12:18 PM
   Dear Joe,

   Would it be possible for you to come in one  day next week at about 3:00
   p.m. to go over your discovery responses?   Alternatively, you could
   come in two days at 4:00 p.m.  On Thursday, I  leave early for my son's
   soccer practice.  Perhaps Tuesday and Friday would  be good for you???
   Jonda L. Stowell
   Legal Assistant
   The Fullenweider Firm
   4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
   Houston, TX  77027
   (713) 624-4100  Telephone
   (713) 624-4141 Facsimile
    e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com

Good Morning Jonda,

I would like to met with Mr. Fullenweider today if that is possible?  I'm going out of town Thursday thru Sunday of this week.  I think it is very important that I speak with him as soon as possible.  Please let me know if today is good for him.  Thanks again,

-Joe

Dear Joe,
 
Would it be possible for you to come in one  day next week at about 3:00 p.m. to go over your discovery responses?   Alternatively, you could come in two days at 4:00 p.m.  On Thursday, I  leave early for my son's soccer practice.  Perhaps Tuesday and Friday would  be good for you???
Jonda L. Stowell
Legal Assistant
The Fullenweider Firm
4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
Houston, TX  77027
(713) 624-4100  Telephone
(713) 624-4141 Facsimile
 e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com
 

It is a tragedy that innocent people have lost
> their lives to acts of war and terrorism. To
> those who have been directly affected, we are
> here for you and we mourn with you. We pray for
> the victims and their families, and all the
> children that have lost a parent. If you receive
> this, please pass
> it on in hopes that it will reach the families
> who were deeply impacted by this tragedy to let
> them know that we are here praying for you and
> thinking
> of you. Copy, paste, add your name and location,
> and send along.
> Thank you.
>
> 1. Katrina Prichard, Camden, SC
> 2. Wes Prichard, Camden, SC
> 3. Micah Prichard, Camden, SC
> 4. Shianne Fitchen, Monroe, WA
> 5. Nikki Heckt, Renton, WA
> 6. Kim Fortney
> 7. Sally Phillips, Seattle, WA
> 8. Rose Forinash, Seattle, WA
> 9: Eilene Ritchotte, Ludlow, MA
> 10. Mernie Drakos, Jacksonville, FL
> 11. Lisa Mitzel, Jacksonville Beach, FL
> 12.Carol Salva, Lorain, OH
> 13. Paul Salva, Lorain OH
> 14. Annette & Joe Corrao, Lorain, OH
> 15. Lynne Ruffolo & Jason Naelitz, Pittsburgh, PA
>
> 16. Lou & Vilma Demos, Pittsburgh, PA
> 17. Nichole & Alex Demos, Pittsburgh, PA
> 18. Kimberly Slavonic, Pittsburgh, PA
> 19. Cara Maddock, Pittsburgh, PA
> 20. Deanna Flanigan, Pittsburgh, PA
> 21. Donna Rae Dunsey, Pittsburgh, PA
> 22. Jaime Kesich, Pittsburgh, PA
> 23. Kathryn A. Kesich, Pittsburgh, PA
> 24. Jory Hunter, Pittsburgh, PA
> 25. Stephanie Martik, Pittsburgh PA
> 26. Tom Moore, Pittsburgh, PA
> 27. Mara Fairley, Pittsburgh, PA
> 28. Renee Kemmler, Pittsburgh, PA
> 29. Joan Langer, Wexford, PA
> 30. Lisa Warnke, Palo Alto, CA (Sydney, Australia)
> 31. Sasha Preble, Excelsior, MN
> 32. Ann Preble, Excelsior, MN
> 33. Deanna Preiss, Minnetonka, MN<!BR>> 34. Allison Preiss, Minneapolis, MN
> 35. Pam Sonntag Nelson, Woodbury, MN
> 36. Angie Burgess, Woodstock, GA
> 37.Bill Nabors Jr, Athens, GA
  38. Maria Palmieri, San Diego, CA
39.Angela Palmieri, Dallas, TX
40. Joseph P. Stepennovitch, III. Houston, TX

I'm not surprised...are you?

I left a message and she did not return my call.

Good Morning Carla and Rhi,

This is like our own little Spy Game!  Thanks for taking the picture.  I hope you had a nice Thanksgiving.  I will talk to you soon!

-Joseph

Hey this is the picture we took.  Sorry you can't see too much.

 - house.doc << File: house.doc >> 

Good Morning Rosanna,

I just got back from Thanksgiving vacation.  I'm in the process of updating my resume.  As soon as I get it done I will send you a copy via e-mail.  I hope you had a nice thanksgiving and I'll talk to you soon.

-Joe Stepenovitch

Joe,
Good speaking with you again this morning.  If you've updated your details
I'd like to have a look and get back to you with some ideas.  I'll follow up
when I receive your email!
Thanks,
Rosanna

Rosanna Migliaccio
Vice President
Robert Walters Associates
(212) 704-9900
Fax: (212) 704-4312
mailto:rosanna@robertwalters.com
http://www.robertwalters.com

This email and any files transmitted with it are confidential and
intended solely for the use of the individual or entity to whom they
are addressed. If you have received this email in error please notify
the system manager.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

Good Morning Todd,

I just got back from Thanksgiving vacation.  I'm in the process of updating my resume.  When I get it done, I will send you a copy via e-mail.  I hope you had a nice Thanksgiving.  I will be in touch soon.

-Joe Stepenovitch

TODD BERTGES 
Recruiter, Energy Staffing Group 
Management Recruiters of Portland, Inc. 
Phone: (503) 290-1179 
Phone: (800) 979-8701 ext. 1179 
Fax: 503-282-4380 
E-mail: tbertges@mrportland.com 
Web: www.mrportland.com/html/energy.htm << File: http://www.mrportland.com/html/energy.htm >> 

I'll get it for you..and I got your resume

-Joe

Joe,

Do you know how to get into contact with Wayne?  His work # or e-mail?  I would appreciate it.  Thanks

Warrick

No prob..good luck.	

-Step

Joe, I really appreciate your offer to forward my resume to your father at FPL.  I forwarded my resume to Irma Sulaiman @ FPL yesterday in response to a job posting in yesterday's Houston Chronicle.

The position, "Energy Trader", calls for at least 1-3 years of experience in fuels, energy marketing or energy trading; all of which I have experience in.

Below is the cover letter and resume that I e-mailed yesterday.  Again, I truly appreciate you helping me out!

<<<<Cover Letter>>>>

I would like to express my interest in the "Energy Trader" position posted in the Houston Chronicle, Sunday, December 2, 2001.

I have been trading power at Enron for the U.S. Eastern Interconnect and am very familiar with all facets of executing hourly and daily trades, including the utilization of trading tools and indices for all energy commodities.

I have over nine years of related experience and have also received my MBA during my four-year tenure at Enron.  My experience ranges from petroleum terminal management, refining and wholesale marketing, fuel management, pipeline and vessel/barge scheduling; liquefied natural gas (LNG); and trading power for the U.S. Eastern Interconnect power grid.

My attached resume illustrates an intense level of vertically integrated experience and knowledge of the energy business.  I believe that my vast experience and advanced education could be of great benefit to your company.

I would appreciate the opportunity to discuss career options with someone at your company.

Sincerely,

Dustin Collins

 << File: CollinsResume.doc >>  << File: Business References.doc >> 

just faxed it

send me your resume.

	Forecast			Actual		
	Kevin	ISO	ECP	Demand	ECP	
PEAK	35,206	33,900	$20.21	33,833	$26.22	
OFF PEAK	26,144	27,900	$14.08	27,495	$15.14	
24 HOUR	28,460	28,617	$18.17	28,626 	$22.53	
						
HE1	22,337	23,200	$14.08	23,366	$17.26	
HE2	21,215	22,100	$12.91	22,107	$14.88	
HE3	20,600	21,500	$12.24	21,703	$15.67	
HE4	20,364	21,600	$12.19	21,423	$11.80	
HE5	20,805	22,300	$12.29	21,797	$12.58	
HE6	22,601	24,300	$14.85	23,401	$14.86	
HE7	26,144	27,900	$17.99	27,495	$19.23	
HE8	28,675	30,100	$19.28	30,003	$21.74	
HE9	29,785	30,600	$20.00	30,743	$19.24	
HE10	30,483	30,800	$21.07	31,313	$30.39	
HE11	31,165	31,100	$20.86	31,637	$31.08	
HE12	31,494	31,100	$19.08	31,717	$22.55	
HE13	31,530	31,200	$18.43	31,493	$24.12	
HE14	31,680	31,200	$19.22	31,411	$25.60	
HE15	31,734	31,100	$18.00	31,131	$19.36	
HE16	31,676	31,000	$18.00	31,015	$18.70	
HE17	32,997	31,600	$21.42	31,957	$79.96	
HE18	35,206	33,900	$30.71	33,833	$33.00	
HE19	34,596	33,300	$26.27	33,332	$18.33	
HE20	33,091	32,200	$20.00	32,145	$18.35	
HE21	31,621	31,200	$18.18	31,162	$21.70	
HE22	30,052	29,700	$17.44	29,873	$19.47	
HE23	27,811	27,900	$15.46	27,847	$15.94	
HE24	25,370	25,900	$16.12	25,113	$14.82	

send me your resume.

Good Morning Rosanna,

Sorry I didn't return your phone call yesterday but we were in meetings all day.  I should find out the status of my employment today.  I'm attaching my resume please let me know what you think and I will talk to some people about the origination positions.  Have a nice day.

-Joe Stepenovitch 

Joe,
Good speaking with you again this morning.  If you've updated your details
I'd like to have a look and get back to you with some ideas.  I'll follow up
when I receive your email!
Thanks,
Rosanna

Rosanna Migliaccio
Vice President
Robert Walters Associates
(212) 704-9900
Fax: (212) 704-4312
mailto:rosanna@robertwalters.com
http://www.robertwalters.com

This email and any files transmitted with it are confidential and
intended solely for the use of the individual or entity to whom they
are addressed. If you have received this email in error please notify
the system manager.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

Good Morning Brian,

Thanks for the advice on my resume. 

Rosanna,

Please use this updated resume.  Thanks

 

Joe,
Good speaking with you again this morning.  If you've updated your details
I'd like to have a look and get back to you with some ideas.  I'll follow up
when I receive your email!
Thanks,
Rosanna

Rosanna Migliaccio
Vice President
Robert Walters Associates
(212) 704-9900
Fax: (212) 704-4312
mailto:rosanna@robertwalters.com
http://www.robertwalters.com

This email and any files transmitted with it are confidential and
intended solely for the use of the individual or entity to whom they
are addressed. If you have received this email in error please notify
the system manager.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

Good Morning,

Did you get a hold of her last night?  

-me

I think I will give her a call if you agree.  Joylyn's number is
561-309-0726.  Dad and I will be going to Disney at the Hyatt Regency the
long weekend of Friday November 9-11 and would like you and Payton to join
us.  Saturday is a free day for us as well as Sunday.  My event is Friday
night and Saturday night.

Good Morning Keller,

Thanks for setting up the lunch with Tim.  I enjoyed meeting him and learning more about what Excel has to offer.  Give me a call later.

-Step 

send me your resume.

Good Morning Adrian,

Thank you for taking the time to review my resume.

-Joe Stepenovitch 

Joe,

I am the executive recruiter you spoke with today about your trading
background.  Thanks very much for your time.  As discussed, I've attached my
contact information for your records.  Please  send your resume to me so I
can review and talk about potential opportunities.

You can find more information about my firm at www.firstcallassociates.com.
We are very familiar with the nuances of the energy trading business and
have built relationships with many energy companies in North America
enabling us to present qualified employees for their consideration.

Adrian Clark
Director
First Call Associates, Inc.
8 Andrew Dr.
Canton, CT  06019
(860)693-4122
(860)693-4118 (fax)

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Executive recruiter in the energy and telecommunications industries.

I'm thinking about someone...can U guess who?

I miss u

Good Morning Lauren,

I was glad to hear from you and to find out your not hurt this morning.  I =
will make this short and to the point. I know people can read your e-mail s=
o I trust you will know what I'm talking about if I don't write it)  I want=
 you to know that I'm not mad at you for the decisions you have made, altho=
ugh I don't understand them.  You were saying one thing while thinking anot=
her and if things would have been different yesterday would you be making t=
he same decision today?  I wanted to do things right thing this time and no=
w it seems I won't get the chance.  Maybe things happened for the best, bec=
ause if things would have different yesterday I think you would have called=
 me with a different decision and now I know by your actions it would not h=
ave been right choice.  I don't think you have followed through but I wante=
d you too more than anything.  Lauren, I hope you are doing the right thing=
 for YOU.  I know life comes down to a few moments and this is one of them.=
  I believe in "FATE" do you?

-Me

P.S. I found what you were missing.............

DO YOU WANT ME TO NOMINATE YOU FOR THIS?

Dear all,

Commodities Now Magazine would like your help!!

To acknowledge the development of the role of women in industry, Commodities
Now, in association with Linda Rader and sponsors Accenture and Jacobs
Consultancy, is honouring women in the energy industry who have made an
exceptional contribution to their marketplace. Commodities Now will host a
survey and awards ceremony to honour the women YOU nominate. Winners and
honourees are not selected based on the number of votes they receive but
instead on the strength of the nomination. So, each one counts.

The awards ceremony will be held at the E-World of Energy conference in
Essen in February 2002. The results will also be published in the December
issue of Commodities Now.

Nominations can be for women working in ANY sector of the energy industry
globally, in any job, with honours being given for the display of particular
characteristics or skills in their work.

To nominate a candidate, fill in the form at www.commodities-now.com
Alternatively, print out the attached PDF file and complete the 5 steps
listed. Return the form as instructed.

Make sure we receive your nomination by October 31st.

Thank you for your support.

Regards,
Charlotte James
Commodities Now Magazine

--
Commodities Now
Isherwood Production Ltd.
2nd Floor, Commerce House
6 London Street
London
W2 1HL
United Kingdom

Tel: + 44 (0) 20 402 9222
Cell: + 44 (0) 7710 630279
Fax: + 44 (0) 20 7262 5853
charlotte@commodities-now.com
www.commodities-now.com

 - Nomination Form.pdf 

UT CHICKS!

check this out when you get back

Hubba!! Hubba!! 
  
 - talibansingles.jpg 

I hope this answers your questions.

-me

Dear Joe:

In order to prepare your case for trial, several things are necessary, as
follows:

1.  Depositions must be taken of you and Tonya.

2.  We must send discovery to Tonya and we must have sufficient time
pursuant to the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure for it to be answered prior
to trial.

3.  The Court will require mediation before we can go to trial.

4. The Court will appoint a mental health examiner and possible an attorney
ad litem to represent Payton's best interests.

This is now a case where custody and possession are an issue and these steps
MUST be taken before we can proceed to trial.  Initially, after paternity
was established and you first visited with Payton, your desire was that all
possession periods would be worked out by agreement and neither you nor
Tonya wanted any more court proceedings.  However, since then, Tonya has
bucked your every request for visitation and put limitations of one kind or
another on it, turning the case into a custody case.  Without discovery to
Tonya (similar to the discovery we answered for you) and Tonya's deposition
and a mental health evaluation, we are not prepared for trial and the Court
would not be ready to hear the case and entertain what was in Payton's best
interest.  Therefore, Mr. Fullenweider did not opposed Stewart Gagnon's
motion for continuance, and would have, in fact, have filed one himself in
keeping with your best interest (and Payton's) in mind.

As I explained, we are working on a Request for Temporary Orders, which I
expect will be set on 11/14/01, along with the hearing on mental
evaluations.  At that time, I expect the court to set your possession
periods with Payton, including holidays.  Until then, we must work on
scheduling your possession periods by agreement.

To confirm your November 3rd visitation period, you have chosen to have
Payton from 12:00 noon to 7:00 p.m. in Vero Beach on the 3rd and will forego
November 4th. Where will you pick up and drop off Payton?

Jonda

Good Morning Jonda,

I received the papers from you yesterday about the continuance.  I was
under the impression that it was the court moving the date.  It looks like
to me its Tonya and her Lawyer.  They have been doing pushing this case
back from the start and I'm sure they are doing this for a reason (to say
to the jury: that a bond has been created and its not in the best interest
of the child to go with his father after being with his mother for so long)
At this point if we go to trial Payton will be 1 year old and I will have
only seen him about 12 times.  I don't think I will win that battle!

As for the November 12th court date will we have something in writing by
the judge so I can start having my rights!  I feel like her and her lawyer
can tell us what to do and we must follow there rules.  Will this change or
do I have to go through this until the April court date?  That can't be how
is system works.  I should have the right to pick my own son up whenever I
want and no court or lawyer or even his mother should have anything to say
about that.  I don't understand why everything is against me?

Finally,  for the weekend of Nov 1st I will take my son for the whole day
(in Vero) on Saturday and forego Sunday.

-Joe

    -----Original Message-----
   Dear Joe:

   I just received a phone call from Miryam  Mitchell.  She said if you
   would like to take Payton to Vero Beach on  Saturday, November 3rd, you
   may have him from 12:00 to 7:00, if you are willing  to forego
   visitation on Sunday and let Tonya have him all day on  Sunday.

   If you'd prefer this, let me know.  It  is your call.

   Jonda L. Stowell
   Legal Assistant
   The Fullenweider Firm
   4265 San  Felipe, Suite 1400
   Houston, TX  77027
   (713) 624-4100  Telephone
   (713) 624-4141 Facsimile
    e-mail:  jls@fullenweider.com

Good Morning,

I didn't know you were going last night!  Where did you go?

Had a good time with your pops last night. I told him no one was better than you. Thanks for the email.  

H
Heather Kroll

That's fine.  I don't know if I get him that weekend.  Thanks for the number

I think I will give her a call if you agree.  Joylyn's number is
561-309-0726.  Dad and I will be going to Disney at the Hyatt Regency the
long weekend of Friday November 9-11 and would like you and Payton to join
us.  Saturday is a free day for us as well as Sunday.  My event is Friday
night and Saturday night.

 give me a call when you get this..

Good Luck...

I'll be staying at my parents condo!  Did you talk to your mom?

Bird, everything still on for this weekend?  I am in Winter Haven right now, I have a big interview this morning at 11:00.  Just give me a call later, I think I have Friday off.  
Christopher M Bedford 
Sr Agency Field Specialist 
561-627-4164*227 
Cell:561-373-9346 mailto:christopher.m.bedford.gt2r@statefarm.com << File: mailto:christopher.m.bedford.gt2r@statefarm.com >>  

thanks....

How did it go?  the interview....
I did talk to my mom and she said no problem.  She will probably be there, if not, I will give you the key to the house.  I told my mom you would give her a call and let her know for sure, she definately wants to see Peyton.  Just give me a call when you get a chanse. 

This is TOO GOOD not to share!!!   Hope you enjoy as much as I did!!

>  <<FirstAfghanmissile(1).jpg>>

 - FirstAfghanmissile(1).jpg 

Dad,

Beth's number is 713-345-8023

 
Joe, I'm going to be in town on Monday night,staying at the Four Seasons.
I'm going to have a drink with Fallon and Ozzie if you want to go .  Dad

  - att1.eml << File: att1.eml >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Hey,

When are you going to visit again?  

me and my grandma

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

This sounds good to me.

Thank You,

-Joe

Please advise as to your approval. <<First.Amended.Petition.tty.wpd>>

Sincerely,
Tammy Young
Legal Assistant
The Fullenweider Firm
4265 San Felipe, Suite 1400
Houston, Texas 77027
Telephone: (713)624-4100 ext. 1030
Fax: (713)624-4141
e-mail: ty@fullenweider.com

 - First.Amended.Petition.tty.wpd << File: First.Amended.Petition.tty.wpd >> 

Good Morning,

Sorry, I didn't get back with you yesterday I had the day off.   I would be happy to send you the info I look at during the day. [  
let me know if it helps

-Joe
 -- ---Original Message-----
Joe,

My name is Castlen Moore, and I work with Narsimha Misra on the EES desk.  Anna Santucci and I are managing the Nepool hedging for EES, and Narsimha mentioned you might have a spreadsheet that could be helpful to us.  He said he thought it was pulling info daily from the web on various fundamentals.  Give me a call or email me when you have a minute.  Anything on Nepool would be greatly appreciated by Anna and I.

Thanks!
Castlen
58528 

NO PROB...SEE YOU THEN

Joe,

I looked at the sheet, and I think it will be very helpful.  When I open it however, its giving me an error message - "error updating database."  and then it freezes.  Any ideas?  Is it something I can update each day from the file you gave me, or do you have it saved in a directory that I could just open?  I will be up on 31 at 10:30 , and can swing by your desk if you will have a minute.  Thanks for all your help!

Castlen

Good Morning,

Sorry, I didn't get back with you yesterday I had the day off.   I would be happy to send you the info I look at during the day. [  << File: Nepool ISOInstantUpdate from Peter.xls >> 
let me know if it helps

-Joe
 -- ---Original Message-----
Joe,

My name is Castlen Moore, and I work with Narsimha Misra on the EES desk.  Anna Santucci and I are managing the Nepool hedging for EES, and Narsimha mentioned you might have a spreadsheet that could be helpful to us.  He said he thought it was pulling info daily from the web on various fundamentals.  Give me a call or email me when you have a minute.  Anything on Nepool would be greatly appreciated by Anna and I.

Thanks!
Castlen
58528 

Good Afternoon,

Could you please forward my vacation schedule to Dana Davis.  I will be taking December 17th through January 1st off from work.  Bryce Schneider will be covering my trading responsibilities while I am on vacation.  Also, I would like to rollover my additional week into the new company, leaving me with 40 hrs in which I will give up this year.  If you have any questions please let me know.  

Thank you,

-Joe Stepenovitch

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

Good Morning,

So, what did you decide?  What is Jolyn's cell number?

Let me think about this.
I love you.
Mom

FYI

I need your help to make September 1 physical delivery happen. Please talk amongst yourselves and set up meetings as necessary. Just keep me in the loop. 

Rogers Herndon and I (and others) are going to meet this Friday to go over the report. Please have your plans of action/feedback/comments to me by Thursday morning, so I can make sure they get included in the report he sees. 

 

Thanks for all your help so far. 

Preston
x53341 

Let me know if this week is not convenient, I will be back in town every damn week. Brett sent me an e-mail saying he was getting his ass kicked at Ercot getting ready for the Market to open. How is TA treating you these days? Let me know what works for you.

						

When do you want to come?  The wife and I are expecting you and Richter this week.
I will be working some nasty hours this week due to the new market opening.

Let me know.....

JMF

So when do I get to see the Palace?

I think so, sent the e-mail Thursday.

Did you get Ainsley sorted out ? 

NFB 

Yes

Chris,

Is Ainsley Gaddis a summer intern?

Please advise.

Louis

Please bill Ainsley Gaddis's bus pass to RC 150298

			Thanks
			Chris Stokley

Please bill Ainsley Gaddis's bus pass to RC 150298

			Thanks
			Chris Stokley

Vivian,

	I just wanted to leave you my contact numbers:
	
						Cell:    503-807-8959
					           Work:   503-464-8219
 					          Home:   503-625-3541

	I will be flying out tomorrow, but I should be in around 1:00 Pacific Time. Please send me an e-mail on where we stand with being able to get into the MV90 tables. I have Jeff Richter chomping at the bit on this one so it would be a nice if we can get our hands on that data. Thank you very much for your help on this topic.

									   

Chris, 

We are planning to use the following days to gather data for the ISO audit:

Februay 5, 2000
June 11, 2000
July 15, 2000
August 7, 2000
December 28, 2000

No data is taken from 1999 due to the conversion from CHEOPS to MDMA.
The 5 days represent high UFE days from each quarter of 2000 (see ISO analysis).
July 15 and August 7 were included on the resubmittal analysis you provided.
December 28 is an "exit" sample from the audit period.

Please respond with any concerns or comments.

Thanks,

Ken

I think this is a good example to go off of.

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net <mailto:9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net>
e-mail:  <<mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>>

 - Unscheduled Demand Penalty.doc 

Why did Todd get more words in his e-mail than me? Where is the love?

					me

You still alive?  How is beautiful Houston?

Stewart

Thanks again for the help

 

FYI?MO

Sent:   Tuesday, June 26, 2001 7:40 AM

Cc:     Herrera, Juan

Murray, thanks for your interest in leveraging the Gutenberg work.  Here's the draft Overview.  The visio documents are not the most current, but I've asked the consultants to produce a binder this morning and also e-mail you all of the most current process flows as well as the Pricing and Booking disconnect detail you requested.

I 'd like very much to learn more how you would see expediting progress through the EWS processes and tools, and hope you'll work with us as soon as possible to see what might be possible.

Glenn   <<pbgDesign & Dev Doc May17A.doc>> 

What was the question?

Attached is the TX market diagram and tentative answers (in red) to the settlement questions posed below.  

 << File: TXMarketDiagram.xls >>  << File: TXPreston730.doc >> 

Also, regarding the question posed earlier today,  Marty Sullivan 214-875-2636 (Enron's TXU representative) is checking to see if the information you requested is public and available.  TXU considers industrial customers to be >1 MW.  He informed me that on September 1st customer information will be released to marketers.  There is a possibility that by sorting through this information, you can identify the industrial customers in the TXU service territory.

Please call me with any questions.  

Preston Ochsner
07/24/2001 08:01 PM

While cautious of the issues we face, I'm very encouraged by your experience and your willingness to help. 

I tried to summarize the issues discussed in the meeting this afternoon in the attached report. Please let me know if I've erroneously attributed your name to an issue. 

Don't pay much attention to the Scenario at the bottom of the report. I haven't spent much time on it. 

 << File: ERCOT Physical Delivery Process.doc >> 

We will continue to fill in the blanks (and probably add issues) over the next few months. 

My short term goal is to identify the vast majority of the issues and have a plan of action related to those issues within the next week. 

Any feedback you have is welcome. 

FYI

<<521 - 523 Synopsis.doc>> 

FYI

Greetings, attached is an excel spreadsheet that lists the 5 highest UFE

days broken out by demand zones and for all trade days during the audit

period.  We though this might be a useful piece of information for you as

you begin picking your sample days for testing SQMD.  We have put this

spreadsheet together strictly as information to provide to you.

We are already at the half way mark of the audit period and wanted to again

extend our services if any of you have any questions or concerns that you

would like to discuss, please feel free to contact either myself or Glen

Perez at gperez@caiso.com < <mailto:gperez@caiso.com>> , 916-325-2135.

 <<highUFE.xls>>

Jeanette Mertz

Data Quality Auditor

California ISO

916-608-5971

jmertz@caiso.com

 - highUFE.xls <<highUFE.xls>> 

FYI

I have prepared a handout which I will make available at today's meeting.  I am also distributing it with this email.
 
Alan Comnes

Mechelle,
            I will let you make the call, MW's or $'s. Look at the spreadsheet  below and give me your thoughts.
 
                                                              Chris
              

Chris, 

I've attached a spreadsheet regarding metered load resubmittals.  Please call me if you have any questions at all. 

Donna 

<<stokley.xls>> 

Take Jeff off off of your list and that should be the proper distribution.

All, 
        Attached is the ISO final settlement statements for EES, months January, February, and March.  Please call me at 503-464-8816 if you have any questions.

-Kit Blair      

<<EES 1.xls>> <<0201 EES.xls>> <<0301 EES.xls>> 

Who is your contact?

Chris,
    I did ask Caroline, she told me to ask you, we were both under the impression that it had changed and that you had someone new that we were to send it to.  I will keep sending them to the old contacts.
-Kit

Check with Caroline to see who the current contact is with EES.

Chris, 

        I have EES and PGES files prepared though March, if there is someone at EES you would like me to send them to, please let me know.  Thanks.

-Kit 

Check with Caroline to see who the current contact is with EES.

Chris, 

        I have EES and PGES files prepared though March, if there is someone at EES you would like me to send them to, please let me know.  Thanks.

-Kit 

Ress,
        Who would be the contact to get the latest version of this document.
 
                                                         Thanks
                                                          Chris

Chris,

This is not exactly the same but should be very close.  

Ress

Glenn Dickson

02/01/2001 02:54 PM

<<201 CAT presentation final.ppt>> 

Mechelle,
              I  should have an answer today on the month that had the greatest number of resubmittals to the ISO. What are the dates that the ISO is showing for the greatest UFE inpact? Also, I will try and set up a time later in the week that Murray O'neil and myself can come by to get an update on the audit.
 
 
                                                                       Thanks
                                                                         Chris

Jeff,
       Please add me to your distribution list for the varies reports that you send out to Neil Bresnan.
 
 
                                                                                Thanks
                                                                                  Chris 
 

Sorry for my tardiness on this issue, I was cleaning my e-mail today and realized that I never got back with you on this topic. Go w/ the original estimates for Valley to bill off of. The actuals variance from estimate is immaterial. If you have a question call me at 503-807-8959.

give me a call on my cell 807-8928

I will give you a call tomorrow.

Chris I need to get these numbers from you.

Thanks,

Paul 
X3837

ACCOMPLISHMENTS

?	Successfully hired trained and implemted a group within VM that acts as the liaison b/w Houston Settlements and our Traders.
?	Provided guidance to Virginia on what type of reports would be needed for the Traders along w/ settling up a weekly forum by which she can communicate her issues and results to the traders.
?	Helped coordinate a plan of attack on how we would become current on ISO actualizations and on what we would do in the interim.
?	Provide leadership,guicance and a shoulder for the group to cry on during a very stressful six months.
?	Worked Murray O'neil to provide different reporting units with timely accurate reporting of EPMI's credit position w/ the ISO and PX.
?	Provided solutions that helped manage Mid-Marketing expectations with what the group could provide in a timely manner due to our technology constraints.
?	Made communication and transfer of knowledge a top priority within the group, which is now paying off dividends. Quite a few members of the group now are able to interchange duties when necessary and therefore able to dilute the stress level of the person that is becoming overwhelmed.
?	Came up with the calculation that has the potential to add money to the desk under the current  ISO inc dec pricing.

GOALS
	
?	To gain more working knowledge of the financial products used by the Commercial units of Enron
?	Successfully complete the EES project by year-end and make a transition to a new rotation.
?	Continue to increase my knowledge of relevant software ( VB, Excel, Access, etc.)
?	Take courses on financial modeling and statistical analysis
?	Take my knowledge of the both the ENA process and the West market, and transfer them over to the EES business unit.
?	Gain intimate knowledge of all of the relevant reports and reporting tools that are used within Enron.
?	Formulate a clear plan by year-end  to where I want to be in the next two years, and what I need to do to arrive at my end goal.
?	

Yea, me giving up what is with that. So I got to go out like a punk and you went down in a blaze of glory, beautiful. How is everything going in the wonderful PacifiCorp world? Did you ever settle into a specific job or do still move around. Risk group seems to be doing better, they even get to get off early one day a week. I am pretty much spending all of my time in Houston working on the EES project, kinda sucks s far as the travel goes. I don't know if you heard, but we lost Sean could lose more at year end when all of the contracts come to duration.

										Chris

had a dream last night, actually this morning, and you were in it.  We were running from the cops.  You gave up.  What's with that?

Maurice,
              Thursday at  3:00pm would be fine for all of us involved in the meeting.
 
                                                                Chris
 

Gentlemen,

I have been pulled into an emergency task force this morning by Evan Hughes to address some CA issues for which you are probably aware.  Therefore, I must reschedule our meeting for tomorrow afternoon or Friday.  I would like to try 3:00pm on Thurs.  What are your schedules looking like?

Remember how bad T.A. reported that we all were on putting cuts into the system, enpower work,  reconciliation,  etc. ? 

THESE GUYS DO NONE OF THAT - NO ONE EVEN KNOWS HOW.   

Settlements is working hard,  but TA doesnt say a word to the RT traders here,  as it would be political suicide.     That's why she turned toward us.
She is supposed to be our rep to the ISO,   and I talked to her,   explaining my expectations.   She was squirming  about saying that she or Rebecca wouldnt know the answers.   Im cool with that,  but cant you find out?   Everything is such a big struggle here.

Im not coming until February at the earliest.    I am an Oregonian.
The freaking mosquitos are terrible now that the floodwaters have subsided.  I forgot about that bit of joy.

Later,
JMf

That is ok with me 

Michael,

Can we move the meeting this aftrnoon back to 3 PM ? 

NFB 

Keoni,

	I realize that there are no penalty charges associated to Load, I am referring to the neg. and positive load deviation. What are all of the charges associated to the penalties for deviation from schedule. 

	Ps  Jim, take your best cut at what you think these charges are and then get Keoni too sign off on what results you come up with. We need to put every charge that we think is linked to a schedule and then just have Keoni fill in the gaps and sign off on the document.

								Chris

This is what Keoni says:  See below.  I have placed all the numbers on the Charge Names and am putting together a list of what is missing from this document.

There are no "penalty charges" associated with loads, just the load
deviation charges such as replacement reserves.
http://www.caiso.com/docs/2000/04/13/20000413073746684.pdf

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>

This is one request of Chris.  Is he talking about 403 with 111-116?

Jim
>  -----Original Message-----

Home# 503-625-3541
Cellular# 503-807-8959

I need to get the following information from you for group cards:

Pager#
Home#
Cellular#

Edith and Joseph I only need your pager number

If you do not have a pager please let me know.

Thanks,
Kathy
x39308

Thought you guys might get a kick out of this.

Remember how bad T.A. reported that we all were on putting cuts into the system, enpower work,  reconciliation,  etc. ? 

THESE GUYS DO NONE OF THAT - NO ONE EVEN KNOWS HOW.   

Settlements is working hard,  but TA doesnt say a word to the RT traders here,  as it would be political suicide.     That's why she turned toward us.
She is supposed to be our rep to the ISO,   and I talked to her,   explaining my expectations.   She was squirming  about saying that she or Rebecca wouldnt know the answers.   Im cool with that,  but cant you find out?   Everything is such a big struggle here.

Im not coming until February at the earliest.    I am an Oregonian.
The freaking mosquitos are terrible now that the floodwaters have subsided.  I forgot about that bit of joy.

Later,
JMf

Also, could you please add the associated charge codes to the description. Then go back and audit the document by cross checking the number of ISO charge types vs. what you have been given in the document. The final document should have all charge types that the ISO currently has in place.

 << File: Activity Charges Keoni.doc >> 

There you go!  How is Houston?

Please forward me the version w/ Keoni's comments.

 << File: Activity Charges Keoni no edits.doc >> 

Harvey had created the above document that shows the ISO Charges that occur due Firm and Non-Firm Imports and Exports and Load.  I had Keoni look it over and edit Harvey's file...And here is the version not showing Keoni's edits.   

Jim

Jim,
	We are missing one significant piece of info in this document. We need to add the charges associated Positive and Negative  Load Deviation (Penalty Charges). I don't think that there are any for Positive Dev., but I know that there are charges associated to Neg. Dev.

								Chris

 << File: Activity Charges Keoni.doc >> 

There you go!  How is Houston?

Please forward me the version w/ Keoni's comments.

 << File: Activity Charges Keoni no edits.doc >> 

Harvey had created the above document that shows the ISO Charges that occur due Firm and Non-Firm Imports and Exports and Load.  I had Keoni look it over and edit Harvey's file...And here is the version not showing Keoni's edits.   

Jim

Mary Lynne,
	I just got a chance to look at this document. Take a look at line 19(Utilities Covered), I think it has all of the information you are looking for. 

											Chris

Chris - Is there any master list of Utility acronyms with the full name of the utility ?
Take a look at this document. The section with major players is the one with the utilities that are tied to an index, however, there are some minor utilities that are not covered in that list. Do you think that we need the minor utilities?

 << File: PJM Front Page.xls >>  
					Chris

Were you able to get the utility names for PJM?

Christina,
	I will not be in the Houston office until late Monday afternoon, could we please move this meeting back until latter in the day(after 3:00). Also, could you please make sure that we have a confer ace phone in the room so that we can conference in the Portland group. Please add Murray O'neil to the list of required participants for this meeting.

						Thanks
						  Chris

Please forward me the version w/ Keoni's comments.

 << File: Activity Charges Keoni no edits.doc >> 

Harvey had created the above document that shows the ISO Charges that occur due Firm and Non-Firm Imports and Exports and Load.  I had Keoni look it over and edit Harvey's file...And here is the version not showing Keoni's edits.   

Jim

In case you have not seen this, here it is:
<http://www.ferc.gov/news/pressreleases/mitigation.pdf>

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net <mailto:9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net>
e-mail:  <<mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>>

All,

Retail curves for California were not created last night.  I will notify you once the curves are completed and checked.
I am looking into why this occurred.

DK

Tuesday works better for me Maurice, my flight does not arrive into Houston until 6:00pm tonight. As far as a time for Tuesday, I would say anytime after 10:00 am would be open on my schedule.
                                                      Chris
 
 
 

:-----Original Message----- 
Neil,

Pat is meeting with the CAISO auditors all afternoon, but I have asked if she can give us some time after 5pm.  If she is not available, what time tommorow morning is good for you? Chris and Micheal?

Also, I have attached the CSC systems drawing that I spoke of in our last meeting.

Maurice

<<CES System Overview 001102.bmp>> 

   

        Enron Energy Services

Maurice,

I have PRC Monday.  If we have the meeting with Pat at 4 PM I should be able to make it. 

Please send me an e-mail to confirm the time and location. 

NFB 

Michael Frazier

06/14/2001 07:09 PM

Sounds like a feasible solution to me as long as we can get specified formats and the data uploads are well-maintained by CSC.  Are there any extra costs on their end for performing this posting function?

mrf

Maurice Winter

06/14/2001 08:51 AM

All,

I spoke with Pat Priestley this morning about our request to get access to the MV90 daily interval meter data for load forecasting.  She said that she would not be available to meet formally until Monday due to the declared disaster at their operations due to the flood.  She said they are moving back to the Pennzoil building today and Friday, so things should be close to normal by Monday.

Pat said that it is not be a problem to export the MV90 data (in just about any format) on a daily basis for us.  The data is housed in MV90 databases which , according to Pat, can only be read by an MV90 system; so we would need to purchase MV90 (very expensive) if we wanted to read the data directly.  

I suggest we get the data exported daily from CSC to an FTP site at Enron, because they can manage the process on a daily basis.  We can sweep the FTP site daily and have it automatically imported into our databases.

If we are in agreement with this solution, I  will create an emergency work request with CSC to begin working on this immediately.

Maurice

FYI

Busy schedules did not permit this meeting to occur on next week.  We are now looking at the week of June 25th.  Once again please let me know the availability for the following  individuals:
  Greg Young, Rogers Herndon, Don Black, Chris Stokley, Jeff Richter, Brenda Herod, Evan Hughes, Neal Symms, Beth Apollo, Anthony Dayao

Suggested meeting times:
Monday, June 25
between 8:00 - 11:30
between 2:00 - 3:00 pm

Tuesday, June 26
between 8:00 - 2:00 
between 3:00 - 5:00

Wednesday, June 27
between 8:00 - 10:00

Thursday, June 28th
between 8:00 - 1:00

Friday, June 29
between 8 -5pm 

This Friday did not work out.  Please forward availabiIity for the week of June 18th.

Suggested meeting times:

Monday, June 18th
1:00 - 2:00 pm

Tuesday, June 19th
between 11:00 - 2:00 pm
betwenn 3:00 - 5:00 pm

Friday, June 22nd
between 8:00 - 5:00 pm

Scott Mills has requested a meeting to discuss Service Management Settlements.  Please check your respective manager's calendar and let me know their availability  for Friday June 15th.

Chris / Jeff / Neal - 
Please let me know of your availability for Friday, June 15th.

Meeting Invitees
Greg Young
Anthony Dayao
Rogers Herndon
Don Black
Chris Stokley
Jeff Richter
Brenda Herod
Beth Apollo
Neal Symms
Evan Hughes

Thank you,
Christina
ext. 36331

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Jeff,
=09Please add me to your current e-mail distribution list.

=09=09=09=09   Thanks
=09=09=09=09Chris Stokley

In addition to Sue Mara's list you also want to get on Jeff Dasovich, and A=
lan Comnes to make sure you are covered.=20

NFB=20

Susan J Mara@ENRON <mailto:Mara@ENRON>
06/15/2001 12:43 AM

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Counihan, Rick" <rick.counihan@greenmountain.com <mailto:rick.counihan@=

Ann Watson of Comm. Bilas' office said that the decision ending DA and the =
Bilas alternate would be mailed outtoday, but probably not up on the websit=
e until tomorrow.  Everyone should watch their mail and e-mail for it.
=20
Ann confirmed that Hertzberg had called Lynch asking for them to delay.
And, of course the PUC accommodated them today.  Ann said however, that she
was not able to hold the decision until July 12.  The reason is that a
letter from the Treasurer, DWR and Finance was sent to Commissioners and
legislators telling them that DA had to be suspended by June 28 in order fo=
r
appeals etc. to be settled by the time the issue the bonds in August.  I
believe someone else referenced this letter in an e-mail yesterday.  Ann is
appending the letter to the Bilas alternate so everyone can see it and
comment.  Also, they are going to ask for comments on going to "bottoms up"
rates.
=20
Rick Counihan
Green Mountain

Alan,

=09Please add me to your current e-mail distribution list.

=09=09=09=09Chris Stokley

In addition to Sue Mara's list you also want to get on Jeff Dasovich, and A=
lan Comnes to make sure you are covered.=20

NFB=20

Susan J Mara@ENRON <mailto:Mara@ENRON>
06/15/2001 12:43 AM

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Counihan, Rick" <rick.counihan@greenmountain.com <mailto:rick.counihan@=

Ann Watson of Comm. Bilas' office said that the decision ending DA and the =
Bilas alternate would be mailed outtoday, but probably not up on the websit=
e until tomorrow.  Everyone should watch their mail and e-mail for it.
=20
Ann confirmed that Hertzberg had called Lynch asking for them to delay.
And, of course the PUC accommodated them today.  Ann said however, that she
was not able to hold the decision until July 12.  The reason is that a
letter from the Treasurer, DWR and Finance was sent to Commissioners and
legislators telling them that DA had to be suspended by June 28 in order fo=
r
appeals etc. to be settled by the time the issue the bonds in August.  I
believe someone else referenced this letter in an e-mail yesterday.  Ann is
appending the letter to the Bilas alternate so everyone can see it and
comment.  Also, they are going to ask for comments on going to "bottoms up"
rates.
=20
Rick Counihan
Green Mountain

Sue,
=09Please add me to your current distribution list.

=09=09=09=09=09Chris Stokley

In addition to Sue Mara's list you also want to get on Jeff Dasovich, and A=
lan Comnes to make sure you are covered.=20

NFB=20

Susan J Mara@ENRON <mailto:Mara@ENRON>
06/15/2001 12:43 AM

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Counihan, Rick" <rick.counihan@greenmountain.com <mailto:rick.counihan@=

Ann Watson of Comm. Bilas' office said that the decision ending DA and the =
Bilas alternate would be mailed outtoday, but probably not up on the websit=
e until tomorrow.  Everyone should watch their mail and e-mail for it.
=20
Ann confirmed that Hertzberg had called Lynch asking for them to delay.
And, of course the PUC accommodated them today.  Ann said however, that she
was not able to hold the decision until July 12.  The reason is that a
letter from the Treasurer, DWR and Finance was sent to Commissioners and
legislators telling them that DA had to be suspended by June 28 in order fo=
r
appeals etc. to be settled by the time the issue the bonds in August.  I
believe someone else referenced this letter in an e-mail yesterday.  Ann is
appending the letter to the Bilas alternate so everyone can see it and
comment.  Also, they are going to ask for comments on going to "bottoms up"
rates.
=20
Rick Counihan
Green Mountain

Please note- the location for this meeting is EB 1273
	Calendar Entry	

Brief description:
Date:
Time:

 West Intramonth Book (EB 1273)
06/18/2001
02:00 PM - 02:30 PM

Detailed description:

Invitations have been sent to:	Jeff Richter/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Richter/Enron@EnronXGate>, Neil Bresnan/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Bresnan/HOU/EES@EES>, Ligny Hunter/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Hunter/HOU/EES@EES>, Jeffrey Jackson/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Jackson/HOU/EES@EES>, Chris Leonard/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Leonard/HOU/EES@EES>, Chris Stokley/ENRON@enronXgate <mailto:Stokley/ENRON@enronXgate>

So when do I get to see the Palace?

FYI

ppriest2@csc.com <mailto:ppriest2@csc.com> on 06/12/2001 02:48:24 PM
Patricia G Priestley/CEG/CSC
06/12/2001 02:47 PM

Attached is a summary of the impacted areas and a current status of Meter
Operations due to Houston flooding:

Meter reading and posting of data - We are currently unable to read/post
interval data for California or Phoenix.  While the electricity has been
restored, phone lines are still inoperable meaning we are unable to read
phone or wireless meters.  Since the phone system to the building had
extensive water damage, we are not sure when the lines will be available.
Backup operations are being developed in Dublin but are not yet functional.

Settlements for EEMC - Files for EEMC have been posted through Sunday, the
10th, for day 41, April 30.  Day 41 files for 5/1 due Monday, the 11th, and
5/2 due today, the 12th, have not been produced.  We are unable to
communicate with our servers because of the phone outage and are therefore
unable to create the files remotely.  Through today we have been denied
access to  our building.  Our plan is to seek access on Wednesday at least
long enough to generate our files and submit them remotely using a laptop.

Settlements for EESO - Files for EESO have been posted through Sunday,
settlement file 4/30 for day 41.  We are able to generate settlement files
offsite and are working to submit Monday's 5/1 and Tuesday's 5/2 file by
midnight today.

My plan is to produce these daily updates until all of our operations are
back in place and on schedule.

Please contact me with any questions....pager 800.946.4646    pin# 1524013.

Scott Mills has requested a meeting to discuss Service Management Settlements.  Please check your respective manager's calendar and let me know their availability  for Friday June 15th.

Chris / Jeff / Neal - 
Please let me know of your availability for Friday, June 15th.

Meeting Invitees
Greg Young
Anthony Dayao
Rogers Herndon
Don Black
Chris Stokley
Jeff Richter
Brenda Herod
Beth Apollo
Neal Symms
Evan Hughes

Thank you,
Christina
ext. 36331

All,

I spoke with Pat Priestley this morning about our request to get access to the MV90 daily interval meter data for load forecasting.  She said that she would not be available to meet formally until Monday due to the declared disaster at their operations due to the flood.  She said they are moving back to the Pennzoil building today and Friday, so things should be close to normal by Monday.

Pat said that it is not be a problem to export the MV90 data (in just about any format) on a daily basis for us.  The data is housed in MV90 databases which , according to Pat, can only be read by an MV90 system; so we would need to purchase MV90 (very expensive) if we wanted to read the data directly.  

I suggest we get the data exported daily from CSC to an FTP site at Enron, because they can manage the process on a daily basis.  We can sweep the FTP site daily and have it automatically imported into our databases.

If we are in agreement with this solution, I  will create an emergency work request with CSC to begin working on this immediately.

Maurice

Could one of you please take a look at the below e-mail and see if you can answer her questions.

					Chris

	 
 - EPMI BLK FWD.doc 

http://www.dslreports.com/

I think that these are all of the documents that you were unable to open from my previous e-mails.

     

					Chris
Mechelle,

	Sorry for the delay on getting you the documents in question. I currently can not get into Lotus Notes where all of the documents reside. The IT group is looking into the problem and I will get the documents to you the moment that I have access to Lotus Notes again. 

							Chris

Hello, Chris.  It was nice to meet you last Friday.  I wanted to remind you to please re-email me those documents as soon as you get a chance.  I'd like to get through those and have a plan re:  dates, staff, etc. by mid-week this week.  Please call if you have any questions.

Thanks.

Mechelle Atwood
Director, Enron Assurance Services
Enron Wholesale Services
713.345.4554; Location:  EB2383
Mechelle.Atwood@enron.com <mailto:Mechelle.Atwood@enron.com>

George,
	Questions:
1)	What DA and RT Excel reports are you referencing in the e-mail below? The only report that my group currently sends out is the ISO HA Final which comes from Jim Reyes. 
2)	Who are the contacts that are sending you these reports and what are the timelines in which you receive these reports after the date of physical flow.
3)	Please send me and example of both the reports and the discrepancies that you have encountered along w/ your process for booking the information given in the reports.

I think that you are probably referring to the reports that Kate Symes and the R-T group send out, but I don't want to jump to that conclusion without you confirming that to be true. Any information you can give me on the process will be helpful in coming up w/ a solution to the issues that you are running into. 

									Thanks
									  Chris

Chris, 

Recently, the Excel files for the DA and RT markets that are sent to populate EES DealTracker, do not tie to the EnPower file sent to us later.  This has caused all parties increased  investigation time and could cause potential delays in the booking of accruals. Recently,  the scenario is occuring more frequently.   I wanted to bring this matter to your attention now to avoid any delays.   Thank you in advance for any assistance you can provide to make the process smoother.  If you have any questions, please contact me.  -George 

Chris,

A request was put in from Mike Tully to add exporting funtionality to the Scheduling Activity Report (SAR).  This functionality has been added and is now currently in Stage, ready for user testing.  I spoke with David Poston about who to contact for this, and he directed me to you.  If you have any questions please let me know, also please e-mail me back if the report is fine so I can put the request in to move it to production.

The Stage Version # is:  2.0.0.19
 
Thanks,

Brett Pate
Enpower QA
713-345-2534

 

Hey, good morning Will. I was out yesterday, so I could not get in touch with you. Sorry. Anyway, the problem is that the SAR report has no way to save the data to anything other than it's own special format. We need the ability to save this data into a CSV type file. The reason for this is that we sometimes send this report to customers and, presently, they cannot view the information. We also share this report with our traders who need immediate access to this report and cannot view it unless they take the time to Open up Enpower and then view the report through there. This presents a problem as most of the time Enpower is so slow. Is there any way that we can have an option to save the data to either a CSV Type, or as an Excel Document.

Thanks

Mike

http://www.eteamz.com/sherwoodbaseball/links/

A leopard never changes its spots! Is this an after thought since they heard you were going to leave? I would be worried about any position that I felt needed arm twisting to get to in the end. Sounds like a good opportunity, but I wonder why it is now coming to the surface and what is behind it. I am bias, I don't trust anyone on that side of the pond so I may not be the best person to give an objective answer. You have a good feel for people, go w/ your gut. You knew in you the back of your mind that this is the way that it would go down at the end of the day. Get some more opinions and then go w/ your instincts.

										Chris
The opportunity here has been enhanced;   in addition to Managing RT,   I would be managing all of the Service Assets in Texas.   This includes trading around a 500 mw plant,   serving EES and New Power Company loads,  and also the potential for managing a new 1500 mw full requirements deal. 
Of course,  I would have to have all of this in writing.      I would be working with the Texas Term trader to enhance my trading skills in order to effectively manage this position.
This makes the offer more attractive,  but still I would be in Houston.      I am still apprehensive of the bait & switch exposure.
What do you think?
JMF
Anything new going on w/ your current hunt for opportunities.

			Chris

Amy, 
	I can not believe you did this without my approval! I hate to hear that you are leaving us, you have been such an asset to the Portland office. The person coming in just needs to start the car and drive, since you already built it. We need to go have a drink before you head off to oblivion. Where will you be working?

							Chris
We regret to announce that Amy Fitzpatrick will be leaving Enron's Portland office in September.  Amy's husband, Simon, has accepted a job in New Jersey, and it didn't make sense for them to "commute" coast to coast.  Amy will continue to work here for the next month or two to hire her replacement and to make sure that her responsibilities have been completely handed over.  We really appreciate having such long lead time to effectuate this transition.

Amy has made tremendous contributions to our office over the last 14 months.  We really appreciate her efforts.  We realize that Amy has become integral to the efficient operation of the Portland office and want to make her transition as smooth as possible.  If you have any concerns or wish to get any issues on to the "transition list" please let your manager and/or Amy know.

Tim Belden and Chris Calger

Anything new going on w/ your current hunt for opportunities.

			Chris

Mechelle,

	Sorry for the delay on getting you the documents in question. I currently can not get into Lotus Notes where all of the documents reside. The IT group is looking into the problem and I will get the documents to you the moment that I have access to Lotus Notes again. 

							Chris

Hello, Chris.  It was nice to meet you last Friday.  I wanted to remind you to please re-email me those documents as soon as you get a chance.  I'd like to get through those and have a plan re:  dates, staff, etc. by mid-week this week.  Please call if you have any questions.

Thanks.

Mechelle Atwood
Director, Enron Assurance Services
Enron Wholesale Services
713.345.4554; Location:  EB2383
Mechelle.Atwood@enron.com

FYI

While you are working on the EES project, your new cost center will be 150298.

If you have any questions, please let me know.

Amy

http://www.cnet.com/software/0-3923203-7-1519143.html?tag=st.sw.8888.bhed.3715-7-1519143

<http://homepage.mac.com/marvyn/gretta/Gretta1.mov>
<http://homepage.mac.com/marvyn/gretta/Gretta_Bath.mov>

More will be coming if I ever get a few minutes...the good news is
the Sony DV camera works ***SEAMLESSLY** with the G4!  The Mac takes
complete control of the camera once the firewire is plugged in; no
need to even mess with the camera...the Mac will do all the ffwding,
rewinding, time-code stamping, etc.

Chris,

I am attaching the final audit plan below.  Please let me know if you need
anything else.

Thanks,
Linda

(See attached file: EPMI Audit Plan.ppt)

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

 - EPMI Audit Plan.ppt 

The attached document had no changes and is considered the final ISO file.

Thanks to EVERYONE who helped us with the review!!!!!  Janet, you were extremely helpful and we appreciate all of your time!!

Let's keep in touch,

Jane

Distribution:

Please see the attached document which includes the final version of the 1999 ISO Review.  As you remember, we submitted to the ISO a draft report as testing issues were unresolved.  Please review the report (revisions are in red) and let me know if you have any comments by Wednesday, August 9.

Thank you for all of your help.

Jane

Murray and Chris,

I will send you guys the final report on Thurs. August 10.

Chris, attached is the cover letter that was sent to Murray, along with the
timeline and the requirements.  Should you be the main contact or should I
continue sending the information to Murray?  Thanks

 <<sc-audit-req-00.rtf>>  	 <<sc-audit-timeline-00.doc>>
<<epmi-coverltr.doc>>

Jeanette Plumley
Data Quality Auditor
California ISO
916-608-5971
jplumley@caiso.com

 - sc-audit-req-00.rtf

Jeanette Plumley
California ISO
916-608-5971
jplumley@caiso.com

Chris,

Please see the attached file which includes a brief description of our engagement team for the ISO Audit.  Please call if you have any questions.

Thanks,

Jane

Maurice,
	Could you let me know when you will be able to get your hands on the MV90 sample data. John Rutledge is looking to get his hands on the data and I want to give him an update on where we stand on this item. Hope your trip went well, and thanks again for your help on this item.

							Chris

I would agree, but I didn't think Kevin followed the Catholic faith so I moved him over to the Mormon faith. A lot of people I work w/ are Mormon and they remind me of old school Catholics, lots of kids.

								Chris

Hey Stoke,

You were surprise about the baby! Just imagine how shocked we were - all
this time we figured it was a beer gut. If you are in Houston, we'll have to
get together on one of the weekends that you stay in town. The job search is
"...like jerking-off with a cheese grader, its slightly amusing , but mostly
painful." -Andrew Dice Clay

I disagree with the Mormon comment; as a matter of fact, I believe he is
doing great at upholding the catholic teachings regarding birth control.
Seriously, I believe this one is the last of his flock.

Bud,
	I had zero idea that Kevin had another baby on the way until he
sent out the pictures. He will need to convert to being a Mormon soon if
he keeps having kids. What is your latest on the job search? I am
currently on a 6-mth project in Houston, so forgive me if my responses
are not prompt.

							ME

		 -----Original Message-----
		The room was full of pregnant women and their partners,
and the Lamaze class  was in full swing.

		The instructor was teaching the women how  to breathe
properly, along with informing the men how to give the  necessary
assurances at this stage of the plan.

		The  instructor then announced, "Ladies, exercise is
good for you.  Walking is especially beneficial. And, gentlemen, it
wouldn't hurt  you to take the time to go walking with your partner!"

		The  room really got quiet. Finally, a man in the middle
of the group  raised his hand. "Yes?" replied the instructor.

		"Is it all  right if she carries a golf bag while we
walk?"

FYI

This message is to inform you that information contained on your printed pay advice for the pay period ending May 31, 2001, may be misleading.

Regardless of whether you have single or multiple direct deposits, your net pay is correct, but your pay advice will indicate that all of your pay has been deposited collectively to "Other Bank".  It does not list specific bank accounts.  However, if you view your pay advice in eHRonline, you will be able to confirm your scheduled direct deposits and verify the accounts to which the deposits were made.  

You may access eHRonline and view your pay advice by taking the following steps:

?	Click the following link to open eHRonline:  <https://ehronline.enron.com> 
?	Read the disclaimer
?	Click Accept
?	Type your SAP Logon ID (e.g. your "P" ID) in the User Id field.
?	Enter your SAP password in the Password field.
?	Click the Logon button.
?	Select Paycheck Inquiry from the drop-down list
?	Click the radio button next to Results in Period to select the default for the May 31, 2001 pay advice
?	Click the Continue button.
?	Click the link for the 05/16/2001-05/31/2001 pay period to display your pay advice.
?	Scroll to the bottom of the screen to view your direct deposit details.

If you have additional questions about your pay advice or accessing eHRonline, please contact the ISC Customer Care Group at 713.345.4727 or isc.hotline@enron.com <mailto:isc.hotline@enron.com> .

Thank you.

Bud,
	I had zero idea that Kevin had another baby on the way until he sent out the pictures. He will need to convert to being a Mormon soon if he keeps having kids. What is your latest on the job search? I am currently on a 6-mth project in Houston, so forgive me if my responses are not prompt. 

							ME

 
 
		         The room was full of pregnant women and their partners, and the Lamaze class  was in full swing.   The instructor was teaching the women how  to breathe properly, along with informing the men how to give the  necessary assurances at this stage of the plan.   The  instructor then announced, "Ladies, exercise is good for you.  Walking is especially beneficial. And, gentlemen, it wouldn't hurt  you to take the time to go walking with your partner!"   The  room really got quiet. Finally, a man in the middle of the group  raised his hand. "Yes?" replied the instructor.   "Is it all  right if she carries a golf bag while we walk?"        	

Jim,
         Please send HA Finals for the dates listed below to Pamela Carter.

Chris thanks for sending the files for the above dates however, I don'thave the files for 5/01-5/03.  Would you please forward those to me?

Thanks,

Pam

Murray,

	I tried to send Mechelle the SQMD documents through the old Lotus Notes, but it would not allow me to do so. I will give you a call in the morning so we can discuss a work around. I know that Donna was able to send me an e-mail from Lotus Notes just last week.

							Chris

Amy,
	I did not get to do my reviews through the PEP system, so I will be e-mailing the appropriate supervisors tomorrow with my reviews.

						Chris

Stan,
	Could you please look at these deals and get back w/ Evelyn.

Hi Chris,

Here are the deals I spoke to you about over the  phone.  These are hourly deals however, based on the information that is on APX's website I can't seem to match these deals with anything.

The deal numbers are: 595705, 595714, 595819.  They were traded at the end of April.

Thanks very much for your help.

Evelyn

Melissa,
	Could you please have a payment sent to the APX of  $250,000.

					Thanks
					  Chris

Chris,

I was wondering if we could get some more APX money?  Please request another payment to the APX of $250,000.

Thanks,
Stan

> Victoria Ashley Jones.  Born 7:31 a.m. May 25  7lb 9 oz.  19.5 inches  Mom
> and baby doing fine.  At Memorial Hospital in the Woodlands.
>
>
>  <<Victoria_Ashley_Jones_1.jpg>>  <<Victoria_Ashley_Jones_2.jpg>>
>
> Regards,
> KMJ
>
> Kevin M. Jones
> Systems Engineer
> Compaq Computer Corporation
> 20555 State Highway 249, MS 090501
> Houston, TX 77070-2698
>
> Phone: 281-514-7828
> Fax: 28-514-9168
> email: kevin.jones@compaq.com <mailto:kevin.jones@compaq.com>
>
>

 - Victoria_Ashley_Jones_1.jpg 
 - Victoria_Ashley_Jones_2.jpg 

Congratulations buddy! I didn't even know that you guys had another on the way. 

					Chris

> Victoria Ashley Jones.  Born 7:31 a.m. May 25  7lb 9 oz.  19.5 inches  Mom
> and baby doing fine.  At Memorial Hospital in the Woodlands.
>
>
>  <<Victoria_Ashley_Jones_1.jpg>>  <<Victoria_Ashley_Jones_2.jpg>>
>
> Regards,
> KMJ
>
> Kevin M. Jones
> Systems Engineer
> Compaq Computer Corporation
> 20555 State Highway 249, MS 090501
> Houston, TX 77070-2698
>
> Phone: 281-514-7828
> Fax: 28-514-9168
> email: kevin.jones@compaq.com
>
>

 - Victoria_Ashley_Jones_1.jpg << File: Victoria_Ashley_Jones_1.jpg >> 
 - Victoria_Ashley_Jones_2.jpg << File: Victoria_Ashley_Jones_2.jpg >> 

Send it to myself and Murray, and we will get it approved,

Chris,

I submitted a WIP last week for 3 other pieces of information for each of our 5 audit days.
% of estimated accounts
% of estimated intervals
Detailed account file, SQMD file and MDEF file

CSC is preparing a quote to provide this information, which will be forwarded to me Friday. 

Please advise what needs to be done to obtain approval for this quote.

Thanks,

Ken

I have heard nothing new on the subject of El Paso.

Just curious if you knew where we are at in being able to collect on This El Paso December past payment?  Let me know - Thanks - Amy

Sounds good - will hold off until I hear back from you. - Thanks - Amy

Thanks for your help on this issue. Don't do anything with this until we contact with a  resolution. 

							Chris

The Following invoice was sent in February to collect for the California PX Shortfall - entered as an annuity Deal #508664.1

 << File: El Paso Invoice for shortfall.xls >> 

El Paso should have paid $889,898.71 to Enron atleast by the 2/5/01 (since invoice was sent on Feb 2nd to be paid on receipt).

As of 5/8/01, they are 93 days late.

According to their WSPP contract the interest rate is 1% per month prorated until paid.

El Paso needs to then pay the original $889,898.71 + $27,208.65 in interest.(see below for calculation of interest)
		1% x 12 months = interest for a year = 12%
		12% / 365 days = interest for a day   = .0329%
	          .0329% x 93days    = proration of interest for 2/5-5/8 = 3.0575%
	$889,898.71 x 3.0575%   = interest due to Enron for late pay = $27,208.65	

Let me know if I need to call my contact at El Paso about this late payment or if you want to call her.  In case you do, it's Kathy Peterson (915) 543-2039.

Then,  let me know whether you want me to send an invoice for the interest.  Either way I need to collect the $889,898.71 - since it's sitting on my Accounts Receiveable - flagged as past due. - so just let me know what I need to do and how you want to handle this.

Thanks so much and let me know if you need anymore information. - Amy

Kourtney and Caroline,

	Could you make sure that both of the items listed below are taken care of along w/ updating Foster and myself upon completion.

						Thanks 
						  Chris

Chris:

Confirming our discussion, there are 2 things that I want to make sure happen Monday and Tuesday this week:

1.  Harbor gets paid for Oct.  The amount is      $185,631.78 
2.  Caroline is going to get me final numbers for Nov. Harbor so I can put in the Services Desk Profit Annuity.

C

Chris when you get a chance can look into this?

Stewart

My back office has explained that we have received our  final payment for September business.  Thank you for the processing on that  part of the transaction.  We have, however, invoiced EPMI for interest  payments based on the understanding we had reached at my meeting in your offices  late last year.  The two interest invoices we have sent are for $16,359.28  and $4,530.74, for a total of $20,890.02.  To date, no payments have been  made by EPMI.  Could you look into the status of the processing on these  bills for us?
 
Thanks,
Steve

I would not bother talking to him on Sunday, I don't think it will be very productive.

 Check this out. It looks like this might get ugly.    
 
            "I will resend the letter that shows how I have over paided. I guess you don't keep what I have sent you. 
 
              D"
    
             "By the way what year do you want W-2's for? By all means get the state to handle "child support" or whatever you want 
              them to handle. I would love to pay you more child support after the court sets new reasonable visitation rights. Because 
              you know and I know and Raven will know when he gets older how ridiculous the set up is now. "
 
 

1 files parsed for EES
 - confirmation.csv 

In accordance with FERC

?s April 6, 2001 Order Dismissing Rehearing, Accepting
Compliance Filing and Directing the Recalculation of Lower Wholesale Rates,
CalPX has implemented the $150 breakpoint detailed in FERC?s December 15, 2000
order.  CalPX has included an adjustment amount on the January 2001 Day-Ahead
and Day-of invoices reflecting the breakpoint implementation.  In summary, CalPX
calculated the Day-of and Day-Ahead market settlements and Block Forward
settlements as usual, and included an adjustment amount that took into account
congestion, bid prices, overscheduling, and block forward contracts.  These
adjustments are detailed in new forward market products created specifically for
the adjustments (see new product list below).  The attached file provides a
further explanation of the method used. Also attached are the CalPX filing
requesting guidance and FERC's response. The January Forward market invoice,
price cap adjustments, and CTS invoices are scheduled to be released May 8,
2001.

Product Codes Codes for FERC Adjustments:
DA Price Cap Adjustment Charge     DPCAJC
DA Price Cap Adjustment  Payment   DPCADP
HA Price Cap Adjustment  Charge    HPCAJC
HA  Price Cap Adjustment Payment   HPCAJP

(See attached file: FERC Price Cap description for settlements.doc)(See attached
file: FERC Order Directing Price Cap Recalculation.pdf)(See attached file: PX
Compliance Filing and Request for Guidance.DOC)
 - FERC Price Cap description for settlements.doc 
 - FERC Order Directing Price Cap Recalculation.pdf 
 - PX Compliance Filing and Request for Guidance.DOC 

I will find out where we stand on this tomorrow morning.

					Chris

Chris:

Has Harbor been paid for Oct.?

C

What is your MSN ID, mine is BadMojo0909@msn.com

Stokley,

Give me a shout when you get in and I now use MSN messenger.  Had to delete the yahoo.

Chad,

	I will be in Houston next week, make some room on your busy schedule. I will give you an update on what is going on when I get there. Also, are you using a new IM system, I never see you on the Yahoo system

						me

 

Pat,
	The files are checked by EPMI on a daily basis, however, nothing is done w/ these files until an explanation is sent as to why they are being resubmitted. In our process we need to be able to explain both the reason for the resubmital and the MW variance to the ISO. 

									Chris

All, since our last meeting, here's where we are
now........................

In summary, our late submissions for early March dates were due to missing
load profiles in our manually run estimation database.  Once the problem
was detected and corrected on 4/18, day 41 for 3/8 settlement, the process
began to generate and regenerate the files from 3/1 forward.

A second problem was detected on 5/1 that caused high loads for SCE in
settlement files 3/17-3/24.  The MDMA system, which generates the actual
usage settlement file was incorrectly updated from our STAT system causing
the MDMA system  to calculate incorrect settlement numbers for an incorrect
set of customers, primarily those customers in SCE which had rolled back to
bundled service.  These files were posted to sparky and are now being
corrected for resubmission to sparky.  The load differences will be sent to
you as the corrections are made.

Observations and changes to procedure:
We were unaware that sparky was not manually checked on a daily basis for
late postings.  We became aware of this on 5/7 when Chris called to find
our why all of the late files were sitting on sparky.  Going forward,
Chris, I will let you (all) know of any late submissions.  Do you (Chris)
need notification on all postings or just the ones that are after day 45?

We are  securing a full time settlement person who will be in a position to
detect problems at the time the file is generated and move more quickly
toward resolving problems.

Steve Walker is working with Mike Frazier on the request for account,
usage, etc. listing.

Update on MDMA system generated estimates:
Still testing - fine tuning the missing accounts selection; calculations
look good.  With all of the above interruptions, this has taken a bit of a
backseat during the past couple of weeks.

Give me a call, if you need more details or have questions.

(See attached file: PostingStats050401.xls)

 - PostingStats050401.xls << File: PostingStats050401.xls >> 

I made some changes to the requirements after meeting with Rogers yesterday.  I plan to send this out to IT today - of course, that does not mean this is set in stone.  Let me know if you want me to wait and/or if you have any changes to incorporate.

Also, here is my first cut at the intramonth deal entry screen (part of short-term solution hooked into RPS).  Let me know if you have any comments/questions.

  

T

What's the latest on your job situation? Any bites from the internet job posting that you put out?

						Chris

 

Hey bud,
	I am now officially out of VM and working on the EES mess. I will give you details later, but in a nut shell I will be spending a lot of time in Houston over the next 6-mths. Looks like I will be working with Richter on try to sort out the issues that we currently are having w/ EES.  Did you get a house yet? Also, set up the MSN IM so we can talk.

				Chris

1) "The market wizards" by jack schwager
2)"The new market wizards" by jack schwager
3)"Reminiscence of a stock operator" by leferve(?)
4)"sun tzu's art of war for traders and investors" by ?
5)"short cut math"

Options:
1)"option volatility and pricing" by natenberg
2)"Option market making" by baird
3)CORPORTATE FINANCE  " A VALUATION APPROACH "        Simon Z. Benninga, Oded H. Sarig
4)OPTIONS, FUTURES & OTHER DERIVATIVES                          John C. Hull
	
Hey, 
When you get a chance, will you email me with the reading list?  
What's the latest with your situation - VM vs Cali vs London? 
Hope all is going well with you and yours.  Keeping too busy down here.  Tell the group I said Hey. 
Brett 
Brett Hunsucker 
Senior Client Representative 
Electric Reliability Council of Texas 
Phone: 512.248.6509 
Cell: 512.917.0056 
Fax: 512.248.3995 
email: bhunsucker@ercot.com 

Chad,

	I will be in Houston next week, make some room on your busy schedule. I will give you an update on what is going on when I get there. Also, are you using a new IM system, I never see you on the Yahoo system

						me

Tim,
	Couple of easy questions
1)	Can I use the laptop that you were using this week in Houston?
2)	Can I order a laptop for use on this project going forward?

Chris

Chris,

I am attaching the final audit plan below.  Please let me know if you need
anything else.

Thanks,
Linda

(See attached file: EPMI Audit Plan.ppt)

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

 - EPMI Audit Plan.ppt 

I am fine with the timeline as long as we meet the September deadline. 

				Chris

Hi Chris,

I left you a message regarding the timing of our work for the ISO Report.
Again, please
call me when you get a chance to discuss so that we can get that finalized for
your
plan.  As Linda had mentioned, we plan on starting the work in July as the due
date
is in September.  Please let me know if this is not sufficient time.

Thanks.

713 345-6958

Chris,

We plan on performing our work in July in order to be able to issue the report
in August. Please let me know if you disagree with this timeframe.

Thanks,
Linda

Linda,
     I am ok with the  most of the Audit plan except for the date of
completion. August 2001 seems quite excessive since we now have one SQMD
audit under our belts. Please provide to me the logic behind the thought
that this Audit will take over 3mths to complete.

                                         Thanks
                                          Chris

      -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-linda+2Eo+2Enorman+40us+2Eandersen+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

     Sent:   Thursday, May 03, 2001 1:24 PM
     Chris,

     I just wanted to follow up with you to ensure that you received the
     ISO Audit
     Plan draft yesterday.  If you did not receive it, please let me know
     so that I
     can re-send it.  We would like to receive your feedback before we
     finalize the
     document.

     Thanks,
     Linda

     *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
     Footer*******************

     Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
     If you
     are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
     delivery of
     the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message
     to anyone.
     In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the
     sender by
     reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does
     not consent
     to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions
     and other
     information in this message that do not relate to the official
     business of my
     firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Chris,

I just wanted to take a moment to let you know what a great job Kit is doing.  He is energetic, inquisitive and consistently takes the necessary initiative to get the job done.

He asks all of the right questions, especially "why?," which inspires me to tune up my own knowledge and skills.  It is refreshing to have someone like him join the group and I anticipate that he'll be able to handle allocations completely by the end of next week.

Thank you for your foresight and for the help.

Donna

List of Reviewers

1)	Donna Johnson
2)	Chris Foster
3)	Amy Fitzpatrick
4)	Kourtney Nelson
5)	Stewart Rosman

Pat,
	Two items that I need addressed ASAP
1)	I need to get the analyses mentioned below by the close of business today.
2)	I need to get the new meter data files for 3/17/01- 3/23/01 immediately along w/ the analysis of the MW differences b/w what was originally submitted and the latest submittal to the ISO.

     Chris
503-464-8219

Pat,
	Just a reminder that I will need the MW diff/ for all of the days in question before I can resubmit the March activity to the ISO.

								Thanks
								  Chris

The posting dates that we discussed are attached.

(See attached file: PostingStats050401.xls)
AMROperations
05/07/2001 04:48 PM

Sent by:  Patricia G Priestley

It looks like I neglected to attach the posting dates to my memo on Friday.

(See attached file: PostingStats050401.xls)
 - PostingStats050401.xls << File: PostingStats050401.xls >> 
 - PostingStats050401.xls << File: PostingStats050401.xls >> 

http://frequentflier.com/

Got it
 
Hi Chris.
 
Brett said that he has had trouble sending you e-mail to this address since we have arrived in Austin.  I just wanted to see if you could return this same message to me if this address is correct.  Don't worry about writing a reply.  
 
He sent you another message last week and I just wanted to make sure you received.  I know Brett isn't looking for a reply anytime soon considering how busy you and he both are.  
 
Take care and tell Rachel I said hello.
 
Holly

The Following invoice was sent in February to collect for the California PX Shortfall - entered as an annuity Deal #508664.1

 

El Paso should have paid $889,898.71 to Enron atleast by the 2/5/01 (since invoice was sent on Feb 2nd to be paid on receipt).

As of 5/8/01, they are 93 days late.

According to their WSPP contract the interest rate is 1% per month prorated until paid.

El Paso needs to then pay the original $889,898.71 + $27,208.65 in interest.(see below for calculation of interest)
		1% x 12 months = interest for a year = 12%
		12% / 365 days = interest for a day   = .0329%
	          .0329% x 93days    = proration of interest for 2/5-5/8 = 3.0575%
	$889,898.71 x 3.0575%   = interest due to Enron for late pay = $27,208.65	

Let me know if I need to call my contact at El Paso about this late payment or if you want to call her.  In case you do, it's Kathy Peterson (915) 543-2039.

Then,  let me know whether you want me to send an invoice for the interest.  Either way I need to collect the $889,898.71 - since it's sitting on my Accounts Receiveable - flagged as past due. - so just let me know what I need to do and how you want to handle this.

Thanks so much and let me know if you need anymore information. - Amy

Thanks for your help on this issue. Don't do anything with this until we contact with a  resolution. 

							Chris

The Following invoice was sent in February to collect for the California PX Shortfall - entered as an annuity Deal #508664.1

 << File: El Paso Invoice for shortfall.xls >> 

El Paso should have paid $889,898.71 to Enron atleast by the 2/5/01 (since invoice was sent on Feb 2nd to be paid on receipt).

As of 5/8/01, they are 93 days late.

According to their WSPP contract the interest rate is 1% per month prorated until paid.

El Paso needs to then pay the original $889,898.71 + $27,208.65 in interest.(see below for calculation of interest)
		1% x 12 months = interest for a year = 12%
		12% / 365 days = interest for a day   = .0329%
	          .0329% x 93days    = proration of interest for 2/5-5/8 = 3.0575%
	$889,898.71 x 3.0575%   = interest due to Enron for late pay = $27,208.65	

Let me know if I need to call my contact at El Paso about this late payment or if you want to call her.  In case you do, it's Kathy Peterson (915) 543-2039.

Then,  let me know whether you want me to send an invoice for the interest.  Either way I need to collect the $889,898.71 - since it's sitting on my Accounts Receiveable - flagged as past due. - so just let me know what I need to do and how you want to handle this.

Thanks so much and let me know if you need anymore information. - Amy

Pat,
	Just a reminder that I will need the MW diff/ for all of the days in question before I can resubmit the March activity to the ISO.

								Thanks
								  Chris

The posting dates that we discussed are attached.

(See attached file: PostingStats050401.xls)
AMROperations
05/07/2001 04:48 PM

Sent by:  Patricia G Priestley

It looks like I neglected to attach the posting dates to my memo on Friday.

(See attached file: PostingStats050401.xls)
 - PostingStats050401.xls << File: PostingStats050401.xls >> 
 - PostingStats050401.xls << File: PostingStats050401.xls >> 

Amy,
	I got your message and the fax on this deal w/ Riverside. I will look into this deal today and see if I can get you and answer.

						Chris

Not good, I will let you pick the appropriate excuse for why I haven't gotten it done. I will not be able to get it to until Friday if that is ok for your timelines. Sorry to be a hold up.

										Chris

I never got his message, why would he not follow up with an e-mail on something this important? I will take a look at this issue and get it resolved. In the future please have them send an e-mail on any time sensitive issues. Please make sure and forward this e-mail on to all the people that were copied in his e-mail.

				 			Chris

Chris, if you want I, can handle this with George directly.  Let me know.

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>

 - Enron 3-17-01.doc << File: Enron 3-17-01.doc >> 
 - Enron data.xls << File: Enron data.xls >> 

I would like to see this project get move forward immediately. Is there a reason that AA will not start working on this until July?

							Chris

Chris,

We plan on performing our work in July in order to be able to issue the report
in August. Please let me know if you disagree with this timeframe.

Thanks,
Linda

Linda,
     I am ok with the  most of the Audit plan except for the date of
completion. August 2001 seems quite excessive since we now have one SQMD
audit under our belts. Please provide to me the logic behind the thought
that this Audit will take over 3mths to complete.

                                         Thanks
                                          Chris

      -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-linda+2Eo+2Enorman+40us+2Eandersen+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

     Sent:   Thursday, May 03, 2001 1:24 PM
     Chris,

     I just wanted to follow up with you to ensure that you received the
     ISO Audit
     Plan draft yesterday.  If you did not receive it, please let me know
     so that I
     can re-send it.  We would like to receive your feedback before we
     finalize the
     document.

     Thanks,
     Linda

     *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
     Footer*******************

     Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
     If you
     are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
     delivery of
     the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message
     to anyone.
     In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the
     sender by
     reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does
     not consent
     to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions
     and other
     information in this message that do not relate to the official
     business of my
     firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

What's up Chris?  I haven't heard from you in a while.  I don't know how things are going to pan out with the re-org, but I think the re-org is being done out of necessity.  I don't know who Don Black is.  I know that when he came in, Dennis Benevides reported to him.  He moved Dennis off of the Power Desk and put Neil Bresnan in charge.  Obviously, his role has expanded.  Will your group be reporting to him now?

Rick Baltz was our Director when Derenda and I left.  He has since moved over to work for Evan Hughes.  Mary Lynn Ruffer is now over the group.  George Phillips is managing the settlements/volume control function.  At least this is my understanding. 

I think Derenda will be a much happier person wherever she is going.  It's too bad that she had to get a raw deal in order for her to find happiness, but that's the way the world works sometimes.

So what all are you going to be doing over the next 6 months?  Is it strictly related to volume management?  Is it only related to the West?  Maybe we can grab some lunch when you come to Houston.  Talk to you later.

Wayne

Wayne,
	What do think of the latest re-org and the e-mail we got from Derenda. Do you have any insight into what is going on over in the EES world. It looks like I will be on the team that helps sort all of this out and I wanted to see if you had any knowledge on Don Black. Also, who is the gentleman that caused you and Derenda so much grief? I guess this all worked out well for you in the end, since you won't have to sweat all of the decisions that are about to take place for that area of the business. I more than likely will be in Houston quite a bit over the next 6mts, so I will swing by and visit with you and Chad when I find out my schedule. Hope all is going well, Derenda told me that you were enjoying your job.

							Chris

						

John,
	Set this up so we can chat in real-time.

			Chris

Kristian,

	Here is the link for the messenger service. Let me know if you have any question on setting it up.

		<http://messenger.msn.com/>

Linda, 
	I am ok with the  most of the Audit plan except for the date of completion. August 2001 seems quite excessive since we now have one SQMD audit under our belts. Please provide to me the logic behind the thought that this Audit will take over 3mths to complete. 

								Thanks
								 Chris

Chris,

I just wanted to follow up with you to ensure that you received the ISO Audit
Plan draft yesterday.  If you did not receive it, please let me know so that I
can re-send it.  We would like to receive your feedback before we finalize the
document.

Thanks,
Linda

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

I will be there, make sure that they have a large enough room for all of us and that it has a phone that we can conference Murray in on.

would like to have you there

Please attend a premeeting on Thursday 3:00 in 3109 to discuss the above item.

The objective of this meeting is to discuss our strategy and process required to fill our wholesale and retail needs in Ercot as a group.  We need to define the process that we will be using to fill the Ercot load from the wholesale/retail markets starting from the meter to the wholesale settlement process.  This needs to be a common vision and documented process between us for all.

This premeeting will allow us all to get ready for Nancy and capture any additional action items for the above objective.

Please ensure that any additional staff required are invited.

At Lloyd's request, I've scheduled a meeting at 4:00 on Thursday, in EB 3109, to discuss issues related to Texas retail power sales.  Nancy Hetrick and Thane Twiggs will be on hand to update us on requirements that EPMI needs to comply with in order to sell retail power within Texas.  Please feel free to bring anyone else you think might be interested.  Also, please let me know if any scheduling conflicts arise.  

Attached you will find an electronic copy of the document we went over during lunch.  I have asked Colin Carlsen to send you his presentation that he gave this afternoon concerning the rates and tariffs curve database.

Hope this help...

Phil.

 

Congratulations! So it takes getting married to get a vacation. J

			Chris

I am getting married, taking a honeymoon and moving into a new house.  They
say things happen in three's don't they?
Jeanette Plumley
Data Quality Auditor
California ISO
916-608-5971
jplumley@caiso.com

		-----Original Message-----
		Three weeks! How did you pull that one off

		               Chris

		      -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Plumley+2C+20Jeanette+22+20+3CJPlumley+40caiso+2Ecom+3
E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

		     Sent:   Monday, May 07, 2001 10:07 AM
		     Thanks Chris, I am really hoping to have all of the
audit plan
		     correspondence completed by Wednesday because I am
taking three weeks
		     off of
		     work.  So, I would really appreciate it if you could
get the audit
		     plan to
		     me as soon as possible.  Thanks for getting back to me
and let me know
		     if
		     you have any other questions or hold up.  Thanks again.
		     Jeanette Plumley
		     Data Quality Auditor
		     California ISO
		     916-608-5971
		     jplumley@caiso.com

		               -----Original Message-----
		               Jeanette,
		                    Sorry I am so late in getting back w/
you on this
		     topic. We had
		               a mix up w/ AA that had to get worked out but
I think we are
		     clear to go
		               forward. I have the Audit Plan from AA so I
will give them
		     my comments
		               and send it to you by tomorrow.

		               Chris

		

Three weeks! How did you pull that one off J

			Chris

Thanks Chris, I am really hoping to have all of the audit plan
correspondence completed by Wednesday because I am taking three weeks off of
work.  So, I would really appreciate it if you could get the audit plan to
me as soon as possible.  Thanks for getting back to me and let me know if
you have any other questions or hold up.  Thanks again.
Jeanette Plumley
Data Quality Auditor
California ISO
916-608-5971
jplumley@caiso.com

		-----Original Message-----
		Jeanette,
			Sorry I am so late in getting back w/ you on this
topic. We had
		a mix up w/ AA that had to get worked out but I think we are
clear to go
		forward. I have the Audit Plan from AA so I will give them
my comments
		and send it to you by tomorrow.

		Chris

Jeanette,
	Sorry I am so late in getting back w/ you on this topic. We had a mix up w/ AA that had to get worked out but I think we are clear to go forward. I have the Audit Plan from AA so I will give them my comments and send it to you by tomorrow.

										Chris

									

Chris-
Reminder I'll be back from ATL Tues 5-8-01.

Call me on my cell if you need anything.

Virginia

FYI

Chris, 

This wire payment of $497,076 for Willamette has been set up for payment on Monday, 5/7/01.  We were trying to set it up for payment today, but Treasury encountered system problems while interfacing to the bank.  Please let me know if you have any further questions. 

Thanks, Melissa

Melissa,
	Just make payment for the Willamette portion of the e-mail below. CRC has agreed to be paid when we complete actualization for Nov. and Dec.

								Chris
							

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					

	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

Thank you

Chris, 

This wire payment of $497,076 for Willamette has been set up for payment on Monday, 5/7/01.  We were trying to set it up for payment today, but Treasury encountered system problems while interfacing to the bank.  Please let me know if you have any further questions. 

Thanks, Melissa

Melissa,
	Just make payment for the Willamette portion of the e-mail below. CRC has agreed to be paid when we complete actualization for Nov. and Dec.

								Chris
							

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					

	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

FYI

Melissa,
	Just make payment for the Willamette portion of the e-mail below. CRC has agreed to be paid when we complete actualization for Nov. and Dec.

								Chris
							

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					
	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

fyi

Chris:

Per our conversation last week, I have changed the trading terminal server on which the timeout settings have been lifted.  At present, the timeout settings are lifted on NAHOU-TRDTS1.  We will cycle NAHOU-TRDTS5 into the maintenance schedule this weekend.  Please let me know if you have any questions.

Andrew

I spent several hours with TJ shadowing and we tested the 402 code while I examined results.  As each error or incorrect result was noted, we went to the code and walked through and made changes.  TJ is now running actual dates and we will check them in the morning.  When all is well, we will run the rest of October.  Next we will perform the same testing and coding revisions for 405 (only need to test for EPMI-side exceptions) and then we will be able to run 405 for the month.

After the latest unsuccessful run of 403, I delved into the specific details of the variances, and all of the material volumes are included in the Finals, so any allocations that would be created as a result of those variances would be reversed when I run the Final actualization.  So, this morning I manually calculated appropriate allocations for our Load customers (the variances are due to re-submitted meter data), entered the values in the ProRata allocation table, created an additional allocation for the remaining 1.9496MW variance, matched all up to the ISO, and completed 403 for Preliminaries.

I have actualized the regular stuff and set to M through October 27.  I will wrap those up on Friday.

At this point in time we are on target for completion of Prelims by Friday afternoon, but Finals may not be done until Monday.

Caroline
Anna and I worked through the coding for 403 and she made some changes to the method for finding percent usage.  I reran the tool and looked at the results and we still do not have valid allocations.  On October 1, we now have an 877MW difference between the variance and the amount allocated.  Will look into it again tomorrow.

402 is nearly complete.  Ran into an error while running a test day, and I will discuss it with TJ tomorrow.  405 should be a quick fix once we get the 402 exceptions working properly.

I have actualized finals on the regular charges through October 23, and should be able to wrap up most, if not all, of the rest tomorrow.

If we can get them working properly tomorrow, then I will be able to finish the Prelims on Friday, and the Finals on Monday.

Caroline

Exception handling coding changes are nearly complete.  TJ had to weave through the code for 402 all the way, as well as add 3 new function points: EPMI exceptions, ISO exceptions, and repeating (scavenging, he calls it) the exception roll up function from another module.  He has a test environment set up and is testing EPMI variance allocations, EPMI exceptions and ISO exceptions.  He has not yet done the 'scavenging' part.  He will be finished with 402 tonight, and tomorrow I will test the results on one of the days where I had samples of these exceptions.

The part of 405 that needs to be changed is for EPMI exception handling, which should be a much less involved endeavor.  

For 403, I attempted to follow all of the queries through to see if I could run some tests within the environment and determine what was being pulled as a variance, and how that variance was being allocated.  However, these queries are currently beyond my expertise (I plan to rectify that).  We are going to enlist Anna's help as much as possible for 403, and get to the bottom of what is happening.  As a side note, for the time change date, we have an extra HE 2, and the ISO has HE 25.  We are also going to get with Anna on how to resolve that.

For the regular actualizations, I have set 10/1 - 10/18 (except 10/16) to M today.  There is a strange anomaly going on on the 16th, and neither Donna nor I could figure out what.  I will get back to it.

Anticipate completion of all by Monday, May 7.

Caroline

Exception handling in 402 and 405 not coded properly.   Tj working on enhancing the codes to handle them correctly, and anticipates being done with 402 by tomorrow afternoon, and 405 by mid-day Wednesday.

Final actualizations for the regular charge codes are complete and set to M through October 10.

Will perform additional research into the improper allocations for 403 on Tuesday.  The unallocated volume on 10/1 is approx 300MW, so I will focus my research on that day.

Estimate completion date of all (deviations, prelim and final, and regular charge codes, final) Monday, May 7.  

Caroline

I have started the actualization process with 403 Load Deviation, and need to work closely with TJ on Monday to find out why the allocations don't match the variances.  I have isolated one day, zone and hour and will work on that with him.  We have got to get it working properly, or else there will be a lot of manual work required.

404 Export Deviation is complete for October, and the records can be set to A with the other days as normal.  

405 Import Deviation needs the new calcs that will be provided by a re-run of SettleSupplemental, which I am going to kick off just before I leave.  I will run that on Monday while TJ is researching the 403 errors/problems.

402 Gen Deviation will also be started on Monday.

Tentative target date for completion of Prelim's is next Thursday, and Finals on Friday.

See you Monday.

Caroline

Anna and I worked through the coding for 403 and she made some changes to the method for finding percent usage.  I reran the tool and looked at the results and we still do not have valid allocations.  On October 1, we now have an 877MW difference between the variance and the amount allocated.  Will look into it again tomorrow.

402 is nearly complete.  Ran into an error while running a test day, and I will discuss it with TJ tomorrow.  405 should be a quick fix once we get the 402 exceptions working properly.

I have actualized finals on the regular charges through October 23, and should be able to wrap up most, if not all, of the rest tomorrow.

If we can get them working properly tomorrow, then I will be able to finish the Prelims on Friday, and the Finals on Monday.

Caroline

Exception handling coding changes are nearly complete.  TJ had to weave through the code for 402 all the way, as well as add 3 new function points: EPMI exceptions, ISO exceptions, and repeating (scavenging, he calls it) the exception roll up function from another module.  He has a test environment set up and is testing EPMI variance allocations, EPMI exceptions and ISO exceptions.  He has not yet done the 'scavenging' part.  He will be finished with 402 tonight, and tomorrow I will test the results on one of the days where I had samples of these exceptions.

The part of 405 that needs to be changed is for EPMI exception handling, which should be a much less involved endeavor.  

For 403, I attempted to follow all of the queries through to see if I could run some tests within the environment and determine what was being pulled as a variance, and how that variance was being allocated.  However, these queries are currently beyond my expertise (I plan to rectify that).  We are going to enlist Anna's help as much as possible for 403, and get to the bottom of what is happening.  As a side note, for the time change date, we have an extra HE 2, and the ISO has HE 25.  We are also going to get with Anna on how to resolve that.

For the regular actualizations, I have set 10/1 - 10/18 (except 10/16) to M today.  There is a strange anomaly going on on the 16th, and neither Donna nor I could figure out what.  I will get back to it.

Anticipate completion of all by Monday, May 7.

Caroline

Exception handling in 402 and 405 not coded properly.   Tj working on enhancing the codes to handle them correctly, and anticipates being done with 402 by tomorrow afternoon, and 405 by mid-day Wednesday.

Final actualizations for the regular charge codes are complete and set to M through October 10.

Will perform additional research into the improper allocations for 403 on Tuesday.  The unallocated volume on 10/1 is approx 300MW, so I will focus my research on that day.

Estimate completion date of all (deviations, prelim and final, and regular charge codes, final) Monday, May 7.  

Caroline

I have started the actualization process with 403 Load Deviation, and need to work closely with TJ on Monday to find out why the allocations don't match the variances.  I have isolated one day, zone and hour and will work on that with him.  We have got to get it working properly, or else there will be a lot of manual work required.

404 Export Deviation is complete for October, and the records can be set to A with the other days as normal.  

405 Import Deviation needs the new calcs that will be provided by a re-run of SettleSupplemental, which I am going to kick off just before I leave.  I will run that on Monday while TJ is researching the 403 errors/problems.

402 Gen Deviation will also be started on Monday.

Tentative target date for completion of Prelim's is next Thursday, and Finals on Friday.

See you Monday.

Caroline

Could I get my login and password for clicktrip?

Wayne,
	What do think of the latest re-org and the e-mail we got from Derenda. Do you have any insight into what is going on over in the EES world. It looks like I will be on the team that helps sort all of this out and I wanted to see if you had any knowledge on Don Black. Also, who is the gentleman that caused you and Derenda so much grief? I guess this all worked out well for you in the end, since you won't have to sweat all of the decisions that are about to take place for that area of the business. I more than likely will be in Houston quite a bit over the next 6mts, so I will swing by and visit with you and Chad when I find out my schedule. Hope all is going well, Derenda told me that you were enjoying your job.

							Chris

						

Kristian,

	Here is the link for the messenger service. Let me know if you have any question on setting it up.

		http://messenger.msn.com/

First off, I am still confused on how this whole thing plays out myself. I will be flying into Houston quite a lot in the short term to get a feeling for what is currently in place for EES. Tim wants Don Black to stay in place for the short term to help him make his way through this mess called EES. Don Black has not been with EES that long, so he is not being hit w/ any of the blame for the current problems. I should have a clearer picture of what is going on in the next couple of weeks.

				Ps   I am now an Associate.

						Chris

I give up, I am so confused.  How does this play out with the Portland office - will you be working with Don?

   Enron Americas - Office of the Chairman
Given the growth in EES it has become apparent that it is time to consolidate the risk functions between EES and EWS.  This will provide EES with the systems, resources and risk expertise of the wholesale energy groups necessary for it to continue to grow and take advantage of current market opportunities.

With this in mind and in agreement with the management of EES, two new risk groups inside Enron Americas will be formed to provide EES with pricing, structuring, retail and wholesale commodity risk management, logistics and back-office services.  These groups main function is to provide these services to EES.  We have asked Rogers Herndon, currently Vice President-Trading in the Eastern Power Group to manage this function in the Eastern Interconnect (this includes both gas and power).  Rogers will continue to report to Kevin Presto.  We have asked Don Black, formerly Vice President-EES Risk Management and Sourcing, to manage this function in the Western U.S.  Don will manage this group from Houston and will report to Tim Belden.

These groups will work very closely with EES to pursue shared goals while ensuring close coordination with the wholesale gas and power trading organizations.

These changes are effective immediately.  Please congratulate Rogers and Don on their new roles.

John Lavorato & Louise Kitchen

Melissa,
	Just make payment for the Willamette portion of the e-mail below. CRC has agreed to be paid when we complete actualization for Nov. and Dec.

								Chris
							

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					
	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

Melissa,
	Just make payment for the Willamette portion of the e-mail below. CRC has agreed to be paid when we complete actualization for Nov. and Dec.

								Chris
							

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					
	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

I got it and will give you feed back by close of business tomorrow.

				Chris

Chris,

I just wanted to follow up with you to ensure that you received the ISO Audit
Plan draft yesterday.  If you did not receive it, please let me know so that I
can re-send it.  We would like to receive your feedback before we finalize the
document.

Thanks,
Linda

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Melissa,
	The payments that we need to send out to these counter parties are listed below. These payments are being made based off of our estimates for both the month of Nov. and Dec. The Nov. payment is being calculated at 23 cents on a dollar (Due to the ISO short-pay) while the Dec. payment is dollar for dollar.  We will then actualize both Nov. and Dec before the close of the May accounting month. Please give me call if you have any questions on this topic.

					
	NOV		DEC		
	Flash	ISO Short-Pay 	Flash	Total Payment	
Willamette	(836,787)	(189,532)	(307,544)	(497,076)	
CRC	(227,274)	(51,477)	(326,887)	(378,364)	

This is to notify everyone that STAR operations are going resume in Folsom
on Tuesday, May 8 2001.  The synchronizing of the databases is going to
start at 10:00am.  Starting at 10:00 please discontinue sending data and
requests for data to the Alhambra site (166.49.55.18).

After 10:00 please send all data and requests for data to the Folsom IP
address which is 166.49.120.18.

The STAR application should be available in Folsom at 11:00am.  Any data
submittals and data requests will be processed at that time with the ack
file being sent out.

Thanks for your patience.

FYI

This is to notify everyone that STAR operations are going resume in Folsom
on Tuesday, May 8 2001.  The synchronizing of the databases is going to
start at 10:00am.  Starting at 10:00 please discontinue sending data and
requests for data to the Alhambra site (166.49.55.18).

After 10:00 please send all data and requests for data to the Folsom IP
address which is 166.49.120.18.

The STAR application should be available in Folsom at 11:00am.  Any data
submittals and data requests will be processed at that time with the ack
file being sent out.

Thanks for your patience.

 

Thanks

I'll take care of it today.
K.

Kathy,

	Could you please change the Credit Card number that the Mid Town Apartments are billing, to the one that I gave you for booking my flights. 

							Thanks

Your ears must have been burning, I was just talking about you yesterday. If is ok, I would like to give you a call just to see how everything is going and let you know that they could always use your talent in our area of the woods. 

								Chris
					

								

Just wanted to say 'later'!  My last day at Enron is officially next Wednesday 5/9.  It's been real and it's been fun!  I've met some interesting and good folks here and have learned a lot.  Good luck and get that stock price up a little, will ya?

Keep in touch,
Big D

cell	281-728-3187
home	281-454-5442
email	deedlelou3@aol.com

Chris,

I am attaching a draft of the audit plan for your review.  Please provide your
comments, particularly regarding:
     the accuracy of EPMI's scope of SC services,  and
     additional information (see last Power Point slide) that you would like to
     provide to the ISO.

Thanks,
Linda

(See attached file: ISO Audit Plan 050201.ppt)

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

 - ISO Audit Plan 050201.ppt 

Good morning all, 

I just wanted to clarify the distribution of some of the California responsibilities...

Godfrey Hyde will be handling all of Audrey's old accounts with the exception of the California ISO and its related customers, such as those below, that are handled outside of the Enpower/Unify systems.
I will be training our new coordinator, Sharon Fredrick, on the ISO process and she will be responsible for this portion until Audrey's return.  Please ensure that all communication regarding the ISO is sent to both Sharon and myself.

Please join me in welcoming Sharon to the group, and feel free to contact me with any questions or concerns.

Thank you, Melissa

Caroline Emmert
04/30/2001 12:07 PM
Godfrey,

I have revised the Snohomish number, as we had a counter party called SNO that actually belongs to Snohomish.  I am inserting a new table with the corrected amount (they still owe us money, it's just more money).

Caroline

Caroline Emmert
04/27/2001 12:46 PM
Godfrey,

The final actualizations for Preliminary and Final Settlements are available and can be found in the following Flash file:

M:\Electric\CALISO ACTUALIZATION\Actual\2000\Final\0900 Settlements Final ISO 042701.xls

The following customers have been paid an initial amount, and are owed the additional amount as shown:

You will note that Snohomish was overpaid, and owes us a refund in the amount of $1,591.06; the remaining amounts are balances owed to the customer.   I can find no record of an initial payment to El Paso (EPE), but the Flash report reflects a payment owed to them.  Other customers reflected in the Flash are handled in a different manner and we need to talk about those (CRC, DELANO, HARBOR, Willamette, etc.).  Please feel free to call me if you have any questions about this data, or the details in the Flash file, as well as to discuss the special-handling customers.

Please set up these payments to go out as quickly as possible, and let me know the expected payment date.

Thanks,

Caroline
503-464-3718

Linda,
	This is not what we agreed upon when we had our conference call. You where supposed to come back to me with your plan on how to attack this audit within a week of our conference call.  Why did you not convey this change in status to Murray or myself? And who gave you the direction to put everything on hold until Murray and Kevin spoke? Murray knows nothing about this conversation that is supposed to take place with Kevin Hughes. Let me make this as clear as possible, EPMI is the one that is driving this process and you where given your direction by me to proceed forward on this audit. I expect to see a plan in my hands by the end of this week. All communication going forward are to go through me, and I will make the decision as to who needs to be in to the process.

								  Chris Stokley
								  503-464-8219

Chris,

It is my understanding that Kevin Hughes was going to contact Murray to discuss
the ISO Audit status.  No decisions have been communicated to me thus far.  We
are awaiting direction from EPMI or EES before commencing our work.

Thanks,
Linda

Please give me as update on where we stand on going forward w/ the ISO
Audit.

                         Chris

           -----Original Message-----
          Chris,

          Thanks for your reply.  I received the ISO requirements
and timeline; the
          requirements appear to be materially consistent with
prior year.  We can set up
          a call to discuss the audit as early as next week, as we
are in the midst of our
          earnings release testing this week.  Would next Thursday
morning around 9:00
          a.m. (your time) work? Any other time on Thursday would
work with our schedules.

          Thanks,
          Linda

          *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
Footer*******************

          Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in
this message.  If you
          are not the addressee indicated in this message (or
responsible for delivery of
          the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver
this message to anyone.
          In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by
          reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer does not consent
          to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions,
conclusions and other
          information in this message that do not relate to the
official business of my
          firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed
by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Please give me an update on where we stand with going forward on the ISO Audit.

					Chris

Chris,

Thanks for your reply.  I received the ISO requirements and timeline; the
requirements appear to be materially consistent with prior year.  We can set up
a call to discuss the audit as early as next week, as we are in the midst of our
earnings release testing this week.  Would next Thursday morning around 9:00
a.m. (your time) work? Any other time on Thursday would work with our schedules.

Thanks,
Linda

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Chris, we will provide a call in number for those wanting to call in.

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net <mailto:9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net>
e-mail:  <<mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>>

Murray P O'Neil
02/05/2001 02:17 PM
FYI...

This is the letter which was sent to our service customers.

If you have any questions please let me know.

Thanks - MO
 

Stewart,

	I went over Murray's spreadsheet for the CDWR allocation and found some numbers that don't make since to me. I will talk to Murray the moment he walks in the door and get this e-mail to CDWR before 9:00am. There is an adjustment made to the multiplier for CDWR that is specific to only them as a counterparty.

							Chris

FYI

Just an update : CDWR/CERS did make their 5th payment on time on Friday - one invoice (this Wednesday) left to go.

Thanks
Amy

Betty,

	Stewart has asked that I send you an e-mail giving you the logic behind  the way in which EPMI arrived at the CDWR payments for December as they relate to the PX index.  EPMI made a payment for December sales to all of our Scheduling Coordinator clients equal to approximately 78% of what they would have received according to the PX hourly index.  This is the approximate methodology that the  PX  used in making its payments to their customers. If you have any questions in regards to this issue, feel free to call me at 503-464-8219.

								Chris Stokley

 I think this is for you

AGENT MD/CB BOOKING REF YLATCB
ONEIL/MURRAY
ENRON NORTH AMERICA
3WTC 0306
ENRON CORP                              KATHRYN SHEPPARD 464-7698
INTEROFFICE ETKT RCPT
ETKT RECEIPT
 
 
  DATE:	JUL 18 2001
 
SERVICE               DATE  FROM           TO             DEPART  ARRIVE
 
CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  23JUL PORTLAND OR    HOUSTON TX     1150A   600P
CO 1538    K          MON   INTERNATIONAL  G.BUSH INTERCO
TERMINAL C
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         4:10 DURATION
AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-700
SEAT 07C NO SMOKING CONFIRMED ONEIL/MURRAY(ID
CAR                   23JUL NATIONAL               HOUSTON TX
27JUL CONFIRMATION: 812379667AISLE
TELEPHONE: (281) 443-8850
FAX: (281) 821-6944
INTERMED CAR AUTOMATIC AIR
RATE: USD39.00DY-UNL MI
RATE QUOTED
BASE RATE: *ZL*USD156.00 BR-4DY
PICK-UP: HOUSTON INTERCONTINENTAL ARPT,
HOUSTON
DROP-OFF: HOUSTON INTERCONTINENTAL ARPT,
HOUSTON
HOTEL                 23JUL CROWNE PLAZA DOWNTOWN
27JUL 1700 SMITH STREET
HOUSTON, TX 77002
UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
TELEPHONE: 713-739-8800
FAX: 713-739-7307
TELEX: NONE
CONFIRMATION: 66864106
                            REFERENCE: KNGSENR
SINGLE ROOM KING SIZE BED
RATE: ENR USD 145.00 PER NIGHT
GUARANTEE GIVEN
ENRON CORP NON SMKNG KING
TO AVOID BILLING CANCEL BY 4PM DAY OF ARRIVAL.
CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  27JUL HOUSTON TX     PORTLAND OR    940A    1154A
CO 1612    B          FRI   G.BUSH INTERCO INTERNATIONAL
TERMINAL C
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         4:14 DURATION
AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-700
SEAT 24D NO SMOKING CONFIRMED ONEIL/MURRAY(ID THIS IS A NON-REFUNDABLE FARE THAT REQUIRES TRAVEL ON THESE SPECIFIC DATES AND FLIGHTS.
ANY CHANGES WILL RESULT IN A PENALTY AND/OR
ADDITIONAL COLLECTION.
           **************************************************
YOUR TICKET REFLECTS A NEGOTIATED DISCOUNT FROM THE TAP
THE PUBLISHED FARE FOR THIS TICKET IS $560.50
           **************************************************
 
MISCELLANEOUS         24NOV HOUSTON TX
                      SAT   ** THANK YOU FOR USING THE TAP **
 
RESERVATION NUMBER(S)  CO/VK6Z14
ONEIL/MURRAY  S5C0413R1059               TICKET:CO/ETKT 005 7029706859
CO  FREQUENT FLYER COUR586605
*******************************************
INTL TVLRS: CARRY SOS WALLET CARD W/ENRON ASSISTANCE INFO CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:IN U.S 800 523-6586 CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:INTL 215 245-4707 (COLLECT)
*********************************************
THIS IS THE PASSENGER RECEIPT FOR YOUR ELECTRONIC TICKET.  PLEASE CHECK-IN WITH PHOTO IDENTIFICATION AND WITH EITHER (1) THIS RECEIPT OR (2) YOUR CONFIRMATION NUMBER.
YOUR ETKT CONFIRMATION NUMBER IS: VK6Z14
ALL FARES ARE SUBJECT TO CHANGE UNTIL TICKETED/PURCHASED

?
I was informed that Brett is no longer handling the HA_Finals reporting.  Would you please let me know who will be handling this reporting hence forth.

Thanks,

Pam

Brett, for March 17th, hour 1 SCE1 has no volume.  Also, for March 11th I still need to get a revision for hour 1 on PGE3 and SDG1.

Would you please give me updates as soon as possible.

Thanks,

Pam

Kristian,

	I met with Tim today to inform him of my intentions to pursue opportunities outside of the Portland office. It seem to go very well, w/ TIm also saying that he had expressed an interest in working in London. He did make sure and state that the London office is the highest cost office in all of Enron, and therefore would probably be the first on to experience layoffs if the economy took a downturn. His thought is that he wants to see if he can get me into something on the floor by mid year, but would support me if I decide to go elsewhere. The tougher issue is going to be telling Murray of my intentions. What do I do now to start truly pursuing a job in the London office?  

								Chris

Mike,
	Tim Beldon (503-464-3820) has asked that you give him a call in regards to your request for historical EES metered volumes. 

					Chris

Caroline, 
	
	While I agree with you that having you go to Houston would be productive, it is a luxury that we cannot afford. We are currently four and a half months behind on our actualization process, with both the internal and external customers running out of patience. With also have Brett leaving this Friday and Donna out until next week, I need you to focus solely on getting us actualized for the months in question. We also have a deliverable to Seattle City Light by the end of this week. Until we get these items settled, I can not allow the transition of duties between yourself and Virginia to take place as we had planned. We all want this transition to happen, but we have to get these deliverables out the door.  I hope that you can understand that with all of these issues on the VM plate, my answer will have to be no to your going to Houston. 

							Chris

Caroline Emmert
04/04/2001 09:39 AM
Chris,

I understand that Virginia has been approached to head down to Houston and meet with the Settlements group.  I would like to be part of that as well, if that is alright.  There are still some things they do on their side that I would like to learn about, and I think that Virginia and I could collaborate on a sharing of information meeting and both would get a lot out of it.

Let me know.  I guess the date hasn't been settled, yet, but I am available pretty much any time in the next few weeks.

C

You are the man!  Picking a bar near my house - double points for you!

Stewart

   

Please join us at the Horse Brass Pub on Thursday, April 5th, for 				Brett's Farewell!  

We will be kicking off the festivities at 6:00pm and hope you all can come to wish Holly and Brett good luck on their new adventure!  Attached are directions--the address is 4534 SE Belmont Street.

 
 

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Attached is a zip file with a compressed excel file showing our  computation of the September settlement.  Please review the spreadsheet and  contact me to discuss the deviations in our computations.  I had to send  you a numerical file due to the large size of the active computational file and  all the embedded links to the exposte data files, etc.  If you have  questions, call me at 206-615-0961.  I look forward to a speedy resolution  of our outstanding settlement issues.
 - September.zip 

Les,

	Come by my desk when you get back in the office so we can discuss the e-mail below. Audry and I need to have couple of questions cleared up before we send payment..

								Thanks
								   Chris

Audrey Cook
04/06/2001 11:46 AM
Lester Rawson
04/03/2001 02:25 PM
Audrey,

Here are the Income Statements I've created using Courtney's data to pay Willamette. I'll be gone on vacation this afternoon thru Monday. 
Willamette is getting upset that we haven't settled for 6 months after the power flowed. I need to get them paid for these months this week if possible.

Les

   

Linda,
	We are going to need your services for the 2000 ISO SQMD Audit. Please contact me at your earliest convenience so that we can move forward on this project. I can be reached at  (503)464-8219.

							Chris

linda.o.norman@us.arthurandersen.com on 03/06/2001 01:36:45 PM
Chris and Murray,

Jane requested that I follow up with you regarding EPMI's need for ISO audit
agreed-upon procedures.  (I visited the Cal ISO website, and did not readily see
discussion of 2000 audit requirements.)

Please let us know as soon as possible if you will need our assistance, as we
are in the midst of our 2001 planning.

FYI - Jane is no longer with Arthur Andersen.  Debra Cash is our engagement
partner, and I am an engagement senior.

Thanks,
Linda

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer do not consent to
Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Linda,

	The below e-mail contains the latest requirements for the ISO Audit. I have asked for and been granted an extension to all of the time lines listed the in the requirements. 

							Chris
Chris, attached is the cover letter that was sent to Murray, along with the
timeline and the requirements.  Should you be the main contact or should I
continue sending the information to Murray?  Thanks

 <<sc-audit-req-00.rtf>>  	 <<sc-audit-timeline-00.doc>>
<<epmi-coverltr.doc>>

Jeanette Plumley
Data Quality Auditor
California ISO
916-608-5971
jplumley@caiso.com

 - sc-audit-req-00.rtf 
 - sc-audit-timeline-00.doc 
 - epmi-coverltr.doc 

Done

I received CERS/CDWR's last of the 7 day settlements payments on Friday - on time.  
Let me know if there is anything else I can do.  Otherwise, I will return to settling "normally" with them.

Thank you
Amy

 

4:30 will be fine

That will be fine.

	Chris

linda.o.norman@us.arthurandersen.com on 04/09/2001 05:36:07 PM
Chris,

Thanks for your reply.  I received the ISO requirements and timeline; the
requirements appear to be materially consistent with prior year.  We can set up
a call to discuss the audit as early as next week, as we are in the midst of our
earnings release testing this week.  Would next Thursday morning around 9:00
a.m. (your time) work? Any other time on Thursday would work with our schedules.

Thanks,
Linda

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

I will have these numbers to you by close of business today.

			Chris

Joy Werner@ENRON
04/09/2001 06:51 AM
Hi Chris,
I just wanted make sure that we areon track to get the figures tomorrow for the 1st quarter.
Please let me know if you have any questions. 
Thank you
Joy
Joy Werner
04/02/2001 01:36 PM
 HI Chris,
We need to get the California ISO numbers for the 1st qtr. 2001 in the same format as you have prepared in the past (See example below), by April 10th, 2001.  
Please give me a call if you have any questions.  
Thank you
Joy
713.345.8674

 

Joy Werner@ENRON
04/10/2001 08:29 AM
wonderful, thank you Chris!!

   

I will have these numbers to you by close of business today.

			Chris

Joy Werner@ENRON
04/09/2001 06:51 AM
Hi Chris,
I just wanted make sure that we areon track to get the figures tomorrow for the 1st quarter.
Please let me know if you have any questions. 
Thank you
Joy
Joy Werner
04/02/2001 01:36 PM
 HI Chris,
We need to get the California ISO numbers for the 1st qtr. 2001 in the same format as you have prepared in the past (See example below), by April 10th, 2001.  
Please give me a call if you have any questions.  
Thank you
Joy
713.345.8674

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Kristian,
	I will get the list of accomplishments out by end of business tommowrow. I apologize for taking so long to respond, it has been pretty hectic around here the last couple of weeks. I have been desperately trying to fill the positions within the group.  Hope all is going well with you and Monica. Did you find a place to live yet?

	ps     Did you hear that PG&E declared bankruptcy? 

						

Kristian J Lande

04/03/2001 12:47 PM

Great.  Paul asked if you could put together a summary of your accomplishments in an email.  Paul will shop you around to some different groups here.  He mentioned Rich Lewis (head of UK power) is looking for people who are good at analytics and have allot of perseverance.  Paul will be out of the office for the next week so don't feel pressured to do it right away.   I will try to give you a call.

   

Kristian,

	I met with Tim today to inform him of my intentions to pursue opportunities outside of the Portland office. It seem to go very well, w/ TIm also saying that he had expressed an interest in working in London. He did make sure and state that the London office is the highest cost office in all of Enron, and therefore would probably be the first on to experience layoffs if the economy took a downturn. His thought is that he wants to see if he can get me into something on the floor by mid year, but would support me if I decide to go elsewhere. The tougher issue is going to be telling Murray of my intentions. What do I do now to start truly pursuing a job in the London office?  

								Chris

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Pamela,

	Please forward to me Brett's last e-mail so that I can make sure that I keep the report in the same format that you are comfortable with using.

						Chris

Chris will you be forwarding me the HA_Finals for EES and EEMC with Brett leaving the company?  Please let me know.  If so, will you forward me the lastest files you have for April.  Brett has already forwarded the 1st - 3rd.

Thanks,

Pam

My pleasure :)

Thanks for responding...

pam
  

Betty,

	Stewart has asked that I send you an e-mail giving you the logic behind  the way in which EPMI arrived at the CDWR payments for December as they relate to the PX index.  EPMI made a payment for December sales to all of our Scheduling Coordinator clients equal to approximately 78% of what they would have received according to the PX hourly index.  This is the approximate methodology that the  PX  used in making its payments to their customers. If you have any questions in regards to this issue, feel free to call me at 503-464-8219.

								Chris Stokley

Kathy,

	Could you please set up a conference room for Monday from 10:00 to 12:00.

					Thanks
					  Chris

FYI

In order to continue settlements on a weekly basis - I feel we are going to have to have that in writing - them agreeing to it; because just today someone from CERS called to confirm that we got our last payment from them and to say "goodbye & thanks" since I would no longer be calling her with 7 day settlements since that ends March 31st.  So #1 I need to know that we have relayed it to the correct people there before I forecast money coming in again weekly.  Also, I need to see what all deals should be included - because in March there was both a buy & sale that was checkedout with CDWR and paid according to WSPP.  We had the 7 day settlements deal under CDWR when it probably should have been under CERS - since that is who was on the confirm for the 7 day settlement.  

Let me know & I'll run some CARPs to see what I see so far for April.

Thanks and I hope to be of help! - Amy  

   

Amy,
	I would like to continue settling CERS/CDWR on a weekly basis until both Legal and Credit are comfortable with moving them to standard settlement time lines. Thanks for your help on this issue.

								Chris

   

I received CERS/CDWR's last of the 7 day settlements payments on Friday - on time.  
Let me know if there is anything else I can do.  Otherwise, I will return to settling "normally" with them.

Thank you
Amy

 

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Kristian,

	Sorry I didn't call you back yesterday, by the time I got a chance to return your call it was 11:00(8 hr difference?) your time. What is the best time to give you a call? I will be here pretty late tonight, so just let me know what is convenient for you.

									Chris

Steve--

Here's a quick synopsis of what we need:

Users want actual historical metered data. If they can't get the data before it has been EEV'd (?) by MV-90, they need to know, for each value, whether it is the actual metered amount or an estimated value.
Users understand that there may be missing data, but do not require the meta-data detailing this. However, this is with the understanding that the back-fill data will eventually arrive at some later date.
We want any account- and meter-descriptive data as well as the associated volumetric data.
A  test file to see what kind of data are available and a few consecutive days worth of data to get a feel for volumes are needed.
If data is received from 12 - 6 a.m., how soon after 6 a.m. can we get a file?

Please do not "burn in" this process just yet because data and timing requirements may change.

Chris--

With the bullets above, Steve has promised to turn around the completed WIP by COB today or tomorrow morning. Hopefully this will at least get the ball rolling. It is then up to the business to determine whether to proceed and how to prioritze it. There must be concerted effort from the business to prioritize requests to CSC. Steve gave me Richard Miller's name as the EES coordinator for these requests. Please contact him and let me know what you find out.

Going forward we MUST establish who is responsible for filling these things out and keeping track of them. I've heard different things from different people, and I don't want to end up (nor should anyone else) being the person who fields random and anonymous lobs from the other side of the fence.

Cheers,

--John

Kathy,
	Could you check on how much we paid for Donna's organizer. 

			Chris

  

Thanks for responding...

pam
  

Thanks

Chris,
	I have sent the message to Andrew about term serv and will let you know what I find out.

Dave

Jennifer,
	I will need to know what the volume totals you are expecting in each of the hours listed below. Please send your comparison of what was expected by EES  vs what you received from EPMI. 
						             Thanks
							Chris

Chris, 
thanks for sending these files promptly.  However, there are a couple of zones and hours I need you the check in the EES file as the volume look a little inconsistent when compared to hours before and hours after. 

Please check the following:

Date		Zone		Hour
4/1		PGE1		14, 17 & 18

4/4		PGE1		11, 13 & 17
		PGE2		11
		PGE3		11&12
		SCE1		1, 11 - 17

4/5		PGE2		2-5

4/7		PGE3		13-15 & 18

4/11		PGE2		2-6
		PGE3		2-6 & 24
		SCE1		4, 5 & 24

Please let me know if  you have any questions.

Thanks again,

Pam

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Who do you want me to send my accomplishments to?

					Chris

Stewart,
	How amazing that this is exactly what we agreed to this morning. You then apparently decided to put yourself back into the process and schedule a meeting that I did not agree to attend. I made it very clear that it would be difficult for me to attend a meeting today, but that I could try to break free for 2:30. I then thought that it would be on ME not yourself to schedule this meeting if I was able to break lose from my meeting by 2:30.I left my schedule open most of last week in order to resolve this issue. However, we never got a response from Steve to allow us to close this item. Before any phone call takes place to Steve tomorrow, you and I will talk about the handling of this item going forward. Please stop by at your earliest convenience so that we can put this issue to rest.

							Chris

   

Please call Steve and resolve the settlement issues - I am out of this process - I will check in tomorrow at noon to find out if its closed.

Stewart

Stewart,
	Let me make this very clear, no phone call will take place until you and I talk about this issue.

						Chris

I am not interested in talking any more about this issue - you deal with it however you want and call whenever you want.  I am out of the process completely.  I will call you at noon tomorrow just to make sure it got resolved.

   

Stewart,
	How amazing that this is exactly what we agreed to this morning. You then apparently decided to put yourself back into the process and schedule a meeting that I did not agree to attend. I made it very clear that it would be difficult for me to attend a meeting today, but that I could try to break free for 2:30. I then thought that it would be on ME not yourself to schedule this meeting if I was able to break lose from my meeting by 2:30.I left my schedule open most of last week in order to resolve this issue. However, we never got a response from Steve to allow us to close this item. Before any phone call takes place to Steve tomorrow, you and I will talk about the handling of this item going forward. Please stop by at your earliest convenience so that we can put this issue to rest.

							Chris

   

Please call Steve and resolve the settlement issues - I am out of this process - I will check in tomorrow at noon to find out if its closed.

Stewart

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

I no longer have his resume.

		Chris

Kathryn Sheppard
04/16/2001 04:44 PM
GRACE RODRIGUEZ
04/16/2001 04:20 PM
Do you have Kit Blair's home address info? Or might Chris (Stokley) still have a copy of his resume?

I am open anytime before 10:00 to talk about the SCL issue. This is not a big deal, I just want to find out what was discussed while I was in my meeting yesterday. 

						Chris

   

If you want to talk with me before calling steve I will be around all morning.

Stewart

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

Awsome! That is very cool, she will also help put things into perspective for you along the way. I will be swinging  by your floor sometime after 5:00 today, I will drop in if you are there. Thanks for the update.

						Chris

Chris,

I couldn't remember if I sent you an email or not.  So I am going back and doing it.  On June 22 my daughter Elizabeth was born.  7 lbs 6 oz, 19.5 inches.  She is a handful.

I never knew how much I liked sleep before she came.  She already has Dad wrapped around her finger.  Hope all is well.

Greg

Steve,

	I will be in meeting most of the morning but have an open schedule after 12:30 today. Would 1:00 be a good time for us to discuss any pending items that we have left to complete? Could you please send me a list of the hot items so that I can research them before our meeting.

							Thanks for your patience
							          Chris

Audrey,

	Go ahead and send a payment out to Willamette for the items listed below

					Thanks
					   Chris

Lester Rawson
04/17/2001 08:41 AM
Chris,

Audrey have tied out on numbers for Willamette for Sept and Oct.

Sept. Payment of $6897.32

Oct. Payment of $ 48,005.05

These numbers are based on CARP and the estimates from Audrey.

Les

  

I would like to discuss the EPMI/SCL split on the differences  detailed in Caroline's spreadsheet.  It appeared that the differences were  the gross amounts owed by the CISO for our business, without being segregated  into a recomputed EPMI portion and SCL portion.  I would like to clarify  the magnitude and certainty of the difference between our Prelim and expected  Final payments at this point in time.  Given the magnitude, I think we  should then discuss the timing of payments, so it might be a good idea if Stuart  were on the call as well.  My calendar is open from 1 to 2 if you want to  work it in then.

>>> <Chris.Stokley@enron.com>  04/17/01 08:55AM >>>
Steve,

     I will  be in meeting most of the morning but have an open schedule
after 12:30  today. Would 1:00 be a good time for us to discuss any pending
items that we  have left to complete? Could you please send me a list of the
hot items so  that I can research them before our  meeting.

                                    Thanks for your  patience
                                              Chris

Does "People Finder" currently exist as an option in this web sit? If not, could we get that added as an option in the very near future.

	ps. What kind of turnaround time should I expect on a response from the support group when I send an issue in?

Please have them mirror Kortney Nelson's profile along with adding VPN to all of the current and incoming Volume Mang. group.

						             Thanks
							Chris

Chris,

You have several new users starting soon. Do you want me to mirror them after a specific user?  If not could you please get with me so I can request the appropriate access for each person.  I have already requested the default user accounts..  login ID's and Notes.

Kit Blair  Id - kblair   pswd   
Marina Tchernokojeva - Id mtcherno  
Eugene Lee - Id - elee2 

Login password:  p0rt8lan!  (it's a zero not an o)  (same for all users)
Notes Password: notespassword!  (same for all users)

Thanks,
Diana Willigerod
503-464-3704 office
503-703-2418 cell

Dave,
	Any updates on when we will they will be rolling out Outlook?

			Chris

Thanks for the update.

Chris

Last word I got is that on Monday someone will be here.  I have sent out another mail asking for confirmation.  I will be letting everyone know as soon as I do.

Dave

Dave,
	Any updates on when we will they will be rolling out Outlook?

			Chris

Please give Kourt a call on her cell and get an answer to the question below.

			Thanks
			   Chris
Hi Kourtney,

Can you please let me know if Sierra Power is a new Counterparty. 
 

Godfrey Hyde
X57741

Any updates on this item?

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

Also, thanks for deciphering my original sentence.

			Chris

Thanks for the update.

Chris

Last word I got is that on Monday someone will be here.  I have sent out another mail asking for confirmation.  I will be letting everyone know as soon as I do.

Dave

Dave,
	Any updates on when we will they will be rolling out Outlook?

			Chris

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Bob,
	I am a little confused, my understanding was that you would be able to escalate these items to get a quick turnaround time in comparison to going the normal process. What you are recommending sounds like the normal process, am I incorrect on that conclusion?  When can I expect to get feedback from CSC with the process listed below? 

								Chris
John/Chris - I spoke to Steve Walker with Team Enron this morning about your request.  He'll be contacting you to help fill out the request form and get it submitted.  When the request is completed, it should be forwarded to Jacqueline Jackson in my group for submission to CSC.  With respect to your time for completion requirements, we'll need to work with CSC on prioritization if there are any issues.

Bob

John/Chris,

I talked to Bob Gresch this morning.  His recommendation was to complete a WIP for this request. The WIP process will be the most expodicious method.

He can complete one WIP for both:
MV90 interval data to FTP site (daily)
MV90 interval data to MDMA (daily)

Bob can help you complete the WIP form.  Bob can be reached at 5-5678.

Thanks,
Robert

In an effort to centralize information uncovered in various meetings, I have put together a short document covering *my* understanding of the meter data flow. Please take a look at ...

     http://172.24.5.129:90/sp/doc/project/analysis/meterdataanalysis.html

...and reply with any corrections, additions and feedback--I will incorporate them into the document.

Pat Priest has told us that if we could get a WIP in by today regarding the daily download of meter data from MV-90, CSC might be able to turn something around to us by next week. Who is in charge of this process? Who gives the go-ahead?

--John

FYI
ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/18/2001 01:41 PM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
We are looking at adding this but as it is confidential information, we have to obtain permission.  Turnaround time on the clickathome mailbox is within a few hours but no more than 24 hours.  Thanks.  

   

Does "People Finder" currently exist as an option in this web sit? If not, could we get that added as an option in the very near future.

	ps. What kind of turnaround time should I expect on a response from the support group when I send an issue in?

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Keoni,
	Please get this answered ASAP. This is holding up a mission critical deadline for our group that we can not afford to miss. Your help is very much appreciated.

					Chris

Caroline Emmert
04/18/2001 04:05 PM
Caroline Emmert
04/18/2001 03:56 PM
Keoni,

We are, still, struggling to fully understand the Instructed/Uninstructed Energy data (IE), specifically the two columns that report Uninstructed Deviation and Uninstructed Energy.

The volumetric totals in one of these two columns is supposed to match the volume in the Settlement Detail file for Charge Type 407.  However, I have discovered a couple of (annoying) things in September:

In comparing the two columns within the table - 
For LocationTypes L and C, there is no volumetric difference between the two columns.

For LocationType G, there is a volumetric difference of 153.15 (more in the Deviation column than in the Energy column)

In comparing IE to the Settlement Statement data - 
When I use the volumes in the Uninstructed Energy column for all LocationTypes, I have a volumetric difference of 10.52 (less in the IE data).
However, when I use the Uninst Energy column for L and C, and the Deviation column for G, I then have a volumetric difference of 142.63 (less in the Settlement Statement Detail data).

My question is two- or several-fold:

What causes the volumes in the two columns to be different for the G type?  I could find no discernable value to make it change anywhere in the data.
Which column has the values that the ISO uses in determining the total net position for EPMI?
Why don't the two sets of volumes match (IE to Settlement)?

I really need to understand this, as we are required to tie all of our customer's volumes back to the Settlement Statement file, and, again, when the backup file doesn't match or is inconsistent, that makes our goals that much harder to achieve.

Caroline

It still does not work. Please forward this issue on to Elizabeth and have her take a look at it. If she needs to contact me I can be reached at 503-464-8219.

										Chris

ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/18/2001 02:56 PM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Please try again.  It this happens again, please contact Elizabeth B. at X36176.  Thanks.

   

Any updates on this item?

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

<Embedded StdOleLink>

I had to leave early yesterday, but I was able to get in touch with John to
follow-up with your page.  See response below and feel free to provide a
specific example for us to research.  Thanks

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>

Pamela,
	Where do you get the numbers for the EEMC tab? Here are the stages of the process that I currently know about:
	
		1) EES sends the schedule  file to the EPMI server
		2) Calf. schedulers pull EES schedules into their portfolio and submit the information to the ISO.
		3) ISO sends back Day Ahead Finals (Changes could occur with EES original schedule)
		4) ISO Sends back Hour Ahead Finals (Changes could occur with EES schedule from the Day Ahead Market)

	As you can see, there is quite a few places that changes can occur to an EES schedule in the course of a day. So I am trying to follow the information flow on both the EES side and the EPMI side. If the only schedule you see is the one that is originally sent to the  EPMI server, then I can see where we have the potential to have many unexplained variances. If this is the case, this may be nothing more than providing you with the incremental information that is provided by the ISO during the course of a given day. Just update me on your process flow, and I will keep this issue moving along until completion.

								Thanks
								  Chris

Chris,  the spreadsheet below contains the HA_Finals that you send to me(EPMI) as well as the scheduled volumes sent from the scheduling group(EES).  The volumes on the EPMI tab is inconsistent with the EEMC tab.  Please review the variance sheet tab which will denote the days, zone and hours where the difference occur.    I am assuming the EPMI numbers are incorrect because of the hour by hour consistency on the EEMC  spreadsheet.  However,  this assumption could be incorrect.   Again, please review and let me know. 

Thanks,

Pam
 

<Embedded StdOleLink>

 

	

 

Joy Werner@ENRON
04/10/2001 08:29 AM
wonderful, thank you Chris!!

   

I will have these numbers to you by close of business today.

			Chris

Joy Werner@ENRON
04/09/2001 06:51 AM
Hi Chris,
I just wanted make sure that we areon track to get the figures tomorrow for the 1st quarter.
Please let me know if you have any questions. 
Thank you
Joy
Joy Werner
04/02/2001 01:36 PM
 HI Chris,
We need to get the California ISO numbers for the 1st qtr. 2001 in the same format as you have prepared in the past (See example below), by April 10th, 2001.  
Please give me a call if you have any questions.  
Thank you
Joy
713.345.8674

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Pamela,
	I understand that you are getting your information from the schedulers, my question is at what point in the process. Is this the info that is originally sent to the server with no updates? If so, then we are going to keep having variances until we get you more up to date information. I know that the Calf. schedulers send a new file to EES after the close of the Day Ahead Mrkt, yet I don't see these updated numbers reflected in the schedules that you sent me. Find out from your schedulers if this is the original schedule that is sent to us on the server, and if so, are they updating the file after the changes in the Day-Ahead Mrkt. I want to make sure that you and I are chasing true variances and not timing variances.
						
						Thanks
						  Chris

Chris, thanks for explaining your process to me.  However, I am getting my numbers from a spreadsheet that is prepared by our schedulling group.  If you  would like to view the spreadsheet.... go to 
R:
risk_mgt,
West
CALIFORNIA TRADING and SCHEDULING
Schedule Coordination
NEW FORECAST
CA_Schedule

Please let me know if you have any more questions.

Thanks,

pam

<Embedded StdOleLink>

Elizabeth,
	Any luck on fixing this problem?

ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/19/2001 06:41 AM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Elizabeth,

Could you look into this?  Thanks.

   

It still does not work. Please forward this issue on to Elizabeth and have her take a look at it. If she needs to contact me I can be reached at 503-464-8219.

										Chris

ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/18/2001 02:56 PM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Please try again.  It this happens again, please contact Elizabeth B. at X36176.  Thanks.

   

Any updates on this item?

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Kathy,
	Do we have a room for this week's status meeting?

				Chris

Kathryn Sheppard
04/10/2001 01:54 PM
The weekly strategy meetings for Volume Management will be held on Mondays at 1:00 p.m. in the Mt. Bachelor Conf. Room.

Kathy

Steve,
	At last! We now have the final actualized numbers for Sept. Caroline will be sending the details behind our numbers sometime today. Please take a look at these updated numbers and give us feedback at your earliest convenience. Once again, thanks for your patience concerning this matter.

								Chris

Caroline Emmert
04/18/2001 08:55 AM
Steve,

Attached are the details of the results of our actualization, estimates compared to ISO actuals, for the Import Deviation assessed against SCL schedules in September 2000.  Please note that this does not include any of the transactions for which we have submitted disputes.  I have also included details reflecting our original estimate for these charges.

Please feel free to call me or Chris Stokley if you have any questions.

Caroline Emmert
Specialist
 

Kathy,
	Could you please send me and e-mail w/ my relevant itinerary information, the fax is unreadable. Sorry to be such a pest.

								Chris

Kristian,
	
	I finally grew some balls and had my meeting with Murray. It went really well, a lot different than I expected. I now have to meet w/ Tim so that he can lay out what opportunities he thinks exist on the floor. That should be interesting. I will get in early tomorrow, and give you a call to give you an update. I have not sent my accomplishments b/c I wanted to hear what Tim had to say as far as opportunities on the floor. The last thing I want to do is have Paul take the time to go pass around my resume and me not follow through on those potential offers. Talk to you tommorow.

								Chris

Elizabeth,
	Why have you not resonded back to my e-mail? 

			Chris

Elizabeth,
	Any luck on fixing this problem?

ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/19/2001 06:41 AM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Elizabeth,

Could you look into this?  Thanks.

   

It still does not work. Please forward this issue on to Elizabeth and have her take a look at it. If she needs to contact me I can be reached at 503-464-8219.

										Chris

ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/18/2001 02:56 PM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Please try again.  It this happens again, please contact Elizabeth B. at X36176.  Thanks.

   

Any updates on this item?

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Thank you

Good morning, Chris.

I apologize for not replying to you on Friday; I have been out of the office until today.

The problem with the Publications container is a Yahoo issue, as they are the backbone to the portal.  I have spoken with our Portal administrator, and he is working to fix the problem with Yahoo.  As soon as it is back up and running, you will be one of the first to know.

Thank you for your patience,
Elizabeth

Elizabeth,
	Why have you not resonded back to my e-mail? 

			Chris

Elizabeth,
	Any luck on fixing this problem?

 
ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/19/2001 06:41 AM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Elizabeth,

Could you look into this?  Thanks.

   

It still does not work. Please forward this issue on to Elizabeth and have her take a look at it. If she needs to contact me I can be reached at 503-464-8219.

										Chris

 
ClickAtHome@ENRON
04/18/2001 02:56 PM
Sent by:	Clickathome@ENRON
Please try again.  It this happens again, please contact Elizabeth B. at X36176.  Thanks.

   

Any updates on this item?

When I go into the publication area to add magazines nothing happens. I added 
Megawatt Daily and Electric Power Daily and then hit the finished button, at this point 
nothing happens.

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Jessica Burry
04/23/2001 04:18 PM
The Electric System Operation for the Non-Engineer course is scheduled to take place this Friday & Saturday, April 27th & 28th from 8:30am to 4:30pm. I have listed below a brief description of the course overview and location. I can be reached at 464-3800 if you have any questions.

Location						Meal Schedule
2 World Trade Center 					8:15-8:30am - Coffee & Bagels Served
Mezzanine Level  (Oregon Room)			12:00 - 1:00pm - Lunch Served
121 SW Salmon						3:00pm - Drink Refreshments
							Break's - Every 50 min

Overview
The two-day workshop provides you with a comprehensive understanding of system operations including fossil fuel, hydro and nuclear generation, transmission and distribution. The course will provide not only technical information but also economics of operation, system and equipment protection and safety.

Course Highlights
Generation
Transmission & Overhead
Distribution Systems
Underground Distribution
Switchgear
Voltage Control
Matching Generation

Day one					Day Two

8:15-8:30am					8:15-8:30am							
Coffee & Bagels Served			Coffee & Bagels Served

8:30-4:30pm					8:30-4:30pm
Generation					Underground Distribution
Construction and operation 				Padmount transformers, underground
        of steam, hydro and gas 				cable, conduit and reliability overhead 
         turbine generators.					versus underground.

Transmission and Overhead 		Swithgear
Distribution Systems					Circuit switches, fuses and cut outs.
Power and distribution transformers.

Wye and Delta overhead 			Voltage Control
distribution systems					Voltage control using noload tap changers, load tap 								changers, and voltage regulators.

Power and energy calculations		Matching Generation
							Automotive versus manual matching of 
							generation to load, transmission intertie.
						Adjourn

Don, 
	In the future send your e-mail to the person you spoke w/ in the first place before trying other routes. I did send you an e-mail yesterday, if you do not get it by close of business today then let me know.

							Chris Stokley
							

<Don_Deach@calpx.com> on 04/24/2001 03:38:22 PM
Brett,  In talking to Chris Stokley yesterday, he said to draw the amount for
the above subject invoice from your collateral account.  He was going to Email
me a memo stating this.   To date, I have not received that Email.  Since you
Emailed me the information for last billing cycle, can you furnish me this info
for the above invoice?   Would like it in writing before we apply the credit.

Thanks,  Don

Don,
 	Please take the payment for our PX Final R-T Invoice for Jan from our collateral.

				Chris
			      503-464-8219

Don, This was originally sent to Mario.  Per my phone conversation with you, I am forwarding this, and future emails, to you since Mario has left the company and you are his replacement.  

Brett
Mario, 

Regarding the payment for PX invoice # 101779, dated 03/28/2001, for $64,547.04 due to the PX on 04/02/2001:  Our intent is to pay this amount in full.  Please deduct this full amount from the cash you have drawn down from our core market collateral.  

Regards,

Brett Hunsucker 
503.464.8298

I will look into what timeline that we can get these guys paid on and talk with you today. As far as the other issue, we are no where close to being able to take that project on. The current new hires are just to get us caught up in the short term. After that, then it may be a do able item, but right now all I want the new guys concentrating on is getting us caught up. I see this hand-off taking place sometime in the 3rd qtr of this year, when we get the rest of our staff in place.

							Chris

Lester Rawson
04/23/2001 10:39 AM
Chris,

I just received a call from Willamette Ind. concerning our future business. It seems Aquila is making a proposal for Willamette's business. 
Willamette is reasonably satisfied with their Enron relationship with the exception of the time it takes for Enron to settle California business.  They mentioned that timely settlement of the outstanding balances for November and December would be helpful in discussions with their upper management.

I'm confident that Enron will retain Willamette's business, but it would be extremely helpful if we can get them paid for CISO business for November and December before the end of April. 

Let me know what Volume Management needs from Services to get Willamette paid for Nov. and Dec.

On another topic, with your new hires coming soon can we shift the settlements for Services Customers, like we've discussed, to Volume Management?

Regards,

Les Rawson

Kristian,

	I tried to call this morning but I must be doing something wrong b/c I am not getting through. If you get a chance today or sometime this week, give me a call. 

								Chris

Mark,
	Please send me the March Risk numbers. The more detail the better.

						Chris

Any luck on rounding up those numbers?

			Chris

Mark,
	Please send me the March Risk numbers. The more detail the better.

						Chris

Chip,
	What do I do once I get to this folder?

Hi Chris, your public folder has been created. you can access it by clicking on the public folder/all public folders/other enron entities/enron north america/portland and then you can click on the folder with your name on it. You can find this directory in Outlook under the folder list. Give me a call if you need any help with this 503-703-0536        talk to you later Chris,  Chip

  

				Chris

Chris, 
would you forward me the lasted Final Schedule numbers you  have.

Thanks,

Pam

Chad,
	Sorry I haven't called you back, I flew into Houston yesterday and rt back out that afternoon. Your message last week didn't show up on my phone until Friday morning. My phone seems to get somewhat buggy when I am in Houston. I will be back in Houston next week, but I will give you a call tonight or tomorrow.

								Chris

FYI
 
Did you ever receive my email from a couple of weeks ago?  Does Donna Johnson still work for Enron?  
Brett Hunsucker 
Senior Client Representative 
Electric Reliability Council of Texas 
Phone: 512.248.6509 
Cell: 512.917.0056 
Fax: 512.248.3995 
email: bhunsucker@ercot.com 

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

The attachment in the e-mail below contains the EPMI balance with the PX(EPMI 081001.xls). The Win zip files sent by the ISO contain the backup to the 1480 Overview file.

   

							Chris
						       503-807-8959

 
Don Deach
08/13/2001 09:55 AM

PARTICIPANTS:
Enclosed is your updated Account Activity Statement summarizing all accounts receivable/payables activities with CalPX occurring during 2001 starting with the issuance of the December Day-Ahead/Day-Of Market invoice back in January through the April Real Time invoices in August.
The April billing cycles are adjustments being made by CAISO that go back as far as Spring 2000.  CAISO is continuing to make these adjustments, which are basically meter corrections and approved scheduling coordinator disputes, for prior periods.  These will probably continue for a few more months because of the recent FERC ruling regarding refunds.
Please feel free to call Don Deach (626-685-9876), Rachel Axelrad (626-685-9843) or Clark Cheng (626-685-9846) with any questions.
Thank You.
(See attached file: EPMI 081001.xls)

 
 
Did you ever receive my email from a couple of weeks ago?  Does Donna Johnson still work for Enron?  
Brett Hunsucker 
Senior Client Representative 
Electric Reliability Council of Texas 
Phone: 512.248.6509 
Cell: 512.917.0056 
Fax: 512.248.3995 
email: bhunsucker@ercot.com 

Please respond to Hey Chris
That book I mentioned to you is titled, "BLUR: the speed of change in a
connected economy". As a matter of fact, you can just go to the books
website and find almost all of the relevant content.
<http://www.blursite.com/lowcap/home/index.asp>
It sure was great talking to you. We have to take the time to talk more
often.

Take care,
Kerry

 - Kerry Jones (April Resume 2001).doc 

Keoni,

	Are you sure? It seems that we would have a charge or expense or both.

I checked.  You had no charges for 4/13/01.

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Keoni,

	Take a look at the file you sent last time and you will notice
that it does not contain 4/13/01. As far as the 4/29/01 file, you have
finalized this and should be able to send it to me.

								Chris

The file contained 04/18/01 thru 05/28/01. This is as far as we have
finaled.  Dates prior to 04/18 were previously sent. 

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Also, 4/13/01

Could you send me 4/29/01, I don't see it in the file you sent.

				Thanks
				Chris

 << File: Book1.xls >> <<Book1.xls>> Sorry about that.  There was a lot
of cutting and pasting
involved. 

Keoni,

	Take a look at the file you sent last time and you will notice that it does not contain 4/13/01. As far as the 4/29/01 file, you have finalized this and should be able to send it to me.

								Chris

The file contained 04/18/01 thru 05/28/01. This is as far as we have
finaled.  Dates prior to 04/18 were previously sent. 

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Also, 4/13/01

Could you send me 4/29/01, I don't see it in the file you sent.

				Thanks
				Chris

 << File: Book1.xls >> <<Book1.xls>> Sorry about that.  There was a lot
of cutting and pasting
involved. 

Very good question, let me piss some more people off and find out.

			

hey  - how's that meter data?

I sent this e-mail this morning. I didn't cc anyone b/c I wanted to see what the response would be w/ out her getting defensive. If I get anything less than a yes, then Richter will respond and cc the world. I will keep you updated.

Brenda,
	I need to give Jeff Ricter an update on where this item stands with CSC. I am still going off of the e-mail listed below stating that CSC could meet this deliverable by sometime this week. This is the item that we talked about in last week's Project Ranger meeting, and agreed needed to put on the high priority list. If you have any questions on this item, please feel free to call me at 503-807-8959. Thank for your help on this item.

								Chris 

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Kathy,

	Could you please change the Credit Card number that the Mid Town Apartments are billing, to the one that I gave you for booking my flights. 

							Thanks

Also, 4/13/01

Could you send me 4/29/01, I don't see it in the file you sent.

				Thanks
				Chris

 << File: Book1.xls >> <<Book1.xls>> Sorry about that.  There was a lot of cutting and pasting
involved. 

Could you send me 4/29/01, I don't see it in the file you sent.

				Thanks
				Chris

 << File: Book1.xls >> <<Book1.xls>> Sorry about that.  There was a lot of cutting and pasting
involved. 

Lawrence,
	Could you please send me the latest Account  summary for EPMI.

						Chris Stokley
						 503-807-8959	

 

 

 

 

 

 

Robert,
	Please let me know if Bob was able to get this done for us.

				Thanks
				  Chris

fyi

Bob,

Brenda wants us to move quickly with this request.  In your opinion, what is the best way to process this request?  If you put it under the 'Ranger' request, will this escalate this to the top?  If so, please do it.  It you have another process, let us now.  We do not want to incur additional charges by using an ECR, if we can avoid it.

What 'paperwork' needs to be completed?   WIP?  other?

Thanks

In an effort to centralize information uncovered in various meetings, I have put together a short document covering *my* understanding of the meter data flow. Please take a look at ...

     http://172.24.5.129:90/sp/doc/project/analysis/meterdataanalysis.html

...and reply with any corrections, additions and feedback--I will incorporate them into the document.

Pat Priest has told us that if we could get a WIP in by today regarding the daily download of meter data from MV-90, CSC might be able to turn something around to us by next week. Who is in charge of this process? Who gives the go-ahead?

--John

  

 

 

Jim,
	Could you get w/ Pete and get this resolved.
			

				Thanks
				  Chris

Chris,

We received the following four data files from EPMI on Wednesday, 08/08/01.
epmi_epmi_20010429_003.dat	Trade date 04/29/01	Received 08/08/01 16:10 Was this data file sent in error?  Should it have been for trade date 06/29/01?  Let me know if we can disregard this file.
epmi_epmi_20010625_003.dat	Trade date 06/25/01	Received 08/08/01
16:11
epmi_epmi_20010628_002.dat	Trade date 06/28/01	Received 08/08/01
16:12
epmi_epmi_20010630_001.dat	Trade date ???????  	Received 08/08/01 20:52 Assumed to be for trade date 06/30/01 by file naming convention, but unable to view the contents of this data file.  I suggest you either submit a request to review what we have for trade date 06/30/01 (if this is the correct date) or resend for trade date 06/30/01.
Please advise as soon as possible regarding the status of the above mentioned files.  I also wasn't sure if the data files EPMI sent were for trade dates only for those listed above or perhaps they should have sent 06/26/01 & 06/27/01 as well.  Thanks.
Glenna Madeiros
California ISO
Field Data Acquisition & Data Quality
Phone (916) 351-4431
Fax (916) 351-2452

Thanks for you help

 << File: Keoni.zip >> <<Keoni.zip>> Chris, per your request here are the 480 and 1480 charges
that have been tracked to date for Enron.  Please keep in mind that the
systems have not been built to incorporate this data into our Settlements
process so the normal validations built into our Settlements process are not
applied to the manual tracking of these charges. Therefore, this data should
not be considered Settlement quality.  If these charges ever to become
effective the proper systems will be built to pull in this data into the
Settlement process. 

I checked with some folks and found out that FERC should rule on this during
September. 
Take care. 
Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

I think this is a good example to go off of.

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net <mailto:9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net>
e-mail:  <<mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>>

 - Unscheduled Demand Penalty.doc 

FYI

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com <mailto:jthoma56@csc.com> on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc 

Keoni,
	I need to get updated settlement files on these charge types. Below is the last file you sent me. Thanks for the help.

Here you go.

 <<Keoni.zip>>

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net <mailto:9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net>
e-mail:  <<mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>>

 - Keoni.zip 

Alan,
	This is the detail behind the spreadsheet that I sent to you. This was sent to me by Keoni at the ISO.

					Chris

 

I met with Gary Fergus and we determined the  need to prepare affidavits and/or exhibits as part of our August 15th showing in the Califronia refund case. 

Exhbits in a FERC case require supporting documents and a sponsor (witness).

 I am trying to contact various people on getting the data together but here are the parameters of the exhibits:

Witness designations are preliminary.

1. EPMI's receivables from ISO/PX
What it shows:  ISO owes us $41.5 million and the PX $9.1 million plus any claims we want to make w.r.t. letters of credit with the PX
Sponsor: Tracy Ngo (PX data) and Murray O'Neil (ISO data)  (Tracy has agreed to prepare the exhibit but wants support from Murray's group on the ISO numbers.) 

2. EPMI's "receivables" from ISO for the underscheduling penalty
What it shows:  ISO has yet to actually implement the underscheduling penalty but has been tracking it.  According to information provided Chris Stockly, EPMI would receive $30 million of penalty revenues 
Sponsor:  Chris Stokley or Murray O'Neil

3. Enron's PX credit receivables
What it shows:  PG&E and SCE collectively owe EES $500 million
Sponsor: Steve Swain or ??

GAC

Kristian,

	I apologize for  not doing a better job of staying in touch the past few months. I have been flying into Houston every week for the past two months, which is getting quite old. I am not sure what will come of this project, but so far I am still dealing w/ Settlement issues. I hear that things are going a lot better for you since we last spoke, promotion, your own book, etc. Monica seems to also be doing quite well in her new role in origination. She did have time to give me shit for not doing a better job of staying in touch. I told her to go slap you in the head and make you install Instant Messenger on your Computer, so please do so. It is about the only way that I get a chance to communicate  w/ anyone these days including my family. 

										Chris

FYI

 The first test file for the MV90 Interval Data Extract project has beenposted to the common/shared directory. It is all the data for Sunday, 8/5.
If/when this test file is accepted, we will be able to begin daily production at any time.
Also, the Project Proposal for this effort was reviewed and approved this morning and will be priced and forwarded to Enron before the end of the day today or first thing tomorrow morning.
* Steve

I need a timeline of the request, and what has been going on for the past couple of weeks related to this.  When was the request made?  When did CSC receive it?  What have they done with it?  I know this was discussed several business days back.
I don't have a problem with the approval for the emergency request AFTER someone explains why we have had a delay.
Steve and Bob, please work with me Monday morning as
soon as possible to do whatever we need to do to escalate the status of
this
request to the highest response level possible.  Help me get the approval and forms needed to initiate work on this project on Monday.
If we need to meet with the requesters, please advise.
Thanks, Richard

Vivian Hart
08/03/2001 05:22 PM

I am trying to help some people in our team to obtain a
data download from MV90 of all interval usages on a daily
basis.  This has been a big issue with our traders in
the California market.  They have been trying to get this information
to get better Schedule numbers for power usages.
John Rutledge from IT had filled a work request for CSC
to start this work, but according to CSC, for this to be approved
as an emergency request you have to approve it.  This is
a high priority request for the traders.  CSC can start on this
Monday first thing and start giving us samples.
Please approve this request as an emergency request.
Attached is the work request and I've asked Richard Miller to
help escalate this also.
Thanks.

Jacqueline M Jackson
08/02/2001 07:52 AM

          cc:	John Rutledge/HOU/EES@EES

          Subject:	HIGH PRIORITY-FWD: WIP for MV-90 data

Chris
I went ahead an submitted this request to CSC.  I called and asked that they treat it as high priority so that the work can began immediately.
Jacqueline M Jackson
08/02/2001 07:48 AM

          cc:

          Subject:	HIGH PRIORITY-FWD: WIP for MV-90 data

Please see the attached request for your action.  Thank You.
Enron Energy Services
          cc:	"John Rutledge" <jrutledg@enron.com>@ENRON,
"Chris Stokley" <Chris_Stokley.enronXgate@enron.com>@ENRON, "Michael
Frazier" <mfrazier@enron.com>@ENRON, "Richard Miller"
<rmiller8@enron.com>@ENRON, "Maurice Winter" <mwinter@enron.com>@ENRON,
"Kenny Ha" <kha@enron.com>@ENRON, "Steven Gullion"
<sgullion@enron.com>@ENRON, rgresch@enron.com@ENRON,
tcarrol6@csc.com@ENRON, swalker2@csc.com @ ENRON, Todd
Taylor/HOU/EES@EES
          Subject:	FWD: WIP for MV-90 data

Jackie-
I am forwarding a completed WIP to you as instructed by Steve Walker.
Kind regards,
* John

<<WR MV90 data.doc>>
swalker2@csc.com on 07/27/2001 11:40:24 AM
          cc:	"Chris Stokley"
<Chris_Stokley.enronXgate@enron.com>, "Michael Frazier"
<mfrazier@enron.com>, "Richard Miller" <rmiller8@enron.com>, "Maurice
Winter" <mwinter@enron.com>, "Kenny Ha" <kha@enron.com>, "Steven
Gullion" <sgullion@enron.com>, rgresch@enron.com, tcarrol6@csc.com
          Subject:	Re: WIP for MV-90 data

John-
I have attached a copy of the Work Request for this
effort. Please review
it to be sure that it accurately reflects your need.
Everywhere on the form where you find 3 questions marks
(???), you need to
supply the data. If there is no information to be filled
in, feel free to
leave the field blank. The only fields that are REQUIRED
are the fields for
Lead requestor (the person who can answer questions
related to this
request), the Alternate requestor (someone who can
answer questions in the
lead's absence) and the Business sponsor (the person who
can authorize
spending for this effort if it approved-must be VP level or above)
When you have filled in those fields, please forward
this form to Jackie
Jackson (jjackson@enron.com) for submission to CSC in
Dublin. (They are
aware of this request, but need the official request from Enron.)
Please let me know if you have any questions.
* Steve

          cc:	"Michael Frazier" <mfrazier@enron.com>, "Richard
	Miller"

<rmiller8@enron.com>, "Maurice Winter"
<mwinter@enron.com>, "Kenny
Ha" <kha@enron.com>, "Steven Gullion"
<sgullion@enron.com>, Stephen
Walker/TMG/CSC@CSC
          Subject:	WIP for MV-90 data

Chris-
To clarify what I meant regarding prioritization:
CSC handles multiple, often independent, requests from
ENA as well as EES,
many
of which are of the "we need this as soon as possible"
variety. What they
want
from us (not just EES, but Enron as a whole) is a
prioritization of *all*
of
these outstanding requests, not just what our group
might have asked of
them.
Sorry about the confusion,
* John

          ---------------------------

(Embedded     Enron Energy Services
image moved
Frazier/HOU/EES@EES
          cc:	Richard Miller/HOU/EES@EES, Maurice
Winter/HOU/EES@EES, Kenny

Ha/HOU/EES@EES, Steven Gullion/HOU/EES@EES
          Subject:	WIP for MV-90 data

Steve-
Here's a quick synopsis of what we need:
Users want actual historical metered data. If they
can't get the data
before
it has been EEV'd (?) by MV-90, they need to know,
for each value,
whether it
is the actual metered amount or an estimated value.
Users understand that there may be missing data, but
do not require the
meta-data detailing this. However, this is with the
understanding that
the
back-fill data will eventually arrive at some later date.
We want any account- and meter-descriptive data as
well as the
associated
volumetric data.
A  test file to see what kind of data are available
and a few
consecutive
days worth of data to get a feel for volumes are needed.
If data is received from 12 - 6 a.m., how soon after
6 a.m. can we get a
file?
Please do not "burn in" this process just yet because
data and timing
requirements may change.

Chris-
With the bullets above, Steve has promised to turn
around the completed WIP
by
COB today or tomorrow morning. Hopefully this will at
least get the ball
rolling. It is then up to the business to determine
whether to proceed and
how
to prioritze it. There must be concerted effort from the
business to
prioritize
requests to CSC. Steve gave me Richard Miller's name as
the EES coordinator
for
these requests. Please contact him and let me know what you find out.
Going forward we MUST establish who is responsible for
filling these things
out
and keeping track of them. I've heard different things
from different
people,

and I don't want to end up (nor should anyone else)
being the person who
fields
random and anonymous lobs from the other side of the fence.
Cheers,

--John

(See attached file: pic10437.pcx)

* pic10437.pcx <<pic10437.pcx>>

(See attached file: winmail.dat)

 a

 a

Agreed J

Hey buddy you know me and deal entry!  i think this is pretty impressive!

Stewart

Thank God we brought Stewart in to clear all of this up!

This email is to summarize how i think we are going to book the LA AS transactions so as to ensure smooth settlements and month end.  Whoever intiates the deal will put in two enpower transactions:

Transaction One:  This one represents ENA buying AS from LA at the agreed upon capacity price and volume

Transaction Two:  This one represents ENA selling AS to EES at an agreed upon price and volume (Once Bill finishes his assessment of work he will work with Neil to determine what fee is appropriate  - this fee will be embedded in the price he sells to EES).

Lastly any time the AS gets exercised Bill's group will put the energy in caps and enpower.

If you have any questions or comments on the process let me know.

Stewart

Thank God we brought Stewart in to clear all of this up!

This email is to summarize how i think we are going to book the LA AS transactions so as to ensure smooth settlements and month end.  Whoever intiates the deal will put in two enpower transactions:

Transaction One:  This one represents ENA buying AS from LA at the agreed upon capacity price and volume

Transaction Two:  This one represents ENA selling AS to EES at an agreed upon price and volume (Once Bill finishes his assessment of work he will work with Neil to determine what fee is appropriate  - this fee will be embedded in the price he sells to EES).

Lastly any time the AS gets exercised Bill's group will put the energy in caps and enpower.

If you have any questions or comments on the process let me know.

Stewart

Observe group as Virgina gives us a lesson in kissing up to the boss. J

Hey Everyone:

  Just a quick reminder to fill out your status report at   P:\VolumeMgmt\Web Docs\West Desk VM Home Page.htm
  Then click West Desk VM Home Page
  Then click Status Update
  Then click Status Report
  Then Click on  08-2001
  I have created a report for today called Status 080701.pub

  Whenever ya'll get a chance -- let's impress Murray!

    Virginia

  

Brenda,
Here are the events as I know them
1)	On 7/25/01 this item was brought to the attention of varies members of a team meeting for Project Ranger. At that point, it was  agreed that this item should be high priority and Robert Bailey offered to push it forward.
2)	On Friday(7/27/01) I got a call from John Rutledge asking if he is the person that is supposed to enter  the WIP to CSC. John had never had any dealing w/ filling out a WIP, plus he is unsure if he is the person to fill it out. (Ball drop number one)
3)	WIP is finally submitted on 7/30/01. I got a call from Jacqueline Johnson on 8/2/01 asking a bunch of questions about the work request that was submitted by John. At that point I ask why I am just now being contacted if the WIP was submitted on Monday(7/30/01). Jacqueline then goes on to tell me that she has not been in the office that week and is just now getting around to reviewing our WIP request. I then ask why she did not have a backup covering her during her absence and told her she needs to get this out the door ASAP. (Ball drop number two)
4)	Brenda sends out an e-mail on Friday asking for an update from Richard Miller on the CSC issue. Yesterday at about 11:30 I sent an e-mail to Richard asking for an up date on the e-mail that Brenda sent out. I then get a call from Richard and Steve Walker in which they both told me that this item is not showing as an emergency item to CSC. Both told me that it was never conveyed to them that this was an emergency item, but  they will now escalated it to such. (Ball drop number three)

In summary, John should have been given a lot more guidance in filling the WIP out and getting it submitted to CSC since he has no prior relationship with CSC. As far as the rest of the items listed, I am unsure of where the disconnect in communication occurred at this time. Lastly, where does Robert Gresch fit in all of this since he is the one that I conveyed my concern about this item not looking like it was escalated to emergency status(7/26/01)? 

							Chris Stokley
Richard and Bob,
What is the status?  It is my understanding that the work request was not even received until Monday, 7/30.  I also understand that CSC (Steve Walker) worked with John Rutledge to define the work request.  I would like some insight into Chris' comment on the "ball being dropped."  I know we were all clear internally that this was a priority.  

Has CSC escalated this?  What is their timeline to deliver?  Let me know ASAP.

Richard,
	This is the last e-mail that I got from Mr. Gresch. As you can see, I am asking if this has been escalated to something other than the normal process. From the conversation we just had, I guess the level of priority never made it's way to you. While I am not sure who dropped the ball on this item, the fact remains that it was dropped and another week of information that is crucial to the intramonth book was missed. From this point forward, I would like to know who I should be talking with when it comes to these types of issues so as to avoid this miscommunication in the future. 
								
								
								Chris

Chris, Richard Miller, Gregg Young and Brenda Herod are working on prioritization.

Bob,
	I am a little confused, my understanding was that you would be able to escalate these items to get a quick turnaround time in comparison to going the normal process. What you are recommending sounds like the normal process, am I incorrect on that conclusion?  When can I expect to get feedback from CSC with the process listed below? 

								Chris
John/Chris - I spoke to Steve Walker with Team Enron this morning about your request.  He'll be contacting you to help fill out the request form and get it submitted.  When the request is completed, it should be forwarded to Jacqueline Jackson in my group for submission to CSC.  With respect to your time for completion requirements, we'll need to work with CSC on prioritization if there are any issues.

Bob
??Z5??J/?3OI?yr??<M8.?__:/?s?:??	

What is your office number?

Yes, but sadly know one took the initiative to follow through on this item. I had to call today and get the ball rolling because it was never moved to emergency status. 

								Chris

Did Bob follow thur with this for you?

Bob,
	I am a little confused, my understanding was that you would be able to escalate these items to get a quick turnaround time in comparison to going the normal process. What you are recommending sounds like the normal process, am I incorrect on that conclusion?  When can I expect to get feedback from CSC with the process listed below? 

								Chris
John/Chris - I spoke to Steve Walker with Team Enron this morning about your request.  He'll be contacting you to help fill out the request form and get it submitted.  When the request is completed, it should be forwarded to Jacqueline Jackson in my group for submission to CSC.  With respect to your time for completion requirements, we'll need to work with CSC on prioritization if there are any issues.

Bob
??Z5??J/?3OI?yr??<M8.?__:/?s?:??	

Richard,
	This is the last e-mail that I got from Mr. Gresch. As you can see, I am asking if this has been escalated to something other than the normal process. From the conversation we just had, I guess the level of priority never made it's way to you. While I am not sure who dropped the ball on this item, the fact remains that it was dropped and another week of information that is crucial to the intramonth book was missed. From this point forward, I would like to know who I should be talking with when it comes to these types of issues so as to avoid this miscommunication in the future. 
								
								
								Chris

Chris, Richard Miller, Gregg Young and Brenda Herod are working on prioritization.

Bob,
	I am a little confused, my understanding was that you would be able to escalate these items to get a quick turnaround time in comparison to going the normal process. What you are recommending sounds like the normal process, am I incorrect on that conclusion?  When can I expect to get feedback from CSC with the process listed below? 

								Chris
John/Chris - I spoke to Steve Walker with Team Enron this morning about your request.  He'll be contacting you to help fill out the request form and get it submitted.  When the request is completed, it should be forwarded to Jacqueline Jackson in my group for submission to CSC.  With respect to your time for completion requirements, we'll need to work with CSC on prioritization if there are any issues.

Bob
??Z5??J/?3OI?yr??<M8.?__:/?s?:??	

?

Hi Chris. Since you will be going to baton rouge one weekend and then to New orleans the next, I changed your return flight on the ticket originating from Portland on 23jul to return IAH/PDX on 10aug the 940am flight. The other ticket we did originating in Portland on 30jul will be printed and used towards your next trip from Portland. This was the least expensive way to handle your traveling to Baton Rouge and New Orleans. If this is confusing, you may call me at 713-860-1155 for me to explain it better. I assume the last itineraries for Baton Rouge and New Orleans are okay to ticket. 
thanks
cynthia

Richard,
	Do you have an update on this item?

			Chris
Can you run this down for Chris, and copy me on it.  If they haven't completed it, I'd like to why and when it will be done.

Chris,  I apologize for this sitting here since Wednesday with no response.  I was in CSC's offices on Wednesday and Thursday.  I need to get a lap top to check in when I travel.

Brenda,
	I need to give Jeff Ricter an update on where this item stands with CSC. I am still going off of the e-mail listed below stating that CSC could meet this deliverable by sometime this week. This is the item that we talked about in last week's Project Ranger meeting, and agreed needed to put on the high priority list. If you have any questions on this item, please feel free to call me at 503-807-8959. Thank for your help on this item.

								Chris 

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Yes, we do have Outlook. Get w/ Monica, I currently have her on my MSN IM. How is that Spanish coming along, can I now bring you along as an interpreter on my next trip to South America? Also, you need to come up w/ an excuse for  coming over to Houston in the very near future. 

								Chris

Chris,

Enron Europe has restricted access to MSN Messenger to communicate through the web. It is possible to set it up if you have MS Outlook.  Have you guys been migrated to MS Outlook?  Anyway, how is everything?

Cheers

 

Don't remember if I sent these documents to you.

 

Sean,
	Thanks for following up on this issue. I went by your office a few times Friday, but you had people that you were meeting with. I will stop by some time today to get an update.

									Thanks
									  Chris

Come see me when you get a moment in the morning.  I actually have an answer.....Sean

Sean,
	Sorry to keep bothering you, but we need to get an answer to the issue listed below. Who is looking into this item, and when will they have an answer back to us. Thank you for any help you can give us on resolving this issue.

								Chris

Sean,
	Did you get a chance to talk to Evan about the issue concerning the lack of notification as to when PG&E transferred over certain meters to EES.

									Chris 

FYI
 
Murray,  Thanks for the info, and the ideas.  We will talk on Monday when you get into the office.
 
Terry, Evan and Mark,
 
I am trying to determine if EES customers have been invoiced in compliance with the contract anywhere there is language regarding consumption bands/ over/under takes.  There is at least one thought throughout the organization that penalties have never been invoiced if a customer's usage was outside of the contractual bands, such as 90/110.
 
Beth and I talked with CSC about this last week, and they told us the following.
 
Gas:
The Altra system handles the over-take (above 110) as another tier in the pricing to bill the penalties.  The invoice combines it into one line-item with the first tier so when it is booked to the general ledger it is not segregated.  They do provide the customer with a break-out independently.  For undertakes, the administration is manual.  Erich Evans, CSC Gas Supervisor, told us he was confident in that his staff is monitoring the bands and applying penalties as applicable.  He did tell us that in the past the Gas Desk has communicated to CSC that they did not want the penalties accessed for the undertakes.  He also said that customers have a tendancy to dispute the undertake penalties.
 
In the HP abd STAT systems, the efforts are also manual.  Once again, he is confident that his staff is administering the penalties.
 
The exception to this is two-fold.  First of all, when CSC acquired these systems and contracts (formerly the Enron Dublin/Access Energy deals) from EES in 1999, there was no review of the contracts to ensure the system had cpatured the terms correctly.  CSC simply continued to invoice as EES had.  For new deals entered into from their take-over in 1999, CSC actually received the contracts and interpreted them to capture the data in their systems.  This practice continued until 2001 when the "deal ticket" concept was introduced, pushing the burden to EES for the correct data capture.  The process was gradual, but CSC feels that by 5/01 that almost 100% of the deals were captured through the deal ticket process.  Therefore, there is exposure that the deal set-up within CSC's systems is not accurate and consequently, the bands are not being monitored for compliance. 
 
Second, since the deal ticket process was effective, CSC's administration of bands is reliant on communications from EES through the deal ticket. 
 
In either scenario, our deal clean-up team will reveal any inaccurate deals, and our historical clean-up team will be able to calculate the exposures.  CSC is providing a listing of billed penalties/disputed penalties by Friday, 8/10.
 
POWER:
CSC is aware of only one contract with this scenario.  
 
We do not believe this to be true, and need to locate some power contracts to follow through their systems.  I need your help with this.
 
Terry,  Can someone on the Phoenix team provide me with a listing of any contracts that the team has looked at with this contractual implications?
 
Evan,  Can your service managers also provide examples of contracts that they know have the contract language?
 
Mark,  As we discussed on Friday, I need your team to review the GNO contracts/invoices and let me know if they are monitoring this.
 
Please let me know ASAP on Monday when I can expect this info.  I will assign someone tomorrow to bird-dog this for me.  I need an answer, and a plan (if it is not being monitored) by Tuesday to determine EES's exposure.
 
I appreciate your help.
 
Brenda
x35778
 
 
 

What time are you getting out of there today?

ISO Market Participants:
Since Trade Month November 2000 (which settled beginning in January 2001), =
payment defaults in the ISO markets have caused the ISO to pay less than th=
e full amount due Scheduling Coordinators (SCs) in the monthly cash clearin=
g process.  The purpose of this message is to describe the ISO's policies a=
nd procedures in settling the market when defaults occur.  As set forth in =
Section SABP 6.7.4 of the ISO Tariff, when payment defaults occur from SCs =
that have obligations to the ISO's markets (Debtor SCs), the shortfall is t=
o be prorated to SCs with net amounts due them (Creditor SCs) based on thei=
r outstanding balances. The principles that drive how amounts are settled a=
nd defaults are allocated to Creditor SCs are summarized below:
Proportionate allocation of defaults - The total amount of market defaults =
is allocated to the Creditor SCs on a proportionate basis such that each Cr=
editor SC receives the same percentage of their total net amount receivable=
 for the month.  SCs are allowed to net the credits and debits on a monthly=
 basis as described below.  The intent of the Tariff is to equitably distri=
bute market shortfalls only to those SCs that have net market receivables f=
or the period. =20
Each month is treated as a whole period - Final and preliminary invoices ar=
e combined when possible (see exception conditions below) in allocating mar=
ket defaults.  Cash payments from the market are received in two stages (pr=
eliminary and final).  At preliminary, market payments are distributed base=
d on the preliminary amounts due to the Creditor SCs as set forth in the pr=
eliminary invoices. Final invoices serve essentially as true-ups to the pre=
liminary invoices, and accordingly, payments received at final are redistri=
buted to the extent possible to achieve true-up allocations for the whole m=
onth considering the combined amounts due the Creditor SCs from both the pr=
eliminary and final invoices.
Each month is treated as a discrete period - Market defaults are generally =
allocated to the Creditor SCs that have amounts due for the month being set=
tled.  The exceptions to this rule involve (1) SCs that are Creditor SCs in=
 the current month but have default obligations relating to prior periods o=
r (2) Debtor SCs that pay in the current month but have unpaid balances for=
 prior months.  In the first instance, the Creditor SC would not be paid to=
 the extent of default obligations from prior months.  Amounts due to the C=
reditor SC would be allocated back to the default period and such proceeds =
would be allocated based on remaining amounts still owed for that period. I=
n the second instance the current month's payment is carried back and appli=
ed first to the oldest outstanding balance. The proceeds would be distribut=
ed to the Creditor SCs for that earlier period based on the Creditor SCs un=
paid balances in that month.  With respect to the carry back of payments to=
 the earliest period, Pre and Post bankruptcy debts are deemed to be from d=
ifferent SCs.
GMC defaults are remedied as a first priority on market payments  - GMC is =
billed separately from market billings on both preliminary and final invoic=
es each month.  In the event of payment default on any GMC invoices (at eit=
her preliminary or final), market funds are transferred to satisfy GMC obli=
gations before any market distributions are made.  This first priority posi=
tion for GMC revenues is set forth in Section SABP 6.3.1.3 of the ISO Tarif=
f.  Therefore, when both GMC and market defaults occur (as has occurred in =
each of the past few months), the Creditor SCs have two reductions to the m=
arket clearing amounts ultimately paid - an allocated portion of the GMC de=
fault, and an allocated portion of the market default.  RMR invoices and pa=
yments are not affected by market or GMC defaults - The RMR invoicing proce=
ss involves amounts due from the PTO's to the RMR Owners as set forth in mo=
nthly invoices processed through the ISO's systems.  However, such amounts =
are invoiced independent of the ISO's market and GMC billing processes, and=
 accordingly, market and/or GMC defaults do not impact RMR related payments=
.=20
There are a number of factors that complicate the monthly process of alloca=
ting cash to Creditor SCs when defaults occur.  Some of these factors inclu=
de:
* amounts received after payment date deadlines - such amounts are typicall=
y included in the next distribution
* market payments due to Creditor SCs that default on GMC in the current mo=
nth - such market allocations are reduced by the specific amount of the GMC=
 default by the Creditor SC
* allocations to prior months - not made unless the amount exceeds
0.5% of that months billed amounts
* small invoices under $5,000 are paid in full rather than the allocated pe=
rcentage.
For more information about these allocation issues or any other related mat=
ters, please contact Melodie Iverson (916) 351-2174 (e-mail mkiverson@caiso=
.com <mailto:miverson@caiso.com> ) or Mike Epstein (916) 351-2314 (e-mail m=
epstein@caiso.com <mailto:mepstein@caiso.com> ) at the ISO. =20

Byron B. Woertz, Jr.
Director, Client Relations
Phone:  (916) 608-7066
Pager:   (800) 481-7037

Perry, Todd says:
Any of them.  PacBell, Home Depot, Sysco, EOP, Messer Ind., Pepsi Bottling.

Thanks for your help.

Can you run this down for Chris, and copy me on it.  If they haven't completed it, I'd like to why and when it will be done.

Chris,  I apologize for this sitting here since Wednesday with no response.  I was in CSC's offices on Wednesday and Thursday.  I need to get a lap top to check in when I travel.

Brenda,
	I need to give Jeff Ricter an update on where this item stands with CSC. I am still going off of the e-mail listed below stating that CSC could meet this deliverable by sometime this week. This is the item that we talked about in last week's Project Ranger meeting, and agreed needed to put on the high priority list. If you have any questions on this item, please feel free to call me at 503-807-8959. Thank for your help on this item.

								Chris 

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Here is the data model and data flow diagram for MDMA.  

  

I am trying to find out if the data from MV90 get interfaced into MDMA on a daily basis
or not.  If it is done on a daily basis, then I don't think there is a need to go into MV90.
MV90 will have raw data and will not have gone through validations which are performed
in MDMA.

Vivian,

	I just wanted to leave you my contact numbers:
	
						Cell:    503-807-8959
					           Work:   503-464-8219
 					          Home:   503-625-3541

	I will be flying out tomorrow, but I should be in around 1:00 Pacific Time. Please send me an e-mail on where we stand with being able to get into the MV90 tables. I have Jeff Richter chomping at the bit on this one so it would be a nice if we can get our hands on that data. Thank you very much for your help on this topic.

									   

Can you run this down for Chris, and copy me on it.  If they haven't completed it, I'd like to why and when it will be done.

Chris,  I apologize for this sitting here since Wednesday with no response.  I was in CSC's offices on Wednesday and Thursday.  I need to get a lap top to check in when I travel.

Brenda,
	I need to give Jeff Ricter an update on where this item stands with CSC. I am still going off of the e-mail listed below stating that CSC could meet this deliverable by sometime this week. This is the item that we talked about in last week's Project Ranger meeting, and agreed needed to put on the high priority list. If you have any questions on this item, please feel free to call me at 503-807-8959. Thank for your help on this item.

								Chris 

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Chris, can you provide this... Thanks

Ken,
	The project proposals for all request must be approved by upper level management depending on the amount of the cost estimate.  Please have the director of your department forward an email to me stating approved.  After the approval is received, we can move forward.  Thank You.
Thanks

Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the
California ISO Audit #2 Work Request (CES2139).   Please review the
documents at your earliest convenience.  Please note that the Project
Proposal offers two separate options.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO,
please forward your acceptance and indicate the appropriate option being
accepted to my attention via electronic mail attached to this submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2139.CA ISO Audit 080201.doc) 

Ken,
	You just need to put his name in and send it off, we just got thorough doing this Monday. If anyone has any questions feel free to have them call me.

Has Tim approved this verbally?  If so, please let me know and I will notify CSC and forward a copy to Tim for his signiture. 

kl

Put Tim Belden name on it as VP
 << File: Microsoft Word 4 >> Chris,

This is the proposal I need approved.  CSC indicated that they will spend time over the weekend to turn this around for us by the middle of next week but we obviously need to get back to them quickly.  Please advise.

Ken

Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the
California ISO Audit #2 Work Request (CES2139).   Please review the
documents at your earliest convenience.  Please note that the Project
Proposal offers two separate options.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO,
please forward your acceptance and indicate the appropriate option being
accepted to my attention via electronic mail attached to this submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2139.CA ISO Audit 080201.doc)

Put Tim Belden name on it as VP
 << File: Microsoft Word 4 >> Chris,

This is the proposal I need approved.  CSC indicated that they will spend time over the weekend to turn this around for us by the middle of next week but we obviously need to get back to them quickly.  Please advise.

Ken

Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the
California ISO Audit #2 Work Request (CES2139).   Please review the
documents at your earliest convenience.  Please note that the Project
Proposal offers two separate options.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO,
please forward your acceptance and indicate the appropriate option being
accepted to my attention via electronic mail attached to this submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2139.CA ISO Audit 080201.doc)

Yea, I was just about to send you an e-mail to see what you were doing tonight. I will also be staying in Houston this weekend, had to cancel my trip to New Orleans. Let me know if you want to do something

Are you in today?

Ok, then I need to get some updated numbers

On May 16, FERC rejected the ISO's proposed Amendment 38, which would have suspended the penalty.  FERC said it would look at the issue later.

Are we going to see this money, I thought they had asked FERC to do away with this charge.

$30 million bucks!!!  I would have hoped for 10 times this amount, but it's still 30 million bucks.  Legal and Settlements should get origination credit for this.  Let me know when the ISO's check clears.---Steve

This is based on the settlement statements that the ISO sent me.

 << File: OVERVIEW.xls >> 

Are we going to see this money, I thought they had asked FERC to do away with this charge.

$30 million bucks!!!  I would have hoped for 10 times this amount, but it's still 30 million bucks.  Legal and Settlements should get origination credit for this.  Let me know when the ISO's check clears.---Steve

This is based on the settlement statements that the ISO sent me.

 << File: OVERVIEW.xls >> 

This is based on the settlement statements that the ISO sent me.

 

Sean,
	Sorry to keep bothering you, but we need to get an answer to the issue listed below. Who is looking into this item, and when will they have an answer back to us. Thank you for any help you can give us on resolving this issue.

								Chris

Sean,
	Did you get a chance to talk to Evan about the issue concerning the lack of notification as to when PG&E transferred over certain meters to EES.

									Chris 

Sean,
	Sorry to keep bothering you, but we need to get an answer to the issue listed below. Who is looking into this item, and when will they have an answer back to us. Thank you for any help you can give us on resolving this issue.

								Chris
Sean,
	Did you get a chance to talk to Evan about the issue concerning the lack of notification as to when PG&E transferred over certain meters to EES.

									Chris 

Give me a call if you need anything else.

		503-807-8959

Here is the data model and data flow diagram for MDMA.  

  

I am trying to find out if the data from MV90 get interfaced into MDMA on a daily basis
or not.  If it is done on a daily basis, then I don't think there is a need to go into MV90.
MV90 will have raw data and will not have gone through validations which are performed
in MDMA.

Vivian,

	I just wanted to leave you my contact numbers:
	
						Cell:    503-807-8959
					           Work:   503-464-8219
 					          Home:   503-625-3541

	I will be flying out tomorrow, but I should be in around 1:00 Pacific Time. Please send me an e-mail on where we stand with being able to get into the MV90 tables. I have Jeff Richter chomping at the bit on this one so it would be a nice if we can get our hands on that data. Thank you very much for your help on this topic.

									   

When I drag these folders over does that copy the folder are move it?

We talked about this last night and decided that YOU ARE THE MAN FOR THE JOB. WELCOME TO HOUSTON BABY, PACK THAT FAMILY UP AND COME ON DOWN. 

						Congratulations
						     Chris

Peter Nelson Houston Settlements last day is Friday...I'm not sure who will be replacing him at this point.

Mike P. Purcell
Settlements Coordinator
Volume Management-Portland
503-464-8297

Thanks

Chris, Done it is now added.

Thanks,
Mark

Mark,
	Could you please add "DL_Portland_Volume_MGMT" to your distribution list for Flash, Desk analysis and DPR.

							Thanks 
							  Chris

Attached is the June 01 Flash Report.  The Desk Analysis will be sent later this afternoon.

Thanks,

Mark

 << File: 20001 06 flash Report 72501 .xls >> 

Sean,
	Did you get a chance to talk to Evan about the issue concerning the lack of notification as to when PG&E transferred over certain meters to EES.

									Chris 

Mark,
	Could you please add "DL_Portland_Volume_MGMT" to your distribution list for Flash, Desk analysis and DPR.

							Thanks 
							  Chris

Attached is the June 01 Flash Report.  The Desk Analysis will be sent later this afternoon.

Thanks,

Mark

 << File: 20001 06 flash Report 72501 .xls >> 

FYI
Date and Time change

I can not attend this conference call, I have a 10:00 meeting already scheduled.

					Chris

Chris - I will meet you at 3AC 1603 at 10am.

Hey Chris,

Here's the list of meters requiring installation but for which we have no data. So I'm not able to calculate the financial exposure. Let me know if you are able to obtain it. Sorry for the delay. Thanks for your help.

Jay

 

Clarissa,
	Sorry I missed your call, but I will be back in town next week if you would like to try and get lunch then. 

								Chris

 

One more item, is there anyway I could get this info from June forward instead of current day forward?
Chris and Murray,

Here is the embedded generation curve vs current day wholesale prices through March - 02.  We cannot break down what the generation cost is by primary, secondary, and transmission.  Hope this is helpful.

Jeff

 << File: Curves.xls >> 
Jeff Richter                            503.464.3917 (w-pdx)

Add Murray O'Neil to this list please

We are serving Quizno's on tomorrow for the meeting.  Please go to the website  @ http://www.quiznos.com/   make your selection and forward them back to me, or call me with your selection  at  ext. 39168.   If you are aware of additional guests that will be attending other that those addressed above,  please let me know as soon as possible so that we can be sure to include them in the order.   Thank you in advance for your help.

yvette

I've attached the Work Request for the above effort. Please check it over
to be sure it contains all the information we discussed.

The question marks (???) must be filled in with the names of the people
responsible:

     Requestor is the person who will maintain contact with the CSC Project
Manager concerning issues, timelines, status, etc.

     Alternate requestor is a person who has the authority to answer
questions in the Requestor's absence.

     The Business Owner is the person who can authorize this project to
move forward.

When it meets your approval and the ???'s are all replaced, the request
should be sent to Jackie Jackson for submittal to CSC. Please CC: me on
that email.

Please let me know if there are any questions.

--Steve

(See attached file: WR Power Banded Pricing Historical.doc)

Chris,

As a follow up of our conversation, here is a summary of contract issues. I have tried to organize my comments into three major categories: baseline, bands and material change language.

Where Contracts were prior to Site Profile Desk took control

Baseline: Not specified in contracts! A variety of mechanisms to build baseline post-contract including:
Calculating volumes on a forward basis, i.e first 12 months
Last 12 months prior to contract closing
Baseline volumes that grow by x%
Bands: Annual 90/110 bands, Aggregation at all levels (including utility, state and national etc.)
Material Change Language: Varied, unclear or vague language (at least in my opinion)

Where we are now

Baseline: Two basic mechanisms intended to bring clarity
Major Transactions (i.e. any deal not priced from Matrix): volumes explicitly specified in contract
Minor transactions: last 12 months prior to contract closing (with the understanding that Origination will collect 12 bills required for booking within days of contract closing; process details to be finalized)
Bands: Monthly 90/110 bands, Aggregation allowed within same utility-voltage-facility type groupings
Material Change Language: Unfortunately still unclear and inadequate (see below for our proposals). For example, the 

Where we want to be

Baseline:
Minor transactions: A process needs to be in place in Services Department to collect the 12 bills required for booking within days of contract closing.

Material Change Language: This area needs to be really beefed up. In my opinion, material language should catch risks that are not explicitly modeled and priced. At the moment, I don't see material change language accomplishing this. 

Issue 1: Protecting for long term shifts in consumption

The 90/110 consumption bands (which are set on monthly basis) we are offering right now are intended to provide normal weather and operating flexibility. With this assumption, we currently price consumption risk as a probabilistic process as opposed to pricing using the classic straddle approach (simultaneous call & put).  Any "step" changes in consumption, such as The Limited adding additional display area or Tyco Health Care Products, adding new production shifts violate this assumption.  I propose either (1) adding language that captures this "steps" or (2) price these steps explicitly. Given the lack of quality actual data the second alternative would be an educated guess at this point.  Recently I proposed (verbally to be fair) the following language to Jim Wood (Products-Origination).

If a "Material Change" (defined below) has occurred, EESO or Customer may request that the commodity pricing be restructured to account for such Material Change.  A "Material Change" shall be any intentional or unintentional change, including energy efficiency upgrades, to the processes or operations conducted at any of the Facilities or other similar occurrences that:

(i)	change a Facility Account's consumption of electricity or natural gas at such Facility Account by more than 10% of the Facility Account's Consumption Baseline over any six consecutive months (i.e. Facility Account's Actual Consumption divided by Facility Account's Baseline Consumption equals less than 0.9 or more than 1.1), or 

(ii)	change a Facility Account' s monthly on-peak usage ratio for electricity at such Facility Account by more than 5% of Facility Account's monthly on-peak usage ratio baseline over any six consecutive months.  The Facility Account monthly on-peak usage ratio equals the monthly on-peak Facility Account usage divided by the total monthly Facility Account usage.

Jim's immediate reaction was mixed. He felt that customers may feel that we are giving them volumetric flexibility on one hand and taking it back with the other. He said 80/120 on material change may be more palatable.

Issue 2: Sudden Load Swings in Short Term

Although, the monthly bands protect us on monthly volume swings, they are not very effective in preventing sudden un-planned short term load swings triggering imbalance penalties. Here the language currently in contracts that is supposed to protect us against this risk:

Notice of Operational Changes.  You agree to promptly advise us of any event reasonably known to you that may impact energy usage at any Account (e.g., equipment installations, outages, shutdowns, repairs, openings or closings, changes in operating hours) by an amount (without regard to weather-related effects) greater than either (i) 25% of the Actual Usage for such Account during the same Billing Cycle in the prior year or (ii) 2 MW (each an "Operational Change").  If you fail to notify us of an Operational Change, you will reimburse us for any Energy Imbalance Charges incurred by you or us as a result of such Operational Change.  

This language has at least three problems:
No compensation mechanism specified if customer does not deliver on this requirement.
Is 25% and / or 2 MW justifiable, especially given the differences in imbalance treatment across physical markets?
No clear process (i.e. minimum time frame for notice, contact information) specified for customer to deliver this notice

I would modify this language to something like:

Notice of Operational Changes.  Customer agrees to advise EESI at least two days (48 hours) in advance to the contacts listed in Schedule ____ by fax or e-mail of any event that may impact energy demand at any of its Accounts (e.g., equipment installations, outages, shutdowns, repairs, openings or closings, changes in operating hours) by an amount greater than either (i) ___ % of the Hourly Load for such Account during the same hour in the prior year or (ii) 0.5 MW of demand (each an "Operational Change").  If such Customer fails to notify EESI of an Operational Change, Customer will reimburse EESI for any Energy Imbalance Charges incurred by the Customer or EESI as a result of such Operational Change.  The mechanism for penalty calculation is specified in Schedule ____.
Hope this helps.

Mallik

Here is the master
  

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Chris and Murray,

Here is the embedded generation curve vs current day wholesale prices through March - 02.  We cannot break down what the generation cost is by primary, secondary, and transmission.  Hope this is helpful.

Jeff

 
Jeff Richter                            503.464.3917 (w-pdx)

One more item, is there anyway I could get this info from June forward instead of current day forward?
Chris and Murray,

Here is the embedded generation curve vs current day wholesale prices through March - 02.  We cannot break down what the generation cost is by primary, secondary, and transmission.  Hope this is helpful.

Jeff

 << File: Curves.xls >> 
Jeff Richter                            503.464.3917 (w-pdx)

It is now apparent that the Change Notification Process, in particular Material Changes in Consumption, is more convoluted than what first appeared. To that end I am proposing the following:

1. A standing meeting to be held on Wednesdays at 2.00pm for the next 4 weeks to address the issues and formalize a Process Flow for each occurrence.
2. Draft Process Flow Documents to be prepared in the interim and passed out ASAP to all relevant parties for comment.
3. All comments/issued to be addressed through the Wednesday meeting.

An invitation for the meeting will be sent out shortly. Your attendance at yesterday's meeting was instructive and appreciated. Let's all try and get a good solid system in place by mid-October.

Also, a request for the attached questions to be sent out was proposed. Please review the questions and provide comments and/or add other issues you feel are not addressed. Please send your replies to all in the distribution list above. (I will be out of the country for 2 weeks and not have access to e-mail).

 

Thank you for your participation.

Martin

Jeff,
	Thanks for the e-mail. One question, why is the PG&E curve lower in price going forward than the wholesale curve price.

Chris and Murray,

Here is the embedded generation curve vs current day wholesale prices through March - 02.  We cannot break down what the generation cost is by primary, secondary, and transmission.  Hope this is helpful.

Jeff

 << File: Curves.xls >> 
Jeff Richter                            503.464.3917 (w-pdx)

Joshua,

	I will not be able to attend this meeting. I will probably have some time open late this afternoon around 3:30.

									Chris
Chris -

Just a message to see if you have any time tomorrow at 10AM to meet with
Todd Taylor.  He wants to get with us to discuss how our effort fits in with
all the others going on.  Please let me know sometime this afternoon after
you get in the office.  Thanks.

> kpmg LLP  Information Risk Management
Joshua P. Galv?n
Senior Associate
700 Louisiana, Ste. 3200
Houston, Texas  77002
713/319-2082 (wrk)
713/256-8499 (mob)
jgalvan@kpmg.com

If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying, distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         

Murray -

Sorry for the delay.  We spent a lot of time this morning working with the
designer of the Gas solution.  We have a much better understanding of their
business case now, and of course the resultant IT solution.  This should
help us in attacking the Power issue.

Attached are the updated memo I sent yesterday, with a more detailed
description and an illustration of the data flow, and a new document with a
set of questions that we may use to steer our initial information gathering
sessions.  Please take a look at these and let me know if you have any
questions.

Annie and I will be meeting with Chris for more business case understanding
next week.  I look forward to this time, and will work with Randy Wilson to
post status to you by week-end.  Thanks.

> kpmg LLP  Information Risk Management
Joshua P. Galv?n
Senior Associate
700 Louisiana, Ste. 3200
Houston, Texas  77002
713/319-2082 (wrk)
713/256-8499 (mob)
jgalvan@kpmg.com

Joshua,

Thanks for the document.  I am also a very visual person.  Can you
please forward me a data flow where I can see the sources of the
information and how they are tied together.  Don't spend a lot of time
on it. I am hoping that this has already been put together.

Thanks - MO

 << File: Enron-GasAccessDBArch-Aug2001-IRM.doc >> Murray -

As requested, I am attaching here a document describing the high-level
uses
of the MS Access Gas solution.  It also details the main table and the
primary key for all records therein.

Please review and let me know if you have any questions.  Annie and I
have a
meeting planned with the developer of the Gas solution tomorrow at 9AM,
after which we are planning on working with Chris to identify some of
the
key data areas required for the Power solution.

Thanks.

 <<Enron-GasAccessDBArch-Aug2001-IRM.doc>> 

> kpmg LLP  Information Risk Management
Joshua P. Galv?n
Senior Associate
700 Louisiana, Ste. 3200
Houston, Texas  77002
713/319-2082 (wrk)
713/256-8499 (mob)
jgalvan@kpmg.com

If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying,
distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is
prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or
advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions
expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         
If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying, distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         

I will not need anything for lunch tomorrow.
		Thanks
		Chris

We are serving Quizno's on tomorrow for the meeting.  Please go to the website  @ http://www.quiznos.com/   make your selection and forward them back to me, or call me with your selection  at  ext. 39168.   If you are aware of additional guests that will be attending other that those addressed above,  please let me know as soon as possible so that we can be sure to include them in the order.   Thank you in advance for your help.

yvette

Glad to hear the rumors where true. I am in Houston every week until the end of the year, so give me a call and we can go get lunch.

						Chris
						503-807-8959

Chris,
	The slide below deals with our Deal Capture set up and the attached file is the deal ticket information.
 
 
Lisa Davila
08/27/2001 08:31 AM
Mark-

Here's a printable version of the Deal Routing Process slide.  It's hard to read it when it's printed from the current color slide.

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Thanks for your help Mark. Did you also get a chance to find the presentation document that you were going to be using in your meeting today?

							Thanks
							 Chris
Chris,
	The slide below deals with our Deal Capture set up and the attached file is the deal ticket information.
 << File: Deal Ticket Requirements.xls >> 
 
Lisa Davila
08/27/2001 08:31 AM
Mark-

Here's a printable version of the Deal Routing Process slide.  It's hard to read it when it's printed from the current color slide.

 << File: PrintableDealRoutingProcess.ppt >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Mark,
	I meant to say Deal Tracker not Deal Ticker.
Mark,
	I know you are very busy, but could I please get the information on Deal Ticket that you mentioned yesterday(all of the fields etc) along w/ the presentation that you were going to be giving today. Thanks for your help.

Mark,
	I know you are very busy, but could I please get the information on Deal Ticket that you mentioned yesterday(all of the fields etc) along w/ the presentation that you were going to be giving today. Thanks for your help.

Work (713) 853-3548
Cell (832) 978-4759

Thanks again for your help

Yes.  Of the 100 on that list, 30 are GNO and 70 are commodity.  I'm leaving early today and taking a few days of vacation.  I'll be back on Tue. night.  Have a good weekend.

Andy

Andy,
	That is 30 out of a total of 100 if I understood you correctly. Are the other 70 just the straight commodity deals? Thanks for your help on this item.

						Chris

Chris--

The file attached below lists all the Project Phoenix deals.  I believe that all GNO deals (approximately 30 of them) are covered.

Let me know if you have any other questions.

Thanks,

Andy

Attached find the Project Phoenix Status Report for 24 August. Please call me if you have any questions/comments.

 << File: Phoenix 082401.xls >> 
Stephanie Segura
West Power, EES Transition
Tel: 713.853.7430

Andy,
	That is 30 out of a total of 100 if I understood you correctly. Are the other 70 just the straight commodity deals? Thanks for your help on this item.

						Chris

Chris--

The file attached below lists all the Project Phoenix deals.  I believe that all GNO deals (approximately 30 of them) are covered.

Let me know if you have any other questions.

Thanks,

Andy

Attached find the Project Phoenix Status Report for 24 August. Please call me if you have any questions/comments.

 << File: Phoenix 082401.xls >> 
Stephanie Segura
West Power, EES Transition
Tel: 713.853.7430

Steve,
	Don't we still need to go over the issue you mentioned in the e-mail below?

misspelled your email address, sorry

--Steve
                                                                       
 (Embedded      Stephen Walker/TMG/CSC                                 
 image moved    08/24/2001 04:41 PM                                    
 to file:       (Embedded image moved to file: pic30066.pcx)           
 pic02503.pcx)                                                         
                                                                       

Please find attached the Wrok Request for Power Banded Pricing - Ongoing.
This should be ready for submittal to Jackie at your earliest convenience.

Chris--We need to talk before I can complete the Historical Work Request. I
will be in touch on Monday.

--Steve

(See attached file: Power Banding - Ongoing.doc)

Jacqueline,
	Not sure what I am supposed to do with this other than forwarding it to you. If you have any questions give me a call at 503807-8959

								Thanks
								 Chris
misspelled your email address, sorry

--Steve
                                                                       
 (Embedded      Stephen Walker/TMG/CSC                                 
 image moved    08/24/2001 04:41 PM                                    
 to file:       (Embedded image moved to file: pic30066.pcx)           
 pic02503.pcx)                                                         
                                                                       

Please find attached the Wrok Request for Power Banded Pricing - Ongoing.
This should be ready for submittal to Jackie at your earliest convenience.

Chris--We need to talk before I can complete the Historical Work Request. I
will be in touch on Monday.

--Steve

(See attached file: Power Banding - Ongoing.doc)

That works, see you tomorrow.

Christ - are you guys in Houston?  Ken is in training the rest of this week, but I can get him to call in to my office after training - sometime after 5 - would that work for you?  Thanks.

Murray and I are both open most of the day tomorrow. Let me know what is convenient for you.

				Chris

Mark,

	Where did you want to meet for our 1:00 appointment? I am open to what ever is convienant for you.

							Chris

	

Dear MARLIN STOKLEY:

Thank you for ordering Verizon Online DSL service from Verizon Internet Solutions. This e-mail will confirm the details of your selected service.

Your order number is 1209704
The package you selected is DSL Bronze Plus (up to 768K/128K)
Your monthly charge for this service is $39.95
Your one-time setup charge for this service is $0.00
Your installation date is 7/13/01
Your contract commitment is one year from the date of your installation.

If at anytime you have questions about your order or installed service, please call us toll-free at 1-877-222-ADSL.

Again, thank you for choosing Verizon Online DSL.

Sincerely,
Your Verizon Online Team

[SMTP_SameInstallDate|1209704]

Mark,
	I  left a message on both your cell and work number along with paging you. The only reason I am stating this is so you know that I did try to envolve you in this discussion last week.  1:00  is fine for me and I look forward  to meeting you. Where would you like to meet?

Chris,
	I will be available at 1.00pm tomorrow, however, you should make an arrangement quickly as my time is booked up by Christina Liscana and I sometimes have little control over this part of my life. Concerning the e-mail message attached, the actions items referred to regarding the deal ticket are completely news to me as neither I or any of my group was involved in this discussion which obviously affects us. Perhaps you will be able to shed some light on this.

Regards,
mark

Mark,
	I would like to meet w/ you some time this week about the information  being captured on the Deal Ticket. I am open on Wed. or Thurs of. this week. Please let me know what time and day is convient for you.
							

								Chris
							     503-807-8959

		

FYI?

I left Mark a message today indicating that I was not comfortable that they were capturing all of the different parameters associated with Baseline and Bandwidth on our current contracts correctly.  My biggest concern here is that we need to make sure that CSC who is doing our billing is reflecting the same information.  There needs to be an action items which I thought was started two weeks ago to ensure that everything which is needed by CSC on the Deal Ticket is captured by us on our deal tickets so we can on populate a deal ticket once.  The ultimate would be that we have more on our deal ticket then CSC needs and they can pull just their relative elements.

MO

Brenda,
	Operations have for some time communicated the consumption excess and deficiency charges to CSC on the deal request form in the comments section. They have also indicated the method of calculation. We strongly suspect that these are not being charged correctly and as a result Barry VanDerHoarst and I am currently running an investigation of 10 randomly selected deals to check the CSC pricing calculations. Please let me know who in your group should be involved with this initiative. We have been capturing this information on our deal tracker now for the past two weeks for both power and gas.

Regards,
Mark

AK,

Thanks for the voicemail yesterday.  This is what I need confirmation on:

Power - Are the consumption bands being captured on the del sheets?  Are they being communicated to CSC for invoicing purposes?  If they are being captured and communicated, what day did this start?  It had to be within the last week.  If they are not being captured and communicated to CSC, it needs to start ASAP and I would like confirmation of the official start day.

Gas - It is my understanding that they are being captured on the deal sheets and in the Risk books.  I have confirmed that CSC is billing over/ undertakes.  I just want to make sure that the deal sheets, when consolidated with the customer/new deal set-up with CSC, continues to capture that information.

Thanks for your help.

Brenda:
Following up w/ my voicemail to you, attached is the information I received from Deal Management which I confirmed w/ Risk Management.
Hope this is helpful.
A.K. Matheson

This is what I know.

The DASH definitely captures the consumption band.  As I understand it, a consumption risk book is not up and running.  I believe Mallik's intention is to have in running by the end of the year.

If you need anything else come see me.  

Mariano

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
A K Matheson
08/14/2001 11:53 AM
Mariano:
In your review of the following contracts, is the DASH capturing the consumption band and is this structured into the risk books?

Pac Bell
Home Depot	
Sysco
EOP
Pepsi
 "Medge Industries"

Please advise.
Thanks.
A.K. Matheson

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 

Mark,
	I would like to meet w/ you some time this week about the information  being captured on the Deal Ticket. I am open on Wed. or Thurs of. this week. Please let me know what time and day is convient for you.
							

								Chris
							     503-807-8959

		

FYI?

I left Mark a message today indicating that I was not comfortable that they were capturing all of the different parameters associated with Baseline and Bandwidth on our current contracts correctly.  My biggest concern here is that we need to make sure that CSC who is doing our billing is reflecting the same information.  There needs to be an action items which I thought was started two weeks ago to ensure that everything which is needed by CSC on the Deal Ticket is captured by us on our deal tickets so we can on populate a deal ticket once.  The ultimate would be that we have more on our deal ticket then CSC needs and they can pull just their relative elements.

MO

Brenda,
	Operations have for some time communicated the consumption excess and deficiency charges to CSC on the deal request form in the comments section. They have also indicated the method of calculation. We strongly suspect that these are not being charged correctly and as a result Barry VanDerHoarst and I am currently running an investigation of 10 randomly selected deals to check the CSC pricing calculations. Please let me know who in your group should be involved with this initiative. We have been capturing this information on our deal tracker now for the past two weeks for both power and gas.

Regards,
Mark

AK,

Thanks for the voicemail yesterday.  This is what I need confirmation on:

Power - Are the consumption bands being captured on the del sheets?  Are they being communicated to CSC for invoicing purposes?  If they are being captured and communicated, what day did this start?  It had to be within the last week.  If they are not being captured and communicated to CSC, it needs to start ASAP and I would like confirmation of the official start day.

Gas - It is my understanding that they are being captured on the deal sheets and in the Risk books.  I have confirmed that CSC is billing over/ undertakes.  I just want to make sure that the deal sheets, when consolidated with the customer/new deal set-up with CSC, continues to capture that information.

Thanks for your help.

Brenda:
Following up w/ my voicemail to you, attached is the information I received from Deal Management which I confirmed w/ Risk Management.
Hope this is helpful.
A.K. Matheson

This is what I know.

The DASH definitely captures the consumption band.  As I understand it, a consumption risk book is not up and running.  I believe Mallik's intention is to have in running by the end of the year.

If you need anything else come see me.  

Mariano

 
A K Matheson
08/14/2001 11:53 AM
Mariano:
In your review of the following contracts, is the DASH capturing the consumption band and is this structured into the risk books?

Pac Bell
Home Depot	
Sysco
EOP
Pepsi
 "Medge Industries"

Please advise.
Thanks.
A.K. Matheson

  

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

My number is 503-807-8959. 

Chris,

Do you have any input regarding the question below?

Thanks,
Tim

Jay Bhatty
08/27/2001 10:35 AM
 

Tim,
Chris Stokley would be able to better answer this question. That's a field EPMI needs, not Operations....so please call him.
Lemme me know if I can help in any other way.

 
Timothy Weil
 
08/24/2001 11:45 AM
 
What does "load zone" mean in the CA meter install list spreadsheet?

Thanks,

Tim

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

http://webservices.cnet.com/Bandwidth/

   

FYI?MO

I'm not sure if you have seen this before.  It may just be new to me.

Murray,

Here's a slide showing the current architecture of billing systems setup at CSC. Items marked with a bullet-hole represent those which they hoped to replace with their version of project Genesys.

Neal

 

FYI?

I left Mark a message today indicating that I was not comfortable that they were capturing all of the different parameters associated with Baseline and Bandwidth on our current contracts correctly.  My biggest concern here is that we need to make sure that CSC who is doing our billing is reflecting the same information.  There needs to be an action items which I thought was started two weeks ago to ensure that everything which is needed by CSC on the Deal Ticket is captured by us on our deal tickets so we can on populate a deal ticket once.  The ultimate would be that we have more on our deal ticket then CSC needs and they can pull just their relative elements.

MO

Brenda,
	Operations have for some time communicated the consumption excess and deficiency charges to CSC on the deal request form in the comments section. They have also indicated the method of calculation. We strongly suspect that these are not being charged correctly and as a result Barry VanDerHoarst and I am currently running an investigation of 10 randomly selected deals to check the CSC pricing calculations. Please let me know who in your group should be involved with this initiative. We have been capturing this information on our deal tracker now for the past two weeks for both power and gas.

Regards,
Mark

AK,

Thanks for the voicemail yesterday.  This is what I need confirmation on:

Power - Are the consumption bands being captured on the del sheets?  Are they being communicated to CSC for invoicing purposes?  If they are being captured and communicated, what day did this start?  It had to be within the last week.  If they are not being captured and communicated to CSC, it needs to start ASAP and I would like confirmation of the official start day.

Gas - It is my understanding that they are being captured on the deal sheets and in the Risk books.  I have confirmed that CSC is billing over/ undertakes.  I just want to make sure that the deal sheets, when consolidated with the customer/new deal set-up with CSC, continues to capture that information.

Thanks for your help.

Brenda:
Following up w/ my voicemail to you, attached is the information I received from Deal Management which I confirmed w/ Risk Management.
Hope this is helpful.
A.K. Matheson

This is what I know.

The DASH definitely captures the consumption band.  As I understand it, a consumption risk book is not up and running.  I believe Mallik's intention is to have in running by the end of the year.

If you need anything else come see me.  

Mariano

 
A K Matheson
08/14/2001 11:53 AM
Mariano:
In your review of the following contracts, is the DASH capturing the consumption band and is this structured into the risk books?

Pac Bell
Home Depot	
Sysco
EOP
Pepsi
 "Medge Industries"

Please advise.
Thanks.
A.K. Matheson

Chris,

FYI?This may help you in understanding what Lyman's group is expected to have in place for capturing baseline.

MO

To Distribution:

Attached is our final Baseline Report developed
in accordance with the 2001 Business Audit Plan.
This report has been closed with
Lyman Wilkes and Misty Barrett
before being distributed.

Please call with any questions.

Thank you.

Linda
5-6952

(See attached file: Baseline.ppt)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - Baseline.ppt 

Chris, I am hoping you can give me a little more information on the problems
that occurred for Trade Day April 9, 2001.  There is a post final dispute
being processed, and I am a little confused on the problem EPMI had when
processing and submitting this data.

What I understand is that the data for all zones was submitted with null
values, however, we have two versions in our system, the first was received
on June 8, and the second version was received on August 9.  For all of your
demand zones, PGE1-4, SCE, and SDG1, there are no differences in the two
versions of data submitted.  

Please look into this as soon as you can.  It is important that we have
accurate and correct data for your Post final dispute.  If you have any
questions please don't hesitate to give me a call.  Thanks.

Jeanette Mertz
Data Quality Auditor 
California ISO
916-608-5971
jmertz@caiso.com

Let me know if you have any questions about  this e-mail. I have some thoug=
hts, but most of these will be addressed now that you are in the office ful=
l time.=20

=09=09=09ps. You having fun yet?

Hey Chris,

I hope all is continuing to go as well as can be expected in H-town.

I'm writing with a worry and am not sure the best way to approach it.  The =
gist of it is that I am worried about the VM group and their reputation on =
the floor.  I'll give you a couple of examples as to why:  1) Chris Mallory=
 came to me and starting asking me questions about charges that go w/ impor=
ts and exports--I briefly answered but told him to talk to VM.  He said he =
didn't really know who to talk to, who would be able to answer his question=
s w/out Heather, you or myself back there.  (and he also did not know Jim R=
eyes' name until he asked me yesterday), 2) Bill came over the Darren today=
, concerned that he had been charged cong incorrectly b/c when Bill had che=
cked CAISO, the cong prices were all $0.  Not a huge deal that this happene=
d, but Jim needs to be signing off on the Flash ( i don't know if he is or =
not) and cong charges should always be closely monitored; and I don't think=
 that this is the first day that Bill has been incorrectly charged cong 3) =
Richter asked me who would be the person in VM that should help Tim Coffing=
 (his new analyst that moved up here) to deal w/ looking at the EES wholesa=
le settlements.  Jeff didn't know who would be the best b/c he doesn't real=
ly know the VM team anymore.  (I suggested Kit b/c he seems to be good at d=
igging into problems and getting answers).

Essentially, I think that the traders do not know all of the new faces, wha=
t they are doing and who they should be talking to.  You were always very c=
oncerned about the visibility/availability of the VM team as well as the cr=
edibility and I think these are suffering right now.  And of course on top =
of all of this is VMS.

Do you think I should send this to Scotty? Murray?  Without any management =
being here, I think it is tough to keep a heartbeat on the feeling of the t=
raders and I think that is part of the problem.  And I assume things will i=
mprove w/ Scotty here, but he needs to build relationships on the floor as =
well. =20

I am not trying to be critical of anyone or step on any toes, but I am conc=
erned. =20

Please let me know what you think...thanks and sorry to add a little more t=
o your plate of concerns... KN

Paige,

	I apologize for missing the 11:00 meeting, I will swing by and get an update latter this afternoon. Also, I am in a meeting on Project Ranger at 12:00. I hope to have a lot more clarity on what needs this will meet and the time period we can expect rollout of the different stages. 

							Chris
							503-807-8959

I guess this means our relationship comes to and end :(

Hello Everyone,

Over the past week Debra Davidson and I have been discussing how to operate EWS from the administrative aspect since we have individuals from multiple groups within ENA.  As of today, I would like everyone's travel, expense reports, cell phones, and/or any other administrative needs to go through the following people.

Beverly Filer is your Houston Administrative Assistant.  She is dedicated to providing EWS excellent administrative support while you are in Houston.  This includes preparing your expense reports, arranging meetings, powerpoint presentations, etc.  Beverly's phone number in Houston is 713/345-3134.

Jill Chatterton is your Portland Administrative Assistant .  She is dedicated to providing our EWS group excellent administrative support, whether you are in Portland or Houston.  This includes preparing your expense reports, providing support with cell phones, arranging meetings, making travel arrangements, etc.  Jill's phone number in Portland is 503/464-8216.

Please contact Jill and/or Beverly for ALL of your administrative assistant needs and refrain from asking your previous assistant for support.  Using Jill and Beverly as our assistants will mean they will have more information about our organization which will make them more effective for all of us.  If you have any questions, please contact me.

Jeff Richter                            503.464.3917 (w-pdx)

Foroud,
	How are you doing buddy? I hope all is well in what ever course in life you have chosen. I am currently working for Enron  out of the Portland, OR office. Married w/ two kids, boy(10) and a girl(2).  GIve me an update when you get a chance.

							Chris 
						

I will forward you message on to the person that should be of asstinance in getting this issue resoleved. I am currently in Housont working on a project, so I aplogize for having to punt

							Chris

Chris, I am hoping you can give me a little more information on the problems
that occurred for Trade Day April 9, 2001.  There is a post final dispute
being processed, and I am a little confused on the problem EPMI had when
processing and submitting this data.

What I understand is that the data for all zones was submitted with null
values, however, we have two versions in our system, the first was received
on June 8, and the second version was received on August 9.  For all of your
demand zones, PGE1-4, SCE, and SDG1, there are no differences in the two
versions of data submitted.  

Please look into this as soon as you can.  It is important that we have
accurate and correct data for your Post final dispute.  If you have any
questions please don't hesitate to give me a call.  Thanks.

Jeanette Mertz
Data Quality Auditor 
California ISO
916-608-5971
jmertz@caiso.com

No thank you

 

 

Chris - 

As Caroline has declined, you are next on the list. 

Any interest? 

Amy 

Amy, 

I do not require a WTC building parking space at this time.  You can pass my option to the next in line. 

Caroline 

Cc:     Belden, Tim; Calger, Christopher F. 
With the expansion to the 4th floor, we have been allotted some additional parking spots in the World Trade Center building.  Currently, we have 6 spots available.  Based on the waiting list that was distributed on March 19, 2001, the following individuals have first option on these spots.

Karen Jones 
Caroline Emmert 
Sean Crandall 
Murray O'Neil 
Kathy Axford 
Jim Gilbert 

The cost of these spots are: 

Regular Parking         $155/month 
Reserved Parking        $185/month 

If you are listed above and are interested in parking in the WTC, please see me for a parking agreement form. 

Just a few things to keep in mind..... 

1.  Your spot is not transferable to another employee.  If you choose not to take the spot at this time, your name will remain on the waiting list.

2.  Payment for these spots can be done through direct payroll deduction or you can choose to make payments monthly and submit for expense reimbursement (total company cost covered is $84/month).

3.  A deposit of $20 is required for your parking badge.  Please make this check payable to PMC and return with your parking agreement.

Below is the waiting list and the order in which other individuals will become eligible as additional parking spots become available.

1.  Chris Stokley 
2.  John Malowney 
3.  Phil Platter 
4.  Diana Scholtes 
5.  Julie Sarnowski 
6.  Lysa Tracy 
7.  Les Rawson 
8.  Jeff Richter 
9.  Heather Dunton 

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to ask! 

Thanks- 
Amy 

Greetings, I just wanted to send an update to all of you regarding the
MDMA/MSP audit reviews that PG&E, SCE, and SDG&E (the UDC's) agreed to
conduct.  I was told that all three UDC's have completed these reviews.
Below is a list of contact information for you to request a copy of the
report(s).  It is my understanding that the UDC's are not sending out copies
unless they receive a request.  So, please contact the people listed below
in order to obtain a copy of the MDMA/MSP reports to review and submit with
your audit reports due to the ISO on September 28, 2001.

Southern California Edison (SCE)		Pacific Gas & Electric
San Diego Gas & Electric
Jim Knik					Mike Alexander
Laura Clay
Audit Department				ESP Services
ESP Relations
626-302-1181				415-973-2932
858-654-1787
Knikjr@sce.com <mailto:Knikjr@sce.com> 				maa6@pge.com
<mailto:maa6@pge.com>  				lclay@sdge.com
<mailto:lclay@sdge.com>  

Please feel free to contact me if you have any questions.

Jeanette Mertz
Data Quality Auditor 
California ISO
916-608-5971
jmertz@caiso.com

When it rains it pours. Let me know if you want to discuss any of the items=
 listed below.=20

=09=09=09=09ps You having fun yet?
Hey Chris,

I hope all is continuing to go as well as can be expected in H-town.

I'm writing with a worry and am not sure the best way to approach it.  The =
gist of it is that I am worried about the VM group and their reputation on =
the floor.  I'll give you a couple of examples as to why:  1) Chris Mallory=
 came to me and starting asking me questions about charges that go w/ impor=
ts and exports--I briefly answered but told him to talk to VM.  He said he =
didn't really know who to talk to, who would be able to answer his question=
s w/out Heather, you or myself back there.  (and he also did not know Jim R=
eyes' name until he asked me yesterday), 2) Bill came over the Darren today=
, concerned that he had been charged cong incorrectly b/c when Bill had che=
cked CAISO, the cong prices were all $0.  Not a huge deal that this happene=
d, but Jim needs to be signing off on the Flash ( i don't know if he is or =
not) and cong charges should always be closely monitored; and I don't think=
 that this is the first day that Bill has been incorrectly charged cong 3) =
Richter asked me who would be the person in VM that should help Tim Coffing=
 (his new analyst that moved up here) to deal w/ looking at the EES wholesa=
le settlements.  Jeff didn't know who would be the best b/c he doesn't real=
ly know the VM team anymore.  (I suggested Kit b/c he seems to be good at d=
igging into problems and getting answers).

Essentially, I think that the traders do not know all of the new faces, wha=
t they are doing and who they should be talking to.  You were always very c=
oncerned about the visibility/availability of the VM team as well as the cr=
edibility and I think these are suffering right now.  And of course on top =
of all of this is VMS.

Do you think I should send this to Scotty? Murray?  Without any management =
being here, I think it is tough to keep a heartbeat on the feeling of the t=
raders and I think that is part of the problem.  And I assume things will i=
mprove w/ Scotty here, but he needs to build relationships on the floor as =
well. =20

I am not trying to be critical of anyone or step on any toes, but I am conc=
erned. =20

Please let me know what you think...thanks and sorry to add a little more t=
o your plate of concerns... KN

Thanks for your help on this item.

 

John,
	Have discovered anymore info from your search into MDMA.

					Chris

Chris, Michael--

I've been looking at some of the MV-90 files from CSC. Here's what I have found:

There are 1200 to 1400 meters reported each day. We will need to keep an eye on this number to see what kind of growth to expect.
Almost all meters report in 15 minute intervals. Interestingly enough, one meter (UCSF CUP 3), started reporting 5 minute intervals on 6 August, and has done so ever since.
The current prototype application I am using to read this data into a temporary database reads about 1meter per second, so I am averaging around 20 minutes per file. While I think I can improve the speed of this process, it does not take into account the need to map this data to the correlating account data, so any gains may be lost there.
Although some of the datafiles are complete (4 readings per hour X 24 hours X every meter) others are missing quite a lot of data. ("9 missing readings for meter KZ+029402367...87 missing readings for meter KZ+029402370...15 missing readings for meter KZ+029402392...") I will work with CSC next week to figure out what is causing this extreme variance in the dependability of the data from day to day.

Next week I will be looking into MDMA to match up these meter ids with accounts. I will let you know what I find.

--John

--John

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

Sorry for the delay, I sent the e-mail below to the wrong e-mail address.

Jo Ellen,

	The document below should be a starting point for our discussion this afternoon. I should give you a pretty good idea of the variables we are trying to capture in the Deal Ticket. I will be speaking w/ Steve Walker this afternoon to flush this all out in  greater detail. If you have any question please call me at 503-807-8959.

		 			

Jo Ellen,

	The document below should be a starting point for our discussion this afternoon. I should give you a pretty good idea of the variables we are trying to capture in the Deal Ticket. I will be speaking w/ Steve Walker this afternoon to flush this all out in  greater detail. If you have any question please call me at 503-807-8959.

		 			

Brenda,
	I need to give Jeff Ricter an update on where this item stands with CSC. I am still going off of the e-mail listed below stating that CSC could meet this deliverable by sometime this week. This is the item that we talked about in last week's Project Ranger meeting, and agreed needed to put on the high priority list. If you have any questions on this item, please feel free to call me at 503-807-8959. Thank for your help on this item.

								Chris 

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Diann,
	You should have notified me that you had passed this off to Maurice and not acted on it since we talked last Wed. From here on out I will assume that Maurice is the key person to get these issues resolved. Based on the e-mail below, I lost one week by your not having this conversation w/ a CSC rep last week. This is a week that we could not afford to lose. 

Maurice,
	Let me know what we need on our side to get the MDMA process escalated to a high priority item. Also, what is the estimated time of delivery from CSC once we make this a priority?  I agree w/ you best scenario recommendation, I would just like to be able to compare delivery dates b/w the two process that you have laid out. Thanks for your help on these items.

			Ps. When next week can we expect CSC to deliver these accounts to the FTP server? Also, what time the next day can we pull the files off 
			      Of the server?

									Chris
	
	

Chris,

In our meeting with Pat Priestley yesterday, she said it would not be difficult to post a CSV file to an FTP server for all the Interval Meter Data accounts in MV90.  Pat said that to post it in the Energy Sense format (MDEF) would be very difficult because of how the system operates.  

Pat also confirmed that they do not post data from all MV90 accounts to the MDMA on a daily basis.  I asked her if they could change this process and she said that it was something they have been wanting to do, but it has not been a high priority.  

I recommend that we get the daily CSV file from the FTP server and import it into the Load Database that John Rutledge is developing.  Pat says that if we can have the Work Request completed today, we could have this set up next week. 

The best scenario is for all the data to be posted to the MDMA daily, so we can possibly get CSC to make this a high priority.

Maurice

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

What is you hotmail address? I want to add you to my MSN Messenger service.
Didn't you say you use it?

Kerry

Kit,
	Sorry about not being able to get back with you on the PX issue yesterday. I will be wrapped up today until this afternoon. Give the Dan or Clark a call and have them walk you through this invoice, the number are listed at the bottom of the second e-mail. Find out where the PX short pay is encompassed in the account summary(about 9 million dollars). Once you walk through this with them, give me a call on my cell and lets discuss before we comment back to the lawyers. Sorry about having to pass the buck, but they have Murray and I scrambling. Call me on my cell if you need any further guidance.

							Chris

The attachment in the e-mail below contains the EPMI balance with the PX(EPMI 081001.xls). The Win zip files sent by the ISO contain the backup to the 1480 Overview file.

   

Chris
503-807-8959

 
PARTICIPANTS:
Enclosed is your updated Account Activity Statement summarizing all accounts receivable/payables activities with CalPX occurring during 2001 starting with the issuance of the December Day-Ahead/Day-Of Market invoice back in January through the April Real Time invoices in August.
The April billing cycles are adjustments being made by CAISO that go back as far as Spring 2000.  CAISO is continuing to make these adjustments, which are basically meter corrections and approved scheduling coordinator disputes, for prior periods.  These will probably continue for a few more months because of the recent FERC ruling regarding refunds.
Please feel free to call Don Deach (626-685-9876), Rachel Axelrad (626-685-9843) or Clark Cheng (626-685-9846) with any questions.
Thank You.
(See attached file: EPMI 081001.xls)

Chris,
No problem.  Just trying to verify your/Murray's schedule.  We will need to spend a fair amount of time together, as we previously discussed.  I want to ensure you guys are aware of everything and we have thoroughly thought through the issues, how they are worded, what the corrective actions are, etc.  So, we will need time to go through in detail, re-draft, review again, etc. until we are all confident we have a good product.

With that in mind, you are in Houston the week Labor Day (Tue - Fri??, I would guess?), what about the weeks of 8/27,  9/10 and 9/17?  We are still receiving a few last details/wrap-up on the draft, as you know.  We could review with you before it is totally completed, but the more complete the better.

Just glancing at my schedule, it looks like next week and the week of Labor Day are already quite full, so the week of 9/10 may be best.  We can jointly make the call when I hear back from you.

Thanks. 

Mechelle,
	I apologize for not getting back w/ you in a timelier manner. I will see if there is any way we can fit something in for tomorrow. If not, we could come by some time during Labor Day week when we are back in town.

						Chris

Mechelle,
	I apologize for not getting back w/ you in a timelier manner. I will see if there is any way we can fit something in for tomorrow. If not, we could come by some time during Labor Day week when we are back in town.

						Chris

Is there anyway you can push this back to the following week when Murray will be in town.

Here are all the details for the DEMO next week.  The attached emails also contain a list of everyone invited.  Date: Tuesday, from 9am-12:00noon.

Please let me know if there is anything I can help with.

Thanks,  Poston

Neal, we have room 42C1 reserved from 9am - 12:00noon.

Thanks,  David Poston

Great.  Let me know the room, and I'll send out a meeting update.  Or you can email everyone; whatever works best.

Neal

Thanks Neal.  I'm working with Dan Luciano to get a room & equipment for Tuesday morning.

Dave Poston will be doing the demo here in Houston.

The main demo should take maybe an hour and a half depending on how many questions we ask.  After that, Dave would like to go over things in more detail if anyone wants to learn more.  He says he can spend 4 hours or more discussing it if we want.

I'll send out location information when I get it.

What is weird is that Jeff S. is still in the building, so it must have truly been his decision. They are issuing more stk, but I have not yet heard the details on how that will work. As far as Greg, I have heard very little on what lead up to his final departure. I know that his son had just had an operation and I think there may have been some complications. Then throw in a new born and watch the stress level rise.
 
                                                            Chris
 
Thanks for the update - off the record, does Gregory know what he is doing? I'll have to give him a call. 
On another subject, has Ken Lay taken odds that if he "opens" the books now, he can go back to cooking them later?  Also, heard that the big e had to issue more stock to retain employees - are you so lucky or does your contract tie you up?
Valarie A. Sabo 
ph 503 813 6904 
fax 503 813 6291 

Sure

Hey Chris can I borrow your Iliad book? I'm very good at returning things and taking care of them as well.

Thanks

You would think that this would be easy information to get - not so.
Jerry Gholson (713) 222 6000
815 Walker (I think he is in the tunnel) 

NFB 

Sorry to keep bothering you, but do you have this info

			Thanks
			 Chris

Sorry to keep bothering you, but do you have this info

			Thanks
			 Chris

Val,
 
            Don't know if you heard yet, but  Greg's last day w/ Enron was yesterday
 
Gawd Boy - you have more questions for me...does this mean you do not require my assistance with CA Block Forwards?  Since you NEVER returned my phone calls??  What's the poop scoop on Jeff S?
Dennis left the NW about a year ago and went to Louisiana I think. Somewhere down around your parts. 
Hey, is that Steve guy - can't remember his last name - still working in Fundies?  He worked with Jim B. in Structuring before they got uppity and went to Broadband. Then Steve came back and Jim went to Houston - THAT Steve.  What's his last name and is he still there?
Val, 
        Do you know where Dennis resides these days, I recommended him 
to someone but he is no longer with Portland Mortgage. 
 
                                        Chris "Needy" Stokley 
 

Take a look at this document. The section with major players is the one with the utilities that are tied to an index, however, there are some minor utilities that are not covered in that list. Do you think that we need the minor utilities?

 
					Chris

Were you able to get the utility names for PJM?

http://pcworld.com/howto/article/0,aid,52643,00.asp

Ben,
	Where are you located? I want to swing by and pick a copy of the Deal Overview book.

					Chris

I have these in a notebook.  I will work on getting soft copies.  Would you like me to get copies made in the meantime.

Also, I believe all of this info has been provided to the Project Phoenix group and should be on file in their file room.

Becky - let's discuss this 1st thing Monday.

ben

Ben,
	Could you please send me by e-mail, the Deal Overview Book. I was told by Greg Young that you would be the person that could get me this document.. Thanks for you help.

								Chris
							      503-807-8959

Todd,
	Just another update on where we stand with the interval meter data. How is everything going in your world? I am getting a lot of projects thrown at me right now, so let me know if there is any deliverables that I owe you. I just want to make sure I am not letting anything slip through the cracks. Hope all is going well, I will try to stop by before I leave out of  Houston this week(Currently spending a lot of time in 3 Allen center).

			Ps   I thought you said our stock price would not go below $40. Did Ken and Jeff forget to check in with you before the big decision. J

						Chris
						503-807-8959

Chris, Michael--

I've been looking at some of the MV-90 files from CSC. Here's what I have found:

There are 1200 to 1400 meters reported each day. We will need to keep an eye on this number to see what kind of growth to expect.
Almost all meters report in 15 minute intervals. Interestingly enough, one meter (UCSF CUP 3), started reporting 5 minute intervals on 6 August, and has done so ever since.
The current prototype application I am using to read this data into a temporary database reads about 1meter per second, so I am averaging around 20 minutes per file. While I think I can improve the speed of this process, it does not take into account the need to map this data to the correlating account data, so any gains may be lost there.
Although some of the datafiles are complete (4 readings per hour X 24 hours X every meter) others are missing quite a lot of data. ("9 missing readings for meter KZ+029402367...87 missing readings for meter KZ+029402370...15 missing readings for meter KZ+029402392...") I will work with CSC next week to figure out what is causing this extreme variance in the dependability of the data from day to day.

Next week I will be looking into MDMA to match up these meter ids with accounts. I will let you know what I find.

--John

--John

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com <mailto:jthoma56@csc.com> on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

Todd,
	I apologize for not getting back w/ you in a more timely manner. As far as tracking a deal through the system, we have made very little progress. I have been pulled off on a couple of other projects that were deemed to be of higher priority. I talked to Chris Leonard last week to see if he could be of some help in tracking this down for us since he knows the Risk systems very well. He agreed, and I will follow up w/ him to day on what his approach will be. 

									Chris
									503-807-8959

http://cnet.com/hardware/0-2709830-404-1781522.html?tag=st.co.2645869-7-1480990.topfive.2709830-404-1781522

Thanks for reminding me. Let me check today and see if I can find the title of the book that I am looking for. 

					Chris

Chris,

Hope you had a good weekend!  Wanted to check and see if there were any books that you wanted me to pick up at Borders on Wednesday (the day we have the discount).  Let me know and I'd be happy to do it for you.

KN

Did we ever hear back from this guy?

Jim, 
	As per Dan, I am contacting you for help in setting up a common drive accessible for both EES and Corp users.

I understand that the system allows for CORP user to access EES resources but no vice/versa

In either case, the Corp users that are now assigned to EES projects request 2 NT Groups created that both EES and Corp users can be added to that will allow RW for on group and the other to allow Change to a common directory easily accessible by both groups (with out requiring separate logon).

The Erequest for access should be routed to Jeff Richter (jrichte) for approvals.

Please let me know how long it may be until we can have something available.  If you need anything else please let me know.

Regards, 

Dave

Let me know if anyone has any questions on this information.

  This is what will be sent out in the mail.  It is not as detailed as what I sent Chris previously.  This shows a payment to Enron.  
Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Thanks for the update

Chris, Michael--

I've been looking at some of the MV-90 files from CSC. Here's what I have found:

There are 1200 to 1400 meters reported each day. We will need to keep an eye on this number to see what kind of growth to expect.
Almost all meters report in 15 minute intervals. Interestingly enough, one meter (UCSF CUP 3), started reporting 5 minute intervals on 6 August, and has done so ever since.
The current prototype application I am using to read this data into a temporary database reads about 1meter per second, so I am averaging around 20 minutes per file. While I think I can improve the speed of this process, it does not take into account the need to map this data to the correlating account data, so any gains may be lost there.
Although some of the datafiles are complete (4 readings per hour X 24 hours X every meter) others are missing quite a lot of data. ("9 missing readings for meter KZ+029402367...87 missing readings for meter KZ+029402370...15 missing readings for meter KZ+029402392...") I will work with CSC next week to figure out what is causing this extreme variance in the dependability of the data from day to day.

Next week I will be looking into MDMA to match up these meter ids with accounts. I will let you know what I find.

--John

--John

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

I will swing by on Monday and pick up a copy. Thanks for your help.

			Chris

I have these in a notebook.  I will work on getting soft copies.  Would you like me to get copies made in the meantime.

Also, I believe all of this info has been provided to the Project Phoenix group and should be on file in their file room.

Becky - let's discuss this 1st thing Monday.

ben

Ben,
	Could you please send me by e-mail, the Deal Overview Book. I was told by Greg Young that you would be the person that could get me this document.. Thanks for you help.

								Chris
							      503-807-8959

Diann,

	We have a few paths that we are looking into, including the one that we discussed w/ Maurice. Never at any time in that meeting did we decide not to look at the paths listed below. Does this mean that you have done nothing to facilitate these request to CSC?  

				Chris

Chris,  I thought that you and Michael met with Maurice the other day and decided a slightly different path.  Is that not the case?  

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Chris, Michael--

I've been looking at some of the MV-90 files from CSC. Here's what I have found:

There are 1200 to 1400 meters reported each day. We will need to keep an eye on this number to see what kind of growth to expect.
Almost all meters report in 15 minute intervals. Interestingly enough, one meter (UCSF CUP 3), started reporting 5 minute intervals on 6 August, and has done so ever since.
The current prototype application I am using to read this data into a temporary database reads about 1meter per second, so I am averaging around 20 minutes per file. While I think I can improve the speed of this process, it does not take into account the need to map this data to the correlating account data, so any gains may be lost there.
Although some of the datafiles are complete (4 readings per hour X 24 hours X every meter) others are missing quite a lot of data. ("9 missing readings for meter KZ+029402367...87 missing readings for meter KZ+029402370...15 missing readings for meter KZ+029402392...") I will work with CSC next week to figure out what is causing this extreme variance in the dependability of the data from day to day.

Next week I will be looking into MDMA to match up these meter ids with accounts. I will let you know what I find.

--John

--John

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com <mailto:jthoma56@csc.com> on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

This seems like a really good time to ask for that ranking J

this is good....

I doubled checked this with Stacey but I wanted to let you know that it is not Enron Works Operations dep't policy to provide cell phones to all employees unless they are in some type of supervisory or managerial and above position. These cell phones are strictly for business use and for emergencies related to work. This policy also applies to all the East risk group as well.  It seems to me that some things are done differently here when compared to the Houston office and if you feel that it is a necessity for you to have a company cell phone by all means talk to Tim about getting a cell phone under his department. Obviously, if you do use a cell phone for business purposes then the applicable charges can be expensed. 

Sorry guys, I don't make the rules, I only tell you about them.

John

Latest on where we stand with day after interval meter data.

Chris--

I guess you must be in Portland--I left a voice mail for you yesterday.

Anyway, I don't know exactly who here at Enron is responsible for representing our priorities for these matters to CSC. I talked to Geoff Goodfellow in Dublin and he suggested Bob Gresh or Brenda Herod. These are names I've seen in the recent barrage of emails, but I have not met either of them and don't know their exact involvement in all of this. I have also asked Geoff to confirm that, assuming this process was elevated to the highest priority, we could be getting the data around 7:30 a.m.

The database you mentioned is definitely not "ready to go." The meter data we're getting from the MV-90 system is just that: a list of meter numbers and readings.  I am assuming (perhaps incorrectly) that just having a database of meters without their associated sites, account, clients, etc. isn't going to be useful to anyone. I am working on putting something very basic together to show Michael Frazier sometime early next week. I will also get back to you on the file-processing time once I've run a few tests.

Let's get together and iron out some of the specifics of what *you* need from this data. I'm free all day tomorrow.

--John

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com <mailto:jthoma56@csc.com> on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

James,
	Could you send the presentation that was presented by Load Star to myself and Murray? I think you said that  you had a copy of the presentation. 

							Thanks
						            Chris

James, 

I am not 100% sure I can provide answers to all of the gas questions below.  I am in the process of locating the correct CSC/EES personal for this data.

I will contact you as soon as I have some answers.

Lisa
x56504

Details regarding EES/CSC deal capture and billing for 90/110 consumption bands -

Power

EWS Business Contact - Richard Miller
Deal Capture Status - Information is not included on any CSC power deal tickets (deal sheets)
Risk Book Status - Currently not captured - A.K. Matheson is researching and will provide details
Billing Status - CSC does not know which customers bands apply to - currently not applying to any power customer bills

Gas

EWS Business Contact - Lisa McClendon
Deal Capture Status - Information is included on CSC gas deal tickets (deal sheets)
Risk Book Status - Currently captured
Billing Status - CSC does know which customers bands apply to - currently applying bands to some gas customer bills, but process performed manually
	==>  Lisa has been working with CSC this week to determine the following -
		- How many gas deals do bands apply to?
		- How is CSC tracking penalties by meter and by billing period?
		- What is total $ amount of penalties?
		- What is the estimated unbilled penalty amount and what is CSC's plan to resolve on a go-forward basis?

I will forward additional information as it becomes available.

Thanks,
James

Ben,
	Could you please send me by e-mail, the Deal Overview Book. I was told by Greg Young that you would be the person that could get me this document.. Thanks for you help.

								Chris
							      503-807-8959

When will the ISO be sending this information out?

IMPORTANT NOTICE
UNDERSCHEDULING PENALTY AND
PG&E BANKRUPTCY PROOF OF CLAIMS
As you are aware, the claims bar date in the PG&E bankruptcy is September 5=
th.  Consistent with our practice of providing information held by the ISO =
to Market Participants that concerns the amounts that may be owed to them i=
n part by PG&E, the ISO is today sending to each Scheduling Coordinator an =
accounting of the amounts it owes or is owed in the event the underscheduli=
ng penalty is not modified by FERC.  FERC adopted the underscheduling penal=
ty in a December 15, 2000 Order.  Because there are several rehearing petit=
ions pending regarding the underscheduling penalty, to date the ISO has cal=
culated but has not invoiced amounts owed or owing pursuant to the undersch=
eduling penalty.  It is our expectation that Scheduling Coordinators will s=
hare with individual entities for whom they schedule, information that is r=
elevant to them.
As we have advised in prior Market Notices, although the ISO settles transa=
ctions on behalf of Market Participants, the ISO is neither authorized nor =
in a position unilaterally to assert claims on behalf of Market Participant=
s in any bankruptcy proceeding, i.e. assert claims of "ISO Debtors" against=
 "ISO Creditors" (ISO Tariff Section 11.20.1).  Further, while the ISO may =
be asked by an "ISO Debtor" to assert such claims in the PX or PG&E bankrup=
tcy cases, the ISO is not obliged to do so and will decline any such reques=
t.  The ISO expressly disavows any liability for any Market Participant's c=
laims, whether or not the Market Participant files any such proofs of claim=
 in the PX or PG&E bankruptcy proceedings.  Further, as we have advised in =
prior Market Notices, all statements, including the information sent today =
regarding the underscheduling penalty, are subject to change.  A number of =
transactions are currently known to be the subject of disputes and market r=
eruns.  There are also proceedings pending at FERC, Federal Courts, and Sta=
te Courts, the outcomes of which may affect amounts owed by PG&E to each Ma=
rket Participant or by the Market Participant to PG&E. In addition, we anti=
cipate that further disputes and proceedings may arise and market reruns ma=
y be performed that will affect the calculation of such amounts.  The ISO w=
ill continue to work diligently to resolve these matters as quickly as poss=
ible.  Nonetheless, it is clear that significant issues may remain unresolv=
ed and/or unidentified by the claims bar date.
Market Participants should consult their own legal COUNSEL as to their resp=
ective rights  and proofs of claims in the bankruptcy cases of the PX and P=
G&E.
Client Relations Communications
CRCommunications@caiso.com <mailto:CRCommunications@caiso.com>

Janet,
	Good to hear from you, what is it that they have you working on there days? Also, what meeting did you get pulled into that would have my name mentioned?

							Chris

Chris - I was in a meeting today and your name came up - in a good way - and I thought I would send a short message to say HELLO.  I heard you are "commuting" to Houston to work every week.  WOW - your commute is worse than mine!!  I was glad to hear that you are still at Enron.
Janet Peake 

Brenda,
	Hope this addresses your needs, I will continue to gather information on this action item.

	If you have any question please give me a call at 503-807-8959

 

	
					Chris

Chris,

As a follow up of our conversation, here is a summary of contract issues. I have tried to organize my comments into three major categories: baseline, bands and material change language.

Where Contracts were prior to Site Profile Desk took control

Baseline: Not specified in contracts! A variety of mechanisms to build baseline post-contract including:
Calculating volumes on a forward basis, i.e first 12 months
Last 12 months prior to contract closing
Baseline volumes that grow by x%
Bands: Annual 90/110 bands, Aggregation at all levels (including utility, state and national etc.)
Material Change Language: Varied, unclear or vague language (at least in my opinion)

Where we are now

Baseline: Two basic mechanisms intended to bring clarity
Major Transactions (i.e. any deal not priced from Matrix): volumes explicitly specified in contract
Minor transactions: last 12 months prior to contract closing (with the understanding that Origination will collect 12 bills required for booking within days of contract closing; process details to be finalized)
Bands: Monthly 90/110 bands, Aggregation allowed within same utility-voltage-facility type groupings
Material Change Language: Unfortunately still unclear and inadequate (see below for our proposals). For example, the 

Where we want to be

Baseline:
Minor transactions: A process needs to be in place in Services Department to collect the 12 bills required for booking within days of contract closing.

Material Change Language: This area needs to be really beefed up. In my opinion, material language should catch risks that are not explicitly modeled and priced. At the moment, I don't see material change language accomplishing this. 

Issue 1: Protecting for long term shifts in consumption

The 90/110 consumption bands (which are set on monthly basis) we are offering right now are intended to provide normal weather and operating flexibility. With this assumption, we currently price consumption risk as a probabilistic process as opposed to pricing using the classic straddle approach (simultaneous call & put).  Any "step" changes in consumption, such as The Limited adding additional display area or Tyco Health Care Products, adding new production shifts violate this assumption.  I propose either (1) adding language that captures this "steps" or (2) price these steps explicitly. Given the lack of quality actual data the second alternative would be an educated guess at this point.  Recently I proposed (verbally to be fair) the following language to Jim Wood (Products-Origination).

If a "Material Change" (defined below) has occurred, EESO or Customer may request that the commodity pricing be restructured to account for such Material Change.  A "Material Change" shall be any intentional or unintentional change, including energy efficiency upgrades, to the processes or operations conducted at any of the Facilities or other similar occurrences that:

(i)	change a Facility Account's consumption of electricity or natural gas at such Facility Account by more than 10% of the Facility Account's Consumption Baseline over any six consecutive months (i.e. Facility Account's Actual Consumption divided by Facility Account's Baseline Consumption equals less than 0.9 or more than 1.1), or 

(ii)	change a Facility Account' s monthly on-peak usage ratio for electricity at such Facility Account by more than 5% of Facility Account's monthly on-peak usage ratio baseline over any six consecutive months.  The Facility Account monthly on-peak usage ratio equals the monthly on-peak Facility Account usage divided by the total monthly Facility Account usage.

Jim's immediate reaction was mixed. He felt that customers may feel that we are giving them volumetric flexibility on one hand and taking it back with the other. He said 80/120 on material change may be more palatable.

Issue 2: Sudden Load Swings in Short Term

Although, the monthly bands protect us on monthly volume swings, they are not very effective in preventing sudden un-planned short term load swings triggering imbalance penalties. Here the language currently in contracts that is supposed to protect us against this risk:

Notice of Operational Changes.  You agree to promptly advise us of any event reasonably known to you that may impact energy usage at any Account (e.g., equipment installations, outages, shutdowns, repairs, openings or closings, changes in operating hours) by an amount (without regard to weather-related effects) greater than either (i) 25% of the Actual Usage for such Account during the same Billing Cycle in the prior year or (ii) 2 MW (each an "Operational Change").  If you fail to notify us of an Operational Change, you will reimburse us for any Energy Imbalance Charges incurred by you or us as a result of such Operational Change.  

This language has at least three problems:
No compensation mechanism specified if customer does not deliver on this requirement.
Is 25% and / or 2 MW justifiable, especially given the differences in imbalance treatment across physical markets?
No clear process (i.e. minimum time frame for notice, contact information) specified for customer to deliver this notice

I would modify this language to something like:

Notice of Operational Changes.  Customer agrees to advise EESI at least two days (48 hours) in advance to the contacts listed in Schedule ____ by fax or e-mail of any event that may impact energy demand at any of its Accounts (e.g., equipment installations, outages, shutdowns, repairs, openings or closings, changes in operating hours) by an amount greater than either (i) ___ % of the Hourly Load for such Account during the same hour in the prior year or (ii) 0.5 MW of demand (each an "Operational Change").  If such Customer fails to notify EESI of an Operational Change, Customer will reimburse EESI for any Energy Imbalance Charges incurred by the Customer or EESI as a result of such Operational Change.  The mechanism for penalty calculation is specified in Schedule ____.
Hope this helps.

Mallik

Here is the master
  

Val,
	Do you know where Dennis resides these days, I recommended him to someone but he is no longer with Portland Mortgage. 

					Chris "Needy" Stokley

Couple of questions:

1)	Did you have any luck getting me upgraded to Gold?
2)	Did they get back with you on the FF miles for automated check in?

Also, I will try to knock out my expenses today and send those to you. I also want to send you and e-mail I got from TAP and get your interpretation.

					Chris

Chris,

This is Richter, Neil had reviews to do so I finished up with the email.  Hope this helps.  Let me know if you need anything else.

Richter

Several deals have no band (1998 ) see note from Dennis
+
The issue with the bands is how to price them.  On the surface the band is the same as selling the customer a call and a put 
in actual fact the customer is not going to always exercise the option on a purely economic basis. Building managers need to keep the lights on even when it is hot. +
Most of our contracts contemplate the establishment of a baseline during the first year of the contract. Most of our consumption bands are settled on an annual basis giving the client a huge swing on an intramonth basis. 
+
New clients have consumption bands which are calculated on a monthly basis and settled with the customer on an annual basis. 
+
We don't currently manage the position aggressively.  Intramonth we forecast load for clients and assume all the load is physical when in fact after a customer goes over (or under) the band we should be buy index for the over under. 

Chris,  Richter takes over

1999 deals:  most deals in 1999 have a consumption band which gets settled annually.  

2000 deals as of feb - consumption bands with monthly settlements

New deals  - See Neil's notes above

One thing to remember is that the customer is exposed to hourly index price and grid charges on every kw they use outside the band and we owe them if they underconsume.  this needs to be flashed and then actualized when the data is available.  One note is that all the existing contracts up to EWS taking over have this little flaw:  the customer is exposed to the hourly price and we wear the risk of all the grid charges.  (Not good!!!)

http://www.oregonlive.com/realestate/index.ssf?/realestate/mortgage.frame

>      DINNER CONVERSATION
> 
>      WOMAN: What would you do if I died? Would you get married again?
>      MAN: Definitely not!
>      WOMAN: Why not - don't you like being married?
>      MAN: Of course I do.
>      WOMAN: Then why wouldn't you remarry?
>      MAN: Okay, I'd get married again.
>      WOMAN: You would? (with a hurtful look on her face)
>      MAN: (makes audible groan)
>      WOMAN: Would you sleep with her in our bed?
>      MAN: Where else would we sleep?
>      WOMAN: Would you replace my pictures with hers?
>      MAN: That would seem like the proper thing to do.
>      WOMAN: Would she use my golf clubs?
>      MAN: No, she's left-handed.
>      WOMAN: - - - silence - - -
>      MAN: Shit.
> 
> 

John,
	I have not heard back from you on the items listed below, where do you stand on these questions

							Chris

John,

	Could you tell me who I would speak to in order to find out the priorities that are pushing this process back to 11:00am? Also, how much time does it take you to get this file into the database once you receive the file from CSC? This is making the assumption that the database is configured and ready to go. What are you currently seeing in the way of missing data coming in from these files on a daily basis.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Have attached the project proposal as returned by CSC. I am also summarizing a discussion I had with Geoff Goodfellow of CSC:

Since CSC is using a third-party, packaged application to produce this file, they are limited in their ability to deliver exactly what we want (in the context of the 51 hour, $4,883.62 estimate).

We requested that missing data (e.g., phone line down) be backfilled in a later day's file, but this is not possible because the process to produce this file only queries on meter data for a specific date, not all data received on a specific date. For example, if they ran it today, for 7 August, we would receive all meter data for that date, but they would have actually received more than that on the 7th, perhaps data dated 6 Aug for meters that failed to dial in on that day. Getting this data will require further development (read: mo' money).

Also, the file is 26MB, of which more that 25% is blank spaces on the end of each line. Again, since this is an external application, I have been told that it is not possible to eliminate this extra space. (Not a killer, since we won't actually be putting it in the database, but it just adds to processing/network overhead.)

I have also been told that file delivery will occur between 11 a.m. and 12 p.m. daily. This is because of current priorities, but even at the earliest, we won't be able to get it before 7:30 a.m. (Data is collected from 12 a.m. to 6 a.m., the report run takes 1 hour 30 minutes, a file is produced at 7:30.)

--John

jthoma56@csc.com <mailto:jthoma56@csc.com> on 08/07/2001 04:11:43 PM
Bob -
Attached is the Project Proposal and Purchase Order document for the MV-90
Data Download (CES2423) Work Request.  Please review the documents at your
earliest convenience.  If the offer is acceptable to EESO, please forward
your acceptance to my attention via electronic mail attached to this
submission.
If you have any questions or require additional information, please contact
me at 614-737-1345.

Best Regards -
Jim
(See attached file: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc)
 - CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc << File: CES2423.MV90 Project Proposa 080701.doc >> 

Thanks

Hi Chris,

Per your request, attached is a copy of Project Ranger.

Thanks,

annie
 <<Ranger.zip>> 

If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying, distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         

Steve,
	Please send me the Ranger download that you were referencing in our meeting on Wed.

							Chris

Yes, Pam will be taking care of this item.

I assume you will be responsible for this.....please let me know so that we can coordinate.  

The Financial Reporting group will need power volumes by  W/D 7 / October 9 at 9:00 a.m. to report this information to corporate by 2:00 p.m. the same day.  I am sending you this information because I have been informned of George Phillips new position and I am not sure who is taking over this role.  If you have any questions please let me know.

Sincerely,

Carrie Yardas

 

I don't think that I do

Hi Chris,

One of the things required to run the Guadalupe application is a Deal Tracker database account. Do you know if you have access to the Deal Tracker application?

Thanks,
tony 5-8170

Tony,
	The address is 3 Allen Center Office 1604A
Tony,

Chris will be helping us implement Guadalupe. Please set it up on his machine at your earliest convenience.

He's in 3 Allen Center. Office 1603

Thanks, 
Preston Ochsner
Commodity Risk Management
Enron Wholesale Services
713-345-3341

Murray and I are both open most of the day tomorrow. Let me know what is convenient for you.

				Chris

I also know that Florida beat the piss out of MSU and seems to have a much better defense than in past years. :)

Let's see what the spread is.  You know LSU has the advantage of Tiger Stadium (been there) and  are ready for an upset after letting go of last week's game.

Toby

How many pts are you giving me?

Chris
How about a 5 dollar bet on the game
Let me know
Toby

Ken,
	Murray is going to take a look at the responses before his 10:30 meeting at which time I will forward those over to you. Also, I am going to have Patti set up a time for you and I to meet on Thursday.

								Chris

Ken,

	First of all, sorry for the mix up last week that is all on me. As far as the comment on the SQMD, Murray wants to take a look at the responses which should happen this morning or early afternoon. I would also like to schedule some time this week to sit down and talk about some questions that I have about the audit that fall outside of my responses. Once again I  apologize for the delay and I will have something to you ASAP.

									Chris 

Chris,

What is the latest...

Thanks,

Ken

Tony,
	The address is 3 Allen Center Office 1604A
Tony,

Chris will be helping us implement Guadalupe. Please set it up on his machine at your earliest convenience.

He's in 3 Allen Center. Office 1603

Thanks, 
Preston Ochsner
Commodity Risk Management
Enron Wholesale Services
713-345-3341

How many pts are you giving me?

Chris
How about a 5 dollar bet on the game
Let me know
Toby

Chris,

Thank you for your response.  We have relief from customer on the 9/28 deadline - new deadline is one-week after we receive the information from customer.

Lamar - This is the UCSF situation we discussed last night.  I suggest those copied on this e-mail have a conference call to discuss Chris' questions.  

Gracie - Since you are in touch with Lamar while he serves his civic duty and know his schedule, could you arrange the call?  Thank you.

Tom  

Kimberly,
	I am more than happy to get this issue resolved, however, this is the first that I have heard about getting a number to the customer by EOB 9/28/01.Here are some of the questions that I have regarding this deal:
						1) What index are we settling this contract at. I see that you have both a 10-min Dec price along with an hourly price in the spreadsheet that you sent me. My 
						     is that it would be settled at the Dec since that is what the ISO pays at, but I need confirmation that the customer has agreed to this index.
						2) Are the prices you have in your spreadsheet settlement quality since the ISO does not publish any changes to their web site that happen after 96hrs.
						3) What method are we using to confirm the customers usage other than him sending us a file.
						4) When can we expect to get the usage data for Feb.-July
						5) Are these spreadsheets the detail behind what was invoiced to the customer.
						6) Do you have a copy of the latest contract with this customer that gives the calculation language appropriate to their over-generation.
 
   I will get this turned around for you as soon a possible once we get the details ironed out on the process. I understand your urgency in wanting to get this settled as soon as possible and I will make sure that happens going forward. However, I will need your patience on getting this settled for Aug. since I have yet to find a documented process for the proper settlement of this contract. Please free to give me a call if you have any questions regarding this e-mail.

										             Thanks  
											Chris Stokley
										           503-807-8959

We currently have a customer in California, UC/CSU, with a cogen plant at the University of California San Francisco campus.  Per their contract, they are owed a monthly credit for their excess energy i.e. energy sold back to the grid.

Due to the return to bundled service, and the chaos which ensued, needless to say, this credit calculation fell through the cracks.  The credit calculation has not been done since January 2001.  The customer is now very anxious for that amount.

We have agreed to give him an amount (not the check) by EOB tomorrow, 9/28.  Since the only volumetric data which the customer has provided so far is for August, we only need to provide that months credit amount.

Per our conversation, here is his August interval data.  I've also attached a sample of what has been done in the past.  If you have any questions, please let me know.

 << File: Rg608.txt >>  << File: USCF Generation Pricing 031301.xls >> 

Ken,

	First of all, sorry for the mix up last week that is all on me. As far as the comment on the SQMD, Murray wants to take a look at the responses which should happen this morning or early afternoon. I would also like to schedule some time this week to sit down and talk about some questions that I have about the audit that fall outside of my responses. Once again I  apologize for the delay and I will have something to you ASAP.

									Chris 

Chris,

What is the latest...

Thanks,

Ken

Kimberly,
	I am more than happy to get this issue resolved, however, this is the first that I have heard about getting a number to the customer by EOB 9/28/01.Here are some of the questions that I have regarding this deal:
						1) What index are we settling this contract at. I see that you have both a 10-min Dec price along with an hourly price in the spreadsheet that you sent me. My 
						     is that it would be settled at the Dec since that is what the ISO pays at, but I need confirmation that the customer has agreed to this index.
						2) Are the prices you have in your spreadsheet settlement quality since the ISO does not publish any changes to their web site that happen after 96hrs.
						3) What method are we using to confirm the customers usage other than him sending us a file.
						4) When can we expect to get the usage data for Feb.-July
						5) Are these spreadsheets the detail behind what was invoiced to the customer.
						6) Do you have a copy of the latest contract with this customer that gives the calculation language appropriate to their over-generation.
 
   I will get this turned around for you as soon a possible once we get the details ironed out on the process. I understand your urgency in wanting to get this settled as soon as possible and I will make sure that happens going forward. However, I will need your patience on getting this settled for Aug. since I have yet to find a documented process for the proper settlement of this contract. Please free to give me a call if you have any questions regarding this e-mail.

										             Thanks  
											Chris Stokley
										           503-807-8959

We currently have a customer in California, UC/CSU, with a cogen plant at the University of California San Francisco campus.  Per their contract, they are owed a monthly credit for their excess energy i.e. energy sold back to the grid.

Due to the return to bundled service, and the chaos which ensued, needless to say, this credit calculation fell through the cracks.  The credit calculation has not been done since January 2001.  The customer is now very anxious for that amount.

We have agreed to give him an amount (not the check) by EOB tomorrow, 9/28.  Since the only volumetric data which the customer has provided so far is for August, we only need to provide that months credit amount.

Per our conversation, here is his August interval data.  I've also attached a sample of what has been done in the past.  If you have any questions, please let me know.

 << File: Rg608.txt >>  << File: USCF Generation Pricing 031301.xls >> 

I think I am only getting billed through Sept., but I will check. As far as the car goes, I am fine w/ just using a cab and I will continue staying at an apartment in Mid-Town(Under someone else's name).

					Thanks

Tell me about the HomeCorp room(s).  I just got a bill for Oct. under Steve Swain's name, but HomeCorp said that there is no longer an apartment in your name.  Did you just move into the other apartment, or do I need to start booking you a hotel room?  Also, do you need a car at this point, or is a cab still working ok?

Kathy

Every week through Nov. for rt. now. Also, would you mind getting me up to date on the travel expenses you know of ( plane tickets, travel miles, apt. etc.) thanks!

							Chris

Chris,

You have no travel arranged after this week.  If you'll send me your travel dates I'll get something on the books for you.

Kathy

Jeff,
	Two questions:
		1) Whose name is the apartment in(Do I expense it)?
		2)  Isn't $107 a day higher than what we currently pay?
		

					Chris
Jeff / Chris,

Well, I think the corp housing saga is finally completed!  

On 10/3/01, your belongings will be moved, free of charge, from Apt.# 4140 to Apt# 2307 in Mid Town Square.  The apartment is on the third floor, corner lot, w/ a slight view.  It is a 2 bed/2 bath and should be comparable to where you are now.  The rate should be $107 / day.  The apt is leased for three months until 12/31/01.  

Denise of Ex Lodging, will be calling you, Chris, to make arrangements for the key and garage door opener drop off.  I gave her your email address. I have the signed contract agreement which I will hand over to Jill when she returns from vacation. 

Jill:  I dealt w/ Denise at Ex Lodging. She can be reached at 713) 552-9852 x111.  They made a specific notation in the file that only you or Debra Davidson are authorized to make changes / cancel / modify the lodging agreement.  Come by my desk when you get back in town and I download the whole story.

Thanks, guys, and again, you've been great thru a frustrating experience!

Julie K

 

Every week through Nov. for rt. now. Also, would you mind getting me up to date on the travel expenses you know of ( plane tickets, travel miles, apt. etc.) thanks!

							Chris

Chris,

You have no travel arranged after this week.  If you'll send me your travel dates I'll get something on the books for you.

Kathy

We are both open anytime tomorrow.

Mr. Stokley, would you or your assistant please forward to me your availability during your visit here in Houston, so that we can arrange a time for the Deal View Pricing Demo with Phil Layton.

 		

For scheduling purposes please forward to me your and Murray Oneal's availablity on next week, beginning with Tuesday, july 24th through Thursday, July 26th.  

Thank you.

Yvette

I wanted to get w/ Steve Fisher to discuss the gathering of the different types of contracts that we spoke about in yesterdays meeting. As for the 1:00, I wanted to go over the fields needed to calculate the consumption bands. How much time do you have at 1:00, maybe we can consolidate these meeting and go over all of the fields with Steve and Glenn in the room.

what is the subject of the four o'clock - are we only talking about the consumption bands or all the fields in general.  I was wondering if it would be good for Glenn to hear their process.  

See you in Houston! How long are you going to be in the Houston office?

Before I leave today, I just wanted to say what a great experience it has been working in Portland over the last 15 months.  I have learned so much and am amazed at what a motivated and talented team we have.  I will miss all of the friendships I have made and wish everyone the best of luck and success. 

If you are ever in Houston, please give me a ring!

Take care -
Amy

FYI
Hey guys, sorry, we tried for a Friday night move but it's not going to happen.  Instead, we are go for Monday night. So, we'll see you here on Tuesday morning.  Please let me know if you need anything.

Jon Moreno
x56921

Request 9279 has been approved for 10/01/2001

And you Address

My cell phone 713-412-7529
home number 281-419-4388
Deb's cell 281-767-3667

catcha later,
jmf

John,
	Send me your new numbers, I can not find them in my address book and I no longer have your e-mail.

						Chris

John,
	Send me your new numbers, I can not find them in my address book and I no longer have your e-mail.

						Chris

Thanks for the update, I will be in town and at the Wed. meeting.

						Chris

Attached are copies of the most recent drafts for the various change
notification processes.  I have a hard copy available as well if you are in
town and you let me know where I can find you.  These maps will be covered
in our meeting on Wednesday.  Please let me know if you have any questions.
I can be reached at ext. 56446.

 <<Visio-Site Add 092401 Rev6.pdf>>  <<Visio-Site Delete 092501 Rev6.pdf>>  
<<Visio-Potential Baseline Change-No Price Change 092401 Rev2.pdf>>  
<<Visio-Potential Baseline & Price Change 092401 Rev2.pdf>>  
<<Visio-Contract Interpretation 092401 Rev5.pdf>>  <<Visio-Billing and
Invoicing 092501 Rev5.pdf>>  <<Visio-Upsell & Restructuring (Risk Mgmt)
091901 Rev5.pdf>> 

Juan Herrera
Pritchett, LLC.
VM    972-731-1307
e-fax  509-691-4441

 
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
Come see what's new at gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	 Come see what's new at gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	 Come see what's new at gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	 gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	
Come see what's new at gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	 Come see what's new at gap.com <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	 get free shipping and 20% off any online purchase of $50 or more* <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/man3.jpg>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	 Hurry, offer good through October 4, 2001 <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/hurry.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	Enter the GAP.COM coupon code 9FQ6ELH9BFat checkout.	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	 TIP: Write the code down, so you'll remember it at checkout <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/tip.gif>	
Shop now <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	
 <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098235X78462X>	
 gap.com offers convenient services <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/services.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
 Start shopping <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/startshopping.gif> women men maternity body kids baby	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/footer.gif>	
  <http://a676.g.akamaitech.net/f/676/773/60m/images.m0.net/catcontent/gap/092501/20off/transpace.gif>	
We sent you this email because you asked for updates about new products and promotions. If you'd like to change how often you hear from us, please click here <http://gap.m0.net/m/s.asp?HB4442149837X1098231X78462X>. If you'd rather not receive email updates from Gap, you can delete your name from our email list by clicking here <http://gap.m0.net/m/u/g.asp?e=CHRIS.STOKLEY%40enron.com>.
<http://gap.m0.net/m/u/g.asp?e=CHRIS.STOKLEY%40enron.com>

*Offer valid through October 4, 2001, at 11:59 p.m., PT. $50 amount applies to merchandise only. GiftCard purchases, packaging, taxes, and shipping & handling does not count toward the qualifying amount. No adjustments on previous purchases. Offer is not transferable without consent by Gap. Not valid at Gap stores or Gap Outlet stores. Cannot be combined with any other offers. Gap Code good for one time use only. Offer valid in the US only.	

 <http://www.m0.net/m/logopen02.asp?vid=3&catid=4442149837&ecid=227919>

fyi

Here are some questions and answers that you will find helpful:
*	Are self provided ancillary services (on a SC required basis)
sequential; excess spin rolls into nonspin requirement for the SC (if
offered
as nonspin).

 NO, If an SC self provides 130 MW of SPIN capacity yet the calculated
market requirement is only 100MW,  the self-provided amount of 120 MW will
be accepted for SPIN and none of the EXCESS 30 MW of capacity considered for
other A/S services.

Please Note if in this example the SC's SPIN obligation is calculated to be
90 MW, the over self provided portion (100MW - 90MW) = 10 MW would receive a
payment.  In this example there is an additional 20 MW of EXCESS above the
total market requirement that "gets left on the table" which will receive no
compensation.

*	If self provision reserves are offered in excess of the total
quantity required for the total market, will the ISO take them all anyway or
will the offerings be truncated and perhaps roll into a subsequent service
(if offered as self provide in that service).

NO, As in the above answer.  The total Self provided quantity will be
accepted and there would be no reduction of the preferred schedule even if
this amount is ABOVE the total market requirement.

Also, check out M-402 and M-421 at the following link:
http://www.caiso.com/thegrid/operations/opsdoc/marketops/

Keoni Almeida
California Independent System Operator
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
A

Jeff,
	Here is a first cut of some of the questions that  need to be answered by the generator that is offering this service. I will have more as I dig into the detail this    	week.

			1) Non performance by counterparty (don't deliver energy when called) :
                                                       - Who is going to be held financially responsible if the generator is unable to meet the ISO instructions to Inc or Dec gen? 
			2)  Is the generator located in the grid or out of the grid?
			        - This is important to know so that we can evaluate our control area risk.
                                                3)   Has the generator registered and been certified by the ISO to deliver all of the A/s Products(Regulation,Spin, Non-Spin and Replacement)
			        - Need to know the specific unit ID's of the performing units so that we can verify w/ the ISO.
                                                4)   Are we paying the Generator based on what we bid in to the ISO or on what the ISO actually grants to EPMI. 
			5)   Are we paying the Generator a fixed price on Capacity and Energy or just passing through what the ISO pays EPMI minus losses for energy.
			   

		Other risks that we need to take look at as EPMI
			1)   Will the revenue stream coming in from the A/S payments put EPMI at risk of becoming a Creditor to the ISO instead of a Debtor.
			2)   EPMI reputation w/ the ISO if the Generator has perpetual non-performance issues. This could impact all of our A/S business if the ISO feels 
			       that EPMI is not able to meet its A/S obligation to the ISO on a consistent basis.
			3)   Need to make sure that they have language in the contract that covers EPMI and EES if we loss a dispute to the ISO. 
                                                4)   Risk to EPMI if the generator fails to deliver energy and the ISO takes back all capacity payment back to the last time in which EPMI
			       performed on an energy call. I think this is based on the entire EPMI portfolio not just for a specific unit. I will need to check on this item
			        Monday.
		

		Chris
                                                       
                                                

In STAT, they mean the following:

     Active - delivering commodity, billing has begun
     Submitted - the account has been DASR'ed, commodity is flowing, no
bill has been sent from the UDC
     Cancelled - the account never became active
     Closed - the account is no longer flowing commodity, last invoice has
been sent
     Deactive - the account has been sent to the utility to close, last
invoice has not been sent
     Pending - account is waiting for installation of a meter to being
flowing commodity

(Pam did I get all these correct?)

--Steve

Could you please help me by giving the defintions of the following CSC
terms.

                         Chris
>  -----Original Message-----

No problem, Steve is an attorney in Portland.

Thanks for getting me this info.!  I will relay this to CERS and if I have =
troubles, I'll conference in Steve - is he an attorney here in Houston?

Thanks again for getting back to me so quickly  - Amy

Amy,
=09This is Steve Hall's  response to the issue with CERS. If you need any h=
elp w/ this, he has volunteered to get on a conference call with CERS. Let =
me know if you need any further assistance on this item.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Chris,

The issue here is whether the CalPX or California Energy Resources Schedule=
r ("CERS") owes us $186,000 for the power we delivered to the CalPX from Fe=
bruary 1st through 6 under our block forward contracts.=09=09=09=09=09=09

The State of California, i.e., CERS, is responsible for payment of this pow=
er.  It is true that we scheduled the block forwards through the Cal PX on =
Feb. 1-6, and that we did not schedule this power through CERS until Februa=
ry 6 (delivery on the 7th).  But Governor Davis issued Emergency Orders D-2=
0-01 and D-21-01 on January 31st.  Under these Orders, the So. Cal. Edison =
and PG&E block forward contracts were "hereby commandeered by the State of =
California to be held subject to the control and coordination of the State =
of California."  The Orders were effective "immediately."  Because the Orde=
rs was effective on January 31st, the State had title to the contracts from=
 January 31st forward.  Section 8572 of the California Emergency Services A=
ct authorizes the Governor to commandeer private property, but requires the=
 State to pay the "reasonable value thereof."  Therefore, since the State o=
f California had legal title to the contracts and the power supplied under =
those contracts on February 1st, the State of California---through CERS---i=
s responsible for paying for power delivered on February 1st, and forward. =
=20

Responsibility for payment falls on the party with title to the power, not =
the party responsible for scheduling the power.  Just because the CalPX con=
tinued to schedule power for a few days while CERS got its act together doe=
s not mean that the PX was responsible for payment.  Once California took t=
itle to the power,---and all the benefits of having the power---it also ass=
umed responsibility for payment.=20

I would be happy to explain this to CERS, if you want.  Let me know.

Steve=20

Thank you

I'll take a look at this today, Chris.

Steve,
=09Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this =
a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try a=
nd put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is goi=
ng well for you.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Hi Chris,=09
=09
=09I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece t=
hey disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handl=
ing this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in F=
ebruary - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So t=
hey are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I n=
eed to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals =
so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I =
really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possib=
le exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remo=
ve these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

Yes

This meeting was originally set for 2pm on Tues., Sept. 25.

Will Wednesday, Sept. 26, 1:00-2:00pm work for you?
Please let me know.
Thanks, Paulett

(Greg, your meeting for 30 minutes w/Paige is still on for Tuesday, Sept. 25 at 2:00pm)

Could you please help me by giving the defintions of the following CSC terms.

					Chris
Chris do you know what the following coding means per CSC invoicing file:

Active
Submitted
Cancelled
Closed
Deactive
Pending

I am trying to reconcile what we believe the total deal population is for California Utilities (PG&E, SoCal, and SDG&E).

Steve

Work (503) 813-6904
Home (503) 534-0347
Valarie.Sabo@pacificorp.com

Joshua,

	Just a reminder that you where going to send me an update the initiatives that you and the group are working on.

								Chris
Guys -

Please review my amended requirements for the Baseline/Bandwidth project.  I
think the approach will be relatively simple, with a lot of data entry on
the side of our staff.  That notwithstanding, I think that our requirements
are pretty solid, with the exception of the code/calculations required for
actually establishing baselines/bands where they do not exist.  We will need
to establish processes and procedures for doing so; this for the staff
actually performing the contract-by-contract work.  We should discuss this
stuff again today.  thanks.

 <<Enron-DealTicketRqmts-Aug2001-PBC.doc>> 

> kpmg LLP  Information Risk Management
Joshua P. Galv?n
Senior Associate
700 Louisiana, Ste. 3200
Houston, Texas  77002
713/319-2082 (wrk)
713/256-8499 (mob)
jgalvan@kpmg.com

If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying, distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         

I will not be attending

Kindly select one of the voting buttons above to let me know whether or not you will be coming to the company picnic this Saturday.  If you are planning to attend, please select the appropriate button for the number of family members who will be accompanying you. If your family cannot attend, you may bring a guest.
 
Thank you!
Anna
x3834

Steve,
	I don't see the attachment. As far as the percentage of Calf. contracts that have  band consumption, my assumption is that it is quite high. I base this on our discussion w/ Dennis and my talks w/ Neil Bresnen. My understanding is that all contracts that where written after first quarter of 1999, have some type of  band consumption language in them.  I spoke w/ Joshua yesterday and I feel that we are making the progress that I would expect at this point. I would like to meet w/ you when I get back in Houston on Monday if you have the time. Also, Joshua is supposed to send me an update today so that I can better assess as to where we are at on the consumption band initiative.

			PS. Sorry I am late getting back w/ you, I could get into my e-mail yesterday but could not send out any e-mail. I still owe you the Project Phoenix   			       list. Also, do we still need to meet w/ Kristian and Murray?

									Chris

Attached is a spreadsheet created by KPMG with some results from CSC data and RPS testing done on California.  This is just for your information.  Do you have any idea what percentage of contracts will have a band consumption.  I am trying to understand your personnel needs to accomplish your objectives.  You can give me a call to discuss or just respond via email.  Thanks.

Steve
(713)345-8240

rav.sav@verizon.net <mailto:rav.sav@verizon.net>
17927 Vandohlah ln
Sherwood, Or 97140
 

Hi Chris.  
 
I know you must just be swamped.  Brett and I have been wondering how work is going for you and how Rachel, Raven and Savannah are.  Please forward me your home e-mail address and your physical address so that I can keep in touch with you guys through Rachel.  Tell everyone hello.
 
Holly

Thanks

Chris,

I will let David know, I called CSC on this and it is legit.

New customers...per Pat, this is going to get even more heavy.

Jim

Jim,
	Could you look into this and let them know that they need to put you or someone else in the VM group on the contact list going forward.

			Thanks
			Chris

Chris,

I left a message on you answering machine last Thursday at 4:36 p.m. (PST)
regarding higher loads noticed in PGE territory. I'm sending this email n
case you're out for a period of time.

I basically just noticed that load had risen above observed normal levels in
July for EPMISCE1, EPMIPGE1, EPMIPGE2, and EPMIPGE3. I was wondering if you
knew why this was happening? On my phone message I also indicted that I had
seen schedules going up as well and assumed that you may be picking up new
customers.

Thank you,

David Alvarez
Market Quality
(916) 608-5915
Dalvarez@caiso.com

Jim,
	Could you look into this and let them know that they need to put you or someone else in the VM group on the contact list going forward.

			Thanks
			Chris

Chris,

I left a message on you answering machine last Thursday at 4:36 p.m. (PST)
regarding higher loads noticed in PGE territory. I'm sending this email n
case you're out for a period of time.

I basically just noticed that load had risen above observed normal levels in
July for EPMISCE1, EPMIPGE1, EPMIPGE2, and EPMIPGE3. I was wondering if you
knew why this was happening? On my phone message I also indicted that I had
seen schedules going up as well and assumed that you may be picking up new
customers.

Thank you,

David Alvarez
Market Quality
(916) 608-5915
Dalvarez@caiso.com

Please use this updated doc., I just noticed that I butchered the name of Dennis Benevides

 
Attached is the update slides for Tuesday.  Chris as you will see Phase 5 needs some bullet point description.  If you don't have a chance to fill in I will come up with something.  You can reach me at x58240.  Thanks

 << File: Update information 91001.doc >> 

Amy,
=09This is Steve Hall's  response to the issue with CERS. If you need any h=
elp w/ this, he has volunteered to get on a conference call with CERS. Let =
me know if you need any further assistance on this item.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Chris,

The issue here is whether the CalPX or California Energy Resources Schedule=
r ("CERS") owes us $186,000 for the power we delivered to the CalPX from Fe=
bruary 1st through 6 under our block forward contracts.=09=09=09=09=09=09

The State of California, i.e., CERS, is responsible for payment of this pow=
er.  It is true that we scheduled the block forwards through the Cal PX on =
Feb. 1-6, and that we did not schedule this power through CERS until Februa=
ry 6 (delivery on the 7th).  But Governor Davis issued Emergency Orders D-2=
0-01 and D-21-01 on January 31st.  Under these Orders, the So. Cal. Edison =
and PG&E block forward contracts were "hereby commandeered by the State of =
California to be held subject to the control and coordination of the State =
of California."  The Orders were effective "immediately."  Because the Orde=
rs was effective on January 31st, the State had title to the contracts from=
 January 31st forward.  Section 8572 of the California Emergency Services A=
ct authorizes the Governor to commandeer private property, but requires the=
 State to pay the "reasonable value thereof."  Therefore, since the State o=
f California had legal title to the contracts and the power supplied under =
those contracts on February 1st, the State of California---through CERS---i=
s responsible for paying for power delivered on February 1st, and forward. =
=20

Responsibility for payment falls on the party with title to the power, not =
the party responsible for scheduling the power.  Just because the CalPX con=
tinued to schedule power for a few days while CERS got its act together doe=
s not mean that the PX was responsible for payment.  Once California took t=
itle to the power,---and all the benefits of having the power---it also ass=
umed responsibility for payment.=20

I would be happy to explain this to CERS, if you want.  Let me know.

Steve=20

Thank you

I'll take a look at this today, Chris.

Steve,
=09Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this =
a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try a=
nd put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is goi=
ng well for you.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Hi Chris,=09
=09
=09I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece t=
hey disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handl=
ing this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in F=
ebruary - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So t=
hey are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I n=
eed to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals =
so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I =
really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possib=
le exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remo=
ve these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

		ps. I may be staying in town until at least tomorrow morning, if so, I would still like to meet with you at your convenience.

						Chris

Guys -

Please review my amended requirements for the Baseline/Bandwidth project.  I
think the approach will be relatively simple, with a lot of data entry on
the side of our staff.  That notwithstanding, I think that our requirements
are pretty solid, with the exception of the code/calculations required for
actually establishing baselines/bands where they do not exist.  We will need
to establish processes and procedures for doing so; this for the staff
actually performing the contract-by-contract work.  We should discuss this
stuff again today.  thanks.

 <<Enron-DealTicketRqmts-Aug2001-PBC.doc>> 

> kpmg LLP  Information Risk Management
Joshua P. Galv?n
Senior Associate
700 Louisiana, Ste. 3200
Houston, Texas  77002
713/319-2082 (wrk)
713/256-8499 (mob)
jgalvan@kpmg.com

If you are not the intended recipient, any disclosure, copying, distribution
or any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance on it, is prohibited
and may be unlawful. When addressed to our clients any opinions or advice
contained in this email are subject to the terms and conditions expressed in
the governing KPMG client engagement letter.         

Paige,
	It has been requested that I fly back to Portland sometime today, so I will not get a chance to meet with you this week. I have attached a document with a  list of the variables that I thought needed to be captured to settle a consumption band contract. Please take a look at this and give me your input. Thank you very much for your help on this item.
 
				Chris
				503-807-8959
Date and Time change

Steve,
	I have heard nothing on my end about the status of the update meeting. I will update you the moment I hear something. I have not spoken to Paige as of this morning. I will track her down and reschedule this meeting and give you an update on the new time.

 

Have you heard if the update meeting was cancelled for this week or will be rescheduled?  If there still is a meeting this week we need to finish the update slides.  Did you get with Paige Grumulaitis or are you going to reschedule.  Let me know when you get a chance.

Steve
x58240

Cell:        503-807-8959
Houston:  713-345-6120
Portland: 503-464-8219
Home:     503-625-3541

Steve,
	Could you please send me:
				1) Glenn's presentation
				2)  Your status report
				3)  Your itinerary for travel to Cincinnati

		Also, I have some updates on the status of the bandwidth project. Let me know if you want to see them. Have a good weekend.

			Thanks
			Chris

Murray,
	I left a message w/ Ken yesterday, but I have not heard back from him. Could you please follow up w/ him or Michelle to make sure this goes out. I got the ok from Jeannette for us to send the Audit today.

 I am waiting on one more item, but this is the latest

I will be unable to attend the conference call that we have set for today. I will have some time open late Monday afternoon(central time) if we could reschedule for then. I apologize for the inconvenience this may have caused anyone.

							Chris
						

Please use the following to access the conf call:

Date:  Friday, 10/12/01
Time:  8:00am PST (10:00am CST)
Call number:  888-469-0869
Passcode:  26720
Confirmation:  9628887

No Problem

-~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~-

Meeting Change Request: 
Conflict...

Conflict at 3 p.m... Can we switch to 4 p.m..?

Chris,

Attached is the Baseline Status Document.

Thanks,

annie
 <<BaselineStatus .doc>> 

Thanks a ton for you help on this item

=09=09Chris

Chris,

The issue here is whether the CalPX or California Energy Resources Schedule=
r ("CERS") owes us $186,000 for the power we delivered to the CalPX from Fe=
bruary 1st through 6 under our block forward contracts.=09=09=09=09=09=09

The State of California, i.e., CERS, is responsible for payment of this pow=
er.  It is true that we scheduled the block forwards through the Cal PX on =
Feb. 1-6, and that we did not schedule this power through CERS until Februa=
ry 6 (delivery on the 7th).  But Governor Davis issued Emergency Orders D-2=
0-01 and D-21-01 on January 31st.  Under these Orders, the So. Cal. Edison =
and PG&E block forward contracts were "hereby commandeered by the State of =
California to be held subject to the control and coordination of the State =
of California."  The Orders were effective "immediately."  Because the Orde=
rs was effective on January 31st, the State had title to the contracts from=
 January 31st forward.  Section 8572 of the California Emergency Services A=
ct authorizes the Governor to commandeer private property, but requires the=
 State to pay the "reasonable value thereof."  Therefore, since the State o=
f California had legal title to the contracts and the power supplied under =
those contracts on February 1st, the State of California---through CERS---i=
s responsible for paying for power delivered on February 1st, and forward. =
=20

Responsibility for payment falls on the party with title to the power, not =
the party responsible for scheduling the power.  Just because the CalPX con=
tinued to schedule power for a few days while CERS got its act together doe=
s not mean that the PX was responsible for payment.  Once California took t=
itle to the power,---and all the benefits of having the power---it also ass=
umed responsibility for payment.=20

I would be happy to explain this to CERS, if you want.  Let me know.

Steve=20

Thank you

I'll take a look at this today, Chris.

Steve,
=09Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this =
a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try a=
nd put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is goi=
ng well for you.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Hi Chris,=09
=09
=09I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece t=
hey disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handl=
ing this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in F=
ebruary - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So t=
hey are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I n=
eed to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals =
so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I =
really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possib=
le exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remo=
ve these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

Thanks for the heads up
Regarding the meeting on Tuesday - MSAP is the system interface between Stat, Lodestar, HP, and Altra with SAP.  Currently we have a contractor monitoring the payment request files against the CSC electronic files, looking for duplicate payments, and sending the files to SAP.  He also manages issues that come up with CSC.  EES IT is in the process of moving the interface to a SQL server and should be done soon.  Since our IT is taking over the system aspects, we need someone permanent to take over the business aspects.  Mary Lynne and I were talking about the business functions that go along with monitoring this interface and think it has alot of settlement aspects, which might fit into Murray's world.  This meeting is just to talk about the responsibilities, where we think the best place is for it to reside and the transition.  

Jeff,
	I will be sending a representative from my group to this meeting.

					Chris

I just talked with Dan Rothfuss of CG&E and it looks like Tuesday, October 23 will work out best for a meeting in Cincinnati for CG&E to walk us through their standard supplier presentation and for us to ask whatever detailed questions we may have.  

The link below will take you to the powerpoint presentation they will walk us through.  Please let me know asap if you have other areas that you want to address 
or any specific questions.
http://www.cinergycge.com/about_cinergy_corp/cge_customer_choice/Supplier_Presentations/default.asp

Also, please confirm if you plan to attend or if there is anyone else not on this distribution that would have an interest in attending.

Thanks,
Jeff 

Both, I would like to have a complete understanding of what MSAL will provide upon completion. Also, I would like to set up a meeting with you sometime tomorrow to get your input on some of the issues I am running into on the lack of a given baseline in most of the contracts that the KPMG group are going through. Thanks for your help on these items.

											Chris
										      503-807-8959

Chris, I know you asked me for some information related to the MSAL after our staff meeting yesterday.  Exactly what do you want to see?  A process flow or the data points we are considering for the system.  Please advise so I know better what to provide.  Thanks	

Deborah,
	9:00 works for me

I'd like to set up a conference call Wed. morning. Both Tom Riley and I are available.

Please let me know if 9:00 PST will work for you. If not, please let me know what other time will work in the a.m.

We will set up a call in number.

Thank you,

Debbie
Debbie O'Jones
Enron Energy Services

Phone:	925.543.3863
Cell:	925.437.3165
Pager:	888.991.5814
dojones@enron.com

There seems to have been some confusion on pricing.  I believe that Chris was going to provide the pricing to John, and we have not seen that yet this week.

Do we need to set up another conference call since Chris could not attend the last one?  Please advise.

Tom:

I talked to Dave Bohler at UCSF Friday regarding the cogen calculation and completion of his business invoices.

I told him to expect it to take at least a week for us to complete our cogen calculations after we received the files from PG&E.
His expectations are that we should have calculations completed by Friday, Oct. 12.

Several weeks ago Dave requested the BI's to be complete by Friday, Oct. 5. I explained that I talked with our billing group (Kimberly), and it would take until Oct. 12 to get the BI's complete.

He is fine with both items. Dave said he appreciated the update, and that his main concern is that he is notified in advance if we can't meet a date we have committed to. 

Kimberly:  

?	Does the group in Houston have all the information from the PG&E files they received to complete the cogen calculation?
?	Please let me know ASAP if there is anything that will delay us from completing both items by Friday, Oct. 12.

Thanks,

Debbie

 

Let me check my calendar for tomorrow. I have been completely booked since I walked in the door on Monday. I will give you a call in the morning once I lock down a time.

							Thanks
							 Chris
You and I need to attempt the consumption band maps and the penalty maps - when do you have time to do those?

Sorry bud,
	I appreciate you taking the time to e-mail me. I am in town every week, why don't you I and Kerry go and grab a bite to eat. I would love to swing by and see the family. It is awesome to hear how well things are going for you and now Kerry. My cell number is 503-807-8959 and my Houston number is 345-6120

										Chris

Well just wanted to drop you a line and say Happy Birthday.

Hope your hands heal soon.  I assume you haven't responded to my emails
because you probably broke both hands and can't type right now.

Will need cover timelines when you meet w/ Murray

		 

Kristin,

	I apologize for being so tardy in responding to your e-mail. Get with Mary Vasquez to arrange a meeting sometime next week.

									Chris

Chris,
I left you a phone message yesterday requesting some of your time to
discuss Wholesale Settlements within the Risk Management.  Since my
voicemail isn't setup, I thought I would also send an email.  Murray O'Neil
suggested we meet with you.  Please let me know when you are available.
Thanks,
Kristin

            Kristin M. Patey                                                                             

Chris,
Do you have availability on Monday afternoon or Tuesday to meet with the
Project Genesys Business Architecture team?  Please let me know what days
and times work well for you.
Thanks,
Kristin

                                                                                                         
            William S. Tinkler,                                                                          
            09/04/2001 11:55 AM                                                                          
                                                                                                         
                                                                                                         

Good Morning Chris,

I'm working with Craig Everson and Mark Feist on the Business Architecture
Phase of the Genesys Project. Mark identified you as EWS's manager
responsible for Wholesale Settlements within the Risk Management Group. I
would like to meet with you Thursday to ask a series of questions about
this functional area. Please let me know when you can meet and I will
schedule a conference room.

Thanks,

Scott

P.S. If there are additional people that would add value to this
discussion, please let me know.

This message is for the designated recipient only and may contain
privileged or confidential information.  If you have received it in error,
please notify the sender immediately and delete the original.  Any other
use of the email by you is prohibited.

Ken,

	Please include in your finding that the variance between the consumption data and the SQMD file is minimal. If that is not the case, please feel free to give me a call at 503-807-8959.

					 

 

I will be in town this weekend.

These cookies really are great.

K

>>>Enjoy it!!!!!!!!!!!!!
>>>
>>>Subject: NEIMAN MARCUS COOKIES
>>>
>>>You've gotta love it.
>>>
>>>A little background: Neiman-Marcus, if you don't know already is a very
>>>expensive store i.e. they sell your typical $8.00 T-shirt for $50.00.
>>>
>>>Let's let them have it!!! THIS IS A TRUE STORY:
>>>
>>>My daughter and I had just finished a salad at a Neiman-Marcus Cafe in
>>>Dallas
>>>and decided to have a small dessert. Because both of us are such cookie
>>>lovers, we decided to try the "Neiman-Marcus cookie."  It was so
>>>excellent
>>>that I asked if they would give me the recipe and the waitress said with
>>>a
>>>small frown, "I'm afraid not but, you can buy the recipe."
>>>
>>>Well, I asked how much, and she responded, "Only two fifty, it's a great
>>>deal!" I agreed with approval, "Just add it to my tab," I told her.
>>>Thirty
>>>days later, I received my VISA statement and it was $285.00. I looked
>>>again
>>>and I remembered I had only spent $9.95 for two salads and about $20.00
>>>for a
>>>scarf. As I glanced at the bottom of the statement, it said, "Cookie
>>>Recipe-$250.00" That was outrageous!
>>>
>>>I called Neiman's Accounting Dept.and told them the waitress said it was
>>>"two-fifty," which clearly does not mean "two hundred and ! fifty
>>>dollars" by
>>>any POSSIBLE* interpretation of the phrase. Neiman-Marcus refused to
>>>budge.
>>>They would not refund my money, because according to them, "What the
>>>waitress
>>>told you is not our problem. You have already seen the recipe. We
>>>absolutely
>>>will not refund your money at this point."
>>>
>>>I explained to her the criminal statues which govern fraud in Texas. I
>>>threatened to refer them to the Better Business Bureau and the State
>>>Attorney
>>>General Office for engaging in fraud. I was basically told, Do what you
>>>want.
>>>Don't bother thinking of how you can get even, or even try and get any of
>>>your money back." I just said,"Okay, you folks got my $250,and now I'm
>>>going
>>>to have $250.00 worth of fun." I told her that I was going to see to it
>>>that
>>>every Cookie lover in the United States with an e-mail account has a
>>>$250.00
>>>cookie recipe from Neiman-Marcus...for free.
>>>She replied, "I wish you wouldn't do this.! "
>>>I said, "Well, you should have thought of that before you ripped me off,"
>>>and
>>>slammed down the phone on her.
>>>
>>>So here it is!!! Please, please, please pass it on to everyone you can
>>>possibly think of. I paid $250 for this...I don't want Neiman-Marcus to
>>>*ever* get another penny off of this recipe....
>>>
>>>  NEIMAN MARCUS COOKIES (Recipe may be halved)
>>>
>>>  2 cups butter
>>>
>>>  4 cups flour
>>>
>>>  2 tsp. soda
>>>
>>>  2 cups sugar
>>>
>>>  5 cups blended oatmeal ***
>>>
>>>  24 oz. chocolate chips
>>>
>>>  2 cups brown sugar
>>>
>>>  1 tsp. salt
>>>
>>>  1 8 oz. Hershey Bar (grated)
>>>
>>>  4 eggs
>>>
>>>  2 tsp. baking powder
>>>
>>>  2 tsp. vanilla
>>>
>>>  3 cups chopped nuts (your choice)
>>>
>>>
>>>Measure oatmeal and blend in a blender to a fine powder.
>>>
>>>Cream the butter and both sugars.
>>>
>>>Add eggs and vanilla, mix together with flour,oatmeal, salt, baking
>>>powder,
>>>and soda.
>>>
>>>Add chocolate chips, Hershey Bar and nuts.
>>>
>>>Roll into balls and place two inches apart on a cookie sheet
>>>
>>>Bake for 10 minutes at 375 degrees.
>>>
>>>  Makes 112 cookies.
>>>
>>>  PLEASE SEND TO EVERY PERSON YOU KNOW WHO HAS AN E-MAIL ADDRESS!!
>>>
>>>Have fun!!!
>>>
>>>This is not a joke-this is a true story.
>>>
>>>Ride free, citizens!!!
>>>
>>>
>>
>

mail_=badmojo1966@yahoo.com
Invia=Send

If it is the number at the bottom of the card, then it is 22692.

if you would like your badge picture used... please supply us with your badge number so that we may obtain it from security...

Thank you,

HRGIM
Please update my Photo w/ the latest picture that is on my Enron badge. The photo being used is from and old badge.

					Chris Stokley

3:00 sounds good

12-2 and 3on

Paige,
	When do you have am opening in your schedule for tomorrow's meeting?

				Chris

Heads up
 
Mary Lynne - I spoke with Pam/Chris S./Mike F.about this issue.  Since Chris is  charged with improving the general settlement process including this specific inssue, he has asked me to be available to answer all his questions and defer all questions I receive to him.  He stated that he understood the urgency and attention this issue commands and will respond accordingly.   
 
 
 
George - Do you know anything about this problem?  I would assume you would have seen large discrepancies b/w meter and scheduled.  Would appreciate a response asap as this has a great deal of attention!

Please update my Photo w/ the latest picture that is on my Enron badge. The photo being used is from and old badge.

					Chris Stokley

 I am waiting on one more item, but this is the latest

Kelley,
	I am guessing that you do not have good news for us, since I have not heard back from you.

Quite alright, it served as a reminder

Chris:
I am sorry that the mail got forwarded to you. I did not intend to.
Regards,
Rajat Khater
x55145
Rajat Khater
10/17/2001 10:22 AM
Rajat Khater
10/15/2001 05:20 PM
Chris:
This is further to our conversation in the afternoon.
I am doing a project to value real time power consumption information. Currently the forecast is done based on old data and there is a variance between the forecast, the load block purchased and the actual power consumption. The variance between actual and the forecast  entails penalties. I would like to know more about the structure of penalty and the amount being paid in Californai by EES where it serves physical power. Some of the questions that I have is:
How is penalty determined.
Are their other expenses apart from penalty that is levied on EES for the variance.
Any other information in this context that can help in the valuation.
What are other things involved in the settlement process that can help in determining the value of real-time information.
I would like to meet with you to discuss this further.
Regards,
Rajat Khater
7133455145

Get with Mary Vasquez and set up an appointment for sometime tomorrow morning.

Rajat Khater
10/15/2001 05:20 PM
Chris:
This is further to our conversation in the afternoon.
I am doing a project to value real time power consumption information. Currently the forecast is done based on old data and there is a variance between the forecast, the load block purchased and the actual power consumption. The variance between actual and the forecast  entails penalties. I would like to know more about the structure of penalty and the amount being paid in Californai by EES where it serves physical power. Some of the questions that I have is:
How is penalty determined.
Are their other expenses apart from penalty that is levied on EES for the variance.
Any other information in this context that can help in the valuation.
What are other things involved in the settlement process that can help in determining the value of real-time information.
I would like to meet with you to discuss this further.
Regards,
Rajat Khater
7133455145

This is for the 12:00 meeting

Conference Room EB8c1 telephone number:  713-345-3391

Paulett,
=09What is the phone number for that room? Murray O'Neil calling in from Po=
rtland.

REMINDER:

=09Calendar Entry=09

Brief description:
Date:
Time:

Systems Meeting - Intermediate Solutions & Intramonth Book - EB8c1
07/31/2001
02:00 PM - 03:30 PM

Detailed description:
Sent for Sean Holmes/Paige Grumulaitis/Glenn Dickson

MEETING RESCHEDULE NOTICE:
THIS IS AN IMPORTANT MEETING, PLEASE PLAN TO ATTEND

Please respond to this invitation.

Thanks,
Paulett

Invitations have been sent to:=09Sean A Holmes/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Holmes/H=
OU/EES@EES>, Paige Grumulaitis/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Grumulaitis/HOU/EES@EES>=
, Glenn Dickson/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Dickson/HOU/EES@EES>, Anthony Dayao/HOU=
/EES@EES <mailto:Dayao/HOU/EES@EES>, Phil Layton/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Layton=
/HOU/EES@EES>, Scott Mills/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Mills/HOU/EES@EES>, Beth Apo=
llo/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Apollo/Enron@EnronXGate>, Kenny Ha/HOU/EES@EES=
 <mailto:Ha/HOU/EES@EES>, Larrissa Sharma/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Sharma/HOU/EE=
S@EES>, Steven Gullion/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Gullion/HOU/EES@EES>, Todd Taylo=
r/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Taylor/HOU/EES@EES>, Todd Busby/NA/Enron@Enron <mailt=
o:Busby/NA/Enron@Enron>, Jeff Richter/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Richter/Enro=
n@EnronXGate>, Murray P ONeil/ENRON@enronXgate <mailto:ONeil/ENRON@enronXga=
te>, Chris Stokley/ENRON@enronXgate <mailto:Stokley/ENRON@enronXgate>, Bern=
ey C Aucoin/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Aucoin/Enron@EnronXGate>, Rogers Hernd=
on/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Herndon/Enron@EnronXGate>, Todd Perry/Enron@Enr=
onXGate <mailto:Perry/Enron@EnronXGate>, John A Pierce/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:=
Pierce/HOU/EES@EES>
Optional invitees:=09Viviana Palma/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Palma/HOU/EES@EES>, =
Yvette Stevenson/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Stevenson/HOU/EES@EES>, Blanca Carriza=
les/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Carrizales/Enron@EnronXGate>, Kathy Bass/HOU/E=
ES@EES <mailto:Bass/HOU/EES@EES>, Debra Coleman/ENRON@enronXgate <mailto:Co=
leman/ENRON@enronXgate>, La Donna Finnels-Neal/Enron@EnronXGate <mailto:Fin=
nels-Neal/Enron@EnronXGate>, Christina Liscano/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Liscano/=
HOU/EES@EES>, Tasha Lair/HOU/EES@EES <mailto:Lair/HOU/EES@EES>

Diann,
	I have got to get an update on the items below. Please send me your status on these items by close of business today. 

									Chris

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Very interesting, how do you get access to expertfinder?

Well, according to expertfinder she has a BA from the University of Phoenix... interestingly, UoP is a publicly traded company providing on-line degrees.

Go figure

Kerry,
	Send me your updated info(Phone numbers, address etc.) Hope all as well and I look forward to seeing you next week. I think you have all of my info, if not, let me know.

La. came out of this unscathed ;)

Alabama 
     At least we're not Mississippi 
Alaska 
     11,623 Eskimos can't be wrong 
Arizona 
     But it's a dry heat 
Arkansas 
     Litterasy ain't everthing 
California 
     As seen on TV 
Colorado 
     If you don't ski, don't bother 
Connecticut 
     Like Massachusetts, only dirtier and with less character 
Deleware 
     We really do like the chemicals in our water 
Florida 
     Ask us about our grandkids 
     Welcome to God's waiting room 
Georgia 
     We put the "fun" in Fundamentalist Extremism 
Hawaii 
     Haka tiki mou sha'ami leeki toru (Death to mainland scum but 
leave your money) 
Idaho 
     More than just potatoes.....Well okay, we're not, but the potatoes 
sure are real good 
Illinois 
     Please don't pronounce the "s" 
Indiana 
     2 billion years tidal wave free 
Iowa 
     We do amazing things with corn 
     Home of James Tiberius Kirk 
Kansas 
     First of the rectangle states 
Kentucky 
     Five million people; fifteen last names 
Maine 
     We're really cold, but we have cheap lobster 
Maryland 
     A thinking man's Delaware 
Massachusetts 
     Our taxes are lower than Sweden's (For most tax brackets) 
Michigan 
     First line of defense from Canadians 
Minnesota 
     10,000 lakes and 10,000,000 mosquitos 
     Our Governor can beat up your Governor 
Mississippi 
     Come feel better about your own state 
Missouri 
     Your federal flood relief tax dollars at work 
Montana 
     Land of the big sky, the Unabomber, right-wing crazies, and very 
little else 
Nebraska 
     Ask about our state motto contest 
Nevada 
     Whores and poker 
New Hampshire 
     Go away and leave us alone 
New Jersey 
     Ya wanna ##$%##! motto? I got yer ##$%##! motto right here! 
New Mexico 
     Lizards make excellent pets 
New York 
     You have the right to remain silent, you have the right to an 
attorney.... 
North Carolina 
     Tobacco is a vegetable 
North Dakota 
     We really are one of the 50 states! 
Ohio 
     We wish we were in Michigan 
Oklahoma 
     Like the play, only no singing 
Oregon 
     Spotted Owl...It's what's for dinner 
Pennsylvania 
     Cook with coal 
Rhode Island 
     We're not REALLY an island 
South Carolina 
     Remember the Civil War? We didn't actually surrender 
South Dakota 
     Closer than North Dakota 
Tennesse 
     The educashum state 
Texas 
     S? hablo Ing'les (Yes, I speak English) 
Utah 
     Our Jesus is better than your Jesus 
Vermont 
     Yep 
Virginia 
     Who says government stiffs and slackjaw yokels don't mix? 
Washington 
     Help! We're overrun by nerds and slackers 
Washington DC 
     Wanna be Mayor? 
West Virginia 
     One big happy family - really! 
Wisconsin 
     Eat cheese or die 
     Come cut our cheese 
Wyoming 
     Wynot? 

Best regards,

Keven Malkewitz

  e-mail:   keven_malkewitz@ncsu.edu

  Phone:   (919) 515-6953

Address:   Keven Malkewitz 
                North Carolina State University
                College of Management/Department of Business Management
                Campus Box 7229
                Raleigh, North Carolina 27695-7229

Actually, that was per my request when I was working on the intra-month book. However, I was wondering if it is possible to get the data loaded into MDMA on a daily basis so we can pull from their.

Chris, you requested a copy of the MV90 report for Meter Operations. This report can be found at L:/EESO/MV90/EXPORTS/DAILY MV90 EXTRACTS/. This report was set up several months ago on the Enron/CSC shared drive per the request of Mike Frazier and Maurice Winter. Please let me know if you have any issues locating the report. If you have any questions about the report you can reach Pat Priestley or Di'onne Williams of CSC at 713-632-8508 or 713-632-8750 respectively. 

We look forward to meeting with you on Wednesday at 11:00. The agenda is to discuss Meter Operations including the ISO audit and arrangements for a metering workshop for Enron and CSC. Meeting room is 1170 at the Enron building. 

Thanks, Cara Tammaro, CSC

Kate,
	Returned your call, but your phone would not put me through to voice mail. Any help you can give Pam would be quite beneficial and appreciated by both her and I. She is getting zero help down here and that is why I pointed her you your direction. I have not dug down in the process, but is seems to be way to  manual for all parties involved. I just want the process improved so that it takes some of the manual error work out the flow. Give me a call at 713-345-6120 if you need anything.

								Thanks
								 Chris

Pam -

I am your Hour-Ahead, or Real Time, contact. I've attached all of my contact information below. You can also find this information attached to the EES Hourly sheet I send you each day.

Kysa is your Day-Ahead contact. Her phone number is 503-464-7486.

If you can tell me more specifically a) what kind of problems you're running into with the CARP report and our sheets, and b) whether the problems are related to the EES Daily sheet (which outlines day-ahead deals) or the EES Hourly sheet (which outlines real time deals), then I can be of more assistance. As I said in my last e-mail, I've gone over all the variances you've sent, and none appear to be related to hourly deals. I've also attached the reconciliation model I maintain each day so you can see how I've tied out Enpower to the hourly model for every day in September.

Please let me know if I can do anything else to help.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Real Time Trading Support
Office/503-464-7744
Cell/503-819-2181
Fax/503-464-7996

 << File: EES Sept. Reconciliation.xls >> 

Kysa/Kate, we are still having problems with the real time sheets and the CARP/Enpower report not tieing.  Given this, Chris would like to know what group in your office is preparing your Reat-time/Daily excel spreadsheets and is there a contact person for this group?

Thanks,

Pam  

 << File: EES October Daily.xls >> 

Kysa M. Alport

Geiv,
	Just curious, who do you think has time to go over the mistakes that you may have made in these spreadsheets? For the time being, Pam will take care of this process for you. In return, you will be given a 24hr timeline to get all discrepancies answered and cleaned up in Deal Tracker. I feel this is a fair timeline since Pam is the person doing the leg work to identify all discrepancies. If you have any questions or suggestion on this process, feel free to call me at 56120.

							Chris Stokley
FYI...

Pam

Pam, I am sorry, but I do not have the time to spare to go over all the deals in these files. Please indicate what specific dates or deal numbers you have questions about and I will go back and address those. 

Thanks,
Geiv

Gang,
	I want to make it very clear that the questions I am having Pam ask are not meant to put anyone one on the defensive. From what I can tell so far, we have a process that is at best inefficient and at worst broken. Pam will be asking a lot of questions going forward because she does not know your process and she is on task to learn it. Please have patience and offer guidance on how we can get these issues resolved so we can better put to use everyone's time. We are all paid to fix problems, not point fingers. I have a lot of faith in the people in the Portland office, that is why I am asking Pam to go to you guys for guidance. If anyone has any issues going forward please feel free to contact me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me. 

							          Thanks
								Chris

Pam -

I am your Hour-Ahead, or Real Time, contact. I've attached all of my contact information below. You can also find this information attached to the EES Hourly sheet I send you each day.

Kysa is your Day-Ahead contact. Her phone number is 503-464-7486.

If you can tell me more specifically a) what kind of problems you're running into with the CARP report and our sheets, and b) whether the problems are related to the EES Daily sheet (which outlines day-ahead deals) or the EES Hourly sheet (which outlines real time deals), then I can be of more assistance. As I said in my last e-mail, I've gone over all the variances you've sent, and none appear to be related to hourly deals. I've also attached the reconciliation model I maintain each day so you can see how I've tied out Enpower to the hourly model for every day in September.

Please let me know if I can do anything else to help.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Real Time Trading Support
Office/503-464-7744
Cell/503-819-2181
Fax/503-464-7996

 << File: EES Sept. Reconciliation.xls >> 

Kysa/Kate, we are still having problems with the real time sheets and the CARP/Enpower report not tieing.  Given this, Chris would like to know what group in your office is preparing your Reat-time/Daily excel spreadsheets and is there a contact person for this group?

Thanks,

Pam  

 << File: EES October Daily.xls >> 

Kysa M. Alport

Holly: HHunsucker@austin.rr.com
Rachel: Rav.sav@verizon.com

		As far a Greg W. goes, no not as of yet.

Hey Stokley,

So I'm still waiting for the email address of Rachel and Holly......when you get a chance, could you send them my way?    Also, saw the press release on Greg Wolfe, did he take anyone with him?  Just curious.  

Hope things are well there.  Talk to ya soon.

Monica

Works for me

Sorry, but I have a previous engagement that slipped my mind.  We will
have to move this back a week.  Let's plan on October 25th.  Will this
work for everybody?

Chris, sorry to interrupt your meeting.  

Let's all get together for supper at my house on Thursday October 18th
around 7:00pm.  If you can come earlier feel free to do so.

Kerry, bring the family.
Chris, I don't know if your family is down here or not, but if so then
they are invited as well.  Just give me a call and let me know if you
can make it.  My work number is in my signature.  My home number is
281-516-0743.  Best way to get directions is by using www.mapquest.com.
my address is 19526 Rocky Bank Drive, Tomball Tx, 77375-7751.  Mapquest
will give you perfect directions.

Regards,
KMJ

Kevin M. Jones
Systems Engineer
Compaq Computer Corporation 
20555 State Highway 249, MS 090501
Houston, TX 77070-2698

Phone: 281-514-7828
Fax: 28-514-9168
email: kevin.jones@compaq.com <mailto:kevin.jones@compaq.com>

Sorry bud,
	I appreciate you taking the time to e-mail me. I am in town
every week, why don't you I and Kerry go and grab a bite to eat. I would
love to swing by and see the family. It is awesome to hear how well
things are going for you and now Kerry. My cell number is 503-807-8959
and my Houston number is 345-6120

	
Chris

Well just wanted to drop you a line and say Happy Birthday.

Hope your hands heal soon.  I assume you haven't responded to my emails
because you probably broke both hands and can't type right now.

Steve,
	I would like you to be in this meeting when we lock down a time and date/

Murray and Chris, we made good progress last week on the approach that best meets the Everest kick off and as likely coordinates most effectively across the impacted groups.  I'd like to get with you to review status and explore more carefully impact / interactions on your other activities.  I've just started talking carefully with Vivian and Neal, to resume tomorrow afternoon.  Can you suggest a time when we could meet?  Thanks.

Glenn

Thank you

I'll take a look at this today, Chris.

Steve,
	Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try and put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is going well for you.

							Chris

Hi Chris,	
	
	I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece they disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handling this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in February - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So they are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I need to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possible exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remove these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

FYI
Jeff,
	I will be sending a representative from my group to this meeting.

					Chris

I just talked with Dan Rothfuss of CG&E and it looks like Tuesday, October 23 will work out best for a meeting in Cincinnati for CG&E to walk us through their standard supplier presentation and for us to ask whatever detailed questions we may have.  

The link below will take you to the powerpoint presentation they will walk us through.  Please let me know asap if you have other areas that you want to address 
or any specific questions.
http://www.cinergycge.com/about_cinergy_corp/cge_customer_choice/Supplier_Presentations/default.asp

Also, please confirm if you plan to attend or if there is anyone else not on this distribution that would have an interest in attending.

Thanks,
Jeff 

I agree with the content of John's e-mail except for the pricing delivery date. I will not have the pricing completed until sometime late Monday night. I am in flight to Houston until 2:00CST, at which point I will be in meeting until late Monday evening. I looked at the queries this weekend, so it should not take long to put the necessary fixes in place.  Everyone on this e-mail will have the pricing information in their e-mail when they walk in on Tuesday morning. I apologize if I did not make that clear during our phone conversation. Also, I would like to have a discussion at some point on how we will handle this customer going forward. My thanks to John for taking the time to clarify my concerns.

									Chris

After speaking with Chris this afternoon I believe the status of the UCSF pricing to be as follows:

1.  Chris examined the volumetric data and the pricing information this morning and determined that there was clearly an error that needs to be resolved.  It is this error that prevented Chris from delivering a price at the conference call this morning.

2.  Given the billing errors that we believe have made in computing the January 2000 - January 2001 payments, Chris does not want to compound these errors by giving UCSF a price for February 2001 - August 2001 based on information that he has determined to be incorrect.

3.  Chris can deliver pricing for February 2001 - August 2001 on Monday afternoon but he would like to do with the understanding that this price is to be used solely for internal purposes.  If it is necessary to deliver a price to UCSF at Tuesday's meeting, Chris requests that we make it clear that Tuesday's price is a preliminary price.  We will need to obtain actualized data from the California ISO before giving UCSF a definitive price.

I hope this helps everyone.  Unless I hear otherwise I will speak with each of you at 1:30 PST/3:30 CST Monday afternoon.  Chris, I apologize in advance if I have in any way misinterpreted our phone call this afternoon.

John McMullan
(713) 345-1751

Thank you sir

You got it.  No more notifications as of now.

Pete

Pete,
	Please take me off of the distribution list for this e-mail.
			
				Thanks
				  me

Processing Generation Meter Data for Effective Date: 10/20/01
Data file has been sent to ISO.
Generation Meter Data was successfully imported.

I was correct

Sorry for the delay in getting back to you.  I was on vacation last week and you know how that is trying to get ready to go and then getting swamped upon return.  I regret to tell you that I am not going to accept the position and I am going to stay put until the beginning of next year.  I have family and personal reasons why I do not want to accept the position.  I hope that this does not discount me from future positions that may become available and I hope you will keep me in mind.  I appreciate you & Murray considering me, because I respect your work and opinions.  Please keep in touch with me.  Thanks!

Kelley,
	I am guessing that you do not have good news for us, since I have not heard back from you.

Pete,
	Please take me off of the distribution list for this e-mail.
			
				Thanks
				  me

Processing Generation Meter Data for Effective Date: 10/20/01
Data file has been sent to ISO.
Generation Meter Data was successfully imported.

Sent this last night but it bounced back this morning. I have an opening in=
 my schedule at 3:00 central this afternoon.

Gang,
I was out of the office from Friday morning until Wednesday morning. I trie=
d to check my voice mail during that time period but was unable to do so b/=
c of a problem due my moving to a new location on Friday. I just now got ac=
cess to my voice mail which was full of messages of you guys trying to reac=
h me for a conference call. My apologies for this mishap, please feel free =
to call me in the future on my cell at 503-807-8959. If you do not get a re=
turn phone call within a few hours, contact Mary Vasquez at 5-6349. My cell=
 is Portland based and has a tendency to lose messages or give them to me i=
n an untimely manner. As far as the issue at hand, I completed the ExPost p=
ricing last week and would be more than happy to go over it w/ whoever is a=
vailable. Please get w/ Mary and have here set up a schedule for us to meet=
 tomorrow at what ever opening I have in my schedule. Once again, I am sorr=
y for the late response to such an urgent matter. I can also be reached at =
my home number on the weekend which is 503-625-3541.
This is to confirm a conference call for Monday, 10/22/01 regarding UCSF Co=
gen:
Date:=09Monday, 10/22/01
=09Time:  8:00am PST / 10:00am CST
=09Call Number:  888-329-7124
=09Passcode:  10197
=09Confirmation:  9853584

Please notify Debbie O'Jones at 925-543-3863 if you won't be able to
participate.

Thanks,
Michele

Hey fellas, 
	It looks like I get be the wishy washy guy this week. I will need to work late tomorrow trying to get a few deliverables done by Friday. I still want to get together with you guys, since I could use the good company these days. Let me know what works for you two and I will make sure and work around the date. 

		Ps. No Kerry, this does not mean that you get the option to bail on Kevin and I at the next scheduled date.

Sorry, but I have a previous engagement that slipped my mind.  We will
have to move this back a week.  Let's plan on October 25th.  Will this
work for everybody?

Chris, sorry to interrupt your meeting.  

Let's all get together for supper at my house on Thursday October 18th
around 7:00pm.  If you can come earlier feel free to do so.

Kerry, bring the family.
Chris, I don't know if your family is down here or not, but if so then
they are invited as well.  Just give me a call and let me know if you
can make it.  My work number is in my signature.  My home number is
281-516-0743.  Best way to get directions is by using www.mapquest.com.
my address is 19526 Rocky Bank Drive, Tomball Tx, 77375-7751.  Mapquest
will give you perfect directions.

Regards,
KMJ

Kevin M. Jones
Systems Engineer
Compaq Computer Corporation 
20555 State Highway 249, MS 090501
Houston, TX 77070-2698

Phone: 281-514-7828
Fax: 28-514-9168
email: kevin.jones@compaq.com <mailto:kevin.jones@compaq.com>

Sorry bud,
	I appreciate you taking the time to e-mail me. I am in town
every week, why don't you I and Kerry go and grab a bite to eat. I would
love to swing by and see the family. It is awesome to hear how well
things are going for you and now Kerry. My cell number is 503-807-8959
and my Houston number is 345-6120

	
Chris

Well just wanted to drop you a line and say Happy Birthday.

Hope your hands heal soon.  I assume you haven't responded to my emails
because you probably broke both hands and can't type right now.

Gang,
=09I was out of the office from Friday morning until Wednesday morning. I t=
ried to check my voice mail during that time period but was unable to do so=
 b/c of a problem due my moving to a new location on Friday. I just now got=
 access to my voice mail which was full of messages of you guys trying to r=
each me for a conference call. My apologies for this mishap, please feel fr=
ee to call me in the future on my cell at 503-807-8959. If you do not get a=
 return phone call within a few hours, contact Mary Vasquez at 5-6349. My c=
ell is Portland based and has a tendency to lose messages or give them to m=
e in an untimely manner. As far as the issue at hand, I completed the ExPos=
t pricing last week and would be more than happy to go over it w/ whoever i=
s available. Please get w/ Mary and have here set up a schedule for us to m=
eet tomorrow at what ever opening I have in my schedule. Once again, I am s=
orry for the late response to such an urgent matter. I can also be reached =
at my home number on the weekend which is 503-625-3541.

This is to confirm a conference call for Monday, 10/22/01 regarding UCSF
Cogen:

Date:  Monday, 10/22/01
Time:  8:00am PST / 10:00am CST
Call Number:  888-329-7124
Passcode:  10197
Confirmation:  9853584

Please notify Debbie O'Jones at 925-543-3863 if you won't be able to
participate.

Thanks,
Michele

What about putting it into a zip file?

Chris,

I believe you said all communications for this customer will be through Pam Carter?  I will be actualizing July soon and will send a file directly to Pam.  If that has changed and I need to add either of these folks, please let me know.

Also, we need to come up with a method wherein they can receive all of the details - currently we can only send a total tab via e-mail.  Let me know what shared folder you can access, or if you have another option.

Caroline

Caroline,

In an effort to make better accruals and analyze our numbers, can you provide the ISO charges for EEMC and EES, both estimates and actuals, as they occur?  I think Accounting was originally on the distribution list, but with turnover we seem to be missing them monthly.  Please send them to Troy Klussmann, who will be the point person on this.  Thanks!

Laura
Attached is the summary file of the ancillary, other and penalty charges for EES and EEMC from Sept 00 to June 01 (different levels of detail on each tab).

 << File: Ancillary_Charges Summ.xls >> 

This information is based on the files provided by Murray, as follows:

 << File: 0900 Settlements Restate #2 Final ISO 070301 saved09201.xls >>  << File: CAISO-1000.xls >>  << File: CAISO-1100.xls >>  << File: CAISO-1200.xls >>  << File: CAISO-0101.xls >>  << File: 0201 A  M Summary Flash_062001saved 092001.xls >>  << File: CAISO-0301.xls >>  << File: 0401 Final Position as of 090501 saved092001.xls >>  << File: CAISO-0501.xls >>  << File: 0601 Preliminary Settlements Summary Flash_082901 saved092001.xls >> 

Mary,
	I apologize for being such a pain in the ass, but  I will not be in the office today due to sickness. I think I have some form of streep(?) throat( rash around my neck and very painful to swallow). Reschedule the 11:00 Genesis meeting for any open time after 1:00 tomorrow, the rest of the meeting I will try to call in on. Feel free to call me, I will be online working if you need anything from me. I feel well enough to work, just worried that I might be contagious.

						Chris
	

Steve,
	Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try and put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is going well for you.

							Chris

Hi Chris,	
	
	I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece they disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handling this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in February - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw = $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So they are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I need to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possible exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remove these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

Below is the Gas and GNO presentation

	Chris

 

These are the presentations for Benda.

Brenda,
	Please look over the document below and give me a call on Murray's cell if you have any questions. I have one section in the in slide number three that I will  updating when I get the information this morning. I will then send you the updated document by no latter then 8:00 this morning. 

	 								Chris

This is what Steve wrote up on the CDWR dispute

Chris,

The issue here is whether the CalPX or California Energy Resources Schedule=
r ("CERS") owes us $186,000 for the power we delivered to the CalPX from Fe=
bruary 1st through 6 under our block forward contracts.=09=09=09=09=09=09

The State of California, i.e., CERS, is responsible for payment of this pow=
er.  It is true that we scheduled the block forwards through the Cal PX on =
Feb. 1-6, and that we did not schedule this power through CERS until Februa=
ry 6 (delivery on the 7th).  But Governor Davis issued Emergency Orders D-2=
0-01 and D-21-01 on January 31st.  Under these Orders, the So. Cal. Edison =
and PG&E block forward contracts were "hereby commandeered by the State of =
California to be held subject to the control and coordination of the State =
of California."  The Orders were effective "immediately."  Because the Orde=
rs was effective on January 31st, the State had title to the contracts from=
 January 31st forward.  Section 8572 of the California Emergency Services A=
ct authorizes the Governor to commandeer private property, but requires the=
 State to pay the "reasonable value thereof."  Therefore, since the State o=
f California had legal title to the contracts and the power supplied under =
those contracts on February 1st, the State of California---through CERS---i=
s responsible for paying for power delivered on February 1st, and forward. =
=20

Responsibility for payment falls on the party with title to the power, not =
the party responsible for scheduling the power.  Just because the CalPX con=
tinued to schedule power for a few days while CERS got its act together doe=
s not mean that the PX was responsible for payment.  Once California took t=
itle to the power,---and all the benefits of having the power---it also ass=
umed responsibility for payment.=20

I would be happy to explain this to CERS, if you want.  Let me know.

Steve=20

Thank you

I'll take a look at this today, Chris.

Steve,
=09Take a look at the e-mail and give me you insight. We talked about this =
a few months ago and never came to a solid conclusion. I just want to try a=
nd put it to bed. Thanks for your help on this matter and I hope all is goi=
ng well for you.

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09Chris

Hi Chris,=09
=09
=09I wanted to check on California Energy Resouces Scheduling - the piece t=
hey disputed paying us in February.  Virginia had in DMS that you are handl=
ing this now. So, to refresh your memory, they did not pay us $186,000 in F=
ebruary - broken down as follows:

Deal #533136.1  2/1/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/2/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/3/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/5/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200
Deal #533136.1  2/6/01  800 mws on peak @ $46.50/mw =3D $37,200

They said CDWR did not pick a block forward from the PX until 2/7/01.  So t=
hey are saying these weren't theirs until the 7th.

Thus my accounts receiveable shows that we have been shorted $186,000.  I n=
eed to know if I can collect this from them or if we will change the deals =
so that they will not be charged for the above days they are disputing.  I =
really need to get this fixed as soon as possible - since this shows possib=
le exposure to us if we can't collect or DPR to the West if we have to remo=
ve these deals for the above days.

Let me know if you have any questions and let me know what info. you have.

Thanks!
Amy

Geiv,
	From the discussion that I just had with Pam, this does not seem to be clearly the case. She will do further research and see if there is an issue with Ibook, but you need to give some examples of how you came to such a clear conclusion.  This is something that should have been done some time ago. What I expect is that you and Pam will work together to come up with an efficient solution. It was also brought to my attention that you want to minimize the time you spend on this process, I would agree with that. I have given Pam the same instructions so I would expect to see this process  finely tuned in very near future.  

														Chris

Chris:

I appreciate your concern in this matter, and I fully agree that its imperative for me to enter deals accurately. I admit that I have made a few errors, however, it is clear to me that the real issue  is the fact that the program that Pam uses to query deal tracker is innacurate. The majority of "mistakes" are just instances where IBOOK does not pull accurately from dealtracker. I have talked to Pam about this and I wanted to keep you in the loop.

Feel free to call me at 5-2877 if you have any questions.

Thanks,
Geiv

Geiv,
	Just curious, who do you think has time to go over the mistakes that you may have made in these spreadsheets? For the time being, Pam will take care of this process for you. In return, you will be given a 24hr timeline to get all discrepancies answered and cleaned up in Deal Tracker. I feel this is a fair timeline since Pam is the person doing the leg work to identify all discrepancies. If you have any questions or suggestion on this process, feel free to call me at 56120.

							Chris Stokley
FYI...

Pam

Pam, I am sorry, but I do not have the time to spare to go over all the deals in these files. Please indicate what specific dates or deal numbers you have questions about and I will go back and address those. 

Thanks,
Geiv

Chris,

Here's something to get you started.  Included is the original work request, #1692, which was our initial request for data from them.  It has been trimmed down somewhat so that we could get something within the timeframe we wanted.  Their latest response is in the ROM file.  The file "Ranger0712.zip" has the latest presentation given to us by CSC regarding this project.

Neal

 - CES1692.ROM.RangerIteration I 071901.doc 
  
 - Ranger0712.zip 

 
 
As part of Project Ranger, it is my goal to have a single repository to house all actual data, allowing users to access data through an ad hoc reporting tool.  Additionally, as areas identify needs, I would hope that we can develop feeds rather than just ad hoc reporting.
 
We are setting up a meeting with CSC for this Wednesday to discuss the needs and start defining Iteration 2 of the project.  Vivian forwarded me this meeting that you have already set-up.  My question:  Without knowing the full scope of your efforts, I'd like to propose a single initiative to obtain actuals.  Additionally, we wanted to set-up this meeting for Wednesday when the CSC business analyst is in town.  Do you think it would be advantageous to combine the meetings, and schedule it for Wednesday?  
 
We will move forward with our efforts and will schedule a meeting for Wednesday.  If you all want to combine efforts, please let me know and we will include you on the meeting.
 
Chris - I had already included both you and Murray on the invitation listing.  Will you forward this E-mail to him?  I'm having problems trying to call up his E-mail address.
 
Please let me know.  
Brief description:
Date:
Time:
EB1114 / CSC Metering Data
07/24/2001
10:00 AM - 11:00 AM
 
Detailed description:
Kenny Ha, Todd Taylor, John Rutledge, Maurice Winter, Vivian Hart, Chris Stokley, Murray O'Neil
Invitations have been sent to:  Todd Taylor/HOU/EES, John Rutledge/HOU/EES, Maurice Winter/HOU/EES, Vivian Hart/HOU/EES, Chris Stokley/HOU/ECT, Murray P O'Neil/HOU/ECT

Chris,

I believe Neal Symms is working with Sung-Hang's boss for transition him over to EES.

Kenny H.

Give me your thoughts on the e-mail below.

This is the gentleman we discussed several weeks ago from EBS who understands the "old" EES system set-up very well.  He worked with John Henderson (New Power), Anoush Farhangi (New Power), Vivian Hart (EES- IT), and others in the establishment of several databases (e.g., Pub DB) and systems applications when EES was first getting started.  He might be a great candidate to help transition EES systems into the established EWS systems you prefer as an end solution.
Michael

FYI:  The word is that HR has a moratorium of some sort on placing former EBS staff with IT.  That's why this guy is now available -- he wants some options.
Michael,

	Enclosed is a copy of my resume.  Please forword it to the whoever is concerned.  Thanks.  Talk to you later.

  
SH

Paige,

	I think I have nailed down both the index's we need to use along w/ the load profile for the PJM customers. Let me know when you want to get together and go over these items.

				Ps. Hope your little one is feeling better.

								Chris
								503-807-8959

Diann,

	Do you have an update on the status of the other two items we discussed.

1)	CSC's ability to send all of our Calf. Customers files out to the FTP server as they do with the Energy Sense customers, along with the  timeline to get this implemented.
2)	The cost and timeline to put all of our customers into the Energy Sense website.

Chris
503-807-8959

Vivian has regained access to the MDMA.    However, I need to control who has access so that we don't interfere with CSC's operation.  Let me know who will need access to this data.  Thanks.

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

I will give you a call tomorrow.

Chris I need to get these numbers from you.

Thanks,

Paul 
X3837

Blanca,
	Could you please send me the phone number for the room  we will be meeting in. Murray O'neil will be calling in from Portland.

						Chris

Kevin,
	No problem, just let me know if there is anything that I could do on my side. I am in town this week but I am not sure of my schedule yet. When I nail it down I will give you and Chad a call.

							Chris

Chris,
	Thanks for the help in the "keeping a job" matter.  I appreciate it and will let you know what happens.  Hopefully things will be OK here.  Stop by next time you're here and we can go get a good steak somewhere.  Are you back next week?
Kevin

I am in  Houston, give me a call at 503-807-8959

I'm in the Houston office this week, are you around?  If so, email me your location so I can drop by and say hello.

Monica

I forwarded the resume to Kenny Ha and asked for his thoughts on this topic.

This is the gentleman we discussed several weeks ago from EBS who understands the "old" EES system set-up very well.  He worked with John Henderson (New Power), Anoush Farhangi (New Power), Vivian Hart (EES- IT), and others in the establishment of several databases (e.g., Pub DB) and systems applications when EES was first getting started.  He might be a great candidate to help transition EES systems into the established EWS systems you prefer as an end solution.
Michael

FYI:  The word is that HR has a moratorium of some sort on placing former EBS staff with IT.  That's why this guy is now available -- he wants some options.
Michael,

	Enclosed is a copy of my resume.  Please forword it to the whoever is concerned.  Thanks.  Talk to you later.

 << File: ENRONESU.doc >> 
SH

Diann,

	I am flying back to Portland tomorrow morning at about 9:30 arriving at 12:00 Please call me at 503-807-8959 or e-mail me w/ and update on you talks w/ CSC. Thanks for your help.

									Chris Stokley

Chad,
	If you are in the office, give me a call at 5-3091 or 503-807-8959. I wanted to see if you had time to get together and go do something tonight. 
	

Kourtney,
	Could you take a look at the e-mail below and see you can gather this information for the 2nd qtr. 

Chris. 
Please forward the California ISO numbers for the 2nd quarter 2001 in the same format as you have prepared in the past (see below.)  We will need this information by Wed, 7/18/01.  Please let me know if you have any questions. 
Thanks, Melissa

 

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

What's up! Send me you new phone numbers and give me an update.

	Hey Bud,

		Just checking in to see how Austin and Ercot are treating you. Do you like your gig, house, work culture etc. I tried to call you but it won't let me through, do you have a new work number. Flying into Houston every week is getting quite old, but is has to be done. 

							Latter
							 Chris

 

Is this the Class Average Profile?

Chris,

We require 2000 load profiles for SDG&E.  Unlike the other utilities, SDG&E does not have 2000 LPs loaded on their web-site.  Do you know of a contact at who may be able to help us?

Thanks,

Ken

Jeff:  I just reviewed data on the Cal Poly SLO campus which is up to date through yesterday.  The logon and password I am giving you is the campus' and should be kept confidential. 

Url for web   <http://ci.ees.enron.com>
Logon = John Doe
Password = uccsuweb01

Enter the Site

Click on  "Cal Poly SLO"
Click on "your energy account" (on left)
Click on  New-Energy Sense 3.0 (under Demand Profiling)

At Logon enter edward
password = slojo
company = uc/csu

Let me know if you need help.

Paulett,
	What is the phone number for that room? Murray O'Neil calling in from Portland.

REMINDER:

	Calendar Entry	

Brief description:
Date:
Time:

Systems Meeting - Intermediate Solutions & Intramonth Book - EB8c1
07/31/2001
02:00 PM - 03:30 PM

Detailed description:
Sent for Sean Holmes/Paige Grumulaitis/Glenn Dickson

MEETING RESCHEDULE NOTICE:
THIS IS AN IMPORTANT MEETING, PLEASE PLAN TO ATTEND

Please respond to this invitation.

Thanks,
Paulett

Invitations have been sent to:	Sean A Holmes/HOU/EES@EES, Paige Grumulaitis/HOU/EES@EES, Glenn Dickson/HOU/EES@EES, Anthony Dayao/HOU/EES@EES, Phil Layton/HOU/EES@EES, Scott Mills/HOU/EES@EES, Beth Apollo/Enron@EnronXGate, Kenny Ha/HOU/EES@EES, Larrissa Sharma/HOU/EES@EES, Steven Gullion/HOU/EES@EES, Todd Taylor/HOU/EES@EES, Todd Busby/NA/Enron@Enron, Jeff Richter/Enron@EnronXGate, Murray P ONeil/ENRON@enronXgate, Chris Stokley/ENRON@enronXgate, Berney C Aucoin/Enron@EnronXGate, Rogers Herndon/Enron@EnronXGate, Todd Perry/Enron@EnronXGate, John A Pierce/HOU/EES@EES
Optional invitees:	Viviana Palma/HOU/EES@EES, Yvette Stevenson/HOU/EES@EES, Blanca Carrizales/Enron@EnronXGate, Kathy Bass/HOU/EES@EES, Debra Coleman/ENRON@enronXgate, La Donna Finnels-Neal/Enron@EnronXGate, Christina Liscano/HOU/EES@EES, Tasha Lair/HOU/EES@EES

Diane,

	Jeff Richter has put me on task to resolve the issue that we currently have in trying to get meter data from CSC in a timely matter. Michael Frazier mentioned that you had sent a proposal to Jeff, and that you were waiting on him to review it and give you a sign off to go forward on your proposal. However, when I spoke w/ Jeff last night he had not yet received your proposal. Could you please forward your proposal to myself and Murray O'Neil so we can get up to speed as to what our option are in resolving this issue.

									Chris Stokley
									503-807-8959

fyi

I just talked to the developer and the MV90 and MDMA data sinks up daily.  The previous day's
read should be available in MDMA the next day.  I haven't asked for a logon and password to get
into MV90 because I am not sure you would want the data from MV90.  From my understanding,
MV90 will hold the raw usage and it does not get validated for high low checks or other errors until it gets to MDMA.

If the previous day's data is sufficient then MDMA should be good enough.

Let me know if you still need me to pursue further.

Vivian,
	Have you heard anything back on the time in which they sink up MV90 and MDMA. Also, were you able to find out the password to get into MV90 just in case we have  to go straight to the source. Thanks again for all of your help on these issues.

							Chris Stokley

Thanks

Hey Chris, I sent an E-request in for you and the ticket number is: #46593  I'll let you know when it's been completed. rock on brother!

Chip,
	Could you please help me with this issue, I hear you are the man with the answers.

						Chris

Chip,
	Could you please help me with this issue, I hear you are the man with the answers.

						Chris

I just talked to the developer and the MV90 and MDMA data sinks up daily.  The previous day's
read should be available in MDMA the next day.  I haven't asked for a logon and password to get
into MV90 because I am not sure you would want the data from MV90.  From my understanding,
MV90 will hold the raw usage and it does not get validated for high low checks or other errors until it gets to MDMA.

If the previous day's data is sufficient then MDMA should be good enough.

Let me know if you still need me to pursue further.

Vivian,
	Have you heard anything back on the time in which they sink up MV90 and MDMA. Also, were you able to find out the password to get into MV90 just in case we have  to go straight to the source. Thanks again for all of your help on these issues.

							Chris Stokley

Hey, I was just thinking about you and Kristian yesterday. I never see you on the IM anymore, do you still have access to it? Spending most every week in Houston is getting old, but I think we may finally be making some progress. Family is doing great when I see them  and I will evaluate my situation at year-end. How is your job going and is Kristian going to remain in the fold. I think things have finally gotten much better in Risk, so that is a very good thing. You and Kritian pop on IM sometime so we can chat. 

						Chris

We haven't heard a peep from you in ages.  How's life treating you?

I am forwarding emails relevant to the Team Ranger initiative from the time I became involved to the time the scope of the effort was limited.  My understanding from my notes and recollections and a discussion with Glen Matthys this morning is as follows:
*  Team Ranger is co-sponsored by Greg Young, Scott Mills, and Mary Lynn Ruffer.
*  Team Ranger's objective is to capture all the data necessary for Ruffer to provide flash reports to Mills on what should liquidated from the risk book  vs actual costs and revenues experienced; Young's involved because his Operations group provides the link to CSC's billing and invoicing systems.
*  Since I had been discussing my forecasting data needs and RPS tie-ins with Scott, he viewed this as an opportunity for the organization to gather more information than strictly needed to meet this objective and invited me to lobby for an expanded scope.
*  Clearly I was outvoted, since the subsequent scope was severely restricted to retrieving only the financial data that is readily available to CSC and which will enable flash report development quickly (for power only); an expanded scope would have compromised timely deliverables.
*  The system will pull down monthly data from STAT and LodeStar billing systems on a daily frequency (and will still provide some valuable information for me).
*  The data collected for Team Ranger will be housed in an Enron-controlled database (not CSC's), supposedly for easy access to Enron users.

Chris, this clearly falls in the realm we were discussing last night -- a limited scope "silo" initiative to solve a localized problem.  Like I said, I'm a culprit, too -- if no one else wants to provide the data I need, I'll pull it myself just as you counseled a month ago when we were struggling to get answers from CSC (via Operations). I admit you were right: we've gotten more data since then with access privileges than I could have wrangled out of requests to CSC in six months (despite California).

Let me know what else you need from me to facilitate your efforts.  Please keep me updated with what you learn and where we stand.  I'll do the same.
Michael

There is a meeting scheduled for Monday (see below) to discuss information that must be provided by CSC and Avista so that we can start tying out what is actually billed to what is in the Risk books.  This is a lot of the same information that I know you are trying to get your hands around.  If you are interested in attending, please do so.  If you are not available, give me some data points so that nothing is overlooked.  This will be the first of many "get togethers".  Evan Hughes and his group will be there to represent what we are currently getting from the outsource providers as well as what we are collecting internally.

SRM (x33548)

After looking at this, a couple of thoughts:

Assuming that we will create a "global" repository that will support everyone's needs for all EES activity (purchases and sells)

	Internal as well as outsource data

Outsource data needs to be "Enronized" (consistent internal formatting of field values)

	We should be able to use the GCP/EES Settlement System cross reference mapping that is set up and maintained by Global Counterparty as a way to get 	to Enron's Global Counterparty number

This should be a daily feed

We will need the same information for payments

Additional information needed in the file:

EES Entity transacting Business
Commodity 			(e.g. power, gas)
Covered Service		(e.g. commodity, projects, AOPS)
Flow Begin Date
Flow End Date
Volume
Volume Frequency 		(e.g. daily, monthly, total for period)
Volume Status			(e.g. estimated, actual)
Price Type 			(e.g. Commodity, Tax, ...)
Rate Schedule 			(if applicable -e.g. Name of Utility Rate Class)
Rate Name 			(if applicable -e.g. IF-Transco/Z6 New York Restricted)
Pass Through Fee 		(Yes/No)
Price (Per Unit)/Rate  		(e.g. Per Unit $50.00 USD/MWH or Rate $100,000 USD)
Price Currency                                   (e.g. USD, CAD, etc.
Total Amount 			(Price * Volume)
Total Amount Currency		(e.g. USD, CAD, etc.

Joni -how different is the information in this file compared to what Mike Newlin is getting on a daily basis for the Credit Aggregation process.  Should what Mike is getting be coordinated with this process.  The one advantage that I can see now is the ability to get an aged open A/R Balance

Mary Lynne -is there any additional information from what you are having pulled now for reconciliation of prior months?

Michael -from your requirements that you are already discussing regarding volumes, is there anything else?

How different is this from the Tax Project extract that was discussed -can these efforts be consolidated?

I will have Christina schedule a meeting for further discussion.

SRM (x33548)

   

As discussed in the subject meeting, Joni and I have been working with Patrick Cagney and CSC on defining a project to generate a daily extract file containing transactional invoice data with accounts receivable balances and collections.  Attached is the data item list as discussed with CSC for your information.  CSC has already submitted an impact statement for this work; however, if it would assist any of your efforts to use, expand, or modify this data extract, I believe it would be beneficial to discuss it before we move forward with this project.  Please let Patrick or myself know if you have any questions regarding this.

Thanks,
Kim

 

Jennifer Bryan
06/01/2001 12:47 PM
I know I sent the reminder out the other day, but Wade wanted to add Ben Smith and Kim Nelson to this meeting.

This meeting is to discuss a strategy and have a joint discussion of projects around liquidations, accruals and operations analysis.

Monday, June 4th
4:00
EB9C1

If you have any questions, please let me know.

Jennifer - x5-8340

I hate it when I do that!!
 

As some of you know, Gregg Young formed a team (Team Ranger) to identify and report on actual bill payment and invoicing information.  After meeting with other department heads, Team Ranger has been expanded.  Attached is a document identifying:

The 3 phases of Team Ranger
Project Management
The team members assigned to each phase and the groups they represent
Initial due date of Project deliverables

Please review this document.  If you have not been notified that you will participate on this team, please see your supervisor.

The Power phase will be the first to start.  Glenn Matthys will be contacting those individuals to set up our first meeting.....probably tomorrow.

Thank you in advance for your cooperation!
Robert Bailey

Attached are the minutes from our preliminary meeting..........Before the scope included groups outside of Evan's org.  

Also attached is the project plan we had.  This can be used to 'jump start' our first meeting(s) and to assist in creating our new project plan.

Glenn, can you combine these documents into one and bring to our first meeting?

Thanks
Robert

  
Alarm enabled: an alarm will occur 30 minutes before the start time of this entry.
	Calendar Entry	

Brief description:
Date:
Time:

EB-872 Team Ranger Mtg
06/13/2001
03:00 PM - 05:00 PM

Detailed description:

Invitations have been sent to:	Robert Bailey/HOU/EES, Glenn E Matthys/NA/Enron, Joseph Capasso/HOU/EES, Michael Kim/HOU/EES, Scott Mills/HOU/EES, Angela Smith/HOU/EES, Mary Lynne Ruffer/HOU/EES, Richard Miller/HOU/EES, Maurice Winter/HOU/EES, swalker2@csc.com <mailto:swalker2@csc.com>, Michael Frazier/HOU/EES, Kimberley Nelson/HOU/EES, Vivian Hart/HOU/EES, Neal Symms/HOU/EES, thuson@csc.com <mailto:thuson@csc.com>, Brenda F Herod/Enron
	Cancelled	

		
Chairperson:	Tammy Dawson

Start:	06/18/2001 10:00 AM
End:	06/18/2001 11:00 AM

Description:	EB-12C3  Team Ranger (GNO Team)

Detailed description:

	Cancelled	

		
Chairperson:	Tammy Dawson

Start:	06/18/2001 01:30 PM
End:	06/18/2001 03:00 PM

Description:	EB-12C3 Power Team Meeting

Detailed description:
Action Items
1) Update of the Data Elements' is due to Pat Cagney by Monday 8am.  Pat is to compile list.
2) Bring the reports that we listed (on the white board) and hightlight which data elements these reports provide.
3) Bring a draft list of the reports they need from our database project.

Patrick Cagney
06/19/2001 11:37 AM
Robert,
Below is an attachment with additional data item input from Mike Frazier who needs data for Volume Forecasting.
I wasn't sure if this data fell into the amended scope of "Flash to Actual" or not.

Can you let Mike know?

Thanks, Pat.
 
Michael Frazier
06/19/2001 10:59 AM
Pat
First, I'm sorry about the tardiness.  Attached is the file you sent me with data elements that are important in volume forecasting highlighted and copied into its own column, then supplemented with additional information that would be useful if available from the sources contemplated.  Note the color codes used in highlighting are yellow to denote necessary or essential and blue to mark elements that "would be nice or occasionally useful."  Thanks, Pat, for your help in compiling this list.
Michael
713-345-3200

 

Patrick Cagney
06/14/2001 09:06 AM
Here is the file reviewed in yesterday's meeting.
Pat.
 

Glenn,

please get with Michael and give him a Ranger updatre

<Embedded StdOleLink>
<Embedded StdOleLink>

Thanks for the update on Project Ranger, this is extremely informative. 

					Chris

I am forwarding emails relevant to the Team Ranger initiative from the time I became involved to the time the scope of the effort was limited.  My understanding from my notes and recollections and a discussion with Glen Matthys this morning is as follows:
*  Team Ranger is co-sponsored by Greg Young, Scott Mills, and Mary Lynn Ruffer.
*  Team Ranger's objective is to capture all the data necessary for Ruffer to provide flash reports to Mills on what should liquidated from the risk book  vs actual costs and revenues experienced; Young's involved because his Operations group provides the link to CSC's billing and invoicing systems.
*  Since I had been discussing my forecasting data needs and RPS tie-ins with Scott, he viewed this as an opportunity for the organization to gather more information than strictly needed to meet this objective and invited me to lobby for an expanded scope.
*  Clearly I was outvoted, since the subsequent scope was severely restricted to retrieving only the financial data that is readily available to CSC and which will enable flash report development quickly (for power only); an expanded scope would have compromised timely deliverables.
*  The system will pull down monthly data from STAT and LodeStar billing systems on a daily frequency (and will still provide some valuable information for me).
*  The data collected for Team Ranger will be housed in an Enron-controlled database (not CSC's), supposedly for easy access to Enron users.

Chris, this clearly falls in the realm we were discussing last night -- a limited scope "silo" initiative to solve a localized problem.  Like I said, I'm a culprit, too -- if no one else wants to provide the data I need, I'll pull it myself just as you counseled a month ago when we were struggling to get answers from CSC (via Operations). I admit you were right: we've gotten more data since then with access privileges than I could have wrangled out of requests to CSC in six months (despite California).

Let me know what else you need from me to facilitate your efforts.  Please keep me updated with what you learn and where we stand.  I'll do the same.
Michael

There is a meeting scheduled for Monday (see below) to discuss information that must be provided by CSC and Avista so that we can start tying out what is actually billed to what is in the Risk books.  This is a lot of the same information that I know you are trying to get your hands around.  If you are interested in attending, please do so.  If you are not available, give me some data points so that nothing is overlooked.  This will be the first of many "get togethers".  Evan Hughes and his group will be there to represent what we are currently getting from the outsource providers as well as what we are collecting internally.

SRM (x33548)

After looking at this, a couple of thoughts:

Assuming that we will create a "global" repository that will support everyone's needs for all EES activity (purchases and sells)

	Internal as well as outsource data

Outsource data needs to be "Enronized" (consistent internal formatting of field values)

	We should be able to use the GCP/EES Settlement System cross reference mapping that is set up and maintained by Global Counterparty as a way to get 	to Enron's Global Counterparty number

This should be a daily feed

We will need the same information for payments

Additional information needed in the file:

EES Entity transacting Business
Commodity 			(e.g. power, gas)
Covered Service		(e.g. commodity, projects, AOPS)
Flow Begin Date
Flow End Date
Volume
Volume Frequency 		(e.g. daily, monthly, total for period)
Volume Status			(e.g. estimated, actual)
Price Type 			(e.g. Commodity, Tax, ...)
Rate Schedule 			(if applicable -e.g. Name of Utility Rate Class)
Rate Name 			(if applicable -e.g. IF-Transco/Z6 New York Restricted)
Pass Through Fee 		(Yes/No)
Price (Per Unit)/Rate  		(e.g. Per Unit $50.00 USD/MWH or Rate $100,000 USD)
Price Currency                                   (e.g. USD, CAD, etc.
Total Amount 			(Price * Volume)
Total Amount Currency		(e.g. USD, CAD, etc.

Joni -how different is the information in this file compared to what Mike Newlin is getting on a daily basis for the Credit Aggregation process.  Should what Mike is getting be coordinated with this process.  The one advantage that I can see now is the ability to get an aged open A/R Balance

Mary Lynne -is there any additional information from what you are having pulled now for reconciliation of prior months?

Michael -from your requirements that you are already discussing regarding volumes, is there anything else?

How different is this from the Tax Project extract that was discussed -can these efforts be consolidated?

I will have Christina schedule a meeting for further discussion.

SRM (x33548)

   

As discussed in the subject meeting, Joni and I have been working with Patrick Cagney and CSC on defining a project to generate a daily extract file containing transactional invoice data with accounts receivable balances and collections.  Attached is the data item list as discussed with CSC for your information.  CSC has already submitted an impact statement for this work; however, if it would assist any of your efforts to use, expand, or modify this data extract, I believe it would be beneficial to discuss it before we move forward with this project.  Please let Patrick or myself know if you have any questions regarding this.

Thanks,
Kim

 << File: Cash Flow information ECR1122 Specs v5.xls >> 

Jennifer Bryan
06/01/2001 12:47 PM
I know I sent the reminder out the other day, but Wade wanted to add Ben Smith and Kim Nelson to this meeting.

This meeting is to discuss a strategy and have a joint discussion of projects around liquidations, accruals and operations analysis.

Monday, June 4th
4:00
EB9C1

If you have any questions, please let me know.

Jennifer - x5-8340

I hate it when I do that!!
 << File: TeamRangerStaffing.xls >> 

As some of you know, Gregg Young formed a team (Team Ranger) to identify and report on actual bill payment and invoicing information.  After meeting with other department heads, Team Ranger has been expanded.  Attached is a document identifying:

The 3 phases of Team Ranger
Project Management
The team members assigned to each phase and the groups they represent
Initial due date of Project deliverables

Please review this document.  If you have not been notified that you will participate on this team, please see your supervisor.

The Power phase will be the first to start.  Glenn Matthys will be contacting those individuals to set up our first meeting.....probably tomorrow.

Thank you in advance for your cooperation!
Robert Bailey

Attached are the minutes from our preliminary meeting..........Before the scope included groups outside of Evan's org.  

Also attached is the project plan we had.  This can be used to 'jump start' our first meeting(s) and to assist in creating our new project plan.

Glenn, can you combine these documents into one and bring to our first meeting?

Thanks
Robert

 << File: Team Ranger Core Team Mtg Minutes 06.07.doc >>  << File: TEAM RANGER Project Plan 06-06-01.doc >> 
Alarm enabled: an alarm will occur 30 minutes before the start time of this entry.
	Calendar Entry	

Brief description:
Date:
Time:

EB-872 Team Ranger Mtg
06/13/2001
03:00 PM - 05:00 PM

Detailed description:

Invitations have been sent to:	Robert Bailey/HOU/EES, Glenn E Matthys/NA/Enron, Joseph Capasso/HOU/EES, Michael Kim/HOU/EES, Scott Mills/HOU/EES, Angela Smith/HOU/EES, Mary Lynne Ruffer/HOU/EES, Richard Miller/HOU/EES, Maurice Winter/HOU/EES, swalker2@csc.com, Michael Frazier/HOU/EES, Kimberley Nelson/HOU/EES, Vivian Hart/HOU/EES, Neal Symms/HOU/EES, thuson@csc.com, Brenda F Herod/Enron
	Cancelled	

		
Chairperson:	Tammy Dawson

Start:	06/18/2001 10:00 AM
End:	06/18/2001 11:00 AM

Description:	EB-12C3  Team Ranger (GNO Team)

Detailed description:

	Cancelled	

		
Chairperson:	Tammy Dawson

Start:	06/18/2001 01:30 PM
End:	06/18/2001 03:00 PM

Description:	EB-12C3 Power Team Meeting

Detailed description:
Action Items
1) Update of the Data Elements' is due to Pat Cagney by Monday 8am.  Pat is to compile list.
2) Bring the reports that we listed (on the white board) and hightlight which data elements these reports provide.
3) Bring a draft list of the reports they need from our database project.

Patrick Cagney
06/19/2001 11:37 AM
Robert,
Below is an attachment with additional data item input from Mike Frazier who needs data for Volume Forecasting.
I wasn't sure if this data fell into the amended scope of "Flash to Actual" or not.

Can you let Mike know?

Thanks, Pat.
 
Michael Frazier
06/19/2001 10:59 AM
Pat
First, I'm sorry about the tardiness.  Attached is the file you sent me with data elements that are important in volume forecasting highlighted and copied into its own column, then supplemented with additional information that would be useful if available from the sources contemplated.  Note the color codes used in highlighting are yellow to denote necessary or essential and blue to mark elements that "would be nice or occasionally useful."  Thanks, Pat, for your help in compiling this list.
Michael
713-345-3200

 << File: Global EES Risk Book Settlements Billing AR AP CF Data Needs-with forecasting.xls >> 

Patrick Cagney
06/14/2001 09:06 AM
Here is the file reviewed in yesterday's meeting.
Pat.
 << File: Global EES Risk Book Settlements Billing AR AP CF Data Needs.xls >> 

Glenn,

please get with Michael and give him a Ranger updatre

Who has the scoop on the ski trip? Spending a lot of time in Houston working on the EES project, what a  mess. As far as the TX market, I am not currently involved in that area but will probably start looking at in within the next month. What is a QSE? So what are you currently working on for Reliant, and how do you like the work and culture so far. We need to go have lunch since I am in Houston damn near every week. Great to hear from you, and I hope that everything is going well for you.

						Chris
						503-807-8959 

I'm just now hearing some juicy stuff from your annual ski trip from 2000.
I said I would have paid to see IT.

How's it going?  Are you guys involved in the Texas market?  Are you a QSE?

call me at work some time.   713-207-3275

?

You have more than 2 report(s) with receipts outstanding
You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

I do not have access to a color printer.
 
Chris,
 
I have not been able to properly print these attachments.  Can you print a color copy & forward to Brenda at 3AC 1697?
 
Thanks,
Patti x35953
(sitting in for Yvette Connevey)
 
                                                Cell:    503-807-8959
                                                   Work:   503-464-8219
                                                  Home:   503-625-3541
        I will be flying out tomorrow, but I should be in around 1:00 Pacific Time. Please send me an e-mail on where we stand with being able to get into the MV90 tables. I have Jeff Richter chomping at the bit on this one so it would be a nice if we can get our hands on that data. Thank you very much for your help on this topic.
 
                                                                           

Vivian,
	Have you heard anything back on the time in which they sink up MV90 and MDMA. Also, were you able to find out the password to get into MV90 just in case we have  to go straight to the source. Thanks again for all of your help on these issues.

							Chris Stokley

Vivian,
	Have you heard anything back on the time in which they sink up MV90 and MDMA. Also, were you able to find out the password to get into MV90 just in case we have  to go straight to the source. Thanks again for all of your help on these issues.

							Chris Stokley

Here is the data model and data flow diagram for MDMA.  

 << File: MDMA_FLOW_DIAGRAM.ppt >>  << File: MV 90 data Model.ER1 >> 

I am trying to find out if the data from MV90 get interfaced into MDMA on a daily basis
or not.  If it is done on a daily basis, then I don't think there is a need to go into MV90.
MV90 will have raw data and will not have gone through validations which are performed
in MDMA.

Vivian,

	I just wanted to leave you my contact numbers:
	
						Cell:    503-807-8959
					           Work:   503-464-8219
 					          Home:   503-625-3541

	I will be flying out tomorrow, but I should be in around 1:00 Pacific Time. Please send me an e-mail on where we stand with being able to get into the MV90 tables. I have Jeff Richter chomping at the bit on this one so it would be a nice if we can get our hands on that data. Thank you very much for your help on this topic.

									   

This e-mail is being sent to users identified as current or past users of <\\eeshou-fs2\retail$> (known to most users as R:\ ) who are not members of the EES Risk Management Group.

In order to facilitate the integration of EES Risk Management into Enron Wholesale services it may be necessary to migrate the information contained in the R: Drive (<\\eeshou-fs2\retail$>) to another server.  We need your help to avoid unnecessary system overhead and also to make sure that no users are denied access to vital data.

If you would please verify and provide the following information:

1) That you are not a member of EES Risk Management.

2) Do you still Access <\\eeshou-fs2\retail$>  ( R:\ )?
	2a) For What purpose?
	2b) What folders in this drive do you access? (specific folder names please)
	2c) Can this information be saved elsewhere?

If you have any questions, please contact

Mike Hern?ndez
Technical Lead - Risk Management Integration
(713)853-7740

Chris Stokley        Cell:   503-807-8959
Murray O'neil        Cell:   503-702-9846

	Hey Bud,

		Just checking in to see how Austin and Ercot are treating you. Do you like your gig, house, work culture etc. I tried to call you but it won't let me through, do you have a new work number. Flying into Houston every week is getting quite old, but is has to be done. 

							Latter
							 Chris

Tracy,
	I will stop by on Monday to pick up these documents, I am in Portland all of this week.

						Thanks
						  Chris

I have documents at my desk EB1106 with your name on it for you to pick up.  I'll be out on vacation next week and people finder does not have a location for you here.

Chris,
	Here is the info:

 

Could one of you please take a look at the below e-mail and see if you can answer her questions.

					Chris

	 
 - EPMI BLK FWD.doc << File: EPMI BLK FWD.doc >> 

No, I will give you an update when I know the time range.

Chris,

Do you know yet when we will be receiving these?

Thanks

Ken

FYI

Good work if you can find it ....
 
Wednesday, July 4, 2001 
Energy Novice to Be Paid $240,000 
 Power: Hefty annual salary goes to consultant with one year's experience in the field. State officials say she is doing a good job. 

By JEFFREY L. RABIN, DARYL KELLEY, Times Staff Writers

     The Davis administration is paying a young business consultant with barely a year's experience in the energy industry $240,000 annually to head a team of traders who secure California's daily electricity supply. 
     State officials hired Susan T. Lee, 30, in April without competitive bidding under an emergency declaration by Gov. Gray Davis. 
     Lee's contract is equal to the $20,000 a month that Davis pays his chief energy advisor, S. David Freeman, a top utility executive for decades. 
     The two-year contract will pay Lee up to $480,000 to oversee the state's day-to-day energy purchases, totaling billions of dollars a year. 
     Lee's contract reflects the pressure and difficulties the state says it faces to fill key jobs in its new role as one of the nation's largest power buyers, a role that it took on in January as California's utilities faltered. 
     Lee's contract was one of about a dozen released Monday, and among the largest. 
     Reached at her Sacramento office, Lee would not discuss her contract. She said only that she heads a 15-person team of traders and schedulers that works long hours to keep California's power flowing. 
     Pete Garris, a contracts manager for the state Department of Water Resources who recruited Lee, said he met her at industry meetings and had been impressed by her savvy. 
     He said he gave her a pay raise to lure her to state service in April after Ron Shimizu, her boss at Mieco Inc., a trading firm in Long Beach, recommended her. Shimizu refused comment Tuesday. 
     The state, according to Garris, must compete for employees against an aggressive energy industry and pay good salaries to stay in the game. 
     "You can consider this situation to be very extraordinary," Garris said. "Unless we can get permanent and full-time positions approved, these are the rules we have to follow to be able to hire [consultants]." 
     Garris insisted that it is unfair to compare Lee's contract with the six-month, $120,000 deal that Freeman--the former boss at several major utilities--struck with the governor. 
     "I don't want to compare Susan Lee to David Freeman," Garris said. "David comes from the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power and Susan came from a [private] power marketer. With Susan, we just followed the standard formula." 
     In her new job, Lee will direct an immensely complicated, around-the-clock operation responsible for "procuring energy, scheduling power and associated transmission, and reconciling deviations between contracts and deliveries," according to her contract. 
     Lee's resume, attached to the contract, shows that she had no experience in the energy field until March 2000, when she joined Mieco. There, she was a trader and power scheduler, not a manager. 
     "She was only here for a year or so," said Dina Alvarez, an administrative manager for the company. 
     A 1994 graduate of UCLA with a degree in economics, she worked as a pension and benefits manager in Los Angeles and New York before joining Mieco. 
     Lee's contract stands out compared to others disclosed this week, not only for its size but for her relative inexperience in the energy field. 
     She is being paid $120 an hour and can earn a maximum of $480,000, including expenses, by April 2003. 
     Another new consultant, William L. Green, has almost a quarter of a century of experience working for the Bonneville Power Administration, Pacific Gas & Electric and the California Independent System Operator. He is being paid $85 an hour to supervise workers who reconcile the state's accounting of energy purchases. His two-year deal is worth up to $340,000. 
     They are not alone in cutting lucrative deals. 
     Richard Ferreira, the former assistant general manager at the Sacramento Municipal Utilities District, has a $500,000 contract and is being paid $200 an hour to assist the state in negotiating power purchase contracts. He worked for the Department of Water Resources for 23 years before joining the Sacramento agency in 1987. 
     Hardy Energy Consulting also has a $150,000, six-month contract that calls for Randy Harvey to be paid $300 an hour. Harvey has a quarter of a century of energy experience, particularly at the Bonneville Power Administration, where he was chief executive officer from 1991 to 1997. 
     Lee's recruiter, Garris, said her lack of experience is not a concern. 
     "So far she's done an excellent job," he said. "She has the skills, and she has the ability. She was doing a similar job." 
     Dozens of consultants, including Lee, have been hired since January, when Davis declared an energy emergency and set up a special arm of government to buy power. 
     The state filled a vacuum when generators refused to sell to PG&E, Southern California Edison and San Diego Gas & Electric because they were no longer considered credit-worthy, said Oscar Hidalgo, spokesman for the Department of Water Resources. 
     Hidalgo said that about 60% of the 95 people now working for the division are consultants. The rest are state employees. 
     As part of the process, Lee's unit oversees the purchase of power a day ahead of when it is needed. Hidalgo said Lee is involved in contracts that extend no more than three months. 
Copyright 2001 Los Angeles Times 
 

 

  
 
 

When will I be added to this list. I sent and e-mail on 7/2/01 asking this same question and still have not received and answer. 

							Chris

All users have been added except Chris Stokley.

Jay

 	Gary M Kulczar 07/02/2001 02:28 PM 	

SQL Admins,

   Please see attached request.
  
  Thanks,

  Gary
Neil Bresnan
06/28/2001 10:55 AM
Please note the following approved IS&S request for neil bresnan submitted on 06/28/2001 10:25:31 AM for your action.
 << OLE Object: StdOleLink >> 

Dave,
	Two Items:

1)	Ram update
2)	Common Drive Update

Thanks
 Chris

Do you have a date on when I will be added. Why have I not received a response to my question in a timely matter.

					Chris

When will I be added?

		Chris Stokley

All users have been added except Chris Stokley.

Jay

 	Gary M Kulczar 07/02/2001 02:28 PM 	

SQL Admins,

   Please see attached request.
  
  Thanks,

  Gary
Neil Bresnan
06/28/2001 10:55 AM
Please note the following approved IS&S request for neil bresnan submitted on 06/28/2001 10:25:31 AM for your action.
 << OLE Object: StdOleLink >> 

Update time. What is the latest on the job hunt? Since talking w/ you I have seen so many articles coming out on how difficult it is for the recent grads to find employment. I was hoping that I could be of more help to you, but Enron is long people right now. I do feel like I can be of some help by year-end, but I realize that doesn't help you rt now. I am spending pretty much every week in Houston until year end trying to get one of our internal units sorted out.  Maybe we can try to hook up one weekend in Houston, if not, I will see before the year is out.

				PS. Rachel is coming in to town this month and she wants to make sure she gets a chance to see you. I will find out exact dates and send them to you.

											Your bud
											   Chris

											

Here are a few quotes that I think you'll like.

    (1) "Instead of getting married again, I'm going to find a woman I don't
like and just give her a house."  -   Lewis Grizzard

    (2) "The problem with the designated driver program, it's not a
desirable job.  But if you ever get sucked into doing it, have fun with it.
At the
end of the night, drop them off at the wrong house."   -   Jeff Foxworthy

    (3) "See, the problem is that God gives men a brain and a penis, and
only enough blood to run one at a time."   - Robin Williams

    (4) "If a woman has to choose between catching a fly ball and saving an
infant's life, she will choose to save the infant's life without even
considering if there is a man on base."  - Dave Barry

    (5) "What do people mean when they say the computer went down on them?"
-Marilyn Pittman

    (6) "Relationships are hard. It's like a full time job, and we should
treat it like one. If your boyfriend or girlfriend wants to leave you, they
should give you two weeks' notice. There should be severance pay, and before
they leave you, they should have to find you a temp."   -   Bob Ettinger

    (7) "My Mom said she learned how to swim when someone took her out in
the lake and threw her off the boat.  I said, 'Mom, they weren't trying to
teach
you how to swim."   - Paula Poundstone

    (8) "A study in the Washington Post says that women have better verbal
skills than men."  I just want to say to the authors of that study: "huh?"
    - Conan O'Brien

    (9) "Why does Sea World have a seafood restaurant??   I'm halfway
through my fish burger and I realize,  Oh my Goodness.... I could be
eating a slow learner."   - Lynda Montgomery

    (10) "The day I worry about cleaning my house is the day Sears comes out
with a riding vacuum cleaner."   -   Roseanne

    (11) "I think that's how Chicago got started.  A bunch of people in New
York said, 'Gee, I'm enjoying the crime and the poverty, but it just isn't
cold enough. Let's go west.'"   - Richard Jeni

    (12) "If life was fair, Elvis would be alive and all the impersonators
would be dead."   -Johnny Carson

    (13) "Sometimes I think war is God's way of teaching us geography."   -
Paul Rodriguez

    (14) "My parents didn't want to move to Florida, but they turned sixty,
and that's the law."   - Jerry Seinfeld

    (15) "In elementary school, in case of fire you have to line up quietly
in a single file line from smallest to tallest.  What is the logic?  Do tall
people burn slower?"   - Warren Hutcherson

    (16) "Bigamy is having one wife/husband too many.  Monogamy is the
same."     -Oscar Wilde

    (17) "Marriage is a great institution, but I'm not ready for an
institution yet."   -  Mae West

    (18) "Suppose you were an idiot... And suppose you were a member of
Congress ... But I repeat myself."   - Mark Twain

    (19) "Our bombs are smarter than the average high school student.  At
least they can find Kuwait."  - A. Whitney Brown

    (20) "Ah, yes, divorce......., from the Latin word meaning to rip out a
man's genitals through his wallet,"   - Robin   Williams

    (21) "Women complain about premenstrual syndrome, but I think of it as
the only time of the month that I can be myself."   - Roseanne

    (22) "Women need a reason to have sex.  Men just need a place."  -
Billy Crystal

    (23) "You can say any foolish thing to a dog, and the dog will give you
a look that says, 'My God, you're right! I never would've thought of that!'"
- Dave Barry

    (24) "If you can't beat them, arrange to have them beaten."
-   George  Carlin

    (25) "When I die, I want to die like my grandfather who died peacefully
in his sleep. Not screaming like all the passengers in his car."
-  Author Unknown

    (26) Advice for the day:   If you have a lot a tension and you get a
headache, do what it says on the aspirin bottle:  "Take two aspirin" and
"Keep away from children"

  (27) "Oh, you hate your job?   Why didn't you say so?   There's a support
group for that.  It's called EVERYBODY, and they meet at the bar."
 - Drew Carey

Here are a few quotes that I think you'll like.

(1)	"Instead of getting married again, I'm going to find a woman I don't like and just give her a house."  -   Lewis Grizzard
(2)	"The problem with the designated driver program, it's not a desirable job.  But if you ever get sucked into doing it, have fun with it.
At the
end of the night, drop them off at the wrong house."   -   Jeff Foxworthy
(3)	"See, the problem is that God gives men a brain and a penis, and only enough blood to run one at a time."   - Robin Williams
(4)	"If a woman has to choose between catching a fly ball and saving an infant's life, she will choose to save the infant's life without even considering if there is a man on base."  - Dave Barry
(5)	"What do people mean when they say the computer went down on them?"
* Marilyn Pittman

(6)	"Relationships are hard. It's like a full time job, and we should treat it like one. If your boyfriend or girlfriend wants to leave you, they should give you two weeks' notice. There should be severance pay, and before they leave you, they should have to find you a temp."   -   Bob Ettinger
(7)	"My Mom said she learned how to swim when someone took her out in the lake and threw her off the boat.  I said, 'Mom, they weren't trying to teach you how to swim."   - Paula Poundstone
(8)	"A study in the Washington Post says that women have better verbal skills than men."  I just want to say to the authors of that study: "huh?"
* Conan O'Brien

(9) "Why does Sea World have a seafood restaurant??   I'm halfway
through my fish burger and I realize,  Oh my Goodness.... I could be
eating a slow learner."   - Lynda Montgomery
(10)	"The day I worry about cleaning my house is the day Sears comes out with a riding vacuum cleaner."   -   Roseanne
(11)	"I think that's how Chicago got started.  A bunch of people in New
York said, 'Gee, I'm enjoying the crime and the poverty, but it just isn't
cold enough. Let's go west.'"   - Richard Jeni
(12)	"If life was fair, Elvis would be alive and all the impersonators
would be dead."   -Johnny Carson

    (13) "Sometimes I think war is God's way of teaching us geography."   -
Paul Rodriguez
(14)	"My parents didn't want to move to Florida, but they turned sixty, and that's the law."   - Jerry Seinfeld
(15)	"In elementary school, in case of fire you have to line up quietly in a single file line from smallest to tallest.  What is the logic?  Do tall people burn slower?"   - Warren Hutcherson
(16)	"Bigamy is having one wife/husband too many.  Monogamy is the same."     -Oscar Wilde
(17)	"Marriage is a great institution, but I'm not ready for an institution yet."   -  Mae West
(18)	"Suppose you were an idiot... And suppose you were a member of
Congress ... But I repeat myself."   - Mark Twain
(19)	"Our bombs are smarter than the average high school student.  At least they can find Kuwait."  - A. Whitney Brown
(20)	"Ah, yes, divorce......., from the Latin word meaning to rip out a man's genitals through his wallet,"   - Robin   Williams
(21)	"Women complain about premenstrual syndrome, but I think of it as the only time of the month that I can be myself."   - Roseanne
(22)	"Women need a reason to have sex.  Men just need a place."  -
Billy Crystal
(23)	"You can say any foolish thing to a dog, and the dog will give you a look that says, 'My God, you're right! I never would've thought of that!'"
* Dave Barry

(24)	"If you can't beat them, arrange to have them beaten."
* George  Carlin

(25)	"When I die, I want to die like my grandfather who died peacefully in his sleep. Not screaming like all the passengers in his car."
* Author Unknown

(26) Advice for the day:   If you have a lot a tension and you get a
headache, do what it says on the aspirin bottle:  "Take two aspirin" and
"Keep away from children"
(27) "Oh, you hate your job?   Why didn't you say so?   There's a support group for that.  It's called EVERYBODY, and they meet at the bar."
* Drew Carey

Tim Belden

Chris,
As part of independence issues, the requesting group / VP should be EES (i.e. not Enron Assurance).  Who would be appropriate?

kl
Ken, we need to identify who the VP over the requesting group is in the request.  Would this be Evan?

FYI, here is a copy of the work request I have forwarded to Jacqueline.

Regards

 << File: CSC Work Request.doc >> 

Roshmi,
	I don't know if this has been conveyed to you yet, but we will not need Arthur Andersen's services for the SQMD Audit. Also, please send me an itemized breakout of the $5000 invoice that I just received for 5/16/01-5/31/01.

											Thanks
											  Chris

										

Hi Chris,

I left you a message regarding the timing of our work for the ISO Report.
Again, please
call me when you get a chance to discuss so that we can get that finalized for
your
plan.  As Linda had mentioned, we plan on starting the work in July as the due
date
is in September.  Please let me know if this is not sufficient time.

Thanks.

713 345-6958

Chris,

We plan on performing our work in July in order to be able to issue the report
in August. Please let me know if you disagree with this timeframe.

Thanks,
Linda

Linda,
     I am ok with the  most of the Audit plan except for the date of
completion. August 2001 seems quite excessive since we now have one SQMD
audit under our belts. Please provide to me the logic behind the thought
that this Audit will take over 3mths to complete.

                                         Thanks
                                          Chris

      -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-linda+2Eo+2Enorman+40us+2Eandersen+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

     Sent:   Thursday, May 03, 2001 1:24 PM
     Chris,

     I just wanted to follow up with you to ensure that you received the
     ISO Audit
     Plan draft yesterday.  If you did not receive it, please let me know
     so that I
     can re-send it.  We would like to receive your feedback before we
     finalize the
     document.

     Thanks,
     Linda

     *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
     Footer*******************

     Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
     If you
     are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
     delivery of
     the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message
     to anyone.
     In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the
     sender by
     reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does
     not consent
     to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions
     and other
     information in this message that do not relate to the official
     business of my
     firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer does not consent
to Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

Chris,

We have contacted Pat Priestley regarding obtaining the following data for the ISO audit.

We requested two sets of data.  One set which includes daily detail source data from a sample of meters before the application of distribution loss factors and load profiles, and a second set which includes the daily detail meter data that is summed within the SQMD file.  

For each UDC we requested data from 2 meters from each rate class (1 actual meter and 1 estimated meter).  In addition we requested 5 Enron meters from each UDC from different rate classes. The meter data should be taken from 2/15/00, 6/11/00, 7/15/00, 8/7/00, 12/28/00, respectively.

Pat has notified us that a WIP is required in order for us to obtain this data, please confirm if this is the case.

Regards,

Ken

Actually, I think the settlements group would have to have this number at an aggregate level to be able to potion FERC. 

I would have to go into each spreadsheet and make that calculation.  An
example would be for Jan. 1, the total charges were $2,053,504.  

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Keoni,
	What is the total $ amount of the payments due to the SC's for
this charge type?

I confirmed that since Enron does not deviate from their schedules in
real
time a good portion of the payments have been going to Enron.  It is
still
up in the air what they will do with these charges.  

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

Keoni,
	What is the total $ amount of the payments due to the SC's for this charge type?

I confirmed that since Enron does not deviate from their schedules in real
time a good portion of the payments have been going to Enron.  It is still
up in the air what they will do with these charges.  

Keoni Almeida 
California Independent System Operator 
phone: 916/608-7053
pager:  916/814-7352 
alpha page:  9169812000.1151268@pagenet.net
e-mail:  <mailto:kalmeida@caiso.com>
  

When will I be added?

		Chris Stokley

All users have been added except Chris Stokley.

Jay

 	Gary M Kulczar 07/02/2001 02:28 PM 	

SQL Admins,

   Please see attached request.
  
  Thanks,

  Gary
Neil Bresnan
06/28/2001 10:55 AM
Please note the following approved IS&S request for neil bresnan submitted on 06/28/2001 10:25:31 AM for your action.
 << OLE Object: StdOleLink >> 

Good morning, everyone.

Just wanted to let you know that we finally have some of our proofs 
available on-line.  It isn't our whole book, but it is a fair sample.  I 
think they got most of the pictures of you guys posted if you are interested 
in buying a print.  I believe you can order directly from the page.

If anyone wants to see more, call Andrea or myself and we can help you out.

Steps for accessing the proofs are:

1.  Point your browser to "www.elanphotography.com"
2.  From the home page, select "Weddings"
3.  From the Weddings page, select "On-line Ordering".  This will open a new 
browser window to a list of weddings shot by our photographer.
4.  Select the "Childers/Luebbering" wedding.
5.  This will prompt you to enter a username and password.
       Enter:
          username: childers
          password: gnirebbeul
6.  Browse at will.  I believe there are three or four pages of proofs.  If 
you drill down on a picture, you can order it there.

Let me know if you have any problems accessing this site.

Later,

Jason

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

Earlier today, I stepped down as Enron's Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer.  This decision was reached in cooperation with Enron's Board and the Creditor Committee and is effective immediately.

To emerge from bankruptcy, Enron needs a CEO who can focus 100 percent of his or her efforts on rebuilding the company.  Unfortunately, with multiple inquiries and investigations that require my immediate attention, at this time I am unable to fully concentrate on what is most important to Enron's stakeholders - preserving value for our creditors and our dedicated employees.

The Creditor Committee has begun a search for a restructuring specialist to serve as interim CEO to help the company emerge from bankruptcy.  This individual will join Enron's remaining management team to direct the company's ongoing operations.

I truly believe Enron can and will survive.  I will remain a Director of the Board to help see that it does.

During my time at Enron, I have witnessed tremendous change and opportunity.  I have seen people rigorously grow and maintain one of the world's most efficient and safest gas pipeline networks; I have seen people dedicate themselves to a cause that became a passion - the opening of energy markets; I have observed smart people come together as a team to build creative solutions like EnronOnline; and I have watched people tirelessly give of themselves to help their fellow employees and those in the community.  Regardless of what has happened, I am proud of so much of what we were able to accomplish here.

Thank you for your contributions to the company and for the inspiration you have been to me over the years.

Ken Lay

duke contact?

bp corp	Albert LaMore	281-366-4962

running the reports now

give me a contact over there too
BP

Coral	Jeff Whitnah	713-767-5374
Relaint	Steve McGinn	713-207-4000

I have couterparties for all the locations except the Feb TM3. Give me a call 853-7058

In order to offset my current open Enron positions, I need to:

Chicago
Buy from Enron Dec-Mar 155,000 / day

Dominion
Buy from Enron Dec-Mar 20,000 / day

TCO
Buy from Enron Dec-Mar 40,000 / day

M3
Sell to Enron Feb 50,000 / day

Z6
Buy from Enron Dec 60,000 / day

Thanks,
Dave Fulghum
713-544-4759

David,

Thanks for your patience. We are working hard on getting Coral and BP North=
 America on board with the ring trades.

I have another counterparty that may want to ring out some ATM Chicago basi=
s. Let me know about that.

I have also enclosed the language that would tie all these trades together.

Thanks,

Geof Storey
713-853-7058

Each of the parties to this Agreement recognizes and acknowledges that the =
parties are acting and agreeing to perform their obligations hereunder in r=
eliance upon (i) the timely execution and delivery by [legal name of other =
counterparty] ("Third Party") and Party A of a transaction in substantially=
 the form attached hereto as Exhibit A ("Third Party Transaction A") and wo=
uld not otherwise agree to execute, deliver and perform under this Agreemen=
t if Third Party and Party A were not contemporaneously executing and deliv=
ering Third Party Transaction A and (ii) the timely execution and delivery =
by Third Party and Party B of a transaction in substantially the form attac=
hed hereto as Exhibit B ("Third party Transaction B") and would not otherwi=
se agree to execute, deliver and perform under this Agreement if Third Part=
y and Party B were not contemporaneously executing and delivering Third par=
ty Transaction B. The effectiveness of this Agreement shall be subject to t=
he condition that contemporaneously with the execution and delivery of this=
 Agreement Party A and Third Party execute and deliver Third Party Transact=
ion A and Party B and Third Party execute and deliver Third Party Transacti=
on B.

 williams contact?

Coral	Jeff Whitnah	713-767-5374
Relaint	Steve McGinn	713-207-4000

Here are the transactions:

ENA sells to Entergy Koch 4/d NGI-Chicago basis + .155 Dec01-Mar02
ENA buys from Reliant 4/d NGI-Chicago +.155 Dec01-Mar02

Give me a call latter,

Geof 
713-853-7058

Rita & Dave,

Here are the proposed trades:

ENA sells to Entergy Koch 5/d NGI-Chicago basis + .155 Dec01-Mar02
ENA buys from Jaron 5/d NGI-Chicago +.155 Dec01-Mar02

ENA sells to Entergy Koch 2/d IF-Dominion basis + .345 Dec01-Mar02
ENA buys from Jaron 2/d IF-Dominion basis + .345 Dec01-Mar02

give me a call to confirm

Geof
713-853-7058

Dave & Scott,

Here are the proposed trades:

ENA sells to Entergy Koch ? d IF-TCObasis  + .235 Dec01-Mar02
ENA buys from Williams ? d IF-TCO basis + .235 Dec01-Mar02

ENA sells to Entergy Koch 6/d IF-Transco/Z6 basis  + 1.05 Dec01
ENA buys from Williams 6/d IF-Transco/Z6 basis + 1.05  Dec01

Give me a call to confirm latter.

geof

713-853-7058

Dora & Brooke,

Here are the trades I am proposing:

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295

Give me a call to confirm.

Geof Storey
713-853-7058

Dora
212-841-2530
Brooke
312-732-7380

Sorry thats the Enron system code. Yes its Nymex last day settle.

Geoff & Dora, 

This sounds good to me. I admit that I don't know what "NX1" describes, however, if it means something like Nymex Nearby Last Day Settlement, I am good. 

Thanks for the work, 
Brooke Hamilton 

Begin forwarded message: 

X-MimeOLE: Produced By Microsoft Exchange V6.0.4712.0 
content-class: urn:content-classes:message 
Date: Thu, 1 Nov 2001 08:44:30 -0600 
Thread-Index: AcFi47falTXE4DmFSpCCcHNO0OhzJA== 
Dora & Brooke, 

Here are the trades I am proposing: 

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37 
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37 
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37 

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02 3.295 
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02 3.295 
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02 3.295 

Give me a call to confirm. 

Geof Storey 
713-853-7058 

Dora 
212-841-2530 
Brooke 
312-732-7380 

Dora & Brooke,

Here are the trades I am proposing:

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 50 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 3.37

Bank One buys from Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295
BNP Paribas sells to Enron NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295
Bank One sells to BNP Paribas NX1 40,000/d Apr02-Oct02  3.295

Give me a call to confirm.

Geof Storey
713-853-7058

Dora
212-841-2530
Brooke
312-732-7380

Enron has consented to allow the Federal Bureau of Investigation to search the Enron Building and to interview employees regarding allegations of document destruction.  The company encourages all employees to fully cooperate with the FBI.

The company has retained Michael Levy and his law firm Swidler, Berlin, Shereff, Friedman, to advise any employee regarding this matter and to be present with them during any interviews by government investigators.  If you would like to speak with an attorney, please contact Ned Crady of the Legal Department at 3-4558 or contact Michael Levy's office in Washington, D.C. at 202-295-8414 and they will direct you to him here in Houston.

Todd Esay called and still wants to book out some power deals. I refered him to Ed Sacks. BUT, I want to hold off on the book outs and tell him we'll do them if they agree to a credit ring (will bring in cash) on the gas side. Bill would need to call Sempra credit to verify our total exposure. Can we talk to them about this???? Please let Bill know.   geof

Please call Sempra credit and explain the credit ring out.

We will do rings which free up cash.

They are wondering if we can help them with offsets for these positions....
Chris,

AECO:
	LONG | 	SHORT
2001               |
Dec	          |      77.5  Contracts
2002               |
Jan                 |      93     Contracts
Feb                 |      84     Contracts
Mar                 |      93     Contracts
April        45    |               Contracts
May        46.5  |               Contracts
June        45    |               Contracts
July         31    |               Contracts
Aug	  31     |               Contracts
Sep         30    |               Contracts
Oct         31    |                Contracts

NWPL-Canadian (Sumas)
	LONG |	SHORT
2001	          |
Dec	  14.9  |	               Contracts
2002	          |
Jan	  14.9  |	 	   Contracts
Feb	          |	  28.6	   Contracts
Mar	          |	  31.6 	   Contracts
April	  14.4  |	  	   Contracts
May	  14.9  |		   Contracts
June	  14.4  |		   Contracts
July	  14.9  |		   Contracts
Aug	  14.9  |		   Contracts
Sep  	  14.4  |		   Contracts
Oct	  14.9  |		   Contracts
Nov	          |  15.6	   Contracts
Dec	          |   16.1	   Contracts
2003	          |
Jan	          |   16.1        Contracts
Feb	          |	  14.6        Contracts
Mar	          |   16.1         Contracts

Let me know if you need any more information.

Thanks
Curt Conover
Entergy-Koch Trading, LP
713-544-5150

Reliant               Chicago Rob Pitts 713-207-1452
J Aaron              Chicago Rita Nagel 212-902-3845
J Aaron              NE        Herb Petry 212-902-4393
Bank of America NE        Joe Grahman 212-836-5360
Williams             NE       Scott McKenna 918-573-3871            

Enbridge Consumers Gas has cut off trading with us. 

As you are aware, NiSource has been planning for some time now to move the
forward/options book of physical power business to its energy marketing and
trading subsidiary, EnergyUSA-TPC Corp.  You should have received a letter
this week detailing the deals that will be moved with this transition.
EnergyUSA-TPC Corp will begin trading physical power tomorrow, November 1,
2001.

I have set filters on ICE for your company and would like for you to do the
same.  I know that our traders actively trade together on this platform.

If you have any concerns or issues you would like to discuss, please call
me.

Amanda D. Bailey
EnergyUSA-TPC Corp.
Manager, Counterparty Risk
(713) 369-7303 Phone
(713) 369-3303 Fax

This doesn't look right.

Call me 3x7058

Anna,

attached are the screen shots for a spread deal being built for Geoff Storey, please review the information and let me know if it looks good to go ahead and put in to production.

 << File: Can gas phy Fwd Spreads 11-5.doc >>    << File: Can gas phy Fwd Spreads - sitara 11-5.doc >>     << File: transaction report.xls >> 

Thanks,
Melba Lozano
713-345-8986 
713-646-8511 Fax
713-698-4847 Pager

I need phone numbers for head phys traders at:
Dynegy
Reliant
Tractebel
Duke
Hess
Aquila

Steve,

Here's the language:

"Each of the parties to this Agreement recognizes and acknowledges that the=
 parties are acting and agreeing to perform their obligations hereunder in =
reliance upon (i) the timely execution and delivery by [legal name of other=
 counterparty] ("Third Party") and Party A of a transaction in substantiall=
y the form attached hereto as Exhibit A ("Third Party Transaction A") and w=
ould not otherwise agree to execute, deliver and perform under this Agreeme=
nt if Third Party and Party A were not contemporaneously executing and deli=
vering Third Party Transaction A and (ii) the timely execution and delivery=
 by Third Party and Party B of a transaction in substantially the form atta=
ched hereto as Exhibit B ("Third party Transaction B") and would not otherw=
ise agree to execute, deliver and perform under this Agreement if Third Par=
ty and Party B were not contemporaneously executing and delivering Third pa=
rty Transaction B. The effectiveness of this Agreement shall be subject to =
the condition that contemporaneously with the execution and delivery of thi=
s Agreement Party A and Third Party execute and deliver Third Party Transac=
tion A and Party B and Third Party execute and deliver Third Party Transact=
ion B."
=20

If you have any legal questions feel free to call our lawyer Mark Taylor at=
 713-853-7459.

Thanks,

Geof Storey
713-853-7058
cell 713-412-4632

Patrick,

We would. I am just trying to put together a few counterparties. I will be emailing or calling you latter today.

Thanks,

Geof

Geoff,

I did not receive an e-mail from you yesterday.  I was just wondering if ENA
was still interested in sleeving out some physical positions with your other
counterparty.

Pat Bergin
Director Physical & Financial Basis
Entergy-Koch Trading

	

Steve,

As per your discussions with Bill Bradford I am working on reducing your physical risk to Enron.

I am talking with several counterparties on ringing out your positions. Can you give me your phone number so we can discuss this or give me a call at 713-853-7058.

Thanks,

Geof Storey
Director Trading

During the course of their investigation, Special Agents from the Federal Bureau of Investigation will be taking documents they believe may be important for their investigation from employees' offices.  The FBI has agreed to return copies of such documents. 

In addition, should you have an immediate need for a document requested by the FBI, please make a copy of the specific document and give the original to the FBI. Thank you for your cooperation.

was this just gas? or gas and power?

 << File: 103001_ENAGAS_COMMODITY_NOTIONAL_CASHFLOWS.xls >> 

Clara Carrington
Financial Trading
Manager - Rate and Currency Risk Mgmt
Direct Tel: (713) 853-9224
Email:  Clara.Carringotn@enron.com

Any idea how power looks?

This one was gas only.
was this just gas? or gas and power?

 << File: 103001_ENAGAS_COMMODITY_NOTIONAL_CASHFLOWS.xls >> 

Clara Carrington
Financial Trading
Manager - Rate and Currency Risk Mgmt
Direct Tel: (713) 853-9224
Email:  Clara.Carringotn@enron.com

The confirms look good. Send them with Exhibit A and have them return signed copies that include Exhibit B, which will be a copy of the confirm b/w BMO and Reliant.

Call me if you have any questions.

Geof
3-7058

Geoff - 

Attached for your approval are four confirmations for the Ring Trades done among Enron,
Reliant, and Bank of Montreal:

 << File: Ring - BOM YH2563.1.doc >>  << File: Ring Trade - Reliant YH2564.1.doc >>  << File: Ring Trade BOM - YH2566.1.doc >>  << File: Ring Trade - Reliant YH2567.1.doc >> 

You will note that an Exhibit A is attached to each confirm - but  can you tell me from
whom at both counterparties I can obtain the Exhibit B (transaction b/t Reliant and BOM)
in order to attach that as well.  

Please review and advise.

Thanks,
Diane
3.0443

Randall,
 
I have a few structures to propose:
 
ENA sells to Bank of America             500 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 ATM + $1
ENA buys from Williams                     500 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 ATM + $1
Williams buys from Bank of America    500 contracts/month Jan02-Dec02 ATM + $1
 
or
 
ENA sells to Bank of America             250 contracts/month Jan04-Dec05 ATM + $1
ENA buys from Williams                     250 contracts/month Jan04-Dec05 ATM + $1
Williams buys from Bank of America    250 contracts/month Jan04-Dec05 ATM + $1
 
Either set of trades takes off $60million of exposure and flattens our total nymex swap positions. The latter fits the term structure of our positions better, but the former may fit our credit positions better.
 
Let me know what you think.
 
Thanks,
 
Geof Storey
713-853-7058

Geoff, based on implied default levels, we would look to transact this trade in the  +$1.50 range 

Randall, 

Bank of America is the proposed counterparty. 

I wrote the exposure incorrectly on my last email. The trades are the 
same, but your exposure to Enron is reduced and replaced with exposure 
to Bank of America. 

Please let me know what you think. 

Geof Storey 

Work:713-853-7058 
Cell: 713-412-4632 

Your 11-07-2001 Trade Confirmation for Your Account 
Account number XXX-XXX07 is currently available online.  

Login to your account at http://www.tdwaterhouse.com/asppages/fliplogin.asp?EA=76F476A22ECC0B6641557F677770FC54&ESTOKEN=6A8EEEB134AAB95FB9685D1124C2D1015D61F31B620D340180C0879F7088E135 to view your Trade Confirmation in "eServices"  under "My Account".

For initial mutual fund purchases, please view the prospectus from the 
link in your trade confirmation. If the prospectus is not online, one will be delivered via U.S. Mail.

Please verify that the information is accurate.  
Notify TD Waterhouse immediately at 1-800-934-4448, press 4 
If there are any discrepancies. 

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update Delivery Preferences any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in  "My Info"  under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

Your 10-29-2001 Trade Confirmation for Your Account 
Account number XXX-XXX07 is currently available online.  

Login to your account at http://www.tdwaterhouse.com/asppages/fliplogin.asp?EA=76F476A22ECC0B6641557F677770FC54&ESTOKEN=65C3ACC094C8B21393136A07ED64D6355D61F31B620D340180C0879F7088E135 to view your Trade Confirmation in "eServices"  under "My Account".

For initial mutual fund purchases, please view the prospectus from the 
link in your trade confirmation. If the prospectus is not online, one will be delivered via U.S. Mail.

Please verify that the information is accurate.  
Notify TD Waterhouse immediately at 1-800-934-4448, press 4 
If there are any discrepancies. 

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update Delivery Preferences any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in  "My Info"  under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

Your 10-19-2001 Trade Confirmation for Your Account 
Account number XXX-XXX07 is currently available online.  

Login to your account at http://www.tdwaterhouse.com/asppages/fliplogin.asp?EA=76F476A22ECC0B6641557F677770FC54&ESTOKEN=40D2211375DF89DBB7D2165BBA518D4C5D61F31B620D340180C0879F7088E135 to view your Trade Confirmation in "eServices"  under "My Account".

For initial mutual fund purchases, please view the prospectus from the 
link in your trade confirmation. If the prospectus is not online, one will be delivered via U.S. Mail.

Please verify that the information is accurate.  
Notify TD Waterhouse immediately at 1-800-934-4448, press 4 
If there are any discrepancies. 

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update Delivery Preferences any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in  "My Info"  under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

Your 08-30-2001 Trade Confirmation for Your Account 
Account number XXX-X2707 is currently available online.  

Login to your account at http://www.tdwaterhouse.com/asppages/fliplogin.asp?EA=76F476A22ECC0B6641557F677770FC54&ESTOKEN=E7D41174BCA951577ABCBA2C894A63FB5D61F31B620D340180C0879F7088E135 to view your Trade Confirmation in "eServices"  under "My Account".

For initial mutual fund purchases, please view the prospectus from the 
link in your trade confirmation. If the prospectus is not online, one will be delivered via U.S. Mail.

Please verify that the information is accurate.  
Notify TD Waterhouse immediately at 1-800-934-4448, press 4 
If there are any discrepancies. 

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update Delivery Preferences any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in  "My Info"  under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

Your 08-22-2001 Trade Confirmation for Your Account 
Account number XXX-X2707 is currently available online.  

Login to your account at http://www.tdwaterhouse.com/asppages/fliplogin.asp?EA=76F476A22ECC0B6641557F677770FC54&ESTOKEN=FFE4828974746F2996B3F3A5A7107F035D61F31B620D340180C0879F7088E135 to view your Trade Confirmation in "eServices"  under "My Account".

For initial mutual fund purchases, please view the prospectus from the 
link in your trade confirmation. If the prospectus is not online, one will be delivered via U.S. Mail.

Please verify that the information is accurate.  
Notify TD Waterhouse immediately at 1-800-934-4448, press 4 
If there are any discrepancies. 

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update Delivery Preferences any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in  "My Info"  under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

Thank you for updating your profile information. 
Updates as of 8/16/2001 are reflected below.  
Please review your information:
~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*
Account Nickname: Your Account
Email Address: gstorey@enron.com
Second Email Address: N/A 
Wireless Email Address:  N/A

Documents regarding your account will be sent as follows:
~*~ Statements: Online
~*~ Trade Confirmations: Online
For all documents that you have agreed to receive online, 
we will send you an email notification when a new document is available.
~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

You can update this information at any time at 
http://www.tdwaterhouse.com 
in "My Info" under "My Account".

~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*
Questions? Email us at eservices@tdwaterhouse.com 
Please do not send sensitive information as email is not secure.
Thank you for investing with TD Waterhouse.

David Grant has assembled a team to work on gathering documents in response to the numerous subpoenas the company is receiving from Congress, the SEC and the Department of Justice. Please cooperate with the team if they need your assistance.  If you have any questions, please call David Grant at 3-6239. 

Just kidding!!  It is in my way back from San Diego.  I will pass Houston on the 7th, but it is a tight scale.  I don't have my flight itinerary, but is on Sat. in the afternoon.  I will send you the schedule tomorrow, I promise.

Hi Geoff,

We have prepared an estimate of your taxes owing in the US April 16th given
the information you have provided to us and recommend that you make a
$20,000 payment to the IRS on or before that date.

I will fax an extension form to you along with instructions as to where you
should file it.  The extension, if filed timely, gives us until August 15th
to submit your tax return to the IRS but we would like to have it completed
by April 30th, the Canadian filing deadline, as we are also filing a
Canadian tax return for you (I believe we discussed this previously).
Please confirm that your fax number is 713-646-3390 and if you have any
special instructions before I send the fax.

Thanks and kind regards,

Judy Wood
PricewaterhouseCoopers Calgary, IAS Dept.
(403) 509-7470

I have talked with them about phys rings. But the primary counterparty i was going to use was Dynegy. The trading wanted to make some money to do the deal, but i'm not sure where we stand with the other Dynegy stuff going on. So i'm on a holding pattern with Mirant unless you have any suggestions. geof

where's my recruiters?

clock's ticking

you are an impatient one....

where's my recruiters?

 
These two that I am forwarding are not the premier head hunting firms... that information is at home, be nice and good and will bring tomorrow.
I would like to introduce Intercontinental Staffing Group.  Our offices in Houston and London are primarily focused on serving the energy trading industry, bringing together top energy trading talent with the worlds leading energy trading companies.  Our search consultants have past experience in either trading or brokering energy products.  This gives us a distinct advantage with respect to our knowledge of and exposure to the energy trading industry.
 
We are currently working on filling several trading and marketing/origination positions throughout the US.  If you have an interest or know of someone who is looking for a new career opportunity, please contact me at the phone number listed below or feel free to email me at possibilities@istaffinggroup.com <mailto:possibilities@istaffinggroup.com>.  We do offer a referral fee if we are successful in placing one of your recommendations.
 
Thank you for your time.  I look forward to speaking with you.
 
Sincerely,
 
Gary Pitt
Director
Intercontinental Staffing Group Inc.
Phone:  (713) 850-8399
Fax:  (713) 850-7746
Cell Phone:  (281) 467-0022
email:  possibilities@istaffinggroup.com <mailto:possibilities@istaffinggroup.com> 

Are we doing ATM rings for Sempra and Kinder? Or others? Presto said he's refusing to do it in power for anybody. Any advice, cause the phone is ringing off the hook to do them.

Did you say you had a friend that has private health insurance. if so who with? and any advice? 

Dick Snell 713-653-8805 Thompson & Knight LLP
as small as $2,000, $320/hr , he does 706, 1041 done by accountant

With Ken Lay's resignation, you undoubtedly have questions about Enron's management structure and what lies ahead for the company.  The purpose of this communication is to begin to answer those questions and lay out the direction we plan to follow as we regroup and rebuild.

First, the Creditors Committee has proposed that the Board of Directors retain an interim CEO to focus on the restructuring process.  This is a positive sign that the Committee believes Enron will provide greater value as a viable ongoing business.

The Enron Board of Directors has approved Stephen Cooper as interim CEO and chief restructuring officer.  Steve is the managing partner of Zolfo Cooper, a corporate recovery and crisis management firm with more than 30 years experience leading companies through operational and financial reorganizations.

Steve and his firm will work with members of Enron's current management to develop and implement a comprehensive plan to restructure the company and emerge from bankruptcy.  

As you know, Enron has entered into an agreement with UBS Warburg for the sale of NetCo, Enron's wholesale gas and power trading organization.  In preparation for the transition of NetCo to UBS, Greg Whalley has resigned as president and COO of Enron to assume a position with UBS Warburg.  We want to thank Greg and the NetCo employees joining UBS for their contributions to Enron and wish them great success going forward.

In addition to engaging Steve, Enron has formed an Office of the Chief Executive.  I will join Steve in that office as president and chief operating officer, and Ray Bowen will join us as executive vice president and chief financial officer.

We will provide additional information regarding the roles and responsibilities of Enron's entire management team once those become more fully defined.

Thank you for continuing to support Enron by performing your job everyday.  The ongoing uncertainty about our future, coupled with the constant media scrutiny, makes this situation difficult for all of us. While no one can control the media, we can and will define our leadership and devise our strategy for moving ahead.  And in doing so, we will build a more certain future for our company and our employees.

Link to the press release: http://www.enron.com/corp/pressroom/releases/2002/ene/012902Release.html

This is to inform you that on January 25, 2002 the Honorable Arthur Gonzalez, United States Bankruptcy Judge for the Southern District of New York, entered an order as follows:

It is hereby Ordered that until further Order of this Court, Enron Corp., its affiliated debtors-in-possession in these jointly administered chapter 11 proceedings (collectively "Enron"), and Enron's employees shall preserve, and refrain from destroying or disposing of, any of Enron's records, either in electronic or paper form.

Obviously, any violation of this order will carry serious consequences.  We know that we can depend on you to comply with it fully.

Thank you.

messy

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Great stuff seeking new owners in Yahoo! Auctions! 
http://auctions.yahoo.com

Let me know what you think.

DJM

 

 
I do not believe these bills have some out of Conference and been voted into law yet, but you may be interested to see what types of tax relief Congress is expected to pass.  Obviously, we will claim every possible tax benefit allowed on your father's estate tax return and your mother's personal income tax return.

<<Senate Passes Tax Relief For Victims.doc>> 

Connie Babbitt Estopinal 
Mohle Adams L.L.P. 
3900 Essex Lane Ste 630 
Houston TX  77027 
(713) 629-1381 Ext 206 
(713) 965-0618 Fax 
<HTTP://www.mohleadams.com> 

 
Hi Geoff:
 
I'm sorry I did not get back to you yesterday.  I was out of the office.
 
I received your request regarding the contingent beneficiary for your father's life insurance, SIP, SAPP and Voluntary Cash Deferral Plan.  Unfortunately, Ayco does not have access to this information. For all of these types of requests, Marsh has asked that the requesting party send a letter to Marsh & McLennan to the special UP.OF. Box that has been set up:
 
Benefits Processing - WATCH
UP.OF. Box 2002
New York, NY  10108-2002
 
If we can be of any further assistance, please let us know.
 
 
Kay B. Cairns
The Ayco Company, I.UP.
One Wall Street
Albany, NY  12205
Phone: (518) 464-2271

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Email: kcairns@ayco.com <mailto:kcairns@ayco.com>

PRIVACY NOTICE 

This message is intended only for the use of the individual or entity to which it is addressed and may contain information that is privileged, confidential or exempt from disclosure under applicable federal or state law.  You are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or copying of this communication, except in accordance with its intended purpose, is strictly prohibited.

 
Wow, I can see that Cameron is 50% Geoff and 50% Vickie. In spite of your 50 is gorgeous!!! ja,ja 

How's Vickie doing? and you? got new furniture after the natural disaster? 

Wire to: ChaseManhattan Bank  NY NY11245
Routiing: 021000021
beneficiary: Homeside Lending Corp
Acct# :304204633
Phone: Paid in Full Dpt
Homeowners Name and loan Number

 $27.90 
 $151,811.79 	1/2/2002

Here's that info.

Harvey Cohen - 800-473-5558

Lawyer that does estate stuff - Theresa Frierson
713-621-7007

NY law firm that does airline suits Kreindler

Tracey

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send FREE video emails in Yahoo! Mail!
http://promo.yahoo.com/videomail/

Here's that info.

Harvey Cohen - 800-473-5558

Lawyer that does estate stuff - Theresa Frierson 713-621-7007

NY law firm that does airline suits Kreindler

Tracey

 
 

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send FREE video emails in Yahoo! Mail!
http://promo.yahoo.com/videomail/

Terry Lacy

Andrew & Kurth
Chase Tower
40th Floor
713-220-4482

	
Larry,

Sorry I haven't contacted you in awhile with regard to the probate list of assets. We will be disclaiming various Life Insurance and JROS accounts. Harvey Cohen reffered a Trust lawyer to us by the name of Theresa Frierson (713-621-7007). We are going to have her do the legal work on the disclaiming and trust setup.

When the disclaiming process is done, she can coordinate with you the final list of probate assets so you can finish the court work.

Let me know if you have any questions. 

Thanks,

Geof

713-853-7058w
713-412-4632-c
713-942-7972h

Laura Mislin  - works for some company that MMC has outsourced the MMC Victims Fund to.

CNA - Gretta Seay 407-919-6176
Metlife - Pat Cassey 315-792-5833
	Sandy Coyne 315-792-5848

Sorry i didn't get back to you sooner. The 29th 2pm is fine. You can call Pam to confirm. 281-392-0269. 
 
Thanks,
 
Geof

The afternoon of the 29th is good for me too.  Shall we schedule a meeting at 2?

 
Geof I would like to meet with Connie. If possible, a good day for me would  be the afternoon of Jan 29. The kids get out of school early. I can meet wherever.If that won't work, any day except Jan 23 which is when I'm meeting with the estate lawyer. I don't work this Monday either but most people have that day off. Got ck from Paine Weber.

These are the questions I asked her with the answers below.
 
Please read this. She would like to meet with you.

 
 
Connie,

I think we finally decided how much money we want to disclaim for purposes of funding the trust. 

We will not be diclaiming the house but will try to disclaim two life insurance checks, an ADD through Jimmy's employer, Marsh & McLennan, and held with CNA and the credit card Travel Accidental Death Insurace held through American Express. I will be talking to the Larry Harman about the process of doing this. It will add about 450k to the estate and take the probate assets up to about 1.4M or 700k for the trust.
[Connie L. Babbitt]  That sounds good.  There are always complications when a personal residence is put in a disclaimer trust, so I believe you are making the correct decision there.  

Is there any deadline or timelines on when the trust must be setup? 
[Connie L. Babbitt]  No, but the disclaimer must be filed with the probate court by June 11, 2002. 

Is there a form to send to the IRS to request a tax ID for the trust?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Yes, an SS-4 Form.  We can prepare one for your mother's signature. 

My mom wants to know if we need to meet with you or when?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  I would like to meet with her.  I think she will be more comfortable if she's had a chance to meet me personally, although it's certainly not required.  I visit many of my clients at their home, so I could meet at her house if that would be more convenient for her.  She may prefer a meeting fairly soon to answer any general questions she may have about the estate, trust funding, and distributions of assets.  If our firm will be preparing the 2001 income tax return, I would also need to meet with her to obtain all the 1099s, W-2s, etc for the 2001 return.  A meeting around the end of January, beginning of February would probably be good timing for that.

When will we find out what those new regulations will really mean for our estate income taxes?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Once I see the 2001 1099s, W-2s, etc and get a better grip on all the income sources, we ought to be able to zero in better on the issues.  At first blush, I would anticipate very little tax liability for 2001.  I'm hoping the IRS will be issuing further guidance to address more details, e.g. spousal income, etc, over the next few weeks.  I'm sorry I can't give you a more definitive answer on this one.

Thanks,

 

Geof

 

Geoff, if we are given a 2/1 effective date with UBS your benefits with Enron will be active through 1/31/02. 
UBS like Enron does use Hewitt as their 401K Vendor, however they do not have the self-directed account feature set up.
In regards to a provider list for doctors, UBS uses Cigna as their network provider.  You can go out to the web at Cigna's home page and pull up a list of providers by entering in you home address/zip code at the following link.

http://www.cigna.com/general/misc/docdir.html

attached below is a copy of their benefits at a glance document if you have not already seen it.

Thanks, Tony

Tony,
Geoff is an employee slated to go to NETCO.  Can you answer the questions from his wife below.  They have a particular need for medical coverage so any info you could supply would be helpful.

I believe we will be covered on Enron Benefits through the end of Jan and will be on UBS as of Feb 1.  The enrollment period would begin sometime after the hire date so maybe last week Jan./first week Feb.

The 401k will be self-direct won't it?

Don't know about the list of doctors?

1.  when do you elect benefits
2.  when do you switch from enron health insurance to
ubs health insurance.
3.  can we get a list of in network doctors (usually
they have one on line)
4.  is there a self directed 401k option.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send FREE video emails in Yahoo! Mail!
http://promo.yahoo.com/videomail/

    
Detailed Search Results 
Adam, Karolina, MD
Specialties: Maternal And Fetal Medicine, Neonatal-Perinatal Medicine, Obstetrics/Gynecology
6560 Fannin St #702
Houston, TX 77030
(713) 791-1942
 

Schooling: Med Coll Of Pennsylvania-Philadelphia,1983 
Gender: Female  
Languages Spoken: Czech
Spanish
French 

Hospital Affilations:
St. Luke's Episcopal Hospital
Columbia Womans Hospital TX
Methodist Hospital
 

    

Customer Service | About CIGNA | Working @ CIGNA 
Investor Relations | Newsroom | Site Map 

? 2001 CIGNA Health Corporation
See Legal Disclaimers and Privacy Statement.
 

 

1.  when do you elect benefits
2.  when do you switch from enron health insurance to
ubs health insurance.
3.  can we get a list of in network doctors (usually
they have one on line)
4.  is there a self directed 401k option.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send FREE video emails in Yahoo! Mail!
http://promo.yahoo.com/videomail/

Margie Harris

Heights Blvd, 11am
1007 Height Blvd
uturn 11th street 4th bldg on right, lavander house

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send FREE video emails in Yahoo! Mail!
http://promo.yahoo.com/videomail/

  
 
 32AF7A00

gotcha!

After each of your questions is my response.  It's immediately preceded by [Connie L. Babbitt], which was my original Microsoft Exchange address (I recently remarried).

There was nothing written in your email

 

Connie,

I think we finally decided how much money we want to disclaim for purposes of funding the trust. 

We will not be diclaiming the house but will try to disclaim two life insurance checks, an ADD through Jimmy's employer, Marsh & McLennan, and held with CNA and the credit card Travel Accidental Death Insurace held through American Express. I will be talking to the Larry Harman about the process of doing this. It will add about 450k to the estate and take the probate assets up to about 1.4M or 700k for the trust.
[Connie L. Babbitt]  That sounds good.  There are always complications when a personal residence is put in a disclaimer trust, so I believe you are making the correct decision there.  

Is there any deadline or timelines on when the trust must be setup? 
[Connie L. Babbitt]  No, but the disclaimer must be filed with the probate court by June 11, 2002. 

Is there a form to send to the IRS to request a tax ID for the trust?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Yes, an SS-4 Form.  We can prepare one for your mother's signature. 

My mom wants to know if we need to meet with you or when?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  I would like to meet with her.  I think she will be more comfortable if she's had a chance to meet me personally, although it's certainly not required.  I visit many of my clients at their home, so I could meet at her house if that would be more convenient for her.  She may prefer a meeting fairly soon to answer any general questions she may have about the estate, trust funding, and distributions of assets.  If our firm will be preparing the 2001 income tax return, I would also need to meet with her to obtain all the 1099s, W-2s, etc for the 2001 return.  A meeting around the end of January, beginning of February would probably be good timing for that.

When will we find out what those new regulations will really mean for our estate income taxes?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Once I see the 2001 1099s, W-2s, etc and get a better grip on all the income sources, we ought to be able to zero in better on the issues.  At first blush, I would anticipate very little tax liability for 2001.  I'm hoping the IRS will be issuing further guidance to address more details, e.g. spousal income, etc, over the next few weeks.  I'm sorry I can't give you a more definitive answer on this one.

Thanks,

 

Geof

 

There was nothing written in your email

 

Connie,

I think we finally decided how much money we want to disclaim for purposes of funding the trust. 

We will not be diclaiming the house but will try to disclaim two life insurance checks, an ADD through Jimmy's employer, Marsh & McLennan, and held with CNA and the credit card Travel Accidental Death Insurace held through American Express. I will be talking to the Larry Harman about the process of doing this. It will add about 450k to the estate and take the probate assets up to about 1.4M or 700k for the trust.
[Connie L. Babbitt]  That sounds good.  There are always complications when a personal residence is put in a disclaimer trust, so I believe you are making the correct decision there.  

Is there any deadline or timelines on when the trust must be setup? 
[Connie L. Babbitt]  No, but the disclaimer must be filed with the probate court by June 11, 2002. 

Is there a form to send to the IRS to request a tax ID for the trust?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Yes, an SS-4 Form.  We can prepare one for your mother's signature. 

My mom wants to know if we need to meet with you or when?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  I would like to meet with her.  I think she will be more comfortable if she's had a chance to meet me personally, although it's certainly not required.  I visit many of my clients at their home, so I could meet at her house if that would be more convenient for her.  She may prefer a meeting fairly soon to answer any general questions she may have about the estate, trust funding, and distributions of assets.  If our firm will be preparing the 2001 income tax return, I would also need to meet with her to obtain all the 1099s, W-2s, etc for the 2001 return.  A meeting around the end of January, beginning of February would probably be good timing for that.

When will we find out what those new regulations will really mean for our estate income taxes?
[Connie L. Babbitt]  Once I see the 2001 1099s, W-2s, etc and get a better grip on all the income sources, we ought to be able to zero in better on the issues.  At first blush, I would anticipate very little tax liability for 2001.  I'm hoping the IRS will be issuing further guidance to address more details, e.g. spousal income, etc, over the next few weeks.  I'm sorry I can't give you a more definitive answer on this one.

Thanks,

 

Geof

 

Hi Geoff: 
I'm sorry I did not get back to you yesterday. I was out of the office. 
I received your request regarding the contingent beneficiary for your father's life insurance, SIP, SAPP and Voluntary Cash Deferral Plan. Unfortunately, Ayco does not have access to this information. For all of these types of requests, Marsh has asked that the requesting party send a letter to Marsh & McLennan to the special UP.OF. Box that has been set up: 
Benefits Processing - WATCH 
UP.OF. Box 2002 
New York, NY 10108-2002 
If we can be of any further assistance, please let us know. 
Kay B. Cairns
The Ayco Company, I.UP.
One Wall Street
Albany, NY 12205
Phone: (518) 464-2271

I wasn't in yesterday, but its 713-402-3819

I left it at home.  

 
 

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send your FREE holiday greetings online!
http://greetings.yahoo.com

Can I have the info on your mortgage to get a payoff number - i.e. Company Name, Account Number, phone number, ect.

You asked me to forward the documents if I got them. Here they are - though I imagine you already have them . . .

Dave

FYI. Theae are as filed -- they don't reflect the minor modifications the judge made to the text. We are still waiting for his order and the final text. --DP

See below

W. Lance Schuler
I have attached below the following documents that were filed with the
Bankruptcy Court today:

     1.  Contribution Agreement
     2.  Partnership Agreement
     3.  License Agreement
     4.  Bidding Procedures Motion
     5.  Bidding Procedures Order
     6.  Notice of Auction

**********NOTE**********
The information contained in this email message is intended only
for use of the individual or entity named above.  If the reader
of this message is not the intended recipient, or the employee or
agent responsible to deliver it to the intended recipient, you
are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or
copying of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you
have received this communication in error, please immediately
notify us by telephone (212-310-8000), and destroy the original
message. Thank you.

(CONTRIBUTION AGREEMENT - Template for Bid Package) (See attached file:
n_pl08!.DOC)
(Netco, L.P. -- template) (See attached file: nq4d04!.DOC)
(Enron Assignment and License Agreement) (See attached file: n1bx08!.DOC)
(Enron - Bidding Procedures Motion) (See attached file: npm302!.DOC)
(ENRON - Wholesale Business - Order re: Bidding Procs, etc.) (See attached
file: 56m304!.DOC)
(Enron - WSJ Notice (Sale of Wholesale Assets)) (See attached file:
npmt02!.DOC)
 - n_pl08!.DOC 
 - nq4d04!.DOC 
 - n1bx08!.DOC 
 - npm302!.DOC 
 - 56m304!.DOC 
 - npmt02!.DOC 

She is still stuck in bed. 
But she will be going off her medication this week or next. 
Should be off bed rest also in the next week.
I he doesn't come on his own by th efirst week in may,
than they will take him out.

That's the news. I'll be a daddy before you know it !!!!!!

geof

All,
I've recently learned that I'm not receiving a lot of emails  sent to this address, and AT&T can't seem to solve the problem.  I  apologize if you've sent something to me and I've not replied.  I'm going  to phase this out over the next couple of weeks.  
 
Therefore, please update your address books to the  following:
 jmiles777@yahoo.com 
 
Thanks,
Jason

I forgot what my GMAT's were? How do i find out what my scores were?

Geoffrey Clinton Storey
713-853-7058

Here is my specs on the cash positions. Just look at the phy pos tab. 
vicki storey <vickistorey@yahoo.com> on 04/09/2001 01:40:33 PM
here

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get email at your own domain with Yahoo! Mail. 
http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/
 - phase2.xls 

No this is definitely not the final document.. Issues 1-3 are correct and complete, but 4 & 5 are not. 
I imagine 6-10 pages in reporting requirements for Gas Daily Options and Pipe Options alone. 

While we are still working on these requirements we can move forward on 1-3 and the deal entry and new deal type 
for basis options.

Louise Kitchen
04/08/2001 06:57 PM
I take it this is not your final document?
Attached please find the Inception Document for Gas Trading Vision II Phase II. I would appreciate your comments. I will be circulating the document for signatures on Wednesday. Please provide your inputs by then.

Thanks

Zhiyong

 

CALENDAR ENTRY:	INVITATION

Description:
	GTV Meeting in EB3269

Date:		4/3/2001
Time:		3:00 PM - 4:00 PM (Central Standard Time)

Chairperson:	Geoff Storey

Detailed Description:

Thank you for your Pre-Enrollment Application for our Enron Kid's Center.

If you have questions related to the care of your child, lottery, room
capacity, tuition, wait-listing, etc...please email your questions to
gwing@knowledgebeginnings.com.  If you have questions related to enrollment
information, please email cfranklin-rhem@klcorp.com.

Thanks again!

Catherine

Victoria,

Thank you for your Pre-Enrollment Application for our Enron Kid's Center.

If you have questions related to the care of your child, lottery, room
capacity, tuition, wait-listing, etc...please email your questions to
gwing@knowledgebeginnings.com.  If you have questions related to enrollment
information, please email cfranklin-rhem@klcorp.com.

Thanks again!

Catherine

sign me up please, thank you very very much

geof

Parking & Transportation@ENRON
03/28/2001 04:07 PM
Sent by:=09DeShonda Hamilton@ENRON
The Enron Center garage will be opening very soon.

Employees who work for business units that are scheduled to move to the new=
 building and currently park in the Allen Center or Met garages are being o=
ffered a parking space in the new Enron Center garage.

This is the only offer you will receive during the initial migration to the=
 new garage. Spaces will be filled on a first come first served basis. The =
cost for the new garage will be the same as Allen Center garage which is cu=
rrently $165.00 per month, less the company subsidy, leaving a monthly empl=
oyee cost of $94.00.

If you choose not to accept this offer at this time, you may add your name =
to the Enron Center garage waiting list at a later day and offers will be m=
ade as spaces become available.=20

The Saturn Ring  that connects the garage and both buildings will not be op=
ened until summer 2001. All initial parkers will have to use the street lev=
el entrance to Enron Center North until Saturn Ring access is available. Ga=
rage stairways next to the elevator lobbies at each floor may be used as an=
 exit in the event of elevator trouble.=20

If you are interested in accepting this offer, please reply via email to Pa=
rking and Transportation as soon as you reach a decision. Following your em=
ail, arrangements will be made for you to turn in your old parking card and=
 receive a parking transponder along with a new information packet for the =
new garage.

The Parking and Transportation desk may be reached via email at Parking and=
 Transportation/Corp/Enron or 713-853-7060  with any questions.=20

(You must enter & exit on Clay St. the first two weeks, also pedestrians, w=
ill have to use the garage stairwell located on the corner of Bell & Smith.=
)

thats fine. come to my desk or 32c2. i have a meeting there at 3pm.

Geoff,

How about 4:00 pm today?

Zhiyong

We need to have a meeting regarding version 3.

Let me know when you have time? 
I dont want a 10 person meeting. Just you and myself.

geof

We need to have a meeting regarding version 3.

Let me know when you have time? 
I dont want a 10 person meeting. Just you and myself.

geof

I agree with your statements on phase II. I'll start working on the priorities and requirements.

Also, what is the status of Colleen?

Geof

Louise Kitchen
03/19/2001 11:14 AM
Comments:

Zhiyong Wei to be added to signature lists.
Timeline to include production dates - ie include UAT and production roll-out dates.
Dependencies - where there are dependencies on other groups (any interaction required with any group outside of Zheiyong's), these need to be highlighted and a representative from that group needs to sign off on that portion of the timeline ( a representative can not be below Director level in the organiztion).

There are clearly many people rolling off early in this project who can be utilized for Phase II - I would suggest the specfication for Phase II is completed in the very near future as the majority of the work in this is done in the very short term by the developers and it moves to the test team.

Please re-issue today.

Louise

Louise,

Attached please find the inception document requested. I would greatly appreciated your comments. I will be consulting Colleen and Geoff for any necessary revision. I will be requesting signatures on Wednesday afternoon, March 21.

Thanks

Zhiyong

 

I understand we have now finalized 90% requirements on the GTV II.

Please could we pull together the format inception document this week for signature on your meeting next week with Geof and Colleen.

Document to include all requirements, dependencies and timelines.

I would suggest whoever is writing this spend some time with Geof this week.

Please circulate to draft all listed above including me.

Thanks,

Louise

<Embedded StdOleLink>

 
 

All is well. Vicki left the hospital the first week in Feb. She's been in bed at home since. 
We're now at 31 weeks and the doctor said she wants to induce around 36/37 weeks. 
So we may only have 5 weeks left !!! 

We got all excited this weekend cause we bought a car seat and stroller. 
I push the stroller around the house with a teddy bear in it, pretending to be a daddy.

Chow,

Geof

I sell Chi basis Financially, two deals to EES

 

 

Did you ge tthe picture???

Tell me.

did you get the picture??

 

His name is Cameron James Storey

   

	Joseph,

	Hunter will be in Chicago on the 17th, but I reserved a conference room from 2:30-4:00pm. 
	Myself, Martin Cuilla (Ontario Trader) and Patrice Thurstan (Chicago Trader) will be in attendance. 

	Enron is located at 1400 Smith St. and gas trading is in on the 32nd floor.
	Call me from the security desk dowstairs when you arrive (713-853-7058).

	See you soon.

	Geof Storey

Hunter/Geoff,

We are looking forward to meet you. Please confirm the meeting time by
Monday because we will leave Calgary early morning Tuesday. By the way, what
is the street address for Enron in Houston.

Thank you.

Joseph Cheung
Petro-Canada

Hunter, thanks for agreeing to set up a meeting with Mark Rogers and Joseph
Cheung of Petro-Canada.

Mark and Jospeh will be in Houston on May 17th @ 2:30 pm and would like to
meet with some members of the central desk to discuss Chicago and MidWest
fundamentals.

Could you please reply by e-mail  directly to Joseph and Mark with the
location of the meeting and other details.

Thanks

Grant

Phone list :

Hunter Shively           713-853-4772
Geoff Storey        713-853-7058

Joseph Cheung       403-296-5108
Mark Rogers         403-296-3759

Geoff,  Please provide your bid for the LONG Mich Con basis position along with your offer for the SHORT ANR-ML7 basis position.

 

I will call you tomorrow after lunch to discuss.

Thanks,
Jesus

Sarah-Joy,
The long-term originators are as follows:

	Carolina Power and Light/Ashville		Tammi De Paolis	(713) 853-5121
	Three Rivers Michigan Area			Geoff Storey		(713) 853-7058

Call me if you have any other questions,

Janet Wallis
853-5388

 
Mary Jo Johnson
05/17/2001 09:12 AM
Janet,  

Would you be interested in doing this gas deal?  What are the ranges of customers that you would sell to?  Give me a call,  Mary Jo
Mary Jo:
Per our conversation below, could you take a quick look at the data below and see if Varn International is a company we can work with?

Thanks.

Believe it or not, I am currently working in the Northwest side of Houston  
with Varn International.  Our parent company, Day International,  has  
facilities located in Michigan and North Carolina.   Would you be so kind and  
point me in the right direction as to who might handle the Carolina Power and  
Light account in Ashville, NC as well as the American Electric Power account  
in Three Rivers Michigan.  Our Day plants have been using brokers but I  
thought we might could work with Enron, if they are in that market area, and  
possibly negotiate some long term agreement for all our facilities.  Once  
they found out I had natural gas experience, they put me on this project.   
Otherwise I'm responsible for purchasing and logistics for North America and  
eventually worldwide.
Sarah-Joy Hunter
Sr. Manager 
Enron Corporation, Business Development
#(713)-345-6541
sarah-joy.hunter@enron.com

Sarah,

I have attached an excel worksheet with the addresses of our locations along
with the volumes for each.   Please review and give me a call.   281-469-6200
ext. 254

Dwight(See attached file: NATURAL GAS USAGE.xls)

 - NATURAL GAS USAGE.xls << File: NATURAL GAS USAGE.xls >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

	Bought QQQ 6/13
	Bought TIBCO 7/18
	Charties - German Sheppard Dog Rescue of Houston - $533
	Charities - Juvinile Diabetes Foundation $300
	I also had payroll reduction at Enron to United Way

	Paid $533 at closing for real estate taxes. 

Oops, another outstanding item...

Could you please provide me with the date of purchase of your Tibco and
Nasdaq 100 shares.  You gave me the cost per our phonecall, but I forgot to
get the acquisition dates from you.

Thanks,

Vicki

Vicki L. Meszaros
05/22/2001 09:14 AM

Hi, Geoff,

I have not received your list of charitable donations.  Please send (fax)
to me as soon as possible, so that I may finalize your U.S. return.

Thanks so much,

Vicki Meszaros

PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Phone (403) 509-7469
Fax (403) 781-1825

This is to remind all employees that, as earlier instructed, in view of the pending and threatened legal proceedings involving the company, no company records, either in electronic or paper form, should be destroyed.  In the event of an office closing, please contact Bob Williams at (713) 345-2402 to arrange for storage of any records.

Please call Bob with any questions.  

Hi, Geoff,

I know that you are busy, so I will send you an e-mail instead of trying to
reach you by phone...

Just a few quick questions for you:

1.   Box 13, Code "C" for $36.00 on your W-2 - is this your donation to the
United Way?

2.  Please confirm that you donated $533 to the German Shephard Dog Rescue
and paid $533 at closing for real estate taxes.  I just want to make sure
that it is a coincidence that these amounts are the same, and not a typing
error.

3.  Please confirm that you paid $3,133.88 for your Tibco International
Inc. shares and sold at $2,905.09, and paid $9,355.00 for your Nasdaq
shares and sold at $7,459.75 (both sold at a loss).

Thank you kindly,

Vicki Meszaros

PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Phone (403) 509-7469
Fax (403) 781-1825

	NX1 +.14

Geoff, Please provide your offer for the attached NGI-Chicago paper volumes.

 << File: NGI-CHI basis position 053101.xls >> 

Thanks,
Jesus

    Its a bridge to Sun/Oracle, so i can run ERMS portcalc, curveview, ect from my PC
        
 
Geoff, what is exceed? 

You have received this email because the requester specified you as their Manager. Please click <http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000038172&Page=Approval> to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000038172

Request Create Date : 6/1/01 9:47:25 AM

Requested For       : geoff.storey@enron.com

Resource Name       : Exceed

Resource Type       : Applications

	We will be here. How long will you be in Houston??? 

Hey Se?or Papa! 
I have a business trip to San Diego and I think they bought me the airline ticket via Houston.  I will pass by Houston on June 9th.  are you going to be in town?????????? I'd love to meet Cameron and Vickie!

	Cool. Maybe we can have eats at the airport or something. Vicki wants to meet you!! What time is the flight.

	Geof

3 1/2 hours. 

I need to talk to you about some IT personnel issues. 
Can you call me at work (7058), home 713-942-7972 or cell 713-412-4632 whenever its convinient.

Thanks,

geof

ps congrats!!!!!!

	

	Yes,
	2022 Windsor Houston TX 77006
	
	Send it there. 

	What's my tally??? And what is Enron going to reimburse??

	geof

--- vicki.l.meszaros@ca.pwcglobal.com wrote:
__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get personalized email addresses from Yahoo! Mail - only $35
a year!  http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/

Yes,
	2022 Windsor Houston TX 77006
	
	Send it there. 

	What's my tally??? And what is Enron going to reimburse??

	geof

Hi, Geoff,

Could you please confirm that your Windsor address is to be used on your
tax returns.  Also, would you like your completed tax package sent to this
address?  We will be sending out your returns as soon as possible.

Thanks,

Vicki Meszaros

PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Phone (403) 509-7469
Fax (403) 781-1825

	
Those idiots. I was in a hurry and didn't want to miss my flight, so i walked out and assumed that they would just bill the credit card.

But before I left I gave the tux to the front desk and gave them your name and room number. The guy was like, "Okay" and then walked to the back room without writting your name or anything down. So i told him again what name and room number. He said "no problem".

Oh well. Sorry about the trouble and thanks for the invite. It was a great wedding.

Geof

Geoff,
     Did you make it back ok?  The front desk had no idea where the tux
was, in fact they didn't even have you checked out!!!  So we waited around
until noon and had them go up to your room and check.  Anyway, they finally
called and said they found it about 4pm and I went back and got it.  Thanks
again for coming up, hope you had a good time.  LAter

Jon Childers
Sears Premise Network Support
IBM Global Services
847-286-9261

	Hey dork! What time does the flight arrive????? Cameron wants to see you!!!!!

3 1/2 hours. 

Enron announced today that its common stock will now be traded as an Over-the-Counter (OTC) equity security under the symbol "ENRNQ."  This follows a decision by the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) to file an application to delist Enron's common stock, which means that Enron's common stock and related securities are suspended from trading on the NYSE.  Enron is considering whether to appeal the NYSE's decision.

The NYSE has standard criteria for listing stocks, which can be found on their website at www.nyse.com.  Enron recently fell below the following listing criteria: average closing price of a security less than $1.00 over a consecutive 30 trading-day period.  Quotation service for Enron's stock will now be provided by the National Quotation Bureau, LLC "Pink Sheets."  

WHICH ONE?

 Continental 1612 
Aircraft: 733 Sat - Jun 9, 2001 
Monterrey (MTY-Gen Mariano Escobedo)7:55 AM 
Houston, TX (IAH-Bush Intercontinental) 9:34 AM

Continental 1614 
Aircraft: 735 Sat - Jun 9, 2001 
Monterrey (MTY-Gen Mariano Escobedo) 11:45 AM 
Houston, TX (IAH-Bush Intercontinental) 1:10 PM 

Continental 4156 
Aircraft: ERJ Sat - Jun 9, 2001 
Monterrey (MTY-Gen Mariano Escobedo) 3:10 PM 
Houston, TX (IAH-Bush Intercontinental) 4:40 PM

 

	
	Sunday??? June 9th is Saturday. We'll meet you at the gate. Which day?

My flight schedule: 
 Monterrey - Houston - San Diego 
June 7h, CO3564B- arrives to Houston at 12:37 pm and leaves at 2:25 pm on gate 4B 
Return: 
June 9th, CO372T- arrives to Houston at 2:40 pm and leaves 6:25 pm on gate 8A. 
Can you gus come on Sunday????? If so, where shoul I meet you? 

I guess theoritically there could be new info on rates and tarriffs between now and closing. But that seems very unlikely.

I know that the basis, index and fx quotes have to be refreshed like any other deal before we execute a transaction, but what about the transport demand charges?  It seems like we should be done on those.  True or false?

Todd

Saturday, saturday, saturday, sorry!!!  See you at the gate.  In case of flight changes, I will call you home.  
See you there, bro! 
I am looking forward to meet my nephiew! 

My flight schedule: 
 Monterrey - Houston - San Diego 
June 7h, CO3564B- arrives to Houston at 12:37 pm and leaves at 2:25 pm on gate 4B 
Return: 
June 9th, CO372T- arrives to Houston at 2:40 pm and leaves 6:25 pm on gate 8A. 
Can you gus come on Sunday????? If so, where shoul I meet you? 

This is a bridging problem. We alsoi have bridging problems with Canadian deals. Can we talk about fixing these??

Where do we stand with our systems being capable of booking physical fixed priced deals on EOL?  

Thanks,
Mike Grigsby

Please add this to each confirm

1.  Buyer has the option to take gas at alternate Secondary Delivery Points upon proper notice to Seller prior to the pipeline nomination deadline for any Period of Delivery at no cost or expense to Seller.

Geoff-
Just wondering if you had a chance to review the below e-mail.

Geoff-
I am sending three confirms for you to view, however, the comments on these deals are switchable rights / we can point transport to secondary delivery.  I am unclear what you are trying to do, please pick one of the selections below to go in the confirms that stats what you are trying to say.  Also, what is the secondary delivery point.

1.  Buyer has the option to take gas at either Delivery Point upon proper notice to Seller prior to the pipeline nomination deadline for any Period of Delivery.

2.  Prior to the pipeline nomination deadline, either party may select a secondary Delivery Point from among (list point(s)) or any other mutually agreeable point.
	
	3.  Buyer, at its option and upon proper notice to Seller prior to the pipeline nomination deadline, shall have the 	right to change Delivery Points up to ??? times during the Period of Delivery

 << File: Export.doc >>  << File: Export.doc >>  << File: Export.doc >> 
Thanks 
Richard
x54886

Tommy,

I've been getting lots of email about IT budgets. My roll is to oversee the IT projects specifically for Gas Trading, particularly development projects.

I'm not sure your projects will directly affect gas trading and i dont know who to point you toward.

Sorry i cant help. Call me if you like

geof

Geoff:  I understand that I need to get with you to approve the portion of my budget that is allocated the Enron America's.  Currently  $  299,871 is budgeted for allocation to EA.  My group coordinates JV activities as well as conducting due diligence on IT areas related to aquisitions and divestitures.  The amount budgeted above is for the following known projects:

		Coordination and Operations under the Bridgeline IT Services Agreement
		Due Diligence related to Project Sugarcane and how we may monetize our investment in Bridgeline

In 2002 ENA will bill Bridgeline $1,250,000 for IT Services.  Since Chevron/Texaco covers 60% of the bill ENA will net $750,000 in revenue for the services coordinated by my group.  

Let me know if you'd like to get together and discuss this in any detail.

Tommy Yanowski  x36858.
		

th e attachment you sent wont open. can you send another.

This document contains information for our IT Budget review meeting scheduled for this Wed. at 1:00.  Most people will be calling in via a conf. call (see meeting notice for details); otherwise it is in ECN 1835.

Objectives - review part of the 2002 IT costs & allocations for ENA, answer any questions, and obtain your approval to proceed with these projects.

The attached spreadsheet contains all the IT projects being allocated to ENA.  We will only review the projects in blue.  The list contains the name of the project (column C), Project Description (column D), Allocation Basis (column N), EA Allocation % (column O), and Costs being allocated to EA (column P).

Thanks.  Joe.
 << File: ENA Project Review.xls >> 

Chris	

I need a 10 and 5 year service out of Dec 2003. 

Enron has the right to to receive firm Consumer's CDA in exchange for firm Dawn. Enron will notify Enbridge by nomination deadlines the day before gas flow.  

Enron will pay a demand charge on 10,000/day of  ________us$/mm.

Volumes is 0-10,000 mmbtu.

Term is March-November or April - October. We could also do it where it is January - December with Enbridge having the right to recall the service 10 or 20 days each year. 

Let me knwo.

geof
	

As you are all aware, Enron and UBS have entered into an agreement for the sale of certain assets of the wholesale gas and power trading organization.  As part of that agreement, the management of UBS may speak to you over the next several days about an opportunity in that new organization.  If so, we encourage you to consider such an offer. However, if you are not employed by UBS, you remain an Enron employee.  If you have specific questions regarding your employment arrangements and job responsibilities please contact Anne Labbe in Human Resources at 5-7809, or feel free to contact either Jim Fallon or Dave Delainey directly.

Alliance has said anyone that may be taking assignment for service for the new gas year needs to be placed on the approved bidders list immediately to be eligible to take assignment for November 1.

FYI - I know you guys have been talking about service

  
 
 http://www.alliance-pipeline.com/shipper_services/c_ShipperPDF/c_Approved%20Bidders%20Form.pdf

What is the approved bidders list and how do we get on it?

Alliance has said anyone that may be taking assignment for service for the new gas year needs to be placed on the approved bidders list immediately to be eligible to take assignment for November 1.

FYI - I know you guys have been talking about service

I'll still pay IF Vent +0.05 for NBPL Transfer point. whatever volume. and yeah i'll meet him (i guess)

Mirant showed tony Vent+.0475 for Harper and Vent+.03 for Vent (Nov-Mar)

He is still trying to get some of those better numbers

not possible

Tony says he can get NGPL harper for M\C plus .175.  Can you find some taking gas from NBPL into NGPL and swap?

I want my harper gas! come on Tony!

I would rather pay 3 to  3.5cents for the vent harper transport, but if 4 cents is the closer i'd pay that for 2 years

Tony hasn't returned from Vegas yet.  As of Friday, he thought that he could still get some harper gas. 

 Sorry for the delay.  I don't really understand why takes so long, but I suspect it's the people TC deals with.  He is pretty diligent, but they don't always give him a straight answer

It looks like we are going to release most of NBPL capacity that we have (55,000 of the 100,000).  Mirant & BP want the Haper to Chicago capacity for $.08 and Dynergy wants Vent to Chicago for $.12.  PGL wants to exchange their manhattan to North Hayden for the remaining Vent to harper, so there may an opportunity to have PGL buy Vent and sell you Harper, but dealing with PGL is even slower that dealing with Tony.

I'll talk to Tony as soon as I see him

Do i need to forget about this gas or is he still letting it breathe

Nothing done yet, but TC is coming in tomorrow for a special Friday workplace appearance to try to close something.  Actually, his tee-time is canceled due to weather

NBPL Ventura transfer point, IF vent + 0.0125 bid. sure

Do you still want that Vent (nov-oct) for Vent + .0125?

NBPL Harper transfer point, IF Vent + 0.05 or IF NGPL MidCont + .185 bid

good to fill any volume

Tony only offer so far is from Husky at Ventua plus .03 (nov-mar).  He is still looking for better offers

can you email the three budgets , zws, cap, main
i lost them

Jeff and Geoff,

For the detailed requirements I need to talk to both of you. Let's have a meeting to talk about the correct valuation for all physical deals including storage and transport. I will schedule it. I was going to schedule the meeting for the detailed requirements after the State Of Work is signed.

Thanks

Zhiyong

Additions from G. Storey -

1. Confirmations
2. Correct valuation of storage
3. physical option valuation

JG
Zhiyong -

I have looked over the consolidated gas system inception document.  Here are a few questions/observations:

1.  Value all physical deals.  Not just current month.  This will require logistics to enter all forward transport rather than just current month.  (This is not an issue,  just needs to be addressed as we go)

2.  Term transport in new physical system would require spread option model to be in place.  

3.  Storey -  Would all term transportation be a spread option and we would set the correlations to one if there was no optionality?

4.  CPR is currently used as a back up if Sitara goes down.  What would we do if the new system goes down?

5.  What is the functionality to downstream systems going to look like?  (Risktrac - V@R, credit)

6.  Will calculations be performed from the same new system as Global Markets?

7.  What will happen if:  There is a fixed price physical deal where the risk components are split? 

Example: Price : NG-PRICE		Basis: FT-WEST		Index: INTRA-WEST

Jeff,

Please see the attached file for the document of Consolidated Gas System project. I appreciated any comments.

Thanks

Zhiyong

 << File: CGS-Statement of Work.doc >> 

Please do not send out a confirm. 
I added notes to the tagg tickets. ECC is going to confirm and the deal involves an agency agreement. 

Geoff-
Let me know if this confirm is ok to be sent out.  And if you could, I need a fax number for the cp.

 << File: Export.doc >> 
Thanks 
Richard
x54886

Geoff,

Do i need to forget about this gas or is he still letting it breathe

Nothing done yet, but TC is coming in tomorrow for a special Friday workplace appearance to try to close something.  Actually, his tee-time is canceled due to weather

NBPL Ventura transfer point, IF vent + 0.0125 bid. sure

Do you still want that Vent (nov-oct) for Vent + .0125?

NBPL Harper transfer point, IF Vent + 0.05 or IF NGPL MidCont + .185 bid

good to fill any volume

Tony only offer so far is from Husky at Ventua plus .03 (nov-mar).  He is still looking for better offers

We know you have questions about recent events impacting Enron and our plans for the future.  Ongoing investigations and pending litigation have made it difficult, if not impossible, to share information in a timely manner.  While we can't address certain issues, we can tell you about our initial plans to move Enron forward and emerge from bankruptcy, and we are eager to do that.

We had planned to hold an all-employee meeting tomorrow, January 23, at the Hyatt Regency.  However, we don't want to subject you to the media frenzy that would certainly surround such a meeting, so we've decided to postpone it.  We are currently making arrangements to hold a series of employee meetings within the building to protect your privacy.  We will provide the date and times to you as soon as the logistics for those meetings are finalized.

Prior to the employee meetings, we will provide an overview of Enron's new organizational structure.  You can expect that memo shortly.

NBPL Ventura transfer point, IF vent + 0.0125 bid. sure

Do you still want that Vent (nov-oct) for Vent + .0125?

NBPL Harper transfer point, IF Vent + 0.05 or IF NGPL MidCont + .185 bid

good to fill any volume

Tony only offer so far is from Husky at Ventua plus .03 (nov-mar).  He is still looking for better offers

NBPL Harper transfer point, IF Vent + 0.05 or IF NGPL MidCont + .185 bid

good to fill any volume

Tony only offer so far is from Husky at Ventua plus .03 (nov-mar).  He is still looking for better offers

1 billion divided by 5,000 victims = 200,000. Why do i know that the storey family will get none. (not that she needs it)

Here is the file in case you have trouble w/ the link
 

<http://my.aol.com/news/news_story.psp?type=1&cat=0100&id=0110021953090980>

Geoff,
Confirming per our telephone conversation today.  We are done as follows (originator Steven Burnham):
1.  November 1, 2001 through November 30, 2001
     Your physical basis offer
     At Dawn, Ontario - 55 GJ/d   Physical basis offer is +.20 US/MMBtu
     At Parkway, Ontario - 80 GJ/d   Physical basis offer is +.30 US/MMBtu

2.  December 1, 2001 through November 30, 2004
     Your physical basis offer
     At Dawn, Ontario - 61 GJ/d  Physical basis offer is +.20 US/MMBtu
     At Parkway, Ontario - 103 GJ/d  Physical basis offer is +.30 US/MMBtu

Nicole,
Would you please complete the booking with these numbers, including the in-outs with Lambie's term book.  Thanks. 

thats fine. just call me before you go

I talked to Karen and arranged for us to go clean out Dad's office Wednesday afternoon.  Let me know if this doesn't work for you.

I dont know what any of this stuff is and this is the first time I've seen any $$s. 

I dont even see gas trading vision (maybe its the 'global trading vision'). 
Operational capacity, System Main, Fundamentals, Global Val, and Peoples all have other business sponsers. I cant image what 'IT Commer. Coord' is.

Geoff

This cannot be right - its millions I thought we were about $5mm all in including the secret Zhei project

Geoff,

Niagara Dawn spread - Nov, Nov-Mar

Geoff,

The Canada Physical Basis spread product types are ready to have products built within them.  If you let me know which locations you would like to offer the spread on, I will build them and let you take a look at the functionality.

Kevin Meredith

EnronOnline
(713) 853-9555

	yep

I am currently talking to NGPL about a compression deal in Texas.  When I sat with you guys, you had expressed an interest  in installing compression at the Harper interconnect.  Does the central desk still have any interest?

Chris Meyer
x31666  

This is not what i wanted.

I wanted MTM value or Undiscounted cash per month, not necessarily per book. I.e. what will the books liquidate if prices dont move for Nov, Dec, Jan ect

 << File: 102601_Counterparty Exposure.xls >> 

Please give me a call.  I will be happy to walk you through the analysis.

Thanks,
Clara Carrington
Financial Trading
Manager - Rate and Currency Risk Mgmt
Direct Tel: (713) 853-9224
Email:  Clara.Carringotn@enron.com

give me a contact over there too
BP

Coral	Jeff Whitnah	713-767-5374
Relaint	Steve McGinn	713-207-4000

Lloyd will

Jenny,

It looks like I need to read my e-mail more often.  I'll start using it 
tomorrow (Mon).

Fletch

Please make sure that Fletcher J Sturm is marked for a spot in the new 
parking garage.

Thanks Tjae

Parking & Transportation@ENRON
03/28/2001 04:07 PM
Sent by: DeShonda Hamilton@ENRON
The Enron Center garage will be opening very soon.

Employees who work for business units that are scheduled to move to the new 
building and currently park in the Allen Center or Met garages are being 
offered a parking space in the new Enron Center garage.

This is the only offer you will receive during the initial migration to the 
new garage. Spaces will be filled on a first come first served basis. The 
cost for the new garage will be the same as Allen Center garage which is 
currently $165.00 per month, less the company subsidy, leaving a monthly 
employee cost of $94.00.

If you choose not to accept this offer at this time, you may add your name to 
the Enron Center garage waiting list at a later day and offers will be made 
as spaces become available. 

The Saturn Ring  that connects the garage and both buildings will not be 
opened until summer 2001. All initial parkers will have to use the street 
level entrance to Enron Center North until Saturn Ring access is available. 
Garage stairways next to the elevator lobbies at each floor may be used as an 
exit in the event of elevator trouble. 

If you are interested in accepting this offer, please reply via email to 
Parking and Transportation as soon as you reach a decision. Following your 
email, arrangements will be made for you to turn in your old parking card and 
receive a parking transponder along with a new information packet for the new 
garage.

The Parking and Transportation desk may be reached via email at Parking and 
Transportation/Corp/Enron or 713-853-7060  with any questions. 

(You must enter & exit on Clay St. the first two weeks, also pedestrians, 
will have to use the garage stairwell located on the corner of Bell & Smith.)

I would like to park in the new parking garage.  Please put me down for a 
"yes" to participate.

Fletcher J. Sturm
3-9684

yes, I would be interested

fletch

Please put this on my calendar, thanks

fletch

You are cordially invited to attend cocktails and dinner on April 10, 2001 at 
La Colombe d'Or restaurant located at 3410 Montrose Blvd (a map can be found 
at www.lacolombedor.com).  Cocktail hour will start at 7:00 pm with dinner to 
follow.  

Please note:  this dinner is for the Trading Track Program.

Please RSVP to Ted Bland at extension 3-5275 before April 6, 2001.

Ted,

Please mark me down for the dinner on Apr 10

Fletch

You are cordially invited to attend cocktails and dinner on April 10, 2001 at 
La Colombe d'Or restaurant located at 3410 Montrose Blvd (a map can be found 
at www.lacolombedor.com).  Cocktail hour will start at 7:00 pm with dinner to 
follow.  

Please note:  this dinner is for the Trading Track Program.

Please RSVP to Ted Bland at extension 3-5275 before April 6, 2001.

ok, just send them to TJ when you can and ask her to put them on my calendar.

thanks,

fletch

i'll be available

fletch

Russell Ballato@ENRON
03/21/2001 07:46 AM
http://eastpower.dev.corp.enron.com/portal/default.aspx?_PageIndex=0

Frank,

This guy called me because he read the book I wrote about Natural Gas.  He 
has some kind of special treatment with the federal government in terms of 
gas purchases.  Sounds like a minority owned business to me.  Could you call 
him or refer him to someone at EES?  Thanks,  Fletch Sturm

Don Cooper
703-683-6839

Caroline,

Sorry I haven't checked my e-mail in a while, but that's trading...I'm more 
interested in Cinergy, but would like to see a deal done no matter where.  
Let me know if I can help. 

Fletch

Hello,

We wanted to let you know about a new author directory and  book promotion 
service online.? It is a wonderful directory that offers  more than just a 
basic listing.? We also help you market your services  in several ways. 
Please 
check out our site at http://authors.hypermart.net

What  We Offer:

* One Year Listing with your contact information, email and  web address, 
picture of you and information about your books/services  

* We will register your individual listing with the search engines so  more 
people can find you 

* We will post a press release online for  you free of charge about any of 
your books/services. We have great resources  and can make your press release 
available to over 5000 media contacts within  minutes.

* Each week we will send out a press release about all of the  new authors 
listed in our directory. 

* Each month we will have a  featured author on our site 

* We will be advertising our site on all  major search engines, leading 
ezines, literary directories and sites, and  some print ads, as well as 
purchasing ads in online newsletters. 

All  For Only $29.95 (for a one year listing)

Check it out today. 

Our  site will be featured on top author, book and literary related sites as 
well  as in print, so get your listing today.? Press Releases are currently  
being distributed to universities, companies, and media contacts across the  
United States. Don't miss out on the publicity we can bring to you and your  
products.? 

This message was not intended to be an  inconvenience. If it was, we 
sincerely 
apologize.? Thank you for your  time and we hope to help you expand your 
Internet  presence.

Sincerely,

Extreme Promotions
http://authors.hypermart.net

Ted,

Please put her on the list of candidates for the next beginning rotation for 
Trader Track.  Thanks,

Fletch
Fletch,

As per our conversation, please find attached a copy of my resume.

Thanks,

Bani
	Enron Energy Services
	

Hi Fletch,

I am interested in pursuing a trading position with your group, and I'd 
appreciate an opportunity to meet with you to discuss the same.

Could you please let me know your convenience.

Thanks,
Bani

just checking to see if you had any interest?

fletch

Hi Fletch,

I am interested in pursuing a trading position with your group, and I'd 
appreciate an opportunity to meet with you to discuss the same.

Could you please let me know your convenience.

Thanks,
Bani

please check Jeff King's VAR...it dosn't look right

fletch sturm

I'm not sure, but I think it's a data file for the charting software that I 
use.

Thanks,

Fletch Sturm

you're cool

Attached is the form I'd like everyone to use for tomorrow's reports.  We 
will probably modify this and the ones to follow, so be prepared!

Fletch

TJ,
Please put on my calendar for every Tues., thanks.  Also, please notify my 
team that we will have a meeting with the marketing group every Mon at 3:30pm 
that Ed Baughman should be setting up with you.  That should be a weekly 
thing too.

Fletch

Jennifer Burns

01/23/2001 04:27 PM

There will be a Trader's Roundtable meeting every Tuesday at 4:00PM in 
EB3321.  

First Message that was sent out:
As mentioned during the fourth quarter, Gary and I would like to begin 
regular meetings of our Trader's Roundtable.  The ideas generated from this 
group should be longer term trading opportunities for Enron covering the 
markets we manage.  In addition, this forum will provide for cross commodity 
education, insight into many areas of Enron's businesses, and promote 
aggressive ideas.  

Each week, we'll summarize commodity trading activity, and provide an open 
forum for discussion.  Your input is valuable, and we've limited this group 
to our most experienced traders, and would appreciate regular participation.  
Our first meeting will be Tuesday, January 16 at 4:00pm in EB3321.

what does this mean?

Fletch

how about 3:15 or 3:30?

fletch

Jenny,

Thanks for the response.  I was under the impression that what you and I had 
worked out was more of a temporary fix and that there was another group 
working on a perrmanent solution for all of us.  I'm still obviously trading 
options, but would like you or JP or someone else in risk run a standard 
report for me each morning which shows my net delta positions by month and 
the subsequent gamma positions for certain $ moves in the underlying.  I 
could have Peter do it at night if it needs to be done before calc.  Just let 
me know.  Thanks,

Fletch

p.s.  sorry if it seems like this is being blown out of proportion

http://gasfundy.corp.enron.com/gas/framework/default.asp

yea...probably get a little relief from the inspection report though

great man...we just lifted a new pad too this past weekend...Bunker Hill 
area...sweet

fletch

no way

just kidding...you get 'em...just tell TJ to put any vacation days you want 
to schedule on my calendar.  thanks

fletch

Jeff,

Thanks for inviting me to be in the Round Table.  I think it'll be a 
success.  I'm able to make it to dinner tomorrow night for the Tiger Team 
deal.

Fletch

p.s.  did you close on your house yet?

I'm pretty sure we're good to go.  Check back with you on the restaurant.

Fletch

T Jae,

Please put this on my calendar.  Thanks,

Fletch

Jennifer Burns

01/12/2001 12:46 PM

As mentioned during the fourth quarter, Gary and I would like to begin 
regular meetings of our Trader's Roundtable.  The ideas generated from this 
group should be longer term trading opportunities for Enron covering the 
markets we manage.  In addition, this forum will provide for cross commodity 
education, insight into many areas of Enron's businesses, and promote 
aggressive ideas.  

Each week, we'll summarize commodity trading activity, and provide an open 
forum for discussion.  Your input is valuable, and we've limited this group 
to our most experienced traders, and would appreciate regular participation.  
Our first meeting will be Tuesday, January 16 at 4:00pm in EB3321.

T Jae,

Please put this on my calendar and remind me beforehand if you would.  Thanks,

Fletch

Vince J Kaminski
01/12/2001 04:41 PM
I would like to invite you to a meeting with Jeff Shankman on Tuesday
January 16, 3:30 p.m.  at Jeff Shankman's office.

We are meeting to plan the agenda for the Tiger Team, a group of about 20 
Wharton School
students visiting Enron.  A Wharton  tiger team works through a semester on a 
special project, proposed by
a corporation. The team sponsored by Enron works on project regarding the 
impact of
electronic trading on the energy markets. The semester long project will  
result in a report that
will be submitted to Enron for review and evaluation. I hope that  you will 
find this report useful.

 We have invited our tiger team to visit Enron. The students will arrive on 
Thursday, 
January 18, and will spend Friday at Enron. I would appreciate if you could 
find 30 minutes
on Friday to talk to the students.

The meeting with Jeff on Tuesday  should not last longer than 10-15 minutes.

Vince

sorry, just got your e-mail...I actually don't have any in hand anyway.  
thanks for your interest.

fletch sturm

Thank you very much for doing that for me!

Fletch

please put this on my calendar.  thanks,

fletch

Dave,

John Lavorato would like me to get back with him regarding exactly why we 
can't send out a pop-up window to advertise the new power products that we're 
launching this week.  Could you call or e-mail back?  He basically said he 
wants to do one, but I don't want to if it could crash all of EOL on our 
behalf.  Let me know.  Thanks,

Fletch

TJ,

We'll need another room.  These meetings are only for the MidWest traders.  
The meeting with the guy from PJM is for the northeast group.

Thanks,

Fletch

TJ,

Please put this on my calendar.  Thanks,

Fletch

thanks for the follow-up,
fletch

Ted,

I'll be out of town this weekend (Oct 27/28), but you can put me down for the 
s/s on Nov 4.  Please send details.

Fletch Sturm

Patti,

What do I do with this now?  How do I get the $50?  Can I wait and get a 
series of months reimbursed later or do I have to go through this every month?

Fletch Sturm

yes

Janelle,

That's a great product with a simple explanation.  I have blank deal tickets 
ready to be filled in!  Good luck.

Fletch

http://gasfundy.dev.corp.enron.com/

Lavo,

I'm in for dinner tonight for sure and golf Sun a.m. if you're able.  Oh 
EOG...how I love thee!  +2 1/4

Fletch

Terri,

Hi!  Thanks for your interest in my book.  You should be able to get one at 
www.amazon.com the fastest.  If they're out, or say it will take a while, go 
directly to www.pennwell.com  (this is the publisher.)  Again, thanks.

Fletch Sturm

Please put this on my calendar and remind me.

thanks,  fletch
	
	

Sent by: Kay Chapman
Dave would like to have a strategy meeting next Tuesday  Ocotober 10, 2000 
from 2:30-4:30 in room 30C1. No preparation is necessary and it's important 
that each of you plan to attend. If you cannot attend, please contact Dave 
directly.  

Thanks!

The name is Wallingford, McDonald, Fox and Company on SW Freeway at Buffalo 
Speedway.

Bombs away...

Fletch

Right shoulder complete...full reversal mode as of right now...bang!

Fletch

good luck...I'm sure you'll do well!  Have fun

fletch

jenny,
i'd really like to be able to set my curves through Dec '03 without having to 
freak with that g.d. contango weighting table in the MW4 file.  the market 
changes so fast during the day that i don't have time to switch between my 
MWSum and MW4 files fast enough to keep up with it.  i have a section in the 
MWSum spreadsheet where i keep all of the quick calcs on the calendars, so i 
could link that to the MW4 file like i'm doing through Oct '02.  come by 
tomorrow (Fri) and i'll show you what the h i'm talking about.
fletch

Eric,

The products have been launched (Mon) and did trade a couple times.  As far 
as another article in GD, i'll check with John, but I think it's a good idea.

Fletch

Please put this on my schedule.

thanks,  fletch
	Reschedule
Chairperson: Richard Burchfield
Sent by: Cindy Cicchetti

Start: 09/28/2000 03:00 PM
End: 09/28/2000 04:00 PM

Description: Gas Physical/Financail Positions - Room 2537

This meeting repeats   starting on    (if the date occurs on a weekend the 
meeting ).
Meeting Dates: 

Fletcher J Sturm/HOU/ECT
Scott Neal/HOU/ECT
Hunter S Shively/HOU/ECT
Phillip K Allen/HOU/ECT
Allan Severude/HOU/ECT
Scott Mills/HOU/ECT
Russ Severson/HOU/ECT

Detailed description:
   The meeting with Richard Burchfield/HOU/ECT was rescheduled.  

On   09/28/2000 03:00:00 PM CDT 
For   1 hour  
With:   Richard Burchfield/HOU/ECT (Chairperson)  
  Fletcher J Sturm/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Scott Neal/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Hunter S Shively/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Phillip K Allen/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Allan Severude/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Scott Mills/HOU/ECT (Invited)  
  Russ Severson/HOU/ECT (Invited)  

Gas Physical/Financail Positions - Room 2537  

Eric,

I've been out of the office for two days, but just received this message and 
it's great.  Let me know what else I can do!

Fletch

David,

Yes, i'm interested in meeting with these guys, but i'm unavailable until Thu 
or Fri.  Let me know if I can sit in on a meeting.  Thanks,

Fletch Sturm
x3-6219

good morning!

just wondering if you've talked to Gas Daily yet and if you need anything 
more from me...also, i'd like to see what you're going to give to them (G.D.) 
with regard to facts about the products, EOL, etc...  we'd like to launch the 
products on Fri and have the article appear on Mon because the audience 
should be bigger than Fri.

fletch

Yes, the plan is to roll the new products out on Fri., the 22nd.  

fletch

Eric,

This guy is a friend of mine and he said he'll put in some good words about 
EOL and especially the new product that we're going to launch.  His name is 
Chris McDonald at Southern  (678) 579-3298.  He runs the West gas trading at 
Southern.

Fletch

Eric,

The name I have at El Paso is Tim Bourne 713-420-3826.  Todd Geiger is my 
contact over there.  He's a Vice President and told me that Tim runs the 
trading group and would not be in the office until Mon. next week.

Fletch

Eloy,

Who is General Brinks?

Fletch

Here is the list for you to keep:

Duke   John Thomas  (713) 260-8569
Utilicorp Mark Gurley  (816) 527-1758
El Paso  Bo Collins  (713) 420-3466
Southern Gary Morshes  (678) 579-5323
Dynegy  Matt Schatzman  (713) 509-6438

Fletch

Terri,

Do you think we're close enough to book the deals.  Rogers and I keep 
forgetting that they're not in our positions everyday.

Fletch

Melba,

Could you see to this please?  Thanks,

Fletch

John J Lavorato@ENRON
09/07/2000 07:21 AM
Fletch

Make sure they also set up the fixed price vs. daily term swaps at Henry the 
Hub.

Brad,

(see message below from Melba)

Which one should we use, and how should it look on the website?  Remember, 
only five characters will fit in the name.  Maybe just CNGNo?
Let me know and i'll forward to Melba.

Fletch

	
	                           
	

Fletch,

US Gas Daily GD/D CNGAp-HHub - has two prices on Gas Daily .  North and South.

How do you want to difirenciate one from the other? Please let me know.

Thank you,

Melba

these looks good to me except for the lower case "h" in the Hub phys that we 
already talked about.

fletch

John,

The new products have been built and are in the process of being mapped to 
Sitara and Tagg.  I'm working with Melba Lozano (EOL contact) and she tells 
me they should be ready tomorrow.

Mark Taylor and I haven't spoken yet about simplifying the language in the 
product long description, so I'll try to get with him tomorrow.  For now, 
we're staying with the existing language which isn't really that bad.

Any of these products which are intra-month will stay in the swap filter as 
US GAS DAILY products, but longer than intra-month will be in the basis 
filter as US GAS BASIS products with the format:

  US GAS BASIS      GD/D SoCal - HHub

The only product that will be different is the Nymex to daily swap which will 
be:

  US GAS BASIS      NXL1 - GD/D HHub

Any questions or comments,

Fletch
x3-6219

these looks good to me except for the lower case "h" in the Hub phys that we 
already talked about.

fletch

also, if "NL1" appears anywhere else, change it to NXL1

thanks

fletch

one more change...NL1 change to NXL1

flet

The following is a list of daily basis product names that we would like to 
create, all of which are US GAS BASIS deal type:

GD/D Mich-HHub
GD/D Chic-HHub
GD/D Pepl-HHub
GD/D Demrc-HHub
GD/D HSC-HHub
GD/D Waha-HHub
GD/D Perm-HHub
GD/D SanJn-HHub
GD/D Opal-HHub
GD/D SOCAL-HHub
GD/D TZ6NY-HHub
GD/D TecoP-HHub   (short for Teco Pool)
GD/D CNGAp-HHub
GD/D TETM3-HHub
GD/D TenLa-HHub
GD/D TZ3-HHub
GD/D Nymex-HHub
GD/D CGulf-HHub

I have put a call in to Mark Taylor regarding new product descriptions, but 
have yet to hear back from him.

Fletch

Dale,

The product that crosses monthly and daily swaps is the IF vs GD index swap 
that we currently offer.  I'll call you later...no time right now to write 
more.

Fletch

Dale,

I agree with your proposed changes

fletch

Under the alternative "bumping" method, if the market is 3.75/5.25 and our 
EOL and ICE market's are both 4/5 in that case, would we pay brokerage if 
someone executes on ICE rather than EOL?

Fletch

Jeff,

With little physical knowledge of the transmission and generation 
constraints, etc., it's going to be difficult for me to say, geographically, 
where I think the boundaries ought to be.  However, I think the market would 
always prefer a simple layout, something like MISO - West, - Central, - East, 
- South.  To me, I think that would cover the basic areas that trade 
differently in terms of price.

Fletch

If you haven't received the details yet, here they are (Enron sells):

 30,000 MMBtu/d   Nov '00 - Mar '01   ANR LA @ Index + $0.01
 30,000 MMBtu/d   Nov '00 - Mar '01   NGP LA @ Index + $0.01
 40,000 MMBtu/d   Nov '00 - Mar '01   TRUNK LA @ Index + $0.01

If you need anything else,

Fletch
x3-6219

Sorry, but I've been out of town since you sent this.  There have been a 
couple of errors pointed out to me since the publishing, most of which have 
apparently been somewhat obvious (i.e. not difficult to figure out).  I'll 
look into this one and get back to you.

Fletcher Sturm

p.s.  Thanks for your support!

Please put this on my calendar if you haven't already.

fletch

Please mark you calendars for Thursday August 10th for the Alliance Meeting.  
This meeting will be all day.  The location will be EB32C2.  Please let me 
know if you have any questions.

Thank you,
Lynn
(312) 541-1379

Melba,

I'm sorry I haven't replied sooner, but there is a decision to be made about 
what type of product these should fall under...Gas Daily, or Basis.  We're 
afraid that if we categorize them as Gas Daily, then anyone who logs onto the 
site looking for basis would miss these products altogether.  The "US GAS 
DAILY  HeHub - CHIC" is cleary the best description for the website.  I'll 
get back to you as soon as we make a decision.

Fletch

Rain,

Please sign me up for the class on Fri. (8/11).  Thanks,

Fletch

Jeffrey T Hodge
07/27/2000 10:46 AM
Sent by: Jenny Helton
Attached is a memo detailing Antitrust Training.

sorry so late

Fletch

yes, that would be fine.

fletch

Fletcher Sturm <trademup@yahoo.com> on 07/13/2000 12:50:12 PM
Do You Yahoo!?
Get Yahoo! Mail - Free email you can access from anywhere!
 - Vegas.ppt

Scott,

Please take me off the global e-mail list...

Thanks,

Fletch @ enron

Rain,

Please put this on my calendar.  Thanks,

Fletch

John J Lavorato@ENRON
07/10/2000 01:03 PM
I have asked the crude group to give a presentation on fuel oil supply and 
demand which will take place Wednesday July 12 at 2:15 in the big boardroom 
on the 30th floor. I would encourage everyone to come and bring any traders 
that you think would benefit from it.

Marc,

Sorry, we don't have anything open right now.  Possibly in 6 months or so.

Fletch

Rain,

I'd like to coordinate this with the other fellas (Hunter, Scott, etc.) =20
Let's see if we can all go to the same one!

Fletch

Sent by: Office of the Chairman@ENRON

Please join us for one of the Executive Breakfasts at DePelchin Children=01=
,s=20
Center, our adopted agency for this year and one of the more than 80=20
community organizations supported by the United Way of the Texas Gulf Coast=
. =20
The Executive Breakfasts will focus on our 2000 campaign.  To reach our goa=
l=20
of  $2,310,000, it will take the active leadership and support of each of=
=20
you. We look forward to seeing all of you at one of the breakfasts.=20

Event:  Executive Breakfast
Date:  Thursday, August 3, 2000 (hosted by Joe Sutton)
   or
  Friday, August 4, 2000 (hosted by Jeff Skilling)
Time:  7:45-9:00 a.m.
Location: DePelchin Children=01,s Center
  100 Sandman (close to Memorial and Shepherd intersection)
 =20

Transportation: Bus will depart from the Enron Building (Andrews Street sid=
e)=20
promptly at 7:30 a.m.

NOTE: Bus transportation is encouraged, due to limited onsite parking.=20
However, if you should need to drive, a map will be provided.

Please R.S.V.P. no later than Wednesday, July 26 to confirm your attendance=
=20
and bus transportation to Jessica Nunez=20
at 853-1918.

anytime after 4:30pm is fine...I am at EB-3233C

Fletch

Scott,

I'm receiving faxes from you guys everyday, and would just like to be taken 
off the global e-mail distribution.

Thanks,

Fletch Sturm
Enron

Sheri,

Robyn Menear is my new assistant on the FT-Central book.  I'd like to have 
her set up to use EOL stack manager, product manager, and transact on the 
website.  I believe she already has a login ID for the website, but I don't 
know about the others.  In addition, her trades (stack manager customer 
trades, and her own website trades) need to go into my book (FT-Central).  If 
you need me to do anything else in order for this to happen, let me know.

Thanks,

Fletcher Sturm
x36219

Melba,

The description you sent to me yesterday seems a little confusing...How about 
the following:

 Floating price A: Gas Daily midpoint for Henry Hub
 
 Floating price B: Gas Daily midpoint for __________

 Buyer pays Floating price A plus applicable basis, seller pays Floating 
price B

We should substitute your long description for "Gas Daily midpoint" above.  
Run this by everyone ASAP so we can activate these products.

Fletch Sturm
x3-6219

NatGas is going to the moon on Monday!

Fletcj

Douglas,

Thanks for your interest...My book does go into some option detail (not 
really collars since they're a combination of the tools I discuss) and plenty 
of swap transactions.  Obviously, I think you would gain some insight for 
both your personal and professional interests if you go through it.  Thanks 
again,

Fletcher Sturm

we're ok for now...thanks for checking

fletch

thanks for the note!  we're doing fine and trying to get some sleep here and 
there...i'll e-mail pic's to you...take care.

fletch

Please put this on my calander for Wed (5/3) at 3:30 in 30C1.

Thanks,

Fletch

that's not our house for sale yet, but probably in the next 6 months or 
so...not in a hurry as it feels like real estate market cooling off 
somewhat.  thanks.

Fletch

Greg,

Check out a company called Opus 360 for recruiting IT people 
(www.opus360.com).  It might be a good investment for the equity group too 
(OPUS).

Fletch

Sorry, just read this e-mail and don't think I did the trade you are 
referring to.  Let me know.  Fletch

Greg,

I've been working with an IT guy here who has been building a spreadsheet for 
some of us that can receive live prices from EOL.  I've used this to build a 
real-time matrix which shows spread relationships between different gas 
locations, including variable cost analysis, NPV, etc.  I think that this 
would be an extremely useful application to include on the EOL site, whether 
it is in Excel format or some homemade format.  For example, Hunter and I 
were in Chicago last week talking to NICOR about analyzing the risk 
components of their PBR.  We brought up this idea and they were excited about 
being able to more clearly see daily cash spreads, hedge MTD and BOM PBR 
price with Gas Daily swaps, storage utilization logic, etc.

If we can develop an EOL - dependent application that is helpful to our 
customers in terms of how they make trading decisions, it will reinforce the 
importance of using our site over our competitors.

Let me know what you think!

Fletch

Congratulations Dave!  You're the king!

Fletch

thanks Coi

Fletch

brenda,

could you re-send to everyone and ask them to bring a copy of their one-month 
and summer basis positions?  thanks,  fletch

Kevin,

Don't forget about us down here in the dusty old gas trading business!

Congratulations,

Fletch

that won't be a problem at all
ily
fletch

Bob,

My one pass number is YY109954.  Thanks for the tip!

Fletch

Sorry, I have a meeting today, then going out of town for the rest of the 
week.  I'll have to do it next week.

TJae,

At your convenience (not necessarily today), could you provide my wife with 
the addresses for the following people, please?  Her e-mail is 
sturmt@yahoo.com.  Thanks, Fletch

John Lavorato
Dave Delainey
Kevin Presto
yourself
Rogers Herndon
Dana Davis
Rob Benson
Jeff King
Larry Valderama
Larry Jester
Matt Lorenz
Pete Makkai (sp?)
     names below are NatGas people
Airam Artega
Scott Neal
John Arnold
Phillip Allen
Mike Grigsby
Jeff Shankman

thanks again!

ok, cool

Fletch

Hey,

Sorry I haven't read my e-mail in the past day and a half (too busy selling), 
but that sounds good.

Fletch

I'll need to go another time...already have a meeting.  I definitely want to 
see the demo.

Fletch

Jeff,

Below is a list of items I'd like to discuss with you when we both have 
time(?).  I just wanted to brief you first.

I'm thinking about having a meeting with the basis traders every morning from 
8:15 - 8:30 after each trader has gathered information from their desk 
meetings.  This would be the optimal time to strategize as a group since 
changes in regional fundamentals and respective basis implications would be 
fresh in everyone's mind.  Would it be okay to delay EOL market-making in 
basis until 8:30?  I think it would be worth it.
I think it would be a good idea to meet with leaders from other groups 
(origination (who?), structuring (who?), Julie Gomez, and Fred Lagrasta) on a 
regular basis to obtain new information on anything that might affect ENA's 
basis positions.  Could you point me in the right direction as far as whom to 
involve and maybe notify them of my intentions?
Should we set up a new book (under my management) which would hold certain 
strategic positions such as spread trades and/or more complex structured 
positions?  I think it would be easier to manage that way by not being 
"cluttered up" in different books (i.e.  the P/L from these trades would be 
my focus instead of managed by other traders.)  
Do you think the traders could eventually report directly to me?  It seems 
like more intense leadership might provide an extra push to the group.

Talk to you soon,

Fletch

yes, that's fine

Fletch

Louise,

Yes, I'd like to get together as soon as possible.  I'm available this 
afternoon (Fri) or Tues. next week in the afternoon.  Let me know.

Fletch

Louise,

I mentioned an idea to Jeff Shankman the other day about providing some 
charting and other types of tools to EOL users and he asked me to get with 
you.  He said you were already working on some additions to the website.  I 
would really like to participate in the development of these tools, so please 
let me know when I can get with you and discuss my ideas.

Thanks,

Fletch Sturm

Sally,

Congratulations on your promotion!  Good luck with everything.

Fletch Sturm

We're still working on it for you!  I'll keep you updated as I know more.

Fletch

I appreciate it!  Hope all is well with you...we're doing fine now that the 
flu made its way through our house.

Fletch

yes, that will work.  thanks

fletch

No thanks, but I did pick up a pre-owned Jaguar...sweet!  Congrats to you 
too.  Hope to see you out again soon...Thanks again for your help with Coal 
info.

Fletch

Thanks man!

Fletch

Thanks Julie!  Looking forward to a great new year!

Fletch

Thanks Sue!  Glad to be of help and look forward to a great year 2000!

Fletch

Thanks very much!

Fletch

are spouses invited?

John,

Per Kevin, we've already sent our requests.

Fletch

Phil,

I don't have any specific recommendations, but I think PennWell Books has the 
best selection of all books on the subject.  Thanks for your interest,

Fletch Sturm

Scott,

Please take me off the e-mail distribution list...I receive the charts, etc. 
from others here.

Thanks,

Fletch Sturm
Enron

yeah man, it's going great...how are things with you?

fletch

If it's not too late, I don't even need a lesson at all...I'm using my discount broker live feeds.  thanks,

fletch

sure, I will take care of it.

Danielle,

Could you please tell whoever was coming to give me the Kobra lesson at 1:30 that I need to move it to 2:30?  Thanks,

Fletch

yes.  how about 1pm, you name the place.  thanks,

fletch

Can we meet today to discuss?

Thanks,  Steve

Steve,

It looks as if we're going to be trading effective Mon (2/11).  I'm looking for some assurance that we'll have at least the basics ready to go with regard to position manager.  Can you update?  Thanks,

Fletch

please mark on my calendar,
thanks,
fletch

All,

Please mark you calendars, you  have been selected to participate in the  ENA Trading Track recruiting event Monday, October 29th , 3 pm - 7 pm.     If you are unable to interview on this date please advise.

A selection of you will telephone screen 18 external candidates, and decide whether or not they should proceed to the final round on the above date.    A separate e:mail will be sent in relation to this.

Any questions let me know.

Regards,

Karen 
x54667

Fletch - 

I got this forwarded from my mother (I'm betting the letter is fake) but it backs your idea of investing in online shopping.  What's better - the online stores or shipping services?

Deirdre

===================

Hi All,

I think you all know that I don't send out hoaxes and don't do the
reactionary thing and send out anything that crosses my path.  This one,
however, is a friend of a friend and I've given it enough credibility in my

mind that I'm writing it up and sending it out to all of you.

My friend's friend was dating a guy from Afghanistan up until a month ago.
She had a date with him around 9/6 and was stood up.  She was
understandably
upset and went to his home to find it completely emptied.  On 9/10, she
received a letter from her boyfriend explaining that he wished he could
tell
her why he had left and that he was sorry it had to be like that.  The part

worth mentioning is that he BEGGED her not to get on any commercial
airlines
on 9/11 and to not to go any malls on Halloween.  As soon as everything
happened on the 11th, she called the FBI and has since turned over the
letter.

This is not an email that I've received and decided to pass on.  This came
from a phone conversation with a long-time friend of mine last night. I may

be wrong, and I hope I am.  However, with one of his warnings being correct

and devastating, I'm not willing to take the chance on the second and
wanted
to make sure that people I cared about had the same information that I did.

Laura Katsis
Implementation Specialist
714/921-5424
lkatsis@volt.com
OpsVolt_Track@volt.com

yes, I will be attending,

fletch

Please let me know ASAP if you will be attending the Trading Track Dinner for Lavorato:

October 16th
Place - TBD
Time - TBD

Thanks

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

I'm unable to make it to the dinner...it's open house night at our kids' school.

Fletch

Below are the details to the ENA Trading Track Dinner

When:		Tuesday, October 16, 2001

Location:  	Grappino's Wine Room - above Nino's Restaurant
		2817 West Dallas
		713-522-5120
	  		
Time:		6:00 p.m.  Mix & Mingle with drinks
		6:45 p.m.  Dinner

For those of you who have not confirmed, please do so as soon as possible. 

Thank You,

Felicia L. Solis
Enron Wholesale Services
713-853-4776

Please set up Jason Kaniss with a stack manager login and password effective ASAP.  He will be trading US East Power and US Natural Gas.  All transactions under his login should go into EPMI Mid West risk book.  Jason works for me on the MidWest desk and is in training to be the new short term SERC trader at the beginning of next year.  If you have any questions, please call me at  x 3-9684.

Thanks,

Fletcher Sturm

p.s.  I'd like him to be able to get started tomorrow (Thur.) morning 6:00 am, if possible.

Bernice,

Please set up a new login for Jason Kaniss for EOL stack manager.  He will be trading US East Power and US NorthAmerican Gas.  Jason works for me on the East Power MidWest desk and will be training under me for the rest of this year.  All transactions under this login should go into EPMI MidWest risk book.  If you have any qestions, please call me at x 3-9684.  Thanks,

Fletcher Sturm

p.s.  I'd like him to be able to login tomorrow a.m. if possible.

Lynn,

I'm going to be on personal vacation that week so I'll be unable to attend.  Maybe next year.

Fletch

Just a reminder, the 2001 Las Vegas Offsite will be held

Thursday August 9th - Saturday August 11th

Invitation and Agenda to follow

-enovate-

Kim,

Don's looks good and I'm adding Maria's to it right now.  will send back to you in a couple of minutes.

Please take a look at this and let me know if there are any changes.

 << File: Promotion Nomination Summary for Don Baughman.doc >> 

thanks for your help

fletch

 

For your information.
Attached please find a report on forecasted energy prices and demand in Indiana.  Please forward to anyone who could use this info.
Thanks,
Janine

 <<SUFG Factors Affecting Indiana Electricity Price in Competitive Markets.pdf>> 
This draft report will be featured at the 2001 Energy conference on November 8.  I mentioned this to you last week when we talked and thought you might find it of interest.  Thanks.
*************************************
This message is from BoseTreacy Associates  LLC     .  This  message and any attachments may contain confidential information, and are  intended only for the individual or entity identified above as the  addressee.  If you are not the  addressee, or if this message has been addressed to you in error, you are not  authorized to read, copy, or distribute this message and any attachments, and we  ask that you please delete this message and attachments (including all copies)  and notify the sender by return e-mail or by phone at 317--684-5400.  Delivery of this message and any  attachments to any person other than the intended recipient(s) is not intended  in any way to waive confidentiality.   All personal  messages express views only of the sender, which are not to be attributed to  Bose Treacy Associates LLC, and may not be copied or  distributed without this statement.
*************************************
 - SUFG Factors Affecting Indiana Electricity Price in Competitive Markets.pdf 

Steve,

It looks as if we're going to be trading effective Mon (2/11).  I'm looking for some assurance that we'll have at least the basics ready to go with regard to position manager.  Can you update?  Thanks,

Fletch

It's too bad I don't have the authority to trade it...!

Good call on crude: Sep contract is up ~1.50 since we talked. Vlady.

What do I need to do to get approval to trade crude?  I'm officially bearish now...would be selling wildly short right here @ $27.50

fletch

Please find attached details for the forthcoming Enron Americas Management Offsite. There are group actions which need to be completed before arriving in Beaver Creek. 
The Offsite will involve meetings, mountain biking and white water rafting (grade 3), so please bring appropriate clothing. For those who have not been rafting before appropriate clothing would be swimwear, sports shoes, hat, shorts and T-shirt. Life jackets will be provided. The accommodation will be in condominiums in Beaver Creek and room assignments are also attached below. 
Transportation 
The attached agenda outlines the transportation requirements for those departing from Houston. It is assumed that all members of the ESA team will also travel to and from Houston with the Houston based employees. Dorie Hitchcock will be contacting those of you separately who are not traveling to and from Houston. 
Video 
You each have been assigned to a group for the sole purpose of completing a video prior to attending the Offsite. The video filming should be completed and on a VHS tape prior to departure for Beaver Creek. The purpose of this video is to provide a comic interlude to the proceedings. The videos will be seen prior to dinner on Friday night at Saddleridge. The video should be about  5 minutes in length, on a VHS tape and there is a zero budget assigned to the production of the video. Each team has been given a title which is open to interpretation (see attached spreadsheet).
Please find attached the following information: 
(i) Attendees and Teams for Video 
(ii) Draft Agenda 
Any questions or concerns should be addressed to Dorie Hitchcock (Ext 36978) 
We look forward to seeing you in Beaver Creek. 
John & Louise
 
  

thanks for the update!

Fletch,

I wanted to keep you updated on the Aquila RFP (300-350 mw @ Ameren).  Let me know if you have any questions.

Terri

Terri, I apologize for being late on the term sheet.  Vacations have been
impeding my schedule.  I plan to send it to you today.   Thanks.  

Dwight Cook
Aquila Treasury
816/527-1499 (phone)
816/803-7928 (Cell)

Dwight,

I wanted to get an update from you on the status of your RFP process.
In our former discussion, you had indicated that we were short-listed
and that I would be receiving some additional information as far as next
steps.  I understood that the second phase would be happening within a
couple of weeks.  I just wanted to see where you were in your process at
this point.  Thanks.

Terri Clynes
Director 

Laura (team leader),

I'll be unavailable to work on the skit video this Thurs (8/9) thru Mon (8/13) as I will be in Pennsylvania on vacation.  I have plenty of time this tues or wed after trading or next Tues - Thurs after trading...let me know.

Fletch

I give through paycheck withdrawal every month.

Fletch Sturm

As the "head of whipping employees into submission" on the United Way for EWS...just kidding.

Honestly, in the process of scanning the EWS employee list, I noticed that you hadn't had an opportunity to go online and make a pledge, yet.  So  thought I would pass the access information on to you again and encourage you to take a few minutes to go online and pledge.

To access the United Way system....

Please click on https://hrglobal.enron.com/ and complete your online pledge.  You will need your GIS ID, which is your "9" number not your "P" number and your password.  If you have never accessed global apps, then your password is your Date of Birth (Format is YYYYMMDD - i.e., June 9, 1962 is 19620609).

If you are still having difficulty, please go to https://ehronline.enron.com, click the "Accept" button, and then click on "Forgot your User ID or Password?"

Or, you can also call the HRGIM Help Desk at ext. 3-5666 for assistance.

If you don't have time to do it, send me an e-mail with your pledge amount and I will do it for you.  Then the system will send you a confirmation for your records.

EWS is way behind on participation and dollars contributed.  We need your help!

Thanks.

Eric

I'm fairly busy this week, but could manage half an hour today from 3:30 to 4:00...otherwise, it'll have to be next week sometime.  Let me know over the phone...I may not have time to check my e-mail for the rest of the day.

Fletch  3-9684

Fletch:

I am on the EWS risk management power desk reporting to Rogers Herndon.  My territories include MAIN, ECAR and MAPP.  As you may already know, we are currently gearing up to physically serve retail load in the Midwest (mainly into Commonwealth Edison, Illinois Power, CG&E and Columbus Southern).  If you have time, would it be possible to meet with you and discuss the issues associated with buying power in these markets.  We currently have a substantial position in Illinois and are expecting to gain a fair amount of load in CG&E.

Thank you,

Guy Sharfman

oh...that's new...Yes, I'd like to roll-over what I've been contributing the past few years.  thanks, 

fletch

Those will end on December 31, 2001.  We are in the midst of the campaign for next year's contributions.  If you would like, I can roll-over your current contributions to continue next year.  Or you can access the system and make your own decision.  Please advise.

Thanks.

Eric

I give through paycheck withdrawal every month.

Fletch Sturm

As the "head of whipping employees into submission" on the United Way for EWS...just kidding.

Honestly, in the process of scanning the EWS employee list, I noticed that you hadn't had an opportunity to go online and make a pledge, yet.  So  thought I would pass the access information on to you again and encourage you to take a few minutes to go online and pledge.

To access the United Way system....

Please click on https://hrglobal.enron.com/ and complete your online pledge.  You will need your GIS ID, which is your "9" number not your "P" number and your password.  If you have never accessed global apps, then your password is your Date of Birth (Format is YYYYMMDD - i.e., June 9, 1962 is 19620609).

If you are still having difficulty, please go to https://ehronline.enron.com, click the "Accept" button, and then click on "Forgot your User ID or Password?"

Or, you can also call the HRGIM Help Desk at ext. 3-5666 for assistance.

If you don't have time to do it, send me an e-mail with your pledge amount and I will do it for you.  Then the system will send you a confirmation for your records.

EWS is way behind on participation and dollars contributed.  We need your help!

Thanks.

Eric

thank you

I'll take care of it.  You'll receive a confirmatory e-mail from the system.  Thanks.

Eric

oh...that's new...Yes, I'd like to roll-over what I've been contributing the past few years.  thanks, 

fletch

Those will end on December 31, 2001.  We are in the midst of the campaign for next year's contributions.  If you would like, I can roll-over your current contributions to continue next year.  Or you can access the system and make your own decision.  Please advise.

Thanks.

Eric

I give through paycheck withdrawal every month.

Fletch Sturm

As the "head of whipping employees into submission" on the United Way for EWS...just kidding.

Honestly, in the process of scanning the EWS employee list, I noticed that you hadn't had an opportunity to go online and make a pledge, yet.  So  thought I would pass the access information on to you again and encourage you to take a few minutes to go online and pledge.

To access the United Way system....

Please click on https://hrglobal.enron.com/ and complete your online pledge.  You will need your GIS ID, which is your "9" number not your "P" number and your password.  If you have never accessed global apps, then your password is your Date of Birth (Format is YYYYMMDD - i.e., June 9, 1962 is 19620609).

If you are still having difficulty, please go to https://ehronline.enron.com, click the "Accept" button, and then click on "Forgot your User ID or Password?"

Or, you can also call the HRGIM Help Desk at ext. 3-5666 for assistance.

If you don't have time to do it, send me an e-mail with your pledge amount and I will do it for you.  Then the system will send you a confirmation for your records.

EWS is way behind on participation and dollars contributed.  We need your help!

Thanks.

Eric

Lloyd,

I was just thinking about some of the record peak demand levels set at some of the Midwest utilities despite less than record temps and slowing economic activity, and the resiliancy of the crude oil market to decline in the face of a slowing world economy.  My conspiracy theory...could the U.S. government be secretly building up military arms and parts at factories in the Midwest and other regions of the country, and if so, couldn't that help explain these records?  It's kind of a crazy thought, but I'd like to explore it fundamentally (do we know the locations of certain plants that might engage in these types of activities, how much power they could consume if called upon to expand production of military goods, etc.)  I talked to Rogers about it and he threw a buildup of the strategic petroleum reserve into the theory to help explain crude oil support in the face of a crashing world economy.  Let me know what you guys think...

Fletch

Mark,

I posed this question to Mark Haedicke last week and he suggested I ask you:  Will UBS allow counterparties that enter into an ISDA with UBS to net exposure between financial Gas and Power positions when calculating margin requirements?  If so, to what extent, and if not, why?  This would be a major selling point when we're trying to establish relationships with new trading partners and trying to build our financially traded products business.  Please help.  Thanks,

Fletch Sturm
x 3-9684

I left a voice mail for you regarding this.

fletch

Fletcher:
Do you have any thoughts on this?

Carol St. Clair
EB 3889
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-3393 (office fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

I don't necessarily agree, but I will check into it from this end.  Quite
often our traders truly are trading a Firm LD product instead of an "Into"
product.  As you said the EEI defines both of those.  I'll ask around.

Pam:
I am hoping that you can help me with a confirm issue.  When CP&L is the
Seller and EPMI is the Buyer, the CP&L confirm people have been marking
through our Product description which says "Into Cinergy, Seller's daily
Choice" and putting "Firm LD" instead.  Now that we are confirming under
the EEI Master which defines both of these products, we would request
that your people not mark through the description.  Do you agree and an
you facilitate this?

Carol St. Clair
EB 3889
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-3393 (office fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

TJ,

Please put on my calendar.  Thanks,

Fletch

THE MEETING WILL BE IN 3125B

Please plan on attending a meeting on Thursday, 8/23/01 at 11:30 a.m. to 1:00 p.m. for a presentation by Lloyd Will (location to be announced later).  Lloyd as agreed to present the PJM model of LMP and congestion and how these issues will soon impact the Midwest Markets.

Additionally, I have invited Mike Roan to present a Midwest RTO update.

This will be an excellent opportunity to come up to speed on a series of issues that will have significant impact to our region.

Lunch to be provided

Thanks

Oscar Dalton

thanks Lloyd
 
fletch

We will dig into this but it could take a week or two.
 
I believe that Rogers might have nailed the oil situation.
 
We will start gathering what the loads were as they surface to see what areas have seen new peaks. We will also watch for NERC releases and Regional releases that we get as part of the Control Area dat flow.
 
Thanks.
 
 

Lloyd, 

I was just thinking about some of the record peak demand levels set at some of the Midwest utilities despite less than record temps and slowing economic activity, and the resiliancy of the crude oil market to decline in the face of a slowing world economy.  My conspiracy theory...could the U.S. government be secretly building up military arms and parts at factories in the Midwest and other regions of the country, and if so, couldn't that help explain these records?  It's kind of a crazy thought, but I'd like to explore it fundamentally (do we know the locations of certain plants that might engage in these types of activities, how much power they could consume if called upon to expand production of military goods, etc.)  I talked to Rogers about it and he threw a buildup of the strategic petroleum reserve into the theory to help explain crude oil support in the face of a crashing world economy.  Let me know what you guys think...

Fletch 

after 3:30 today for about 10 min
 
fletch

Fletch
As you proposed, Daniel and me are exploring the subject above. So, you'd like to briefly talk to you about this.
If convenient, please let us know most convenient time.
 
Gus
East Power Fundamental Analysis

does Doug know about King yet?

Don,

What's up with this?

Fletch

In reviewing the Performance evaluations and self evaluations that you sent to Kim Melodick, I noticed that there is a self evaluation for John Kinser, but not a performance evaluation for him.  Just wanted to confirm that this is accurate.

Thanks!
Sarah Zarkowsky

Amanda,

Could you please include Rogers Herndon on the distribution list for Consumer Weekly?  He runs EES East Risk Management and is a VP.  Thanks, and please send him the latest edition as soon as you can.

Fletch Sturm

x 3-9684

Dude,
 
I sent a request to Amanda Hubble for you to be included on the distribution list and send you the latest edition.
 
Fletch

Fletch -
 
I could not open the attachment - probably because you sent from home and this fouls it up for some reason.  If you have this at the office and have an opportunity to resend please do as I would like to read.
 
Thanks,
Rogers

 

<<ConsNewsletter20010822.pdf>> 

Amanda K. Huble 
Gas Fundamentals 
Phone: (713) 853-4384 
Pager: (877) 482-0772 
Fax: (713) 646-8453 

TJ,

Please put the Central Desk Gas meeting on my calendar every day 2:30 - 3:00.  Thanks,

Fletch

it is in room 3270

Dale,

I don't know if you had time to sit with Mitch before he left, but he put this together.  It may or may not be useful.

Fletch

Reagan, Bill, Larry, and I got together to put together a draft business plan that can be applied to the Southeast and Midwest regions.  The schedule is probably aggressive, depending on when we get a power marketing license.  The plan is short on back end details until the eventual buyer is known, and until we know VAR, capital, etc.

Mitch

 

John,

Per Kevin, we've already sent our requests.

Fletch

Phil,

I don't have any specific recommendations, but I think PennWell Books has the best selection of all books on the subject.  Thanks for your interest,

Fletch Sturm

Ron,

I'm available today from 3:30 to 4:00 or 4:30 to 5:00 tomorrow if either of those works for you.

Fletch

Fletcher,

 I have attached a generic term sheet as a starting point for an opportunity we have discussed with Nuclear Management Company.  Any and all of these points included in the terms sheet are subject to change (in particular, the intra-day discussion).  

Background info on NMC is as follows: 

		Nuclear Management Company Llc (NMC)
	joint venture between -- NSP, Alliant, WEPCO and WPS
	services provided -- manage the companies (noted above) 7 nuclear facilities (5 sites)
	The Facilities are as follows:
Point Beach Units 1&2, owned by WEPCO, located in east central Wisconsin (30 miles SE of Green Bay), mW 523 and 500 mW respectively
Kewaunee, owned by WPS, located 27 miles SE of Green Bay, mW 511
Prarie Island Units 1&2, owned by NPS, located in Red Wing, MN, mW560 and 500 mW respectively
Monticello Unit 1, owned by NPS, located 30 miles NW of Minneapolis, mW 536
Duane Arnold, owned by Alliant (IES Utilities), located 8 miles NW of Cedar Rapids, mW 515
Michigan nuclear facility (no details)

They are looking for a physical hedge (they suggested a 600 mW gas fired peaking facility) but may be receptive to a financial hedge (especially for the Michigan site) as well.  Or, a combination.  I would like to explore leveraging the Arpin site if we could but at this time I want to hold off from mentioning the site since it is part owned by Great Rivers Energy.  They want ownership (percentage or all) of the gas fired facility.  Based on the geographic location of the facilities noted above, the Arpin site should work well.  I would imagine they have firm service for those sites and if they are looking for the gas fired facility to take up the slack when these units are out, we should not have a problem with transport from the Arpin site (even though there is a west to east issue).

They would also like to market the gas fired facility when the unit is not needed as a backstop!  From a physical plant standpoint -- I would suggest that we carve out the development with a slight ownership that has a put option (for the equity we retain) at a future date (but retain a percentage of the marketing arrangement for sale of excess power in the market).  I think NMC wants complete control based on their view of deregulation in Wisconsin.  I believe their long term strategy is to have a PPA with the above Utilities for the offtake (firm output w/ firm price) and the ability to market the excess (from both the Nuclear Units and peaking facility) at market rates. 

This arrangement should be able to flange well with a financial insurance product (since the addition of the gas fired facility would provide more liquidity) that I have discussed with the Mid-Market Group (Terri Clynes and Doug Sewell).

Let's arrange a time when we can discuss at your convenience.  Thanks, Ron.

 << File: NMC Tolling Term Sheet 5.18.01.doc >> 

sounds great to me.

fletch

Marcus-

	Please review the attached long description for a new East Power phy spread product/product type and let me know of any changes or 	suggestions.

Fletch-

	Please review the description as well and contact me with any questions you may have about the new functionality.

Chris Walker
3-7533

 << File: Cinergy vs COMED.doc >> 	

I clicked on the link below and it didn't work...I'm RSVP'ing that I'll be there.

Fletch

p.s.  who did the trade? (customer/ENE market maker)

	In celebration of EnronOnline's one millionth transaction this week, we would like to invite you to a celebration party on 	Thursday, June 7th from 5- 8 p.m. at The Grasshopper (506 Main Street @ Prairie in downtown).  Please RSVP as soon as 	possible by clicking on the link below.  

	http://207.21.193.94/invitation/

	I hope to see you there.

	Andy Zipper

let's play ball!

fletch

 
Fletch:

The Midwest marketing team hit 100 transactions today. Our 2001 goal is 200. Thanks for making the aggressive markets!

Ed

thanks!

fletch

Fletch -

I'm sending this to you per Jennifer's request.  It's available on the EGM Fundy site at http://egmfundy.corp.enron.com/crude/framework/default.asp.  Within publications select External Pubs>Daily Reports>ATS Report.  Or you may view the most recent edition in the following attachment.

Please note, there was not a report yesterday due to the Memorial Day holiday, so the most current one is from Friday.

 << File: ATS20010525.DOC >> 

I met this guy the other day in my neighborhood.  He's the son-in-law of the people who live at the end of my street.  He seems like a good guy in person and looks like he's been close to trading.  He's local, so I thought it might not be a bad idea to bring him in.  What do you think?

Fletch

DAC CALDERHEAD
10607 BORDLEY, HOUSTON, TX 77042.  PH/FX 713-952-0549.
dac_calderhead@hotmail.com

June 5, 2001

Hi Fletch,

	Thanks for returning my call and for taking the time to look over this
cover letter with attached resume.  I should be heading out to the driving
range one of these weeknights. Drop me line if you're interested?

I'm looking for a position on the Enron energy trading floor. The personal
and professional qualities that make me a successful mutual fund wholesaler
will make me a strong contributor to your trading team.
	As my resume reflects, I have plenty of analytical skills combined with
hands-on  fixed income and equity trading. I have consistently grown
business because I pay attention to details and thrive in a fast-paced
environment. My experience and success in developing business has come about
through learning quickly, planning ahead, and working well within a team
environment.
I would enjoy answering your questions, and discussing how my skills and
experience could contribute to your team. Thank you for your interest in my
application, and I look forward to hearing from you soon.

Sincerely,

Dac Calderhead

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

 - res.Analyst.doc 

I have decided that I would like this product to be set up the other way around where it is quoted as ComEd vs Cin.  I realize that it will show up as a negative spread, but I have other basis (spread) locations in mind that trade over Cinergy and can see how it will be confusing to some people in the industry.

Fletch  (3-9684)

Chris
	
The changes, except for the scheduling changes, have been included in the proposed final version of this East Power Physical Spread product and as requested confirm that I currently have no further issues with this product. 

The quicker we can get the scheduling language added the better, especially from the trader's perspective.
	
Regards,
	
Marcus

Chris
	
Suggested additions are marked in red. I have included the scheduling language agreed for the Into products as well.
	
Regards,
	
Marcus
	
 << File: ~1372255.doc >> 

Marcus-

	Please review the attached long description for a new East Power phy spread product/product type and let me know of any changes or 	suggestions.

Fletch-

	Please review the description as well and contact me with any questions you may have about the new functionality.

Chris Walker
3-7533

 << File: Cinergy vs COMED.doc >> 	

Thanks dude...it's all bearish right now as the price is headed lower.  Did you see the WSJ from this morning?  Check out the summary article on Beige Book.

fletch

This was an interesting and not surprising piece of info (in red highlights)

Executive Summary
-CPUC rules that SoCal must pay 15% of debt to QFs (approximately $50 million)
-Ruling heightens likelihood of voluntary bankruptcy filing by SoCal
-Voluntary filing further heightened by successful ring-fencing by EIX parent
-Bankruptcy judge firm in support for QFs

5.	GE Looking to Restructure Generating Capacity Financing

General Electric is reportedly "deeply concerned" about the stability of
financing generating capacity in the US.  (GE has over 70% of the gas
turbine market.)  GE is reportedly trying to keep its margins down and is
not raising its prices due to concerns about instability.  Sources believe
that a very significant percentage of generating capacity financing will
have to be restrucured in five years.

If the e-mail I sent you didn't make it, check out this web-site for option-pricing model.

fletch

http://www.cboe.com/TradTool/OptionCalculator.asp

 

Jeff,

Thanks for the referral.  My book should still be available on amazon.com, barnes&nobel.com, and at pennwell.com  If not, I don't know where else to get it.  Things are great with us...hope so with you too!

Fletch

Hi Fletch!  I have an associate in my group that is very interested in the trading side of the biz.  Where can I get one of your books, and when I get one can you do a little personalization for her from the "energy God??"  Hope all is well with you, Toni, and the kiddo's.

Jeffery 

thanks for your time!

fletch

Hi,

	Thanks for taking time out of your busy schedules to meet with me today to tell me about yuur work.

	It sounds very exciting!

	I look forward to hearing from you in the near future.

Regards,
Iris

Johnny,

Please contact this individual and bring him in as soon as possible for a round of interviews with me, Kevin, Dana, Harry, Doug Gilbert-Smith.

Thanks,

Fletch

Let's bring him in for an interview.   Have Johnny Palmer set up.

I met this guy the other day in my neighborhood.  He's the son-in-law of the people who live at the end of my street.  He seems like a good guy in person and looks like he's been close to trading.  He's local, so I thought it might not be a bad idea to bring him in.  What do you think?

Fletch

DAC CALDERHEAD
10607 BORDLEY, HOUSTON, TX 77042.  PH/FX 713-952-0549.
dac_calderhead@hotmail.com

June 5, 2001

Hi Fletch,

	Thanks for returning my call and for taking the time to look over this
cover letter with attached resume.  I should be heading out to the driving
range one of these weeknights. Drop me line if you're interested?

I'm looking for a position on the Enron energy trading floor. The personal
and professional qualities that make me a successful mutual fund wholesaler
will make me a strong contributor to your trading team.
	As my resume reflects, I have plenty of analytical skills combined with
hands-on  fixed income and equity trading. I have consistently grown
business because I pay attention to details and thrive in a fast-paced
environment. My experience and success in developing business has come about
through learning quickly, planning ahead, and working well within a team
environment.
I would enjoy answering your questions, and discussing how my skills and
experience could contribute to your team. Thank you for your interest in my
application, and I look forward to hearing from you soon.

Sincerely,

Dac Calderhead

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

 - res.Analyst.doc << File: res.Analyst.doc >> 

Iris,

I don't have a copy, but they have a lot up on the gas floor (32nd).  Thanks

Fletch

Hi,

	I was doing some research on the web to find info on arbitrage in power,

	While surfing the web I came across references to your book  "Trading Natural Gas : Cash Futures Options and Swaps"
	Do you have a copy of can take a look at?  If not, I will order a copy via Amazon.com.

Thanks,
Iris

 

thanks for your time!

fletch

Hi,

	Thanks for taking time out of your busy schedules to meet with me today to tell me about yuur work.

	It sounds very exciting!

	I look forward to hearing from you in the near future.

Regards,
Iris

Kim,

Accomplishments are attached below...

 

not really...Edison Mission was selling next week this morning.

Are you seeing any effects in the matkets?

RH

Maggy,

I think as long as someone from legal will accompany me I'd be fine with it.  My schedule is fairly open this week after 3:30.

Fletch

Hi Fletch:

I am relatively new with Enron Government Affairs and am supporting EOL.  We have been compiling information on energy trading to create an educational piece for regulators and your book has been quite helpful.  Would you have some time to meet with us to discuss some of these issues?  Please let me know a convenient time.

Thanks and regards,
Maggy Huson
Government Affairs

I don't know...it depends on what you want me to talk about.

Fletch:

Is there a legal concern that I'm not aware of?

Maggy

Maggy,

I think as long as someone from legal will accompany me I'd be fine with it.  My schedule is fairly open this week after 3:30.

Fletch

Hi Fletch:

I am relatively new with Enron Government Affairs and am supporting EOL.  We have been compiling information on energy trading to create an educational piece for regulators and your book has been quite helpful.  Would you have some time to meet with us to discuss some of these issues?  Please let me know a convenient time.

Thanks and regards,
Maggy Huson
Government Affairs

thanks Gregg, great info

fletch

Just passing along some information from the Chicago office.  You may alrea=
dy know this, but here is what I have heard.

Peoples Energy/Dominion's Elwood plant is currently being inspected and rep=
aired for cracks in the turbine blades.  The problem was explained to me as=
 a result of a new blade grinding process being performed by a third party =
which has affected a large batch (potentially 153 units) of GE FA's (150MW'=
s).  The Elwood plant is one of the first units to be inspected and repaire=
d (Dominion had 2 units done prior to Elwood).  The inspection can be done =
on-site but involves removal and non-destructive testing of each blade (the=
re are 92 blades in this section of the FA) and is subject to availability =
of replacement blades and trained personnel.  The Elwood plant has taken ap=
proximately one week working two twelve hour shifts.  One turbine required =
replacement of all blades.  GE is currently telling FA customers that they =
should conduct inspections at the customer's earliest convenience due to pr=
oblems experienced in testing and through field verifications (Elwood).  Th=
ey have not suggested any failure rates as a result of this problem.  I am =
assuming that most customers will choose to postpone inspections depending =
on the particular offtake structure. =20

I will pass along any additional information I hear regarding this situatio=
n.  Let me know if you have any questions.

Gregg

Yes, 1:30 is good.  I'm on the 6th floor in the new building back by the windows in the trading area.  There are plenty of conference rooms around here.  I'll see you then.  Thanks,
Fletch

Does 1:30 work for you? What location?  

Danielle  

Danielle,

I'd like to meet with you sometime today (I have a meeting from 10:00 - 11:30) to discuss what we're services we're talking to PIRA about for both gas and power.  Please let me know what time you can meet.  Thanks,

Fletch

re:?

thank you for a great 1st half of the year!

fletch

Fletch,

Shannon and I want to thank you for the great weekend at Del Lago.  We enjoyed it thoroughly.  It was nice to get to know and socialize with everyone and their families.  I think that we'll find that it will be very beneficial on the desk, due to stronger personal relationships between team members. 

Thanks again,

Don

Enron Americas will be holding an offsite from August 16th to 18th.  Please mark your calendars.  At this time we do not have specific details. 

This event is mandatory. 

Regards

John and Louise.

ok, re?

Hey - we ordered 2 of your books from Amazon.com, so meet with us, ok?   : )  Lisa

disregard previous reply...will meet after 4pm any day

fletch

continuation of our last meeting.  specifically, i would like to get your input on the attachment.   

 << File: EOLQ&A.doc >> 

re:?

Huntman,

Any truth to the rumor about Johnny leaving the group (not the company)?

Fletch

heard it down here from D. Gilbert-Smith...don't know where he heard it.

I have not heard this

Huntman,

Any truth to the rumor about Johnny leaving the group (not the company)?

Fletch

right, but he's in the gossip circle pretty deep

Doug?  Makes one question the source. 

heard it down here from D. Gilbert-Smith...don't know where he heard it.

I have not heard this

Huntman,

Any truth to the rumor about Johnny leaving the group (not the company)?

Fletch

seems like?  If you think about it, it might not be a bad deal for Johnny to get "booked out" and go run the crude group or something like that.  he probably wouldn't fight it too much given those nightmares he still has about last year's second half!

really

right, but he's in the gossip circle pretty deep

Doug?  Makes one question the source. 

heard it down here from D. Gilbert-Smith...don't know where he heard it.

I have not heard this

Huntman,

Any truth to the rumor about Johnny leaving the group (not the company)?

Fletch

Danielle,

I'd like to meet with you sometime today (I have a meeting from 10:00 - 11:30) to discuss what we're services we're talking to PIRA about for both gas and power.  Please let me know what time you can meet.  Thanks,

Fletch

I printed out what you sent me earlier, have not read it yet, and can only meet after 3:30.  That's the best I can do.

Fletch

Fletch - I'm leaving mid-aftn today to catch a flight to Ohio.  I will be on vacation the rest of this week and next week (attending my brother's wedding and other family functions).   I will give you a call when i get back (unless you can meet early this aftn).

Thanks,

Lisa

disregard previous reply...will meet after 4pm any day

fletch

continuation of our last meeting.  specifically, i would like to get your input on the attachment.   

 << File: EOLQ&A.doc >> 

re:?

golf @ houstonian early Sun am?  I might have an "in" with Frank (Pickles) at Amerex.

flet

I'll gladly stop in to say hello sometime after 10:30am if that works.

Fletch

PowerEx will be coming to Houston and would like to meet us on Nov. 7 9:00-11:00.

They are the marketing and trading sub of BC Hydro and have dealt before with our Calgary and Portland offices. They are now opening an office in Toronto and wish to transact more in MAPP, NEPOOL, PJM and SPP. The purpose of their visit is an informal meet n' greet to establish contact with people at Enron.

They will be coming with their Head of Origination and Head of Trading.

Please let me know if you or someone from your group would like to attend.

Thanks,

Dave

He decided to stay where he is until after bonus time, afterwhich he will contact me regarding a position, if any.

Fletch

What did you decide with Mike Bridges?

If he's not a good fit for you, I might be able to use him here.

Dave

Please add to my calendar.
Thanks,
Fletch

There will be a Customer Presentation & Origination Team Discussion on December 5, 2001 from 3:30-5:30.  If you have any questions or I can be of further assistance please let me know.

Thanks,
Lisa x39194

Interesting article below about Calpine and others' 0 coupon convertible bonds with put options - due April '02.  This is ugly.

RH

 
 
 
 
 
Fortune  
November 26, 2001 
SECTION: FEATURES/TOXIC BONDS; Pg. 131 
LENGTH:  2242 words 
HEADLINE: Headed For A Fall; 
Companies issued special  zero-coupon bonds, assuming they'd never have to
pay them off. Now  shareholders could be on the hook for a $ 65 billion tab. 
BYLINE: Janice  Revell 
BODY: 
It was an irresistible proposition: Borrow  billions of dollars, 
pay no interest, reap millions in tax breaks, and then  wait for 
the debt to simply disappear. That was the promise of  
zero-coupon convertible bonds, and companies from Enron to 
Merrill Lynch  binged on what seemed like free money. 
But, of course, there was a  catch: For this scenario to play out, 
a company's stock price had to rise  sharply--and quickly. That's 
because investors bought the bonds in the hope  of converting them 
into equity--if the stock tanked, the bonds would no  longer be 
worth converting. So to make them more attractive to buyers,  
companies had to build in an escape hatch: If the stock price 
failed to  rise sufficiently, investors could "put" (that is, 
sell) the bonds back to  the company--in many cases, after just one 
year. 
And that's exactly  what's about to happen--to the tune of some 
$ 65 billion over the next three  years. Stock prices have fallen 
so far that for at least half of these  special hybrids, the 
prospect of conversion is now absurd. It simply won't  happen. So 
bondholders are looking to get their money back the first chance  
they can. And because of the put feature, that is possible. 
Suddenly  companies like Tyco, Comcast, and dozens more are on 
the hook for billions  of dollars in debt and interest they 
thought they'd never have to pay.  
That could be very bad news for shareholders of these companies.  
After all, they're the ones who are going to be picking up the 
tab when  all that debt comes due. Huge chunks of cash will 
disappear from balance  sheets to repay bondholders. Companies 
without enough cash--and the majority  fall into this camp--are 
likely to face skyrocketing interest charges when  they borrow 
money anew. That means sharply reduced earnings. Especially at  
risk are investors in companies with poor credit ratings--prime  
candidates for killer refinancing costs. Some companies may even 
be  forced to issue stock to pay off the debt, creating 
significant shareholder  dilution, especially at current 
depressed prices. To make matters worse,  this is happening at a 
time when the economy is barreling downhill and  corporate 
profits are already shrinking. "This is a ticking time bomb,"  
warns Margaret Patel, manager of the Pioneer High Yield Bond 
fund, a  top-performing junk fund. 
The seeds of this mess were sown in mid-2000,  when the stock 
market started to falter. Companies in search of capital  balked 
at the thought of selling stock while their share prices were  
struggling. Zero-coupon convertible bonds presented an 
attractive  alternative because companies didn't have to make 
cash interest payments on  the bonds (hence the name "zero"). 
Instead issuers offered an up-front  discount--for instance, 
investors would buy a bond for $ 700 and collect $  1,000 when it 
matured. 
Companies also gave investors the right to  convert the bonds 
into a fixed number of common shares. But the bonds were  
structured so that conversion would make sense only if the stock 
price  rose significantly--in many cases, by more than 50%. With 
that protective  feature (called the conversion premium), zeros 
took off. Corporate issuers  would pay no interest, and once 
their stock prices had climbed back to  acceptable levels, the 
debt would be swept away into equity. "If the bonds  are 
converted, it's a home run for everybody," says Jonathan Cohen, 
vice  president of convertible-bond analysis at Deutsche Bank. 
That  four-bagger, of course, depends entirely on the stock price 
rising. If it  doesn't, the bondholders, armed with that handy 
put feature, can simply sell  the bonds back to the company. 
Great for bondholders, but not so hot for the  company or its 
shareholders. But, hey, what are the odds of that happening?  
"CFOs and CEOs believe that their stock will just continue to go 
up,"  says Cohen. "They don't worry about the bond getting put." 
If all this  seems a little complicated, that's because it is. A 
real-life example should  help. California-based electric utility 
Calpine issued $ 1 billion in zeros  in April to refinance 
existing debt. At the time, the company's stock was  trading at 
about $ 55 a share--severely undervalued in the opinion of  
company management. "We really didn't want to sell equity at 
that  point," says Bob Kelly, Calpine's senior vice president of 
finance. So the  company instead opted to sell zeros, setting the 
conversion premium at a  hefty 37%. 
Still, with no cash interest payments and a stock price that  had 
to rise significantly to make conversion worthwhile, the bonds  
weren't exactly a screaming buy for investors. So Calpine added 
the put  feature: Investors could sell the bonds back to the 
company after one year  at the full purchase price, eliminating 
any downside risk. 
Things  haven't exactly worked out as management had hoped. The 
stock has since  plummeted to $ 25, and it now has to triple 
before conversion makes sense.  So it's looking as though Calpine 
will be liable for the $ 1 billion in  borrowed money when 
investors get the chance to put the bonds this April.  There's 
also the refinancing cost. According to Kelly, Calpine's  
borrowing rate could run in the neighborhood of 8.5%--an extra 
$ 85  million per year in cash. "Obviously, nobody plans for their 
stock to go  down," Kelly says. "I don't think there was one 
person around who thought  the bond would be put." 
Calpine's potential costs are particularly high  because its 
credit rating is straddling junk. "If you are a borderline  
investment-grade company, a financing of this nature is not 
necessarily  the most appropriate thing in the world," notes 
Anand Iyer, head of global  convertible research at Morgan 
Stanley. The problem is, there are a slew of  companies with far 
worse credit ratings out there: Jeff Seidel, Credit  Suisse First 
Boston's head of convertible-bond research, estimates that  about 
half of all zeros outstanding fall into the junk category. And  
others are at risk of having their ratings downgraded before the 
put  date. Today, with junk yielding as much as 5 1/2 percentage 
points above  bonds rated investment grade, refinancing can be a 
pricey proposition.  
Contract manufacturer Solectron is one that could well get hit 
by  the high price of junk. It has $ 845 million in zeros that it 
will probably  have to buy back this January, and another $ 4.2 
billion coming down the  pike over the next couple of years. 
Because of slower-than-expected sales,  the company was recently 
put on negative credit watch by three rating  agencies. And if 
Solectron's credit is downgraded, the zeros would slide  into 
junk status, a situation that could cost the company--and its  
shareholders--tens of millions of dollars in refinancing charges.  
Refinancing isn't the only worrisome cost associated with these  
zeros. Companies pay hefty investment banking fees to sell their  
bonds--up to 3% of the amount raised. If the debt is sold back, 
many  will have spent millions for what essentially amounted to a 
one-year loan.  "They're getting bad advice," claims one banker 
who didn't want to be named.  "Look at the fee the banker earned 
and look at the kind of financing risk  the company got into." 
As if those potential consequences were not scary  enough, 
shareholders can also get whacked when the bonds are first  
issued. That's because some 40% are bought by hedge funds, which 
short  the company's stock (sell borrowed shares with the 
intention of buying them  back at a lower price) at the same time 
that they buy the bonds. If the  stock goes down, the shorts make 
money from their position. If it goes up,  they profit by 
converting the bond to stock. This hedging strategy almost  
always causes the stock to plummet, at least for a while. 
Grocery chain  Supervalu, for example, recently lost 10% of its 
market cap the day it  announced it was issuing $ 185 million in 
zeros. 
Despite all the  pitfalls, the love affair with such Pollyanna 
bonds continues, thanks in  large part to the slick tax and 
accounting loopholes they provide. In fact,  the hit on earnings 
per share can be the lowest of any form of financing.  Even 
better, thanks to a wrinkle in the tax code, companies can rake 
in  huge tax savings by deducting far more interest than they're 
actually  paying. All they have to do is agree to pay small 
amounts of interest if  certain conditions prevail. Verizon 
Communications, for instance, would pay  0.25% annual interest on 
its $ 3 billion in zero bonds if its stock price  falls below 60% 
of the issue's conversion price. In the eyes of the IRS,  oddly, 
that clause enables the company to take a yearly interest  
deduction, for tax purposes, of 7.5%--the same rate it pays on 
its  regular debt. (Why? Trust us, you don't want to know.) That 
adds up to an  annual deduction of more than $ 200 million, even 
if Verizon never shells  out a dime in interest. Not 
surprisingly, more than half of the zeros issued  in 2001 contain 
similar clauses. "It's an incredible deal for them," says  Vadim 
Iosilevich, who runs a hedge fund at Alexandra Investment  
Management. "Not only are they raising cheap money, they're also 
doing  tax arbitrage." 
So despite the enormous risks to shareholders, companies  
continue to issue zeros at a steady clip: According to 
ConvertBond.com,  seven new issues, totaling $ 3.5 billion, have 
been sold since Oct. 1 alone.  "I think the power of the tax 
advantage is going to keep them around," says  CSFB's Seidel. 
Call it greed or just blind optimism that the markets will  
recover quickly--it doesn't really matter. Either way, it's the  
shareholders who'll be left paying the bill. 

Dan,

Could you send a graphic of what you expect this Q4 nuke utilization rate (or actual output) across Eastern Interconnect to look like versus previous 3 yrs actual?  Thanks,

Fletcher Sturm
V.P. Midwest Power

Attached are the two files for this week's Nuclear Rolling Forecast.

Dan
 - 010828 update.doc << File: 010828 update.doc >> 
 - 010828 update.xls << File: 010828 update.xls >> 

Good morning!

I talked with Frank's assistant yesterday (he was out all day) and she said that they can't send an adjuster out without first filing a claim.  To that end, she said it's generally not a good idea to file a claim (it goes on our record) unless we know there's damage.  So, she suggested that I have a roofer come out and look for possible hail damage and, if there is damage, provide us with his estimate for repair.  Then we should file a claim if need be.  So, I'm on the lookout for a roofer who will do that for us.  If you think we should use Joel, I'll call him.  But, I feel like he might not provide us with an unbiased opinion, if you know what I mean.  Talk to you later.  :)

ILY

We are in the process of confirming that all traders are set up correctly and ready to trade when the system goes live. 

We need to make sure that your Stack Managers are accessing the correct database. In order to do this, we need to know how you access Stack Manager:

1) Through Terminal Server (the one that opens up a desktop within a desktop and it actually appears that you have two Start buttons). 
or
2) By opening the Stack Manager directly from your "native" desktop.

Please reply to this message with either a corresponding "1" or a "2" in the subject field.

If you're not sure which one you have, please contact myself x39673, Teresa Mandola x39807 or Jennifer McQuade x53614 and we'll come by your desk to help you.

Thank you,

Dan Diamond

Vladimir,
 
Which measure are we going to be using at UBS?  VaR on portfolio #2 dosn't make sense to me that adding gas short to same position as #1c. increases risk.  What's up with that?  Also, could you forward the results from Rob Benson's portfolio's to me?  Thanks,
 
Fletch

See attached. Let me know if you have questions.
 

 	  	  	  	  	  	
 	
 	
 	 Portfolio  #1	  	
 	
 	 a.)  Long 100 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 b.)  Long 250 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 c.)  Long 500 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	
 	 Portfolio  #2	  	
 	
 	 Long 500 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 Short 30,000/d J-V '02 NG	  	
 	
 	 Portfolio  #3	  	
 	
 	 Long 500 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 Short 250 N-Q '03 Cin	  	
 	
 	 Portfolio  #4	  	
 	
 	 Long 500 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 Short 250 N-Q '02 PJM	  	
 	
 	 Portfolio  #5	  	
 	
 	 Long 300 N-Q '02 Cin	  	
 	 Short 500 U '02 Cin	  	
 	 Long 1,000 Q4 '02 Cin	  	
 	 Long 200 Cal '03 Cin	  	
 	
						

thanks,

fletch

Fletch-

We are moving all relevant Risk Management files over to the new environment, but will not be doing anything with specific files used only by the trading group.  If any of you had an templates or files that you used to follow your positions or estimate your curve shift outside of the Curve Manager, you will need to identify and move those (or possibly have your analysts move them?).

Let me know if you have any questions about specific Risk related files you would like to ensure are being moved.

Thanks-

Andrea

Casey,

Are you guys going to be responsible for moving all relevant power files from the O: and M: drives to UBS?  If so, thanks.  If not, who is?  Thanks,

Fletch

										
	
	
	VaR Portfolio	 Commodity	 Trader	 Book	 Instrument	 Location	 Tenor	 Liquidity (volume/day)	 Best Risk Mitigator	 
	 	  	  	 
	 	 Power	 Ballato	 ST - ECAR	 Forward Phys	 Cinergy	 < 30 Days	 5,000 MW	 Power - PJM	 
	 	 Power	 Ballato	 ST - ECAR	 Forward Phys	 Cinergy	 30 - 60 Days	 2,500 MW	 Power - PJM	 
	 	 Power	 Sturm	 LT - MW	 Forward Phys	 Cinergy	 60 - 365 Days	 1,000 MW	 NG	 
	 	 Power	 Sturm	 LT - MW	 Forward Phys	 Cinergy	 1 - 2 Years	 750 MW	 NG	 
	 	  	  	 
	 	 Power	 Kaniss	 ST - MAIN	 Forward Phys	 ComEd	 < 30 Days	 1,500 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Kaniss	 ST - MAIN	 Forward Phys	 ComEd	 30 - 60 Days	 750 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Sturm	 LT - MW	 Forward Phys	 ComEd	 60 - 365 Days	 250 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Sturm	 LT - MW	 Forward Phys	 ComEd	 1 - 2 Years	 150 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	  	  	 
	 	 Power	 Saibi	 ST - SERC	 Forward Phys	 Entergy	 < 30 Days	 2,000 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Saibi	 ST - SERC	 Forward Phys	 Entergy	 30 - 60 Days	 1,000 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Carson	 LT - SE	 Forward Phys	 Entergy	 60 - 365 Days	 750 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Carson	 LT - SE	 Forward Phys	 Entergy	 1 - 2 Years	 250 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	  	  	 
	 	 Power	 Saibi	 ST - SERC	 Forward Phys	 SOCO	 < 30 Days	 2,000 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Saibi	 ST - SERC	 Forward Phys	 SOCO	 30 - 60 Days	 1,000 MW	 Power - Cinergy	 
	 	 Power	 Carson	 LT - SE	 Forward Phys	 SOCO	 60 - 365 Days	 750 MW	 NG	 
	 	 Power	 Carson	 LT - SE	 Forward Phys	 SOCO	 1 - 2 Years	 250 MW	 NG	 
	 	  	  	  	  	  	  	  	  	 
	
	
	
	
	
	
	
	
										

Mark,

Has UBS decided to allow for true netting of cross-commodity exposure with counterparties under the master ISDA?  I'd like to know as this is an important pitch to our customers to trade financial products with us in power initially until we receive our physical license.  Could you get back to me before 2:30pm today?  Thanks,

Fletch Sturm

Let's meet today at 2:30pm if that's ok with you and the other guys including Larry and Maria.  I'll book it upstairs here and provide you with the room#.

Fletch

TJ,

Could you please book a room for 7 and reply?  Thanks, who is?

Rika,

What time is the meeting again on Fri?  10am or 10:30am?

Fletch

Hi!

Haven't been able to get a hold of you today on cell or at home...  I'm going over to the Front-Porch for a game of Golden Tee before heading home.  I'll be on my cell in about 15-20 min.

ILY

Your REGION
 
Geographical Boundary:
 
Fuel Sources  (Pipelines, Terminals, NG/FO2/FO6 storage, Rivers):
?        Coal:  (conversion factor, supply source)
?        NG:   (pipelines, basis to Henry Hub)
?        FO2/FO6:  (conversion factor, supply source, correlation to CL)
 
Load Mix:
?        Residential / Commercial
?        Industrial
 
Stack:
?        Nuke (tot. mw and % of tot. stack, marginal load/cost)
?        Coal (same as above)
?        NG (same as above)
?        FO2/FO6 (same as above)
?        Hydro
 
Historical Outage Cycles:
?        Nuke, Coal, NG, FO2/FO6
 
Seasonal Interchange:
?        Import (avg. daily mw and where)
?        Export (same as above)
 
Top 5 Largest Utilities/Operators:
?        Service Territory (within this region)
?        Stack
?        Load Mix
 
Top 5 Largest Merchant Generators:
?        Plant Locations/types
 
Attach historical load and MWDaily price sheet as last page for most actively traded hub in this region

All,

The unofficial word on the street is that deal closing is slated for Feb 7 and UBSWenergy launch is Feb 11.  Our intention is to launch financial products only for our regions beginning with Summer '02 through Cal '03.  As we are successful in signing up counterparties to reach a critical mass, we'll be adding products that are closer to the front of the curve (less correlated to NG.)  We need to do this to protect ourselves from "ambushes" by single parties when we don't have a critical mass of players that we can lay risk off with.

Please note that, as a result, we may "only" have a couple of more weeks to play with in terms of studying up and refreshing ourselves on the fundamentals in our respective regions.  Therefore, I'd like each of you to fill-in the information listed on the attached document for the region listed by your name.  Feel free to use any resources you need (fundies, etc.) and have them finished by next Thurs. (2/7).  Someone please nominate yourself to format each paper in the same manner and have them all put together in one binder nice and pretty.  Have a goodie.

Flet

	ECAR (Cinergy) - Krugh
	MAIN (ComEd) - Ave'
	SERC (TVA) - Jackie
	SERC (SOCO) - Twisty
	SPP (ENT) - New Boy

Hi...hope tennis went well.  Hopefully calling Frank Morello after this...anyway, Bill Nielsen's # is (281) 583-2937w  (281) 744-4150cell

ILY

p.s.  what did you think of Atlantis, other than fear of flying?

Mike,
 
I've talked with Kevin about adding another term-trading position position on my desk (TVA, the one we spoke about), and we're still not sure at this stage if that's the best place to allocate talent just yet.  For sure, when business is up to the level it was before the crash last year, that's definitely somewhere we'll need to add, but for right now we're still assessing.  As I said before, the dust is still settling (i.e. shuffling people and positions) so I still need a couple more days to see what the best fit for you might be.
 
Thanks,
 
Fletch

 

Fletch,
 
Talked with Hunter Shively today; think that it went well.  Thank you for setting it up.  I would like to re-stress my interest in working for your group in East Power.
 
What is the next step?
 
Mike Bridges

Casey,

Are you guys going to be responsible for moving all relevant power files from the O: and M: drives to UBS?  If so, thanks.  If not, who is?  Thanks,

Fletch

Dan,

Tomcat's a good guy who's eager to work his way up on an energy trading floor.  Thanks for your help on that.  I'm looking forward to buying you a few beers when you come down again.

Fletch

Fletch:

I will pass Tomcat's resume on to other managers here at WIlliams. Everyone a little bit on eggshells here. I'm sure I'll be back in Houston soon. Would like to get together.

Dan O'Grady

we would like to continue to receive their monthly analysis plus daily load forecasts.  i place low value in their "retainer" service where they come and talk to us about the market.  tim heizernrader has been managing this relationship for us.  he is out for the balance of the week.  tim, could you get in touch with fletch upon your return.  fletch, hopefully this gets you started.

tim

Fellas,

Presto has asked me to be the contact to Allan Stewart at PIRA with regard to setting up an arrangement for their consulting services.  I'm currently having information-gathering discussions over services and fees for both gas and power, in both the east and west.  In order to fully incorporate everyone's needs into our arrangement with PIRA, I'll be contacting you this week to gather requests.  Or, if you know what you need, please just reply to me with the specific information.

Thanks,

Fletch

Victoria,

Sorry I haven't been able to contact you by phone, but will try today.  Can you provide me with a list of the services and fee structures in place with Enron?  I'd like to see what we had before so I can compare with what we'll need going forward.

Fletch

Mike,
 
We're still letting the dust settle up here.  Hunter may want to talk with you upon review of your resume.  Either way, I'll get back to you soon.  Thanks,
 
Fletch

 

Fletch,

Want to re-stress my interest in the position we talked about Friday.  Looking forward to the opportunity.  

Please find my resume attached.  

Mike Bridges

Fellas,

Presto has asked me to be the contact to Allan Stewart at PIRA with regard to setting up an arrangement for their consulting services.  I'm currently having information-gathering discussions over services and fees for both gas and power, in both the east and west.  In order to fully incorporate everyone's needs into our arrangement with PIRA, I'll be contacting you this week to gather requests.  Or, if you know what you need, please just reply to me with the specific information.

Thanks,

Fletch

Allan,

My name is Fletch Sturm, formerly with the wholesale trading group at Enron, now UBS Warburg Energy.  I worked closely with Rogers Herndon in East Power for most of last year (you might remember me) and wanted to see if we could begin some sort of dialog in terms of an agreement to retain your services here at UBS.  Kevin Presto has asked me to be the main contact to you on behalf of perhaps both the gas and power tading groups.  I look forward to discussing this arrangement with you further at your earliest convenience.  My contact information is as follows:

Fletcher J. Sturm
Executive Director
UBS Warburg Energy
(713) 853-9684 work
(713) 562-4207 cell
fsturm@enron.com  (temporary)

Thanks,

Fletch

Hunt,
 
Attached is Mike Bridges' resume.  I talked with him on Fri. and mentioned you might want to talk with him as well.  I don't love him, but could use him if the best fit is East Power.
 
Flet
 
 

Fletch,

Want to re-stress my interest in the position we talked about Friday.  Looking forward to the opportunity.  

Please find my resume attached.  

Mike Bridges

Mike,
 
You must not have received my earlier reply in time...I have another meeting right now (10:30am), so can't meet until tomorrow.  I'll call you an hour before I'm available in the morning.
 
Fletch

Fletch,
 
I can meet anytime and am very interested.
 
Mike Bridges

Mike, 

John Lavorato forwarded an e-mail to me sent by you requesting information on opportunities in trading at UBS.  I'd very much like to talk with you again if you're interested in East Power.  If you're interested, please send your resume to me and let me know if you could meet tomorrow (Fri. 1/25).  We're making personnel decisions here by the hour and I'd like to hear from you as soon as possible.

Thanks, 

Fletch 

Mike,
 
Let's meet this a.m. 9:30.  I'm on the trading floor in the new building 6th floor.
 
Fletch

Fletch,
 
I can meet anytime and am very interested.
 
Mike Bridges

Mike, 

John Lavorato forwarded an e-mail to me sent by you requesting information on opportunities in trading at UBS.  I'd very much like to talk with you again if you're interested in East Power.  If you're interested, please send your resume to me and let me know if you could meet tomorrow (Fri. 1/25).  We're making personnel decisions here by the hour and I'd like to hear from you as soon as possible.

Thanks, 

Fletch 

please send this to Tamara Jae Black for approval

Fletch Sturm

Alert!
You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iPayit in-box that is past due.  It is critical that you login to iPayit and take immediate action to resolve this invoice.

Remember, you play an important role in ensuring that we pay our vendors on time.

Tip!:  You must login to the system to forward this invoice to another user.

To launch iPayit, click on the link below:
http://iPayit.enron.com
Note:  Your iPayit User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iPayit user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://isc.enron.com/site/doclibrary/user/default.asp

Need help?
North America: ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.
Europe: European Accounts Payable at +44-20-7783-7520.
Asia-Pacific: Sydney Accounts Payable at +61-2-9229-2336

I will be out of the office on Wednesday, February 6, and I will be returning on Thursday, February 7.  If you need immediate assistance, please contact Andrea Dahlke at 345-4080.

Lloyd/Rika,

Kevin has asked me to be the commercial lead on continuing and expediting the development of the system for the traders that provided real-time pricing, curve shift, positions, etc. that was in the works last year.  Could you please provide me with the names of the IT people I need to contact and/or the lead on the project?  Thanks,

Fletch

Greg,

Wow!  What a deal!  I just wanted to thank you again for everything these past few months.  I can only imagine the toll all of this has taken on you and your family.  Everyone is very excited about the opportunity you and Hutch' have given us and we're confident we'll be successful.  Thanks again and good luck to us all!

Fletch

Mike,

John Lavorato forwarded an e-mail to me sent by you requesting information on opportunities in trading at UBS.  I'd very much like to talk with you again if you're interested in East Power.  If you're interested, please send your resume to me and let me know if you could meet tomorrow (Fri. 1/25).  We're making personnel decisions here by the hour and I'd like to hear from you as soon as possible.

Thanks,

Fletch

All,

Please plan to attend a welcome and overview meeting presented by UBS senior management on Wed. 1/23/02.  The actual meeting is from 10:00am (sharp) - 1:00pm (hopefully just as sharp :) at The Houstonian Hotel on N. Post Oak Ln. at Woodway.  Breakfast munchies will be served at 9am for those of you who think you are as hungry as I am in the morning.  I will be going straight to the meeting from home the morning of, so if you need me call my cell at 713-562-4207.  

Thanks,

Fletch

p.s.  if you know of other former Enron employees that have signed up with UBS and do not know about this meeting, please spread the word. 

Tomcat,

Sorry it's taken so long, but finally made contact with a guy at Williams regarding your interest.  His name is Michael Westbrock and he's the term ComEd trader.  I just forwarded your resume to him after speaking with him over the phone.  His e-mail is michael.westbrock@williams.com and his phone # is (918) 573-8752.  He said feel free to follow up with him directly later this week after he's had time to look into it.

Good luck,

Fletch

Fletch,  
    I really appreciate whatever help you can give me in the job search.  
Thanks,  
Tomcat 
 - Resume.rtf 

Amy,

If it's not too late, would you please give Mike Carson a copy of his executed document to him?  Thanks.  He forgot to make a copy.

Fletch

Kevin,
 
Put Russell down as 100%.  He's in San Antonio this weekend with his visiting brothers and unfortunately, his contract is here in Houston.  I talked to him last night and he had Jeannie Sloan fax his doc to the hotel and he assured me he'd review it then or first thing this a.m.  I'm sure he'll find the language acceptable since it's merely a 30-day evergreen.  As for additional $'s, I personally guaranteed him $10k and gave him 50-50 odds on the 1-year contract we talked about yesterday.  He's in either way.
 
 I also called Suarez yesterday and left a message, but haven't heard back yet.  I'll lob another call in this morning around 10am.
 
Did you receive a faxed signature copy from Carson yesterday/this a.m.?
 
Flet

TJ,
I don't know what my ID and password are for this thing.  Could you help?  Thanks,
Fletch

Alert!
You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iPayit in-box that is past due.  It is critical that you login to iPayit and take immediate action to resolve this invoice.

Remember, you play an important role in ensuring that we pay our vendors on time.

Tip!:  You must login to the system to forward this invoice to another user.

To launch iPayit, click on the link below:
http://iPayit.enron.com
Note:  Your iPayit User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iPayit user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://isc.enron.com/site/doclibrary/user/default.asp

Need help?
North America: ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.
Europe: European Accounts Payable at +44-20-7783-7520.
Asia-Pacific: Sydney Accounts Payable at +61-2-9229-2336

Please plan to attend a meeting today at 1pm to discuss the UBS transaction and what it means to our operation.  TJ will reply with the room information.  Thanks,

Fletch

Danielle,

Could you please tell whoever was coming to give me the Kobra lesson at 1:30 that I need to move it to 2:30?  Thanks,

Fletch

Dad,

Thought you might find this interesting (read: confusing)!  It's publicly available on the net, so it's ok.  How many other companies are going to come forward with their problems or get in deeper trying to "quietly" clean them up?

Fletch

 

T-

This dosn't mention anything about an "adapter" for the CD, just battery.  I think your girl's on dope.

F

 

__________________________
Name
 
 
ENRON NORTH AMERICA CORP. 
___________________________________________
QUESTIONNAIRE FOR DIRECTORS AND EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
QUESTIONS
 
1.                  GENERAL.
Please state your full name:                                                                                  
2.                  RELATIONSHIP WITH THE COMPANY AND ITS SUBSIDIARIES.
Please list all directorships, positions and offices that you hold with the Company or its Subsidiaries, indicate the date on which you were elected or appointed to each such position, and if any such offices or positions, other than directorships, carry a specific term of office, state such term of office.
 
Position(s):
 
Name of Subsidiary:
Date Elected
or Appointed:
Term of
Office (if any):
 
                                                     
 
                                                     
 
                                                     
 
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
                                                     
 
3.                  INTERESTED PARTY TRANSACTIONS.
If you or any of your Associates have, either directly or indirectly, any interest in any contract, arrangement or property (real or personal, tangible or intangible) used in or pertaining to the Business or the Assets, please describe such interest(s) on Appendix B hereto.
4.                  TRANSACTIONS WITH MANAGEMENT AND OTHERS.
PLEASE REFER TO THE DEFINITION OF "ASSOCIATE."
(a)                Have you or any of your Associates had any interest, direct or indirect, in any transaction or series of similar transactions occurring during the twenty-four months prior to September 30, 2001, or in any currently proposed transaction, or series of similar transactions, to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries was or is to be a party involving the Business or the Assets?  No response need be made and no information need be given for any matter already described in answer to another Item of this Questionnaire.
Yes                                 No      
If "Yes," please describe each such transaction and the nature and amount of your interest therein on Appendix B hereto.  Please include your stock ownership or the stock ownership of any Associate in any corporation that is a party to any transaction for which information is required.
(b)               If any transaction described in (a) above involved or is to involve the purchase or sale of assets by or to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, please state the cost (if any) of the assets to the purchaser and, if acquired by the seller within two years prior to the transaction, the cost thereof to the seller on Appendix B hereto.  In answering this question please make a separate statement with respect to each transaction, giving the names of the parties in each case.  Indicate the principle followed in determining the purchase or sale price and the name of the person making such determination.
5.                  CONTRACTS.
If you or any of your Associates is a party to any contract with the Company or its Subsidiaries which has not been described elsewhere herein, please describe such contract(s) on Appendix B hereto.
 

APPENDIX A
DEFINITIONS:
For the purposes of this Questionnaire, certain terms are defined as follows:
1.                  Affiliate.  An "Affiliate" of, or a person "affiliated" with, a specified person, is a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the person specified.
APPENDIX B

I understand that my answers will be used in the preparation of documents that the Company proposes to file with the Commission in the near future.  If at any time any of the information set forth in my responses to this Questionnaire has changed due to passage of time, or any development occurs which requires a change in my answer, or such information has for any other reason become incorrect, or if any of my answers hereto change materially during the remainder of the current fiscal year, then I will forthwith furnish to the individual to whom a copy of this Questionnaire is to be sent, as indicated and at the address shown on the front hereof, any necessary or appropriate correcting information.  Otherwise, the Company is to understand that the above information continues to be, to the best of the undersigned's knowledge, complete and correct.
Dated:  January      , 2002
 
 
                                                                                                                                    
Signature

thanks...I'll look into it.

Fletch

I just forwarded the voice mail to your extension.  Basically, she indicated that there is no hard contract, that all of the terms and information are posted on the website and what you see is what you get.  I guess you could print out the terms from the website.  Let me know if you need me to research further.

she has not called me...would you please forward?  I need a hard copy this morning.  Thanks,

Fletch

Did Tana call you?  I have a message she left me about the contract if you need me to forward it to you.  Let me know.

yea, I went to the website and they don't have the actual contract there.  I need to get a hard copy.  I'll call Tana.  Thanks.

Fletch

I've got a meeting at 1:00 but here's the website.  Not sure if it has the actual contract.  When I get back I will look some more and I have a call into Tana Jones (paralegal) to see if she has a hard copy.

http://www.nymex.com/

she has not called me...would you please forward?  I need a hard copy this morning.  Thanks,

Fletch

Did Tana call you?  I have a message she left me about the contract if you need me to forward it to you.  Let me know.

yea, I went to the website and they don't have the actual contract there.  I need to get a hard copy.  I'll call Tana.  Thanks.

Fletch

I've got a meeting at 1:00 but here's the website.  Not sure if it has the actual contract.  When I get back I will look some more and I have a call into Tana Jones (paralegal) to see if she has a hard copy.

http://www.nymex.com/

Still unknown...min. 60 days

Thanks.

What is the latest on the timeframe for getting a physical power license?

Dave

Dave,

If you didn't get this from anyone else on Fri, here it is:

Fletch
 << File: Power Trading Start2.xls >> 

yea, I went to the website and they don't have the actual contract there.  I need to get a hard copy.  I'll call Tana.  Thanks.

Fletch

I've got a meeting at 1:00 but here's the website.  Not sure if it has the actual contract.  When I get back I will look some more and I have a call into Tana Jones (paralegal) to see if she has a hard copy.

http://www.nymex.com/

Dave,

If you didn't get this from anyone else on Fri, here it is:

Fletch
 

Reagan, Bill, Larry, and I got together to put together a draft business plan that can be applied to the Southeast and Midwest regions.  The schedule is probably aggressive, depending on when we get a power marketing license.  The plan is short on back end details until the eventual buyer is known, and until we know VAR, capital, etc.

Mitch

 

Rhonda,

Could you help me find a copy of the NYMEX Cinergy futures contract?  I would appreciate it.  Thanks,

Fletch

yes, that's fine.  thanks,

fletch

Fletch:

Does 1:30 today work for you to have a Reuters trainer come meet with you to get you up to speed on the Kobra application?

I apologize for not doing this sooner I just didn't catch that you had the Bridge application.

Thanks,

Danielle

 

Attached is the new spreadsheet with Product List for East Power

From Kevin Presto:

Attached is the spreadsheet version of the template we discussed this morning.   I have added the additional columns everyone requested.   I would now like the business unit leads to fill in the blanks such that we have an initial Power Implementation Plan that can be delivered to Louise on Friday.
 
With respect to East Power (I am out Thursday and Friday), I am delegating to all of my desk heads the responsibility the following:
1) Have all of the forms attached spreadsheet forms complete
2) A product offering sheet is added to the template.

Fletch & Dana - Please take the lead on creating the product offering list (physical and financial).  My recommendation is we put products out through 03 for all regions (financial and physical).   Obviously, the physical products will be contingent on receiving a power marketing license.

Cory and Don Baughman - Please take a crack at identifying all of the transmission service agreements we need for the East (Christi has started a list already).

The transmission agreement list attached can be used to prioritize or assign commercial people to transmission/pool agreements.  It is not correct on the timing under the pools, so don't rely on that column.

 

Please call me on my cell (713-856-3923) with any questions.

Kevin Presto
Vice President, East Power Trading
Phone:  713-853-5035
Cell:  713-854-3923
Fax:  713-646-8272

Everyone-

I will be out of town until Friday (will be in office Friday mid-morning) and then we will be in Belize from the 6th to the 13th.  

We will be staying at:

VICTORIA HOUSE RESORT
P.O. Box 22
Ambergris Caye, Belize
Central America
Tel: 501-262067
Fax: 501-262429

The best way to reach me is probably via my home e-mail (drherndon@aol.com) I will be checking this via internet cafe at least twice a day.  Feel free to call the hotel and leave a message as well.  I will try to check my enron e-mail if i can from Belize.

Have a great New Year and see you briefly on Friday the 4th.

RH

 
The same attachment was sent again in case you had trouble opening the previous file.   I am sending from home via the network and have been having some problems.   Sorry to e-mail you to death.

See Attachment

 - POWER TRADING START.doc << POWER TRADING START.doc >> 

 

Dear Enron Employee: 

Houston Ballet is presenting The Nutcracker through Sunday, December 30.  The production has been hailed by the Houston chronicle as "the crown jewel of holiday entertainment," and is a perfect introduction to the world of ballet for families and audiences of all ages.  Enron has been a long-time supporter of the Ballet, and we would like to thank you with a special invitation from Houston Ballet and TicketMaster for discount tickets to The Nutcracker.

Click on the following links below to receive a 25% discount on tickets to any of the selected performances of The Nutcracker.

To place your order, click on the link below to choose your day and time.  When requesting your tickets, you may choose from best available seats or a specific section, however, all ticket prices may not be available.  Ticketmaster service and handling charges will apply to your order.

Your company code is: NUT1. 

Happy Holidays and enjoy Houston Ballet. 

Performance Dates and Times: 

Wednesday, December 26 at 7:30pm 
<https://ticketing.ticketmaster.com/cgi/purchasePage.asp?event_id=C003345C3DE86FB&event_code=EHL1226> 

Thursday, December 27 at 7:30pm 
<https://ticketing.ticketmaster.com/cgi/purchasePage.asp?event_id=C003345D10FB243&event_code=EHL1227> 

Saturday, December 29 at 2:00pm 
<https://ticketing.ticketmaster.com/cgi/purchasePage.asp?event_id=C003345CDB2A7A1&event_code=EHL1229M> 

Sunday, December 30 at 2:00pm 
<https://ticketing.ticketmaster.com/cgi/purchasePage.asp?event_id=C003345CDDBA7F9&event_code=EHL1230M> 

roger that...we are here and will call.

No problem...I'm out of here on Thursday and Friday. Are you in town over the holiday - if so - give me a call and let's get together. I think we have a sitter for Saturday night.

Evan

Evan,

Thanks for the party pic!  I bought one of those Sony digital cameras for Toni for Christmas.  I jumped up for the one with a mini CD.  We'll see how she likes it.  As for lunch, it looks like we'll have to make it some other time as I have lunch with my group today, I'm leaving before lunch tomorrow, and I'm taking Fri off.  Oh, the life of a Ch.11 employee...later, 

Fletch

Good day all:

Below is a list of applications used by your groups.  We are trying to ascertain which applications are critical to your business.  Please review the list and send me any additional applications that you need to do your job.

Thank you all for your help,
Daniel A. Muschar
ECS Trader Support Group
Office: 713-853-4344
Cell: 281-541-6203
daniel.muschar@enron.com
CCNA, MCSE, CNA, A+

LIST OF Applications:

CRITICAL APPLICATIONS

Gas EBBs (Dial-up)
Kobra
Reuters
TDS
EOL
Internet
Enpower
Excel
CQG
Bloomberg
Sitara
Unify
Pricing Models
Telerate 9.27
ERMs
CPR
Tibco
Exceed
RUNM
Mapp
RiskTrac

 

 
 

TJ,
 
Could you please reply back to me with the current addresses for:
 
Russell Ballato[Black, Tamara Jae]     2421 Westcreek Lane, Houston Tx  
 Jason Kaniss[Black, Tamara Jae]     15614 Grovespring Dr., Houston Tx 77068 
Maria Valdez[Black, Tamara Jae]      1332 W Bell # 4, Houston, Tx 77019
Don Baughman[Black, Tamara Jae]    2203 Acacia Ct., League City, Tx 77573      
 
Thanks, who is?
 
Fletch

TJ,
 
Could you please reply back to me with the current addresses for:
 
Russell Ballato
Jason Kaniss
Maria Valdez
Don Baughman
 
Thanks, who is?
 
Fletch

IT'S A PIECE OF SHIAVONE!

today Enron Corp. filed for chapter 11 protection under the federal bankruptcy protection act, making it the largest Del Lago in US history...

Yes, I do use it, but I'd be glad to talk to someone from Kobra.  Thanks for you help.

Fletch

Fletch:

The Bridge/Telerate system will not be migrated to the UBS infrastructure.  I noticed you had an account but wasn't sure if you actually use the application?  Let me know and I will have a Kobra (Reuters)  trainer help setup anything you are not able to pull up into the Kobra app.

thanks,

Danielle 

Kevin,
 
I'm at home today too.  Have you talked to anyone?
 
Fletch

Huntman,
 
I'm at home today.  Are you in the office?
 
Fletch

 
Please disregard previous email.

Steve

legally, other than a broker, no.  sorry.

fletch

Fletch -
Global Advisors, a hedge fund, via Cargill is reinitiating their outstanding positions with us in the mkt today at Loss to us (as per their ISDA). They're having trouble finding someone who will make a mkt in the financial Dec Cinergy Megawatt Daily trade they're short. Can you suggest someone they can contact? 
Thanks a lot.
Russ and Robyn

this employee no longer works for me...please discontinue sending me these requests for approval.

thanks,

fletcher sturm

This request has been pending your approval for  61 days.  Please click http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000057285&Page=Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000057285
Request Create Date : 8/30/01 5:59:30 PM
Requested For       : erik.simpson@enron.com
Resource Name       : Market Data Kobra Crude
Resource Type       : Applications

thanks Jean...I've already got it on...shorts between natty and power
 
happy belated thanksgiving back atcha
 
fletch

Hunterbob and Fletch,
 
While I was walking today, people were running and walking in their shorts - my Dad's heat is not on.
 
Happy Belated Thanksgiving!
 
Mrha

04:33 20Nov2001 RSF-Platt's: Enron sees cash drain, warns on survival

New York (Platts)--20Nov2001/533 am EST/1033 GMT 

Enron filed Q3 financials late Monday, revealing a huge cash drain, despite last week's $1.5-bil asset-backed infusion from merger partner Dynegy. Enron said its cash Friday had fallen to $1.2-bil, even with the Dynegy payment three days earlier, $550-mil drawn on a new bank line last week and $3-bil drawn on existing lines earlier this month to pay off $1.9-bil of commercial paper. Enron blamed operating costs, trade settlements and collateral deposits paid to trading partners. Enron said it expects $800-mil soon from asset sales and got another $440-mil bank line Monday. But it warned it might not be enough to keep its investment-grade credit rating or restructure debt coming due. That could have a "material adverse impact on Enron's ability to continue as a going concern," it warned.
 
For Related News, Double Click on one of these codes:
[nPL2779110] [CRU] [ENE.N] [US] [PGF] [MRG] [ELG] [NGS] [PLTN] [LEN] [CRU] [ENE] [US] 
 Tuesday, 20 November 2001 04:33:58
RSF [Historical News] {C}
ENDS

Willis Philip
Enron Wholesale Services
East Power Trading
(713) 853-0961

14:01 19Nov2001 RSF-INSIDE FERC: Midwest-Market 2: Lack of sellers forces high Enron bids - PGN311

Washington (Platts)--19Nov2001/301 pm EST/2001 GMT 

One trader said that she found arbitrage opportunities on some of the online platforms, capitalizing on a 5- to 6-ct differential between prices posted on EnronOnline and those on IntercontinentalExchange. She confirmed that few market players are willing to sell to Enron, which is forcing Enron to bid at a premium. 

Spot prices on ANR Pipeline in Oklahoma ranged from about $1.75/MMBtu early in the morning to about $2.36/MMBtu late, up from Friday's range of $1.38 to $1.58/MMBtu. 

For Related News, Double Click on one of these codes:
[nPL4109800] [ENE.N] [US] [NGS] [PGN] [PLTN] [LEN] [ENE] [US] [NGS] 
 Monday, 19 November 2001 14:01:20
RSF [Historical News] {C}
ENDS

Willis Philip
Enron Wholesale Services
East Power Trading
(713) 853-0961

Greg,

Congratulations!  Stay the course and good luck!

Fletch

LLoyd,

I'm supposed to give a presentation to the Trader Track sometime this month and I forget when.   Do you have that schedule?  Thanks,

Fletch

that's great.  thanks,
fletch

UBS will allow full and complete netting for all commodity derivatives done under and ISDA Master Agreement.  They will not allow netting of commodity transactions with other financial transactions (such as interest rate or f/x deals).  Unfortunately, the big limitation for us is that we will not be able to net between physical and financial exposures.  So transactions under an Enfolio physical gas master will not net with derivatives under an ISDA .

Mark,

I posed this question to Mark Haedicke last week and he suggested I ask you:  Will UBS allow counterparties that enter into an ISDA with UBS to net exposure between financial Gas and Power positions when calculating margin requirements?  If so, to what extent, and if not, why?  This would be a major selling point when we're trying to establish relationships with new trading partners and trying to build our financially traded products business.  Please help.  Thanks,

Fletch Sturm
x 3-9684

Jennifer,

Because trading is heaviest on Wed's after 1:00 pm, I'll need to re-schedule with Brooks for 3:00 or later.  Thanks,

Fletch Sturm

Attached are the following:

 << File: Brooks Hodnette- schedule.doc >> 		 << File: Brooks Hodnette - resume.doc >> 

rika,

could you arrange for Thomas to meet with me today @ 3:30 or sometime soon thereafter?  thanks, 

fletch

great...just have Thomas come down when he can.

fletch

should be around 4pm

i have also mentioned to gus that you  may ask him to help you out with any project/research needs 

thanks 

rika 

rika,

could you arrange for Thomas to meet with me today @ 3:30 or sometime soon thereafter?  thanks, 

fletch

you bet

Fletch,

	I have a fundamentals meeting this afternoon with the topic being emmissions from 3:00 - 4:00.  Is it alright if we meet after the fundamentals meeting?

Thomas

Great!  Thanks,

Fletch

Hi Fletch.

All products with the internal trader id of FSTURM
have been disabled for autosuspension if the system 
detects that the Stack Manager has gone away.

Also, you should receive a call from the head of
support to help you get the VPN software.  Let
me know if you do not hear from her.

--jay

Joseph,

Thanks for your interest...you can get the book online at Amazon.com or direct from the publisher at PennWell.com

Fletch

Hi,

I'm an analyst with Enron in the Toronto office.  I'm new to the natural gas business and your Natural Gas Trading book was recommended to me as a good place to start.  Would you know where I can get a copy of it in Canada?

Thanks,

Joseph del Moral
Analyst
Enron Canada Corp.
416-865-3706

Robert,

Please put me on the distribution list for the competitive analysis summary sheet that Kevin Presto is receiving from you on a daily basis.  Thanks,

Fletcher Sturm
V.P. East Power
x 3-9684

 
 
 
>I wonder who thinks up this stuff!  It is interesting,
>however. Check this out....  Millie
>
>The date of the attack:   9/11 -  9 + 1 + 1 = 11
>September 11th is the  254th  day of the year:   2 + 5
>+ 4 = 11
>After September 11th there are  111  days left to the
>end of the year.
>119  is the area code to Iraq/Iran.   1 + 1 + 9 = 11
>Twin Towers - standing side by side, looks like the
>number 11
>The first plane to hit the towers was  Flight 11
>
>I Have More.......
>
>State of New York - The 11th State added to the Union
>New York City - 11 Letters
>Afghanistan  - 11 Letters
>The Pentagon - 11 Letters
>Ramzi Yousef - 11 Letters (convicted of orchestrating
>the attack on the
>WTC in 1993)
>Flight 11 - 92 on board - 9 + 2 = 11
>Flight 77 - 65 on board - 6 + 5 = 11
>
>
>
>
>__________________________________________________
>Terrorist Attacks on U.S. - How can you help?
>Donate cash, emergency relief information
>http://dailynews.yahoo.com/fc/US/Emergency_Information/ 
>
 

 
--- Mark Davis
--- mddjunior31@earthlink.net 
--- EarthLink: It's your Internet.
 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

TJ,

I'm giving that presentation to the Trader Track people on Wed, so it looks like I'll need to postpone the meeting yet again.  In light of what's been happening in the market, I'd like to re-schedule for next Mon.  Thanks,

Fletch

MEETING HAS CHANGED - PLEASE SEE BELOW THE NEW DATE AND TIME

Please mark your calendar for the following meeting:

Midwest/Southeast Desk Meeting w/Fletch Sturm
Wednesday,  September 19th  
3 - 3:30pm
Room - 3125b

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

Steve,

My computer blew up after I sent back to you reply for meeting at 1:00 ish...are we on?

Fletch

I would like to contribute.

fletch

Hey guys...I would like to ask you a favor...please help me support Rhonda Denton and the other girls in the back office with the American Heart Walk.  If you would like to contribute please let me know and I will bring the sheet to you.  Please remember that whatever you contribute the company will match.

Thanks again for your support.

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

Rika,

I talked to Jon and he is under contract.  I'll talk to Kevin about it and get back to you.

Fletch

Fletch,

Please let me know what you think.  I talked with Kevin and he mentioned no, since he may not be under contract 

Thanks 

Rika 

Fletch,

Could you please grant me access to the East Power Fundamentals site in an effort to coordinate our gas and power views.

Thanks,

Jon

Jason,

I'd like to talk to you sometime soon (today?) regarding a cash trading position in the Midwest to see if you might find it interesting.  Let me know by phone...x 3-9684

Fletch

TJ,

What is my current balance?

Fletch

Just a reminder that we are coming up to the end of the year and that you w=
ill be able to roll over 40 HOURS or ONE WEEK of vacation time.  Should you=
 have more that 40 hours please try and use them before the end of the year=
 so that you don't loose them.  I do have a print out of the vacation time =
if you need to verify your current balance.

Thank you,

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

Guys - check out the link at the bottom - awesome!  I am going to buy a few of these for gifts around the office.

Rogers

look at link below

Check out Steve Swain's response to my email to him!

I wonder if the guy sells gift certificates.  I know a few folks I'd like to shop for.

Hey, Starwood looks fine.  Anything else?

>  -----Original Message-----

Rogers,

That was fantastic...good laughs by all here.

Fletch

Guys - check out the link at the bottom - awesome!  I am going to buy a few of these for gifts around the office.

Rogers

look at link below

Check out Steve Swain's response to my email to him!

I wonder if the guy sells gift certificates.  I know a few folks I'd like to shop for.

Hey, Starwood looks fine.  Anything else?

>  -----Original Message-----

Thanks

I show you have 104 hours remaining...if you roll over 40 hours...you need =
to take 8 days.

Thanks

TJ,

What is my current balance?

Fletch

Just a reminder that we are coming up to the end of the year and that you w=
ill be able to roll over 40 HOURS or ONE WEEK of vacation time.  Should you=
 have more that 40 hours please try and use them before the end of the year=
 so that you don't loose them.  I do have a print out of the vacation time =
if you need to verify your current balance.

Thank you,

T.Jae Black
East Power Trading
Assistant to Kevin Presto
off. 713-853-5800
fax 713-646-8272
cell 713-539-4760

sure,

e.g.	Buy Jul-Aug Cin power at $50, sell Jul-Aug NatGas at $2.885
	$50/$2.85 = 17.5 HeatRate

	To hedge:  sell 28 contracts/month gas
	50 MW = 32,000 MWhours (50 MW x 16 peak hrs x 5 peak days/wk x 8 wks = 32,000 MWh)
	32,000 MWh x 17.5 = 560,000 MMBtu = 56 contracts over Jul-Aug strip

	Just do the reverse math at 18 heat rate to figure P/L...

Fletch

Hi
Im not sure I understand how you guys trade heat rates. Is there anything around I could read to give me a brief overview? Alternatively, could you email me an explanation?
Thanks
Jen

TJ,

I'd like a room tomorrow (Tue) after 4pm to speak with Mike Bridges about an open position on my desk.  Could you find a room for 1 hr and let me know where and when.  Thanks,

Fletch

Program: C:\Reuters\Desktop\kobra\kernel\winnt\bin\kobra.exe

 abnormal program termination 

Report ID no. 2B266B6655BD4CEFA874

I don't think there are any receipts outstanding .. Could you please tell me which ones you're missing???  This last report had a receipt for everything.

Employee Name: Michael Swerzbin
Report Name:   Swerzbin, Mike  1/17/02
Report Date:   1/17/2002
Purpose:       Trip to Houston, TX, Meeting w/ UBS Warburg Management
Report ID:     2B266B6655BD4CEFA874
Submitted On:  1/17/2002
Report Total:  2112.45

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

Charts for today's briefing are attached:

 http://www.btinternet.com/~pir8/arnie/

Hi Sue I still have not received a check for voucher NO. 0100067175 FOR $2,2298.95.

 << File: michael Swerbin.xls >> 

Swerzbin will be out of the office, but available on cell phone for the week of Nov 5 to Nov 9.  Back in the office Nov12.  Driscoll will trade the EOL and download curves.

Driscoll on curves and pricing---

Driz will be doing the curves...   be on my cell phone.

The market last week for the flat MC was about $31: that difference would be 9.50 = $2,654,02 nominal for the increased mws.  The loss of the delivery value is about $.75/MWh- (about $2.3 million nominal).  The loss of the option is probably about $1 million.   Overall, you did a very job I think its worth $1.5 million- if you go by the numbers its 0.

MWHRs =  4 Years and 1 quarter Flat so that equals approximately 37,250 Hours

The difference between 102 (the new amount) and 94.5 (the old average flat amount) = 7.5 MW * 37,250 HRs = 279,375 MWhrs

I was under the impression that a 100 MW flat amount would equal $3 million value (a $16 difference between market and $21.50).  This would indicate the 102 equals a $4,100,000 valuation.  As to the discount in value due to the flexibility and delivery point I am looking to you for leadership.  If my assumptions are wrong then let me know.

Stewart

Here's a more detailed reason.  Thanks Mike

 

Mike:

Just wanna follow up with you on the $22.8 schedule C (see below email sent to you and Tim on 9/27).  Did you get a chance to fill in the reason for using the schedule C?  When you are done please send it back to me and I'll print it out for you and Tim to sign off.  We will need to send document to Risk Control in Houston.

Thanks,

Fran

Mike:

We reserved $22.8 MM in your 9/26 P&L for the restructured/changed BPA deal #51353.  Please take a look at the attached schedule C form and fill in the reaon for usig the schedule and any planned removal date.  Right now the reason is filled temperarily with below comments:

Reserve for deal 51353 with BPA due to the uncertainty of open access

When you are done please send the revised form back to me and I'll print out one copy for you and Tim to sign off.

Thank you,
Fran

 << File: Schedule C Form-west1.xls >> 

Mike:

Please see the term sheet that Vivek has put together. I am not sure if Mo or Jeffery is going to work on this.

Please let them coordinate with Vivek and come with a structure that is acceptable to you.

The strikes columns are left blank and as discussed can be close to ATM

Please call me if you need furhter information.

Thanks,

Sanjeev

 

_

Mike:

This structure is from Caslebridge, who are independent consultants and work with various clients to hedge their exposure. They have not told me who the client is (it is not PacifiCorp)..I think we can make a good guess.

At this time, all we would like to know is that we would consider and price such a structure. If yes, then we would like to give them an indicative no. by Wed morning.

At this time the factors 1,000 and 10 are arbitrary.

Please let me know.

Thanks,

Sanjeev

Hydro Contingent Power Call Option: example

Term:  2 years		

Notional Per day (MWH) = [  MIN ( 850MW * 16 hrs,  MAX (1000 - 10 * Daily Flow (KCFS),0)

The Notional per day payoff may have time varying (monthly) strike and multiplier ( here 1000 and 10)

Financial Power Option per day :  Notional per day (MWH) * MAX ( MIDC Power Price - Call strike, 0)
Call strike will be out of the money varying by month. They are also interested in zero strike products if available.

Quarterly Payoffs: Sum of the daily payoffs over the quarterly period.

Flow Index: Reported KCFS flow from Grand Coolee
Power Price Index: standard published day ahead prices for MIDC.

											
Sanjeev K Khanna				Email: 	Sanjeev.Khanna@enron.com
Director						Tel: 	(713) 853-3849
Enron Global Markets				Cell: 	(713) 594-1832
1400 Smith Street, Suite 3004F			Pager: 	(877) 497-1217
Houston TX 77002					Fax: 	(713) 646-3220
											

_

                                    

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Save in H:\Kobra\workspace

   

Paul, 

Here is the information that should be found at the end of the Services file: 
C:\WINNT\System32\Drivers\ETC\Services

Add the data after the last line it should look like this: 

knetd            2053/tcp                           #Kerberos de-multiplexor
man              9535/tcp                           #Remote Man Server  (Add data after this line)
#Reuters Kobra 3.5.1 license server entry
els_port	2100/tcp
els_port	2100/udp
ntdbu1	2400/tcp
# End of Reuters 3.5.1

Sonya L. Johnson
Enron Networks 
Market Data Analyst/IT
(713) 345-4540
sonya.johnson@enron.com

Please find the data as per our conversation yesterday.

 

											
Sanjeev K Khanna				Email: 	Sanjeev.Khanna@enron.com
Director						Tel: 	(713) 853-3849
Enron Global Markets				Cell: 	(713) 594-1832
1400 Smith Street, Suite 3004F			Pager: 	(877) 497-1217
Houston TX 77002					Fax: 	(713) 646-3220
											

_

Date:          September 27, 2001

		

Stewart, per your voice mail of September 25, attached is a chart
showing the approximate shutdown or curtailment dates for each of the
Northwest aluminum DSI's.

Attachment

Mike Junior will be doing EOL and curves.

Some South East Power infomation 
 
Industry notes on curtailments and closures

RandomLengths
09/27/2001

Plywood/OSB

Advanced Wood Resources, Brownsville, Ore., will cease all operations as of November 20. "Severe competition from the lower-priced OSB, combined with challenging economic conditions and rising costs associated with increased environmental standards," were cited as reasons for the closure.

Georgia-Pacific has announced plans to shut down nine plywood mills in the South for one week starting October 1 to replenish log supplies.

Hunt Forest Products will shut down its plywood mill in Natalbany, La., for one week starting October 1 due to tight log supplies.

LP has announced market-related downtime at most of its U.S. and Canadian OSB mills. Most of the mills will be down a minimum of one week, starting October 8. Plants in Sagola, Mich., and Jasper, Texas, will be down the week of October 1. Hayward, Wis., will be down the week of October 15. Carthage, Texas, will be down the week of September 24. And Silsbee, Texas, will be down the week of October 8 and for four to six weeks thereafter for a press rebuild.

Willamette Industries' plywood mill in Dodson, La., will shut down the week of September 24 for scheduled maintenance.

LUMBER

Harwood Products, Branscomb, Calif., has cut production by 20% due to market conditions

Weyerhaeuser will close its three Cedar sawmills in British Columbia for an indefinite duration beginning next week. Market conditions were cited.

Canadian Forest Products will reduce output at its sawmills in British Columbia and Alberta by an estimated 70 million board feet during October.

Abitibi Consolidated plans to cut production by about 25% at all of its sawmills over the next four weeks. "Market conditions and supplemental export costs" were cited as reasons for the curtailments.

Slocan Forest Products will reduce production by 30 million board feet by curtailing production the first week of October

For more information, visit RandomLengths <http://www.randomlengths.com/>

 
Roger Dieringer
Corporate Supply Manager - Energy
936.788.9759  Phone
936.524.0609  Cellular Phone
888.710-0640  Pager
 

The tragedy of Tuesday, September 11 will serve as an unforgettable reminder to people all over the world of what is truly important and of life's fragility.  My heartfelt sympathies go out to the families and friends of all the people whose lives were taken in this senseless and horrific attack.  I ask that all of you keep our deceased colleague Nick Humber and his family in your thoughts and prayers.  Tragically, Nick, a director with Enron Wind, was on one of the planes hijacked on Tuesday.
To help with relief efforts in New York and Washington, D.C., Enron will make a total contribution of $1 million dollars to be split equally between the American Red Cross and the New York Firefighters and Police Officers Fund.
Many of you have expressed an interest in more personal involvement and I want you to be aware of some of the options available.  I encourage you to support those impacted by this tragedy by donating to relief efforts, and to take advantage of our Matching Gift Program to double the impact of your individual donation.  Because of the significance of this tragic event, Enron will match your contribution 2 for 1.

How to Help
?  Please go to www.easymatch.com/enron. Once there, click on "Disaster Relief"  (located in the middle of the top of the page).  Please choose from the list of non-profits that are accepting donations to help with this effort.  Any donations made to aid with disaster relief will not be counted toward the annual $15,000 Matching Gift limit.   You will need your GIS number to do this (it begins with a 9).  If you are unsure of your GIS number, please contact the HR GIM helpdesk at 713-853-5666. 

?  We will have red, white and blue striped ribbons in Houston for employees to pin on their shirts in memory of those who lost their lives, in honor of those who survived, and for their families.  Donations to the New York Firefighters and Police Officers Fund and other organizations are being accepted in exchange for the ribbons.  Enron will also match these donations.  The  ribbons are available tomorrow from 9:00 - 11:00 a.m. at the InfoZone, which is located by the down escalator in the lobby.   For any other employees who would like to make donations, please go to the above website.  

?  Enron employees are generously giving blood, and we will continue to work with relief efforts to ensure that employees who want to give, have the ability to do so.  If you have questions, call 713-853-6100. 

?  President Bush has declared Friday a day of "National Prayer and Remembrance," and is calling on Americans to use their lunch breaks to go to places of worship to pray for victims and their families.   Following is a list of websites with additional information: 

o	<http://abclocal.go.com/ktrk/> 
o	<http://www.chron.com/content/community/religious/>
o	If you are looking for a service within walking distance of the Enron building, First United Methodist Church (corner of Main and Clay) and Antioch Missionary Baptist Church will hold prayer services on Friday.  First United Methodist Church will have services at 11:00 a.m., noon and 1:00 p.m.  Antioch Missionary Baptist Church will have a service at noon.  
o If you are interested in attending a service and don't work in this area, please check your local television websites for more information. 

?  For Houston employees, a citywide candlelight vigil will be held on the steps of City Hall in Downtown Houston at 7 p.m. tomorrow night.  Mayor Lee Brown will be speaking.  

?  At 10:00 a.m. (Central) on Monday, September 17th, in Enron facilities around the world, we will have a moment of silence in memory of  those whose lives have been tragically taken.  We ask that you put down the phone, turn away from your computer and dedicate a personal moment of silence together with your co-workers.  

?  We encourage all U.S. based employees to wear red, white or blue shirts on Monday.

For Counseling Assistance
?  For employees in Houston, we have an on-site employee assistance counselor in the building that you can reach by calling 713-853-6057.  If you are not located in Houston or if you or a family member would prefer an off-site counselor, you can call the 24-hour Employee Assistance Program number 1-800-345-1391. 

?  Employees outside the U.S. can also contact 713-853-6057 directly.  United HealthGroup (Enron's medical network administrator) has provided free access to their National Disaster Line for counseling service to any person.  That number is 800-268-1026.  We are also working to bring crisis counseling to any work location that has a need.

This is an agonizing time for our nation and it is hard for us all.  In addition to the financial and human support we are extending to those in need, it is imperative that we at Enron continue to safely and reliably serve our customers in the U.S. and around the world.  We know it is difficult but we must demonstrate on-going stability and strength at Enron, as this will serve as a signal that the ideals upon which America was founded cannot be diminished.  Again, our hearts go out to the families and friends of those who have lost loved ones in this tragedy.  Please continue to watch your e-mail for more information.

Tom thanks for getting back to me ... its great to have more alumni friends in the company.....  give me a call if you have any questions or interest in West Power.  Regards, Mike.

Hi, Mike,

I guess it must be somebody else with the same name. I just graduated (Dec'00), and in 1986 I was in London doing my undergraduate studies...

Sorry to disappoint you. Regards,

(Another) Tom Barkley

Hi Tom-

I'm with Enron in Portland, OR.  I graduated from Thunderbird in 1986  .... and went to school with a Tom Barkley ... Is that you or just the same name??? Please let me know.  Thanks. Mike Swerzbin 

I really appreicated the way you worked  with us.   You always did your best to get an answer quickly.  I'll miss you.  Thanks a lot for your good work.  Stay in touch -- you might want to come back to Portland some day.

I wanted to see if you could give us an update the screens for the traders and Mike Driscoll's phone.  When  should we expect them??

Report ID no. 2B266B6655BD4CEFA874

I don't think there are any receipts outstanding .. Could you please tell me which ones you're missing???  This last report had a receipt for everything.

Employee Name: Michael Swerzbin
Report Name:   Swerzbin, Mike  1/17/02
Report Date:   1/17/2002
Purpose:       Trip to Houston, TX, Meeting w/ UBS Warburg Management
Report ID:     2B266B6655BD4CEFA874
Submitted On:  1/17/2002
Report Total:  2112.45

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

Hi Tom-

I'm with Enron in Portland, OR.  I graduated from Thunderbird in 1986  .... and went to school with a Tom Barkley ... Is that you or just the same name??? Please let me know.  Thanks. Mike Swerzbin 

 I won't be able to make it  (rats!!!)

Kindly select one of the voting buttons above to let me know whether or not you will be coming to the company picnic this Saturday.  If you are planning to attend, please select the appropriate button for the number of family members who will be accompanying you. If your family cannot attend, you may bring a guest.
 
Thank you!
Anna
x3834

Here's a look at where the Aluminum Cos in the Northwest stand currently-  from our consultant
 

 

Date:          September 17, 2001

		

As we discussed during our September 7 meeting, attached is a matrix
showing the 10 Northwest Aluminum Direct Service Industries (DSI's).
Since the curtailment agreements BPA has with Alcoa and Columbia Falls
are confidential, am not privy to all their terms. However, I think the
overall status is pretty accurate.

We can use this chart in our October 8 meeting to discuss possible DSI
candidates for Enron services. Please let me know if you need any more
information.

Attachment

Hi John!!
 
Nice car photos.   Hey I have been thinking about some sponsors here are some ideas:  Krispy Kreme Donuts (national growing donut chain--everybody loves them), Calpine Energy, Duke Energy, New York Times (they deliver locally through-out the US), Starbucks Coffee (out of Seattle),  Southwest Airlines, Champion Sportswear, Columbia Sportswear, America OnLine, Home Depot,and I could come up with some more.  Do you like any of these for a last name??  John Krispy Kreme???  
 
Sounds like things are going well for you -- give me a call sometime.
Take Care,  Your good friend, Mike.

Hi Mike,
 
How is everything?
 
I know That you tried getting back to me a couple of weeks ago after I sent you the earlier email, and we just keep missing each other!
 
Things move fast over here, the race season is going OK and I've managed not to kill myself yet! We have had an offer of some sponsorship in the states to race in the Speedvision Touring Car championship, so far we've got about 30% of the $600,000 that we need. I am trying to get hold of the names of some companies in th US who sell to end users (Joe Public) and perhaps are not normally associated with racing, big retailers, that sort of thing. I was wondering if you had any idea's, all I need is about six or seven company names, I can research the rest over the internet and send them some proposals via email. If you have two minutes to email them to me that would be great.
 
Cheers
 
John
Hi Mike,
 
Well, I did it, got the deal to do BTCC Touring Cars, it has a similar profile here in the UK to Nascar, but is actually very closely related to The Speedvision Touring Car Championship in the US.
 
Here's me and my team-mate racing;

We are having a very good year, but would like to do it in the US in 2002, can you give me a call on either 01625 520997 or my cell phone which is 07710 769289, I'd like to pick your brains on a couple of things. Can you believe people actually line up to get my autograph!!!! how weird is that?! Hope the family are well and look forward to talking to you soon.
 
John B&Q (it's a long story...but I changed my name AGAIN to match the sponsors name, so that when the commentary team on the TV talk about me....they advertise the sponsors brand!) 

 
Hi Mike,
 
How is everything?
 
I know That you tried getting back to me a couple of weeks ago after I sent you the earlier email, and we just keep missing each other!
 
Things move fast over here, the race season is going OK and I've managed not to kill myself yet! We have had an offer of some sponsorship in the states to race in the Speedvision Touring Car championship, so far we've got about 30% of the $600,000 that we need. I am trying to get hold of the names of some companies in th US who sell to end users (Joe Public) and perhaps are not normally associated with racing, big retailers, that sort of thing. I was wondering if you had any idea's, all I need is about six or seven company names, I can research the rest over the internet and send them some proposals via email. If you have two minutes to email them to me that would be great.
 
Cheers
 
John
Hi Mike,
 
Well, I did it, got the deal to do BTCC Touring Cars, it has a similar profile here in the UK to Nascar, but is actually very closely related to The Speedvision Touring Car Championship in the US.
 
Here's me and my team-mate racing;

We are having a very good year, but would like to do it in the US in 2002, can you give me a call on either 01625 520997 or my cell phone which is 07710 769289, I'd like to pick your brains on a couple of things. Can you believe people actually line up to get my autograph!!!! how weird is that?! Hope the family are well and look forward to talking to you soon.
 
John B&Q (it's a long story...but I changed my name AGAIN to match the sponsors name, so that when the commentary team on the TV talk about me....they advertise the sponsors brand!) 

   foxsports-nba-knicks,mov

   

you gotta help me out, it does't work.

if you cant view this let me know and i can come over and do some tricks to make it work.

 << File: Fox Sports - NBA - Knicks.mov >> 

if you cant view this let me know and i can come over and do some tricks to make it work.

 

Mike,
Here is Idaho's annual football pool....weekly and yearly prizes...if
you have any problems signing up, give Me or Churchlady a call!!
Good Luck
Dave

You have been invited to join FATDOGTRADER's private 
NFL Standard Pool called POWERPOOL at officefootballpool.com.

In order to join the pool, go to http://www.officefootballpool.com,
log in (or join if you aren't a member), and then choose Pools - Join a
Pool.
Then when prompted, enter the following information:

Pool ID#: 3583
Password: IDACORP

Good luck and thanks for choosing officefootballpool.com!

I don't think there are any receipts outstanding .. Could you please tell me which ones you're missing???  This last report had a receipt for everything.

Employee Name: Michael Swerzbin
Report Name:   Swerzbin, Mike  1/17/02
Report Date:   1/17/2002
Purpose:       Trip to Houston, TX, Meeting w/ UBS Warburg Management
Report ID:     2B266B6655BD4CEFA874
Submitted On:  1/17/2002
Report Total:  2112.45

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

Hi 
Chris I'm sitting in the second row with the 4-panel Bloomberg screen  (next to Belden)... drop by.

Hi Mike, I'm looking for some general numbers regarding the basis and wheeling costs from mid Columbia to Montana.  Are you the person I should be going to on this?  I'm looking for some numbers to get me from today thru 2024.  If you can provide me any length of time in this range it would be greatly appreciated.  Thanks,

Chris Mumm

503.464.8862
503.464.3740 (fax)		

Mike,

Here's the URL to the driver. I sent it via instant message but that probably won't help since you need to get the url to your house. So I figure you could forward this email to your email account that you can access from home like yahoo or hotmail or whatever you use at home.

Hope this helps.

http://www.hp.com/itrc_pdi/itrc/swindex/hp_deskjet_840_842_843_series_en.html

Jeffrey Oh

Mike Driscoll will be responding to pricing and doing EOL and curves.

I'll be on  my cell phone (if it works at Waldo Lake).  Driscoll will make  EOL market

"1"

We are in the process of confirming that all traders are set up correctly and ready to trade when the system goes live. 

We need to make sure that your Stack Managers are accessing the correct database. In order to do this, we need to know how you access Stack Manager:

1) Through Terminal Server (the one that opens up a desktop within a desktop and it actually appears that you have two Start buttons). 
or
2) By opening the Stack Manager directly from your "native" desktop.

Please reply to this message with either a corresponding "1" or a "2" in the subject field.

If you're not sure which one you have, please contact myself x39673, Teresa Mandola x39807 or Jennifer McQuade x53614 and we'll come by your desk to help you.

Thank you,

Dan Diamond

PEAK					
Mid-C					
Month	Price				
	PEAK	OFF_PEAK			
					
					
					
Oct-01	    52.00 	Oct-01		    38.00 	
Nov-01	    52.00 	Nov-01		    38.00 	
Dec-01	    69.00 	Dec-01		    50.00 	
Jan-02	    63.00 	Jan-02		    47.00 	
Feb-02	    56.00 	Feb-02		    43.00 	
Mar-02	    39.00 	Mar-02		    35.00 	
Apr-02	    39.00 	Apr-02		    25.00 	
May-02	    34.00 	May-02		    23.00 	
Jun-02	    42.00 	Jun-02		    27.00 	
Jul-02	    58.00 	Jul-02		    47.00 	
Aug-02	    78.00 	Aug-02		    53.00 	
Sep-02	    62.00 	Sep-02		    40.00 	

I believe Chris Calger has lined up a corporate jet out of Portland....

Mike, 
Were you planning on attending the Enron Americas Management Offsite?
If so do you want me to make the travel arrangements?

Jill

The Enron Americas Management Offsite has been scheduled for August 16-19, 2001 in Beaver Creek, Colorado.
Charter aircraft will be available between Houston and Eagle/Vail Airport - flight itinerary is listed below:
Thursday, August 16 - 5:00pm departure from Enron Aviation at George Bush Intercontinental Airport (arriving in Eagle/Vail at approximately 6:00pm)
Sunday, August 19 - 9:00am departure from Eagle/Vail Airport (arriving at Enron Aviation at approximately 12:00pm)

You have the option of flying into Houston and taking this charter flight or you can work with your local travel agent to obtain personal travel into either Denver International or Eagle/Vail.  Enron will provide ground transportation from both airports.  Flights into Eagle/Vail are very limited during the summer months.  Driving time from Denver to Beaver Creek is approximately 2 1/2 hours and approximately 35 minutes from Eagle/Vail to Beaver Creek.

Once travel has been confirmed, please provide me with a copy of your itinerary so I can secure the proper ground transportation.

Please let me know if I can be of assistance or if you have any questions.
Thanks.

Dorie Hitchcock
Event Manager
Enron
1400 Smith Street
Suite 3640a
Houston, TX  77002
Telephone:  (713) 853-6978
Fax:  (713) 646-5800
Cell:  (713) 594-7093
E-Mail:  dorie.hitchcock@enron.com

> For a BridgeNews update on the status of power plants that are proposed
> and being built, click: 
> http://news.bridge.com/commodities/BridgePower073001.pdf
> 
> 	For a .pdf version of this information, contained in the free
> BridgeNews Electricity Week, double-click: 
 <<BridgePower073001.pdf>> 

> 	You are receiving this message because you have given your consent
> to a representative of BridgeNews (www.bridge.com).
> 	TO BE REMOVED from this mailing list, send an email with your full
> name in the body of the message to: pamela.conway@bridge.com
> 
> 
> 

ITINERARY CONFIRMATION FOR HELENA SWERZBIN 30AUG

DATE 20JULY01
                                           AGENT PK/PK BOOKING REF YMQ27M
 
 
  ENRON CORP                               SWERZBIN/MICHAEL
                                           ENRON NORTH AMERICA
                                           3WTC 0306
                                           INTEROFFICE ETKT RCPT
                                           ETKT RECEIPT
 
SERVICE               DATE  FROM           TO             DEPART  ARRIVE
 
AMERICA WEST AIRLINES 30AUG PORTLAND OR    PHOENIX AZ     554A    830A
HP 202     B          THU   INTERNATIONAL  SKY HARBOR INT
                                           TERMINAL 4
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         2:36 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-300
                            SEAT 09B NO SMOKING CONFIRMED
 
AMERICA WEST AIRLINES 30AUG PHOENIX AZ     SANTA FE NM    901A    1140A
HP 6801    B          THU   SKY HARBOR INT
                            TERMINAL 4
                                                          NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         1:39 DURATION
                            FLIGHT OPERATED BY AIR MIDWEST DBA AMERIC
            AIRCRAFT OWNER: ZV  AIR MIDWEST
                  AIRCRAFT: BEECHCRAFT 1900/1900C/1900D
                            SEAT 07A NO SMOKING CONFIRMED
 
AMERICA WEST AIRLINES 02SEP SANTA FE NM    PHOENIX AZ     525P    609P
HP 6808    B          SUN                  SKY HARBOR INT
                                           TERMINAL 4
                                                          NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         1:44 DURATION
                            FLIGHT OPERATED BY AIR MIDWEST DBA AMERIC
            AIRCRAFT OWNER: ZV  AIR MIDWEST
                  AIRCRAFT: BEECHCRAFT 1900/1900C/1900D
                            SEAT 05A NO SMOKING CONFIRMED
 
AMERICA WEST AIRLINES 02SEP PHOENIX AZ     PORTLAND OR    650P    930P
HP 794     B          SUN   SKY HARBOR INT INTERNATIONAL
                            TERMINAL 4
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         2:40 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-300
                            SEAT 16B NO SMOKING CONFIRMED
               THIS IS A NON-REFUNDABLE FARE THAT REQUIRES
               TRAVEL ON THESE SPECIFIC DATES AND FLIGHTS.
               ANY CHANGES WILL RESULT IN A PENALTY AND/OR
                         ADDITIONAL COLLECTION.
           **************************************************
         YOUR TICKET REFLECTS A NEGOTIATED DISCOUNT FROM THE TAP
              THE PUBLISHED FARE FOR THIS TICKET IS $449.00
           **************************************************
 
MISCELLANEOUS         31DEC HOUSTON TX
                      MON   ** THANK YOU FOR USING THE TAP **
 
RESERVATION NUMBER(S)  HP/T3J43O
 
SWERZBIN/HELENA  S0C0413R1059            TICKET:HP/ETKT 401 7029707050
 
*******************************************
INTL TVLRS: CARRY SOS WALLET CARD W/ENRON ASSISTANCE INFO
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:IN U.S 800 523-6586
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:INTL 215 245-4707 (COLLECT)
*********************************************
THIS IS THE PASSENGER RECEIPT FOR YOUR ELECTRONIC TICKET.
PLEASE CHECK-IN WITH PHOTO IDENTIFICATION AND WITH
EITHER (1) THIS RECEIPT OR (2) YOUR CONFIRMATION NUMBER.
YOUR ETKT CONFIRMATION NUMBER IS: T 3 J 4 3 O
ALL FARES ARE SUBJECT TO CHANGE UNTIL TICKETED/PURCHASED 

I was just checking to make sure we are ticketed for the Aug 30  --returning 9/2??? Please let me know.   Thanks- Mike

I should be here -- Muni Man.   Thanks..

Jeff Fuller will be in town on August 3rd 12:00 to discuss information exchange.  Let me know if you are available.

Stewart

Glenn-

I really have no interest in Lewis River or Klamath since there is zero correlation to the Columbia flows....  However, I'll offer the whole deal at $3 million per year with the hair if they're insistent.  Or we'll do any power options the weather desk wants.

Where do we stand on this? I sent Sanjeev some Asian Option Pricing last week; I get the sense he wants to pursue the original stream flow structure (one which were not comfortable with). Let me know what our commercial position is. Thanks

Glenn:

How is the pricing for the stream flow going?

Please let me know,

Sanjeev 

This is what the broker has --  I wonder if you could check it out and see if it's regulated flow or not.  Also we can use whatever proxy we want if you have any suggestions. 

 
Charts for today's meeting are attached:

 

 

 

Scott Freeman
Enron Summer Analyst
West Power Trading Desk
Work: 503-464-3911
Portland Cell: 503-701-1163
Austin Cell: 512-294-7692
Home: 503-236-6204

Pleasure to have spoken with you last night concerning your interest in
arranging for 7-10,000 sf of office space.  Will be pleased to represent
your organization in this effort.  I will have the Pre-Lease Planning
questionnaire delivered to you this morning.  Please let me know what time
works for you on Monday.   Look forward to working on your behalf. M

Mike Holzgang
Senior Vice President
Colliers International
Direct: 503.499.0055
Fax: 503.227.2447

Michael.Holzgang@colliers.com
www.colliers.com/portland

I'll be out this Thursday and Friday- Mike Driscoll will handle EOL & curves-  Have a great 4th!!!!

Please transfer $100,000 from LTNW to "origination"  this is for Laird's work on a long-term City of Santa Clara (NP-15)  deal done 4/18/01.

Dick:

Kimberly Hundl will be forwarding certificates for the Transaction (Trade Date: 6/12/01) which we request be executed by Randy L. Berggren, General Manager/Secretary.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Thank you for your assistance.

Sara Shackleton
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street, EB3801a
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  (713)853-5620
Fax: (713)646-3490

Jill could you try 7/5 to 7/7 or 7/12 to 7/14 for Mike and my trip to Calgary.

Hey,
No problem on the tickets, I just need to know when you would like to change them for and they will charge us about a $100 a ticket.   So if you can let me know by tomorrow and I will get it taken care of.  

Thanks, Jill

http://biz.yahoo.com/prnews/010614/flth004.html

The hotel's no is 011-52-144-34444  --  Talk to Raul  in reservations-- he says there still rooms available  (mostly garden views-- but it's still the place to go)

Kim below are the websites to book the hotel, Melia San Lucas-- I'd like room #502-  we also would like a suite for evening get togethers with the whole group.  Thanks.
 
I believe this is the best choice-  Great hotel, close to town with golf, tennis, fishing right there.   The rooms are great and the beach is awesome.  Check it out!!!  Let me know what you think and we'll book it.

http://www.mexicotravelnet.com/loscabos/hotels/meliasanlucas.htm

http://www.cabofishingvacations.com/melia.htm

This is the info.-  Kim Hillis is making the reservations (I hope there are rooms available this late)    A couple guys here have stayed there and said it's awesome.  With a great beach, close to town and golf. There's jet skis and boats right there.  I'm up for chartering a a catamaran for snorkeling and cruisin' all day.

http://www.mexicotravelnet.com/loscabos/hotels/meliasanlucas.htm

http://www.cabofishingvacations.com/melia.htm
When you get a chance, would you send the accomodation info over to us east power boys.  

Thanks, 

Dana, Fletch, Rob

I believe this is the best choice-  Great hotel, close to town with golf, tennis, fishing right there.   The rooms are great and the beach is awesome.  Check it out!!!  Let me know what you think and we'll book it.

http://www.mexicotravelnet.com/loscabos/hotels/meliasanlucas.htm

http://www.cabofishingvacations.com/melia.htm

I'll be in Calgary Thrs. June 21 & 22.. 

Please see the details below regarding the West Power Trading PRC meeting for Staff, Specialists, Senior Specialists, Analysts and Associates.

Date:		Thursday, June 21, 2001
Time:		11:00 am to ????
Place:		Marriott Hotel, Salmon Room

If you are unable to attend, please let me know.  

Thanks!
Amy

Mikey all our fundies stuff is still locked down ...  try these web-sites:  Powerlytix.com and Friedwired.com (pw: enron, enron).  Next week we'll open the stuff back up ... I'm guessing exports to be close 3,000 MWs into Cal  through the Spring run-off  then up to 5,000 MW thru July  (on average about 4,250 MW) then dropping in Aug and Sept back to 2,500.   

Do you have an outage calendar for 2002?

Grigs

I'm in for a chair- Thanks- (how did you end doing asset sales & HR??)

We will be selling the old desk chairs to employees for $25.00.  If you are interested in purchasing a non-Aeron chair currently on the floor, please let me know by close of business, Monday, June 4.  On Tuesday morning, we will hold a drawing to allocate the available chairs.  

Just a reminder - we will be replacing desk chairs after 2:00 pm on Monday, June 4 and Tuesday, June 5.  If you are happy with your current chair and do not wish to have it replaced or have special requests, please let me know as soon as possible.  Please disregard if you have already responded.

Thanks!
Amy

Mike and Helen,
Thanks very much for attending my mother's service.  Sydney and I are sorry
we did not get to spend more time with you during my time in Portland.  I
will make sure to contact you next time I am coming into town.  I have
enclosed a residency newsletter I sent out to all of the faculty and
resident's summarizing my eulogy to my mother.  I thought it would be useful
as an educational tool as we all unfortunately have to go through this at
some point.  Please feel free to share it with whomever you wish.  One of
the things I have learned the most through all of this is the importance of
sharing.  Take care.

I want to thank everyone who has written to me via mail or E-mail regarding
the recent death of my mother.  This has been a growth experience for me.
Although I am emotionally devastated, I have learned a tremendous amount
about life in the last few weeks and months.  Since this topic is one we all
must face at some time in our lives, I thought sharing some of this would be
helpful for myself and also for those of you who have either faced it in the
past or will in the future.  It is really a tribute to my mother (a former
schoolteacher), as this was her last lesson for me.  The following is a
summary of my eulogy to her at her memorial service 4/18/01.

What I Learned:  Reflections on my Mother's Life

	1.	True Love:  My mother and I had a volatile relationship
during part of my life.  Like many people, I was very self-centered during
my late teens and most of my twenties.  I did well in my professional life,
but I was not very giving in my relationships (either girlfriends or
family).  My mother was not shy to point out her disappointment with these
behaviors and we had many heated discussions during that time period.  I
have noticed that many friends have had volatile relationships with their
closest parent.  I have learned that true love is about passion for the
other person.  One cannot be silent when you believe changes need to be
made.  Some of the hard times draw you even closer later in life.
Ultimately, my mother was right.  I am very proud of my 30s and grateful
that she was able to witness my maturation as a person.

	2.	Grief:  Of course, I have learned a lot about grief.  Grief
is 90% about you.  In the last few days of her life, there were many tears.
Almost all were mine.  My mother had accepted her fate and had a strong
Christian faith.  She was primarily worried about the effect her death would
have on my sister and I.  The vacant spot in your heart and life cannot be
measured.  It will be a wound that cannot heal as you progress in your life
and cannot directly share it with your loved one.  It will come in waves
triggered by various thoughts and activities, as if it was a neurologic
disorder.  All I can say as comfort to those who have not experienced it is
this:  When the unthinkable happens and you lose what you cannot bear to
consider losing, your life is permanently changed.  However, not all of the
changes will be towards the abyss of permanent melancholy that you assume
will occur.  There will be growth and understanding.  There will be
spiritual and emotional opportunity.  Friends and family will step up to the
plate for you.  (More on this later).

	3.	Role Models:  Like most young boys, my idols as a child were
the typical sport stars, people who did larger than life things that I had
never met.  I tried to pursue the usual goals of the young American male.  I
wanted to be physically attractive, well rounded and intelligent, and
economically prosperous.  I wanted to "have it all".  As I grow older, my
definition for "having it all" has changed.  My father is an incredible man.
He lost his left arm at the shoulder in a hunting accident age twelve.
Despite this, he did everything a person with two arms could do, and
sometimes even better.  My friends looked at him as an incredible
inspiration.  I did not pay as much attention to my mother's attributes.
She was simply an incredible giving person.  The unfortunates, the lonely,
the downtrodden never went unnoticed by my mother.  She cultivated friends
and family like a good farmer cultivates crops.  The rewards of this became
obvious to me as I spent more time with her in the last few years.  People
visited her constantly.  People called about her constantly.  People did
things for her constantly.  People prayed for her and loved her constantly.
I never would have thought that as I approach 40, my most important role
model would be a frail woman who spent a lot of time in a wheel chair.  I
will never be the same after going through this with her.  For that, I will
always be grateful.

	4.	Glass Half Full Person:  My favorite quote from my mother is
"I am having a good day".  This was what I always heard when I would phone
her to check on her which I did daily the last year.  For my mom, seeing a
nice arrangement of flowers, visiting with a relative or neighbor, these
were the things that made life grand.  As one gets busier and busier, I
think one tends to become a glass half empty person more and more.
Accomplishments just lead to more deadlines.  The focus is on what you don't
have rather than what you have.  Perspective can become fatally altered.  I
notice the flowers more, the kindness I see more, the sights and smells of
the world more, and appreciate the life I have built more rather than
focusing on the life I want to build.  This is probably the most important
lesson my mother taught me.

	5.	Caregivers:  As a person in the medical profession, I
witness care giving every day.  However, until you have participated in it
yourself, particularly with a loved one, you have not really lived.  The
intimacy you get with the person who you make meals for, wash for, and help
with ADLs is not describable.  You develop little rituals that you look
forward to as much as the person you do it for.  It takes a special type of
person to do this kind of work full-time.  Those moments with my mother will
sustain me the rest of my life no matter what happens to me.

	6.	Priorities:  We all think everything we do is the most
important thing on this planet.  Going through this, I realize that nothing
is more important in your life than your family.  Dr. Krupski said it best
when I came into his office in tears several times needing to go home to be
with my mother this last year.  He said "Ten years from now, you will not
remember what paper you wrote, what operation you did, what talk you gave.
But, you will always remember and treasure the time with your mother.  Go
home."  He was right, and I will never be able to repay him for the ability
to spend time with her.

	7.	Friendships/Neighbors:  As I stated, my mother was excellent
at cultivating these relationships.  It is really not rocket science, it
just requires your time and being open.  I was amazed that she kept contact
with 8 friends from high school (50 years) till the day of her death.  They
would get together regularly.  In the modern world, this is very unusual.
Perhaps it is because we all have distorted priorities.  In addition, she
had a very tight bond with her neighbors.  I remember we had all of the
neighbor kids playing at our house regularly because of the size of our
yard.  One day a boy broke his leg (clearly an immediate lawsuit today), but
that did not stop the neighborhood kids.  My mother was on hospice months
before she officially went on the list.  It was the neighborhood hospice.
They would drive her places, fix her plumbing, and mow her lawn, all for
free.  They would bring food, come visit, and share their lives with her.
It was an incredible thing to see.

	8.	Courage:  My mother spent the last 30 months of her life
with an hematocrit between 15 and 25.  She rarely complained.  She mustered
the strength in the last year to attend my sister's wedding, her high school
reunion, and shop for holidays and decorate the house for Christmas.  She
went to restaurants with friends.  A month before her death she went to
lunch with me twice, went on a trip to a local waterfall, and went shopping
at the local center.  She did all of this with a hematocrit of 17.
Seventeen is the number I will always remember when I am tired and wishing I
could sleep but the life and job I have requires my time.

	9.	Acceptance:  How does one learn to live with the
unthinkable?  Well, I have come to understand many things.  The worst part
of chronic illness is watching your loved one slowly fade over time.
However, they are so miserable at the end that having them leave is more
acceptable.  My mother had a tremendous faith, and I know she is in a better
place.  I have changed as a person based on the above reflections, and I
understand that part of her will always live on through my life and actions.
It is a time of great emotion, but also great opportunity.  Many friends and
family come out to support you, which allow a chance to reunite past
relationships with others.  My sister and I have become very close through
all of this.  That would make my mother proud and happy.   Memorial services
and the like are all about celebration of life.  There are tears, but most
of remembrance is the honor of sharing the person's life.  I know my mother
more now than I ever did.  I have 2.5 hours of her on video to share with my
future children so they can know her too.  I am the product of two
schoolteachers.  They were awesome teachers and not surprisingly awesome
parents.  Much of what we are comes from those that raised us.  I did not
understand that before.  I do now.

Thanks for allowing me to share some of my mother's life with you.
Hopefully it will be as meaningful to you reading it as it was to me writing
it.

Mark R. Nehler, M.D.
Assistant Professor
Vascular Surgery Section
University of Colorado Health Sciences Center
4200 East Ninth Avenue, #5521
Denver CO 81262-0312
303-315-6489
Mark.Nehler@UCHSC.edu

Driscoll will do EOL & curves-- I'll be available on the cell

Mike Driscoll will be taking care of the curves and any pricing requests.  Have a great weekend!!!!

The last two paycheck I've received have been wrong.  They do not include the deferral portion of my contract-- it's $1,606 per pay period.  It should show up under earnings.   Could you please help me get this straightened out?  I can easily show us the error.  Thanks, Mike. 

   BY MARK GOLDEN                                                               
   A DOW JONES NEWSWIRES COLUMN                                                 
                                                                                
   NEW YORK (DOW JONES)--THE CALIFORNIA SENATE IN SACRAMENTO PASSED A           
WINDFALL-PROFITS TAX ON SALES OF ELECTRICITY INTO THE STATE'S WHOLESALE         
ELECTRICITY MARKET MONDAY AFTERNOON AT 4:50 P.M. PDT. AT ALMOST EXACTLY THE SAME
TIME, CALIFORNIA INDEPENDENT SYSTEM OPERATOR INITIATED ROLLING BLACKOUTS FOR THE
FIRST TIME SINCE MARCH.                                                         
   COINCIDENCE? PROBABLY, BUT THE CONNECTION SHOULDN'T BE IGNORED.              
   "THE POLICY DECISIONS THAT HAVE BEEN ADOPTED IN CALIFORNIA TO DATE HAVE      
ACCELERATED AN ALREADY SERIOUS MARKET COLLAPSE," SAID A HARVARD UNIVERSITY STUDY
OF CALIFORNIA'S ENERGY CRISIS LATE LAST MONTH.                                  
   THIS WEEK'S WINDFALL-PROFITS TAX BILL IS THE LATEST BLUNT INSTRUMENT WIELDED 
WITH POTENTIALLY DISASTROUS RESULTS. GOV. GRAY DAVIS WANTED IT AS A STICK WHEN  
                                                                          (CONT)
MEETING WITH EXECUTIVES FROM THE STATE'S MERCHANT POWER COMPANIES WEDNESDAY. THE
MANEUVER WAS LESS THAN ADROIT, AND THE GENERATORS WEREN'T IMPRESSED.            
   AFTER THE MEETING WITH DAVIS, RELIANT ENERGY'S (REI) JOHN STOUT SAID THAT IF 
THE TAX WERE IMPLEMENTED IN CALIFORNIA, IT WOULD "INSTANTLY BLACK OUT ALL THE   
GENERATION IN THE STATE."                                                       
   THE STATE'S LEADERS MIGHT KEEP IN MIND WHO WIELDS THE BIGGER STICK AT THIS   
POINT. CALIFORNIA SET UP A MARKET IN WHICH SELLERS HAVE BEEN ABLE TO CHARGE VERY
HIGH PRICES FOR ELECTRICITY SINCE SUPPLIES STARTED GETTING TIGHT A YEAR AGO.    
SELLERS SAY THEY HAVE PLAYED BY THE RULES THEY WERE GIVEN, AND NOBODY HAS PROVED
OTHERWISE WITH THE ONE EXCEPTION OF A FINE PAID BY WILLIAMS COMPANIES (WMB) FOR 
ONE PARTICULAR INSTANCE OF VIOLATING A CONTRACT.                                
   "IT'S LIKE SOMEBODY INVENTED A NEW GAME, INVITED YOU OVER TO PLAY AND THEN   
CHANGED THE RULES A COUPLE OF TIMES IN THE MIDDLE OF THE GAME. THEN, AFTER YOU  
BEAT THEM, THEY INSIST YOU CHEATED," SAID ONE WESTERN ENERGY TRADER.            
   ALMOST EVERY ATTEMPT BY THE BUY SIDE - THE UTILITIES, THE ISO AND NOW THE    
                                                                          (CONT)
STATE TREASURY - TO LOWER PRICES HAS RESULTED IN HIGHER PRICES OR BLACKOUTS OR  
BOTH. THE WINDFALL-PROFITS TAX IDEA IS THE MOST RECENT EXAMPLE, BUT THOSE WHO   
INSIST ON PRICE CAPS SHOULD KEEP THIS IN MIND: THE ISO HAS HAD PRICE CAPS SINCE 
IT BEGAN OPERATION MORE THAN THREE YEARS AGO. OBVIOUSLY, PRICE CAPS HAVEN'T     
WORKED, JUST AS THEY HAVE NEVER WORKED EXCEPT DURING WARTIME.                   
   IN FACT, PRICE CAPS HAVE BEEN A QUESTIONABLE MEDICINE PRESCRIBED FOR THE     
WRONG DISEASE. AT BEST, PRICE CAPS MIGHT RESTRICT PRICE SPIKES. CALIFORNIA'S    
PROBLEM IS PERPETUAL HIGH PRICES. IT CAN'T AFFORD THE GOING RATE AT NIGHTTIME,  
LET ALONE THE HIGHER MARKET PRICES DURING THE AFTERNOONS IN A HEATWAVE.         
   CALIFORNIA MUST FIGURE OUT HOW TO PLAY BETTER THE GAME IT INVENTED. THE      
INSANELY COMPLICATED COMPUTER-BASED PURCHASING OF POWER ENDED A FEW MONTHS AGO, 
AFTER THE CALIFORNIA POWER EXCHANGE WAS CLOSED DOWN BY FEDERAL REGULATORS AND   
THE ISO LOST ITS FINANCIAL ABILITY TO BUY POWER. THE MATCH BETWEEN THE PROGRAMS 
AND THE ENERGY TRADERS WASN'T EXACTLY IBM'S "BIG BLUE" VERSUS GARRY KASPAROV.   
   ALMOST EVERYONE IN THE MARKET AGREES THAT THE UTILITIES' HUMAN TRADERS COULD 
                                                                          (CONT)
HAVE BOUGHT NEEDED POWER FOR BILLIONS OF DOLLARS LESS THAN THE PROGRAMS THAT THE
UTILITIES WERE REQUIRED TO USE BY STATE LAW.                                    
   SINCE THE DEMISE OF PROGRAMMED PURCHASING, THE COMPUTERS HAVE BEEN REPLACED  
BY HUMANS, BUT WITHOUT MUCH BETTER RESULTS. THE TEAM ASSEMBLED TO BUY TENS OF   
MILLIONS OF DOLLARS WORTH OF SPOT POWER EVERY DAY CONSISTS MOSTLY OF FORMER     
EMPLOYEES OF THE POWER EXCHANGE AND ISO, AS WELL AS EXPENSIVE CONSULTANTS WITH  
NO ENERGY TRADING EXPERIENCE. ONE OF THE LEADERS OF THE TRADING TEAM, FOR       
EXAMPLE, IS A FORMER PUBLIC RELATIONS DIRECTOR FOR THE POWER EXCHANGE WITH NO   
TRADING EXPERIENCE PRIOR TO THE CURRENT JOB.                                    
   AS ONE ISO EMPLOYEE WAS WONT TO SAY: "IT'S LIKE WATCHING A FOOTBALL GAME     
BETWEEN NOTRE DAME AND ST. MARY'S SCHOOL FOR UNWED MOTHERS."                    
   AND THE SIGNING OF TENS OF BILLIONS OF DOLLARS OF FIVE- AND 10-YEAR CONTRACTS
IS BEING EXECUTED MAINLY BY FORMER EXECUTIVES OF SOUTHERN CALIFORNIA EDISON -   
PEOPLE THAT LEFT THE UTILITY YEARS AGO TO BECOME CONSULTANTS AND ALSO DON'T HAVE
TRADING EXPERIENCE.                                                             
   GOOD IDEAS, MEANWHILE, HAVE LANGUISHED.                                (CONT)
   "WE ARE GOING TO INSTALL METERS IN EVERY MAJOR COMMERCIAL CONCERN IN THE     
STATE THIS SUMMER AND GO TO REAL-TIME PRICING," DAVIS TOLD WALL STREET ANALYSTS 
ON FEB. 28.                                                                     
   THAT PROPOSAL WAS GREETED BY MANY OBSERVERS AS THE MOST CONSTRUCTIVE IDEA    
FROM THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE TO DATE.                                             
   WHAT HAS HAPPENED TO REAL-TIME PRICING FOR CALIFORNIA'S BIG BUSINESSES SINCE 
THEN? NOTHING.                                                                  
   "THE PROBLEM IS THAT EVERYBODY IN CALIFORNIA IS 'SPECIAL'," SAID STANFORD    
ECONOMIST AND CALIFORNIA ISO CONSULTANT FRANK WOLAK. EVERY INDUSTRY FROM OIL    
REFINERS TO INTERNET SERVER FARMS HAS HAD LOBBYISTS IN SACRAMENTO SUCCESSFULLY  
SECURING EXCEPTIONS TO THE RULE.                                                
   "MY POINT HAS BEEN THAT IF WHAT THEY DO IS SO VALUABLE, THEN THEY SHOULD BE  
ABLE TO HANDLE THE HIGHER PRICES. BUSINESSES WITH ABOUT 10,000 MEGAWATTS OF LOAD
HAVE REAL-TIME METERS. EVERY ONE OF THEM SHOULD BE GETTING MARKET PRICES," SAID 
WOLAK.                                                                          
                                                                          (CONT)
   ONE OF THE GREATEST ADVANTAGES THAT SELLERS OF ELECTRICITY TO CALIFORNIA HAVE
HAD IS THAT CONSUMERS HAVE FIXED PRICES, SO DEMAND IS INFLEXIBLE. SELLERS KNOW  
EXACTLY HOW MUCH ELECTRICITY THE UTILITIES MUST BUY BASED ON TEMPERATURES AND   
THE TIME OF DAY, WOLAK SAYS, AND THEY SIMPLY SUPPLY THE MARKET JUST ENOUGH POWER
AT HIGH MARGINAL PRICES.                                                        
   REDUCING OVERALL CONSUMPTION THROUGH HIGHER RATES WILL HELP THE STATE SOME,  
BUT MAKING 25% OF DEMAND FLEXIBLE BASED ON PRICE WOULD GIVE THE STATE A FIGHTING
CHANCE IN THE MARKET, ACCORDING TO WOLAK.                                       
   BUT THAT, APPARENTLY, IS TOO COMPLICATED OR POLITICALLY DIFFICULT. PRICE     
CAPS, A WINDFALL-PROFITS TAX AND POLITICAL PATRONAGE JOBS FOR BUYING BILLIONS OF
DOLLARS OF POWER MAY NOT SAVE THE STATE FROM BANKRUPTCY, BUT THEY ARE EASIER TO 
SELL - OR SLIP THROUGH - IN SACRAMENTO.                                         
   -BY MARK GOLDEN, DOW JONES NEWSWIRES; 201-938-4604; MARK.GOLDEN@DOWJONES.COM 
                                                

for Mike Driscoll:  Matt Motley,  Mark Fisher, Sean Crandall,  Heather Dunton, Jeffrey Oh,  
for Myself:	Sean Crandall, Tim Belden,  Greg Wolfe, Tom Alonso, Matt Motley

watch your back on this one....03/04 np combo was 52.50/58 ees on the offer
yesterday...let me know if you want to look at it  cal 03 pv 59/65.

ed

 - twin spires.JPG 

Swerzbin & Motley agreement proposed modifications:
 
 
Page 1,  first paragraph, last sentence,  CHANGE:  ? , for any reason, either the employee or the Company in their discretion. ?
 
Section 1. c., CHANGE:  On or within five business days from  the date ?.
                 d., CHANGE:  On or within five business days from  the date ?.
 
Page 2. & 3, Section 8, ADD:  Except for disclosures required by law, to my attorney and C.P.A., and if the information is readily known to the public (such as customers, investors, etc.).
 
Page 3, section 9., ADD:  If terminated without cause, the non-competition obligations will not be in effect.  INSERT or CHANGE:  Scope of the non-competition obligations cover and are limited to Western U.S. power trading.
 
Page 4,  section 10., first sentence, INSERT: ? under this Agreement, provided the employee is not terminated without cause, you will not ?
 
            Section 11., CHANGE first sentence to:  For a period of 12 months following the commencement , providing the employee is not terminated without cause, you will not  ?.
 
 
 

Section: 12.0 

ADD: Company agrees to give employee 30 days written notice for termination of employment without cause.
 
Section: 16.0
REPLACE: "and you shall not be entitled to further salary or bonus compensation from such Enron entity as of that date"
WITH:   "and you shall not be entitled to further salary, except accrued, or bonus compensation from such Enron entity as of that date"
 
Exhibit I:
ADD: If employee is terminated without cause, the sign-on award shall be deemed fully vested and non-forfeitable.
 
 
Miscellaneous:
 
We need a written statement from Enron releasing employee from ALL obligations under preexisting contracts including but not limited to non-competition agreements as well as any claims against retention or performance bonuses. 
 
Location: ADD: Company cannot relocate the employee outside of Portland, OR during the term of this agreement without consent of employee.
.  
ADD TO AGREEMENT:
 
You will receive service credit for vesting, vacation, and any other benefits contingent on length of service based on Enron in-service date.  (October 1989 for Swerzbin, March 1999 for Motley)  or similar wording
 

Just a reminder toget  the documents together.  I talked to John-- he said his intent is not  adjust bonuses due to contract payments.    He was very excited the team is staying together.

This young man has done a good job for us in structuring and analysis.  Thanks, Mike.
 
Thanks Mike!

James Bruce	

my address is:

12404 S.E. Blaine Dr.
Clackamas, OR 97015

=20
=09=09=09=09=09[IMAGE]=09
[IMAGE]=09New York Times National << File: spacer.gif >>  =09[IMAGE]=09=09=
=09=09
[IMAGE]=09[IMAGE]=09[IMAGE]=09=09=09=09
[IMAGE]=09[IMAGE]The New York Times << File: National.gif >> =09[IMAGE]=09[=
IMAGE]=09   [IMAGE] SEARCH   Today's NewsPast 2 WeeksPast 30 DaysPast 90 Da=
ysPast YearSince  1996  =09[IMAGE]=09
=09=09=09=09=09[IMAGE]=09
=09=09=09=09=09[IMAGE]=09

=09=09=09=09=09=09=09        [IMAGE]  search [IMAGE]  [IMAGE] Today's NewsP=
ast 2  WeeksPast 30 DaysPast 90 DaysPast  YearSince 1996   [IMAGE] << File:=
 top.gif >> [IMAGE]   Go to Advanced  Search << File: NytArticleHeader.gif =
>>   [IMAGE] [IMAGE] Welcome, betterthanworse << File: gn_home.gif >>    Si=
gn Up for  Newsletters << File: gn_classifieds.gif >>   |  Log Out << File:=
 gn_news.gif >>              [IMAGE]        [IMAGE] =09
=09=09[IMAGE]=09  E-Mail This Article << File: gn_opinion.gif >>  Printer-F=
riendly Format << File: gn_features.gif >>   Most E-Mailed Articles << File=
: reale86.gif >>  Single-Page View << File: gn_destinations.gif >>  [IMAGE]=
  [IMAGE]  May 1, 2001     River's Power Aids California and Enriches the  =
Northwest  By BLAINE HARDEN               [IMAGE] Larry Davis for The New  =
York Times  Electricity generated by Rock Island  Dam in Chelan County, Was=
h., helped the county's public  utility earn a record $58.2 million in prof=
its last  year.         Multimedia  [IMAGE] [IMAGE] [IMAGE] chartThe  Price=
 of Power Nationwide << File: gn_services.gif >>     [IMAGE] [IMAGE]      [=
IMAGE]      Related Articles  [IMAGE] [IMAGE] [IMAGE] Plan on California  E=
nergy Has No Shortage of Critics << File: gn_newspaper.gif >>  (April 27,  =
2001)  Board  Orders Limited Price Caps for California Power << File: profi=
le.gif >>  (April 26,  2001)  California Official  Spars With U.S. on Power=
 Policy << File: empty.gif >>  (April 10,  2001)  [IMAGE] [IMAGE] [IMAGE]  =
    [IMAGE]      Other Resources  [IMAGE] [IMAGE] [IMAGE] Related Sites *  =
Interactive  Guide: California Power Woes - Associated Press << File: gs_se=
arch.gif >>     California I.S.O. << File: emailArticle2.gif >>     Energy =
Department: energy  statistics << File: printArticle2.gif >> [IMAGE]  [IMAG=
E] [IMAGE]      [IMAGE]       [IMAGE]       GEORGE, Wash. - Doing something=
 nice for California has  never been a priority here in the Columbia River =
Basin, where  high-voltage power lines lope across irrigated fields of alfa=
lfa,  potatoes and wheat.  Politicians from California, as farmers in this =
area will explain  at great length, have been scheming for decades to sipho=
n off the  basin's cheap electricity and water.   Californians, however, ha=
ve been noticeably less irritating as of  late. Having fouled up electricit=
y deregulation six ways from  Sunday, they are skidding into the summer air=
-conditioning season  desperately short of power. In the last year, much of=
 their  salvation has come from the Columbia River, whose monstrous dams ar=
e  the largest hydroelectricity machines in North America.  All along the r=
iver, from Portland, Ore., to British Columbia,  utility companies, aluminu=
m makers and farmers have joined to help  save California - but at a stagge=
ring price. Charging whatever  California's dysfunctional power market will=
 bear, people in this  narrow stretch of the Northwest have created a kind =
of Kuwait along  the Columbia.  With their record profits, some public util=
ities are wiring the  emptiness of Eastern Washington with fiber optics, bu=
ying diesel  generators to make still more power and paying Wall Street-sty=
le  wages to electricity traders - while making sure that their  electricit=
y rates remain among the cheapest in North America. Just  north of the bord=
er in British Columbia, a state-owned utility  luxuriated in its California=
 windfall by mailing out rebate checks  to 1.6 million customers.  Their go=
od fortune, though, has come with a measure of  ambivalence and may well be=
 short-lived. A severe drought is already  hurting farmers across the regio=
n. If it continues, utilities along  the river will have to buy power and m=
ay be punished by the same  market forces that gave them a windfall.  "This=
 is not nice money," said Alice Parker, a retired farmer who  heads a group=
 that promotes irrigation in the Columbia Basin. "It is  something that is =
offered to us not to use water so Californians can  run their air-condition=
ers."  Nice or not, a whole lot of money flooded into the Columbia  Basin. =
 North of here in sparsely populated Chelan County, a publicly  owned utili=
ty that has two dams on the Columbia made three times as  much money last y=
ear than it ever had before. With just 35,000 local  customers, the utility=
 last year had a $58.2 million profit. It paid  its two top power traders $=
285,000 each, an astonishing income in a  county where per capita income is=
 less than $25,000 a year. The  utility refuses to reveal the traders' name=
s for fear their children  might be kidnapped.   The chief operating office=
r of Chelan County Public Utility  District acknowledged that increases in =
the cost of power were  "huge" and "obscene." But the executive, Charles J.=
 Hosken, added,  "We would be imprudent if we did not maximize this market =
for our  customer owners."  Next door in equally sparse Grant County, a pub=
lic utility that  also owns two dams on the Columbia has made even more mon=
ey  maximizing the market. It had a record $88.8 million in profits last  y=
ear - more than double its best previous year.  Grant County Public Utility=
 District, which has just 40,000  retail customers, is using its windfall t=
o help build a $70 million  fiber optic network for local residents. It has=
 also bought 20  diesel generators to guard against power shortages and, if=
 possible,  exploit the power gold-rush. The utility estimates that those  =
generators could add $50 million to profits in the coming year.  Like Chela=
n, Grant is using its profits as a kind of drought  insurance to insulate i=
ts customers from high market prices for  electricity, when, as now, local =
needs exceed generating capacity in  the river. Power rates in Grant and Ch=
elan Counties are about  one-fifth as much as in New York City.  Grant Coun=
ty's utility has rejected, for the time being, the idea  of giving a share =
of its profits to its customers.   "How would it look if Grant County gives=
 away rebates while so  many people are paying more for electricity?" asked=
 Lon Topaz,  director of resource management for the utility. "It would be =
lousy  politics."  An Upside-Down Economy    The second-worst drought on re=
cord in the Columbia River Basin  has combined with California's deregulati=
on mess to further distort  the energy market. Drought has not only helped =
increase the price at  which electricity can be sold on the spot market - 1=
0 to 20 times as  much as last year's price - it has strengthened a compell=
ing  bottom-line rationale for conservation. Every megawatt not purchased  =
and used in the Northwest (often at locked-in, long- term prices  that are =
a fraction of the current market rate) can be sent south to  California. Fo=
r many utilities, conservation spells local savings  and a long-distance bo=
nanza.  As a result, a regional economy built on half a century of cheap  h=
ydropower has been stood on its head. Irrigation farmers here are  being pa=
id up to $440 an acre not to farm.   Similarly, aluminum companies are coll=
ecting about $1.7 billion  this year by not making aluminum. Companies like=
 Alcoahave earned profits that delight Wall  Street, while keeping about 10=
,000 workers on their payroll, by  reselling hydropower that they bought in=
 the mid-1990's under a  cheap long-term contract.  Even residential custom=
ers are being offered a chance to make a  few dollars from the power crunch=
. AvistaUtilities has announced that it will pay its  customers in Washingt=
on and Idaho 5 cents for every kilowatt they do  not use, if their consumpt=
ion falls more than 5 percent below last  year's level.   For utilities in =
the Northwest, by far the largest profits from  California's electricity cr=
isis have been secured in British  Columbia. A number of private American u=
tilities have also benefited  from California's troubles.   BC Hydro, a uti=
lity owned by British Columbia with dams on the  Columbia and Peace Rivers,=
 is the first corporation in the history  of the province to exceed $1 bill=
ion in profits, as measured in  Canadian currency ($712 million in United S=
tates currency).    Continued 1 | 2 << File: toshiba_emlart.gif >>  | Next>=
> << File: mostEmailed2.gif >>  Home << File: singlePage2.gif >>  | Back  t=
o National << File: 01powe.1.jpg >>  | Search << File: multimedia.gif >>  |=
 Help << File: chart.gif >>  Back to  Top << File: relatedArticles.gif >>  =
  E-Mail This Article << File: otherResources.gif >>  Printer-Friendly Form=
at << File: g.gif >>   Most E-Mailed Articles << File: serve?bfmid=3D232712=
48&siteid=3D35542624&bfpage=3Dnytimes_6 >>  Single-Page View << File: NYTMe=
nuTop.gif >>  [IMAGE]   =09=09=09=09=09
  home << File: USAMenuBottom.gif >>   Classifieds   Automobiles << File: a=
dLinks.gif >>   Job Market << File: marketplace.gif >>    Real Estate << Fi=
le: circulation.logo.gif >>    Personals   All  Classifieds   [IMAGE]  News=
   Quick News   NYT Front Page    Arts    Business    Health    Internation=
al    National    New  York Region   Obituaries   Politics    Science    Sp=
orts    Technology    Weather   Corrections     [IMAGE]  Opinion   Editoria=
ls /  Op-Ed   Readers'  Opinions   [IMAGE]  Features   Automobiles   Books =
  Cartoons    Crossword/Games    Job  Market   Living    Magazine    Movies=
    Photos    Real Estate    Travel    Week in  Review   Special:  Auto Sho=
w    [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]    [IMAGE]  Destinations  =
 Boston.com   College Times   Learning Network   New York Today   NYT Store=
    [IMAGE]  Services   Archives   E-Cards  & More   Help Center   Media Ki=
t   NYT Mobile    Our  Advertisers   [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  Newspaper   Home  De=
livery   Customer  Service   [IMAGE]  Your Profile  Review  Profile   E-Mai=
l  Options   Log Out       [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE] [IMAGE] Text  Version =
   [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE] =09[IMAGE]=09=09  [IMAGE]   Click Here  to  Re=
ceive 50% Off Home Delivery of The New York Times Newspaper.        [IMAGE]=
 SEARCH    Today's NewsPast 2  WeeksPast 30 DaysPast 90 DaysPast  YearSince=
 1996   Copyright 2001  The New York Times Company  |  Privacy  Information=
    =09[IMAGE]=09[IMAGE]=09[IMAGE]=09 [IMAGE]   [IMAGE] [IMAGE] NASA resear=
ch creates "smart bed" sleep surface     Outdoor air conditioning?     Why =
break your back and the bank for clean  floors?     Private DVD theater put=
s a floating 6-foot screen  right before your eyes     Join the e-mail revo=
lution without buying a  computer     Protect any area with an invisible in=
frared  fence     This year's hottest kitchen item...for under  $100     Br=
ing a drained battery back to life without opening  your hood!    [IMAGE]  =
  [IMAGE][IMAGE] [IMAGE] [IMAGE] Post  a Job on NYTimes.com      [IMAGE]   =
Search NYTimes.com  Classifieds AllAutomobilesJob  MarketReal EstateOffice =
 Space       Browse the NYT  Store Front PageBooksCardsCrosswordsPhotosPost=
ersPublicationsReprintsVideos       Explore Shopping at  NYTimes.com     =
=09

 - spacer.gif=20
 - National.gif=20
 - top.gif=20
 - NytArticleHeader.gif=20
 - gn_home.gif=20
 - gn_classifieds.gif=20
 - gn_news.gif=20
 - gn_opinion.gif=20
 - gn_features.gif=20
 - reale86.gif=20
 - gn_destinations.gif=20
 - gn_services.gif=20
 - gn_newspaper.gif=20
 - profile.gif=20
 - empty.gif=20
 - gs_search.gif=20
 - emailArticle2.gif=20
 - printArticle2.gif=20
 - toshiba_emlart.gif=20
 - mostEmailed2.gif=20
 - singlePage2.gif=20
 - 01powe.1.jpg=20
 - multimedia.gif=20
 - chart.gif=20
 - relatedArticles.gif=20
 - otherResources.gif=20
 - g.gif=20
 - serve?bfmid=3D23271248&siteid=3D35542624&bfpage=3Dnytimes_6=20
 - NYTMenuTop.gif=20
 - USAMenuBottom.gif=20
 - adLinks.gif=20
 - marketplace.gif=20
 - circulation.logo.gif

how about next Tuesday or Thursday in the late afternoon is fine....  it would be good to get on the same page with what we're doin in the market!! Thanks, let me know whcih day is best for you, Mike

Hey,

I'd like to know if I could buy you a beer sometime and pick your brain on how things work in the NW term trading world.  I'm one of the NW mid-marketers now (4 of us total) and I'd like to know in advance how to best work with you, add value, and not be a pain in your ass.  Let me know if this is OK.  You pick the time & place.

Thanks!  
Andrea Woodland

Let me know if this is what you wanted.

In reviewing Jeff Shields' expenses for the previous two months, I have found 
two travel itineraries which came without prices on them. Jessica and Mollie 
have both checked their e-mail and confirmed that the only documents sent did 
not detail the cost of the trip. 

The prices I need are from the following trips:

Itinerary only - August 28, Alaska Airlines, PDX-SeaTac-Helena-SeaTac-PDX, 
Reservation # AS/WXOKNK
 (reservation made August 24)
Itinerary only - Sept. 6 to 7, Delta Airlines, PDX-Salt Lake 
City-Spokane-PDX, Reservation # DL/V2KIC3
 (reservation made September 6)

Thank you so much for your time.

Kate Symes
West Origination Clerk
Enron NA
503.464.3748

We just changed the deal - it was input correctly, but the computer did not 
change the time zones correctly. That's why we were off 25 MW. I'll let Duong 
Luu know of the problem.

Thanks,
Kate

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 12:39 PM
i was talking about the total mws, they have 23,775, we have 23,800.  i think 
they entered the strips wrong.  can you pls check on that.

thanks

   Kate Symes @ ECT                11/17/2000 02:17 PM

Mike confirmed with Natsource this was a 25MW deal with no broker fee.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 07:47 AM
the broker has 23,775 as total mws, and also has a fee of .0075.

This was one of a slew of deals that one of our schedulers ran across that 
had the wrong time zone in the strips. According to Duong Luu, there was an 
EOL application error that was incorrectly populating deals that flow over 
4/1/01 - the first of day of Daylight Savings Time. Duong said the error has 
since been fixed. But for the incorrect deals, we had to go in and change all 
the strips back to PPT and re-save the deals so the time zones would populate 
correctly. Hope this doesn't cause too much confusion - but nothing should 
change other than that the MWH will be flowing on the correct hours now. Let 
me know if you have any questions.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/27/2001 02:59 PM

Kate, checking on deal  318870.01, it is an EOL deal and looks like it has 
been changed.  Once an EOL trade is transacted we are not suppose to change 
the deal.  Please let me know why the ch took place.  

Thanks
Stephanie

A heads up -

The Forward Obligation report for 3/28 will show Short Term Northwest with a 
50 MWh short position off-peak at NP-15. This is due to an option that Sean 
and Diana decided not to exercise. Thought that might clear up at least one 
of the many discrepancies we may find on that report.....

Kate

Please accept my apologies for this worksheet's absence yesterday. It was 
undergoing cosmetic improvements to more accurately represent the EES-EPMI 
position. Note two new column headings as of 3/27 - "Transmission" and "Other 
EnPower" deals. Also, a change has been made to the SP-15 volumes in the 3/2 
sheet. This change was made per Daniel Kang at EES and Chris Foster at EPMI. 
And as always, feel free to contact me with questions.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

help!
	
	

Could you please let me know if you are planning to attend birthday party.

Thanks

Question, comments, concerns.....

Kate Symes
503-464-7486

Let me know if this works.

Kate

Chris entered that this morning - 562978 - would you like me to back-date it?

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 12:27 PM
Kate what about the Chris Mallory deal?

PREBON
Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Duke Q2'01 25 mw of NP-15 at $180.00 off-peak hrs

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/27/2001 04:50 PM

PREBON
Matt Motley
562635

Jeff Richter
562556

Jeff Richter
562546 - corrected to 25 mw

BLOOMBERG
Mike Driscoll
562546 - Mike would like to keep this as Pinnacle for now because that is the 
true counterparty - Bloomberg's system has not been updated

Tom Alonso
did not do this deal (he did a BUY  with the same terms)

Sean Crandall
562641

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/27/2001 02:32 PM
PREBON

Matt Motley
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to Alleghany Q4'01 Palo Verde at $125.00 peak hrs

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Duke Q2'01 25 mw of NP-15 at $180.00 off-peak hrs

Jeff Richter
deal 562546
Prebon shows 25 mw ....enpower has 23 mw

AMEREX WEST
All deals are fine.

BLOOMBERG      P.S. I am still confirming trades for Bloomberg.

Mike Driscoll
deal 562226
Bloomberg show cp name as Arizona Public Service Company....enpower has 
Pinnacle West Corp.

Tom Alonso
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to El Paso 25 mw of April'01 PV peak hrs at $265.00

Sean Crandall
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Pacificorp25 mw April MID-C peak hrs at $285.00

done

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 12:53 PM
yes

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/28/2001 02:44 PM

Chris entered that this morning - 562978 - would you like me to back-date it?

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 12:27 PM
Kate what about the Chris Mallory deal?

PREBON
Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Duke Q2'01 25 mw of NP-15 at $180.00 off-peak hrs

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/27/2001 04:50 PM

PREBON
Matt Motley
562635

Jeff Richter
562556

Jeff Richter
562546 - corrected to 25 mw

BLOOMBERG
Mike Driscoll
562546 - Mike would like to keep this as Pinnacle for now because that is the 
true counterparty - Bloomberg's system has not been updated

Tom Alonso
did not do this deal (he did a BUY  with the same terms)

Sean Crandall
562641

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/27/2001 02:32 PM
PREBON

Matt Motley
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to Alleghany Q4'01 Palo Verde at $125.00 peak hrs

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Duke Q2'01 25 mw of NP-15 at $180.00 off-peak hrs

Jeff Richter
deal 562546
Prebon shows 25 mw ....enpower has 23 mw

AMEREX WEST
All deals are fine.

BLOOMBERG      P.S. I am still confirming trades for Bloomberg.

Mike Driscoll
deal 562226
Bloomberg show cp name as Arizona Public Service Company....enpower has 
Pinnacle West Corp.

Tom Alonso
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to El Paso 25 mw of April'01 PV peak hrs at $265.00

Sean Crandall
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from Pacificorp25 mw April MID-C peak hrs at $285.00

AMEREX

Diana Scholtes
563461 - should be amerex/in as prebon/changed

Chris Mallory
563362 - he changed it to Prebon

PREBON

Chris Mallory
563461 - changed to amerex
563358 - killed/new heavy load deal entered - 563967

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 02:32 PM
AMEREX

Diana/Sean
I am missing the following deal:
1) Enron sells to Powerex MId-C light 3/29 at $140.00

Chris Mallory
Amerex does not recognize deal 563362

BLOOMBERG
All deals are o.k.

PREBON

Chris Mallory
deal 563461
Is this a duplicate of 563460 because Prebon only recognizes 1 deal

deal 563358
Prebon says should be heavy not light hrs.

Mark says it's a good deal - any reason why it didn't get checked out?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 03:09 PM
deal 563473
Mark Fischer
Amerex does have this on there webcheckout and we did not verbal it.  Is this 
a good deal with them?

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/28/2001 04:41 PM

AMEREX

Diana Scholtes
563461 - should be amerex/in as prebon/changed

Chris Mallory
563362 - he changed it to Prebon

PREBON

Chris Mallory
563461 - changed to amerex
563358 - killed/new heavy load deal entered - 563967

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 02:32 PM
AMEREX

Diana/Sean
I am missing the following deal:
1) Enron sells to Powerex MId-C light 3/29 at $140.00

Chris Mallory
Amerex does not recognize deal 563362

BLOOMBERG
All deals are o.k.

PREBON

Chris Mallory
deal 563461
Is this a duplicate of 563460 because Prebon only recognizes 1 deal

deal 563358
Prebon says should be heavy not light hrs.

I sure will - and you're about right. My first free minute should be in 
approximately 12 years. See you then!

Mollie Gustafson
11/17/2000 01:13 PM
Kate,

When you get a minute (at 8:00 tonight?), would you, please show Theresa and 
I were the auction stuff is in Word?  I am going to have her call the vendors 
we haven't hear from (the majority of them) on Monday.

Thanks!

Mollie

The missing Richter trades are all EES sleeves that he neglected to enter 
before leaving for Houston this afternoon. Since Risk is running their calc, 
Chris Mallory said he's enter the deals first thing in the morning. 

The Fischer deals - 563728 and 563729 - have been changed to Constellation, 
per Matt Motley who did the trades.

And the other two deals where the brokers have been changed look fine. Would 
you let me know beforehand next time, just in the offhand chance that the 
trader entered other things in the deal incorrectly? Thanks for your help.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/28/2001 02:57 PM

Kate-

all Jeff Richter
APB shows:

Enron buys EES
Q2 02
50 mws np 15    99.95

Enron sells Allegheny
Q1 02 
25 mws
np 15
170.00

Enron Buys EES
Q1 02   np 15
25 mws   169.95

Enron sells Allegheny
Q2 02
50 mws np 15  100.00

Enron Buys EES   Q1  02
25 mws np 15  169.95

Enron Sells Mirant
170.00    Q1 02
25 mws   np 15

and TFS said that two Fischer trades might ch Cp names due to Credit...
563728.01
563729.01  both from Pacificorp to Constellation Power.

D. Scholtes trade 563467.01 moved from apb to prebon
Mallory 563362.01 moved from natsource to prebon

thanks
sp

Thanks for the response! I know the feeling......(is it only Wednesday?)

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 03:27 PM
Actually the deal did get vernballed......for some reason Amerex just hasn't 
put it in their system yet ..............My fingers are typing faster than my 
brain is moving today.

Just disregard!!  

Evelyn

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/28/2001 05:08 PM

Mark says it's a good deal - any reason why it didn't get checked out?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 03:09 PM
deal 563473
Mark Fischer
Amerex does have this on there webcheckout and we did not verbal it.  Is this 
a good deal with them?

   Kate Symes @ ECT                03/28/2001 04:41 PM

AMEREX

Diana Scholtes
563461 - should be amerex/in as prebon/changed

Chris Mallory
563362 - he changed it to Prebon

PREBON

Chris Mallory
563461 - changed to amerex
563358 - killed/new heavy load deal entered - 563967

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/28/2001 02:32 PM
AMEREX

Diana/Sean
I am missing the following deal:
1) Enron sells to Powerex MId-C light 3/29 at $140.00

Chris Mallory
Amerex does not recognize deal 563362

BLOOMBERG
All deals are o.k.

PREBON

Chris Mallory
deal 563461
Is this a duplicate of 563460 because Prebon only recognizes 1 deal

deal 563358
Prebon says should be heavy not light hrs.

I'll change this when Risk is done calcing - but APB is right - broker fee 
should be .00275 on LADWP deals.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/28/2001 03:26 PM

Kate
Deal 562195.01  Alonso, LA dept of Water
the apb broker confirm has fee of .0275, apb checked and confirmed fee should 
be .0275 instead of .0075, please ch when you get a chance.   Thanks

563906 - changed to Pinnacle West
563907 - changed to Pinnacle West
562226 - changed to APS

Regarding the last deal, Mike Driscoll talked to his broker at Bloomberg last 
night and asked him to change their confirm to say Pinnacle West. The broker 
said he'd check on it, but that Bloomberg hadn't switched their contract over 
yet and he didn't know if they could check a deal out under the new name. So 
we left it, under the impression that Bloomberg was actually in the wrong. My 
question is - has APS switched over to Pinnacle West entirely, and when or if 
Bloomberg starts recognizing Pinnacle as the counterparty are we going to 
have problems with deals containing the old counterparty name? I'm just 
trying to clarify, so I can let the traders know what to expect. Thanks for 
your help.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/29/2001 07:17 AM

Kate, 

I just spoke to DeeDee of Pinnacle West, we verballed deals and she said all 
deals should be under the Pinnacle West name unless for Bloomberg 
transactions.   Please review the following 

Mark Fischer
563906.01  non brokered > cp name should be Pinnacle West
563907.01  non brokered > cp name should be Pinnacle West

562226.01  Bloomberg, cp name should be Arizona Public Service.  (Evelyn 
inquired about this yesterday)

Thanks for your help!
Stephanie

I wanted to check with you on this. All these deals are entered in your book, 
and I know the Services desk typically does their own confirmations with 
counterparties. However, these deals have comments in them that say they 
replace other deals. In that case, would you like them confirmed by Houston? 
Let me know.

Thanks,
Kate
Hi Kate,

Do we need to confirm Les Rawson's Wilamette Deals? 

564024
564019
564018
564017
564016
564015
564012
564007
564004
564002
564001
563994

They all had some sort of replacement comment so I just wanted to double 
check to see if we should confirm.

Thanks!!
Amy

Brett -

I'm so sorry for not sending you an e-mail last night! I did test the report 
and it looks just fine - but I had so many things going on right up until I 
left that I forgot to tell YOU that it looked fine. Thanks for the reminder, 
and for your work on the report.

Kate

Kate, were you able to test the Fwd Obligation Report?  Mr. Luu is ready to 
push it in to production, but we wanted you to look at it and give it your ok 
first.  

Thanks, 

Brett Pate
Enpower QA

563262
4 units to Willamette Industries Albany Paper Mill Unit
4 units to Grays Harbor Paper Unit

563259
All units to Las Vegas Cogeneration

Please let me know if this answers your question.

Thanks,
Kate

Kate,

In deal # 563262 Eugene Water & Electric and 563259 Salt River Project, I 
need to know the Unit name in order to confirm it.

Thanks!!!
Amy

According to Les, we don't need to confirm any of these deals. I guess they 
were deals done by the Real Time desk on behalf of Services, but they were 
entered incorrectly. Thanks for checking, though.

Kate

Hi Kate,

Do we need to confirm Les Rawson's Wilamette Deals? 

564024
564019
564018
564017
564016
564015
564012
564007
564004
564002
564001
563994

They all had some sort of replacement comment so I just wanted to double 
check to see if we should confirm.

Thanks!!
Amy

These have been auto-scheduled, and I've told the confirms group not to 
confirm them. Let me know what the Nov. and Dec. deal numbers are when you 
get them.

Kate

Lester Rawson
03/29/2001 09:54 AM
Kate,

No we don't need to confirm those deals they are to replace deals entered by 
Real Time incorrectly.

I am having to go back and change a number of deals from Oct., Nov. and Dec.

For Oct. I need the following deals for Oct. approved and scheduled.

10/7 563994, 10/11 564001, 10/12 564002, 10/13 564004, 10/17 564007, 10/18 
564012,  10/19 564015, 10/20 564016, 10/22 564017, 10/23 564018,  10/30 
564019, 10/31 564024.

Thanks,

Les

The folowing EES sleeves have been entered and backdated to yesterday:

564924 - buy EES
564925 - sell Allegheny
564926 - buy EES
564927 - sell Allegheny
564928 - buy EES
564929 - sell Mirant

Sorry for the delay - I didn't realize Chris had been sitting on them for so 
long. 

Thanks,
Kate

Both deals have been changed. Jeff entered them incorrectly.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 01:21 PM
461487
461488
jeff

broker has sp15 on these deals

I'm sorry for not resonding sooner - did this get resolved? I see Duke Energy 
Trading and Marketing in the deal.

Kate

Rhonda L Denton
03/28/2001 04:46 AM
Please see if this is Duke Power, a division of Duke Energy or should it be 
Duke Energy Trading and Marketing.  Thanks.

Bob's at lunch right now - I've left a big note on his desk and we'll sort it 
out this afternoon. Thanks for the reminder.

Kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
03/29/2001 11:13 AM
Hello, I hate to bug you with this.  Whenever you can spare a second would 
you ask Bob about this?  I am afraid it is going to slip through the cracks.

Thanks for your help!
Melissa
Melissa Ann Murphy
03/26/2001 10:34 AM
Hi Bob, I was wondering if you have contacted Constellation about the 6 
trades that are in the system with the Cal Px as the index price.  All of 
these trades start flowing in July of this year.

The deal numbers are as follows:

453152.01
453175.01
453294.01
462109.01
471888.01
471889.01

Let me know if Constellation agrees to change these deals to the Dow Jones so 
I can send a letter for them to sign.

Thanks,
Melissa

Thanks so much! I'll pass this along to the traders.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/29/2001 11:52 AM

Hello Kate,
APS and Pinnacle...We ran into a problem checking out for the end of the 
month, because a few deals had Pinnacle in the system, but Bloomberg on the 
bro confirm.  We had to ch them to match the broker confirms, because APS 
showed the deals as APS on there side.  They are trying to segregate 
companies little by little.  We have been told by Rhonda, our contract 
administrator that trading under both names are legally correct, both are 
under WSPP.  

DeeDee from Pinnacle said all trades are with Pinnacle unless Bloomberg 
trade; then cp should be APS.  DeeDee said shortly all trades will be under 
Pinnacle, but did not give me a specific date.       

Please let the traders know that all trades should be with Pinnacle West, and 
APS that are transacted with Bloomberg.  No, we will not have problems 
recognizing the old name, Rhonda says they will just be assigned over to 
Pinnacle, but we will not have to revise confirms.  Hope this helps!
Thanks
Stephanie

   Kate Symes                03/29/2001 11:46 AM

563906 - changed to Pinnacle West
563907 - changed to Pinnacle West
562226 - changed to APS

Regarding the last deal, Mike Driscoll talked to his broker at Bloomberg last 
night and asked him to change their confirm to say Pinnacle West. The broker 
said he'd check on it, but that Bloomberg hadn't switched their contract over 
yet and he didn't know if they could check a deal out under the new name. So 
we left it, under the impression that Bloomberg was actually in the wrong. My 
question is - has APS switched over to Pinnacle West entirely, and when or if 
Bloomberg starts recognizing Pinnacle as the counterparty are we going to 
have problems with deals containing the old counterparty name? I'm just 
trying to clarify, so I can let the traders know what to expect. Thanks for 
your help.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   03/29/2001 07:17 AM

Kate, 

I just spoke to DeeDee of Pinnacle West, we verballed deals and she said all 
deals should be under the Pinnacle West name unless for Bloomberg 
transactions.   Please review the following 

Mark Fischer
563906.01  non brokered > cp name should be Pinnacle West
563907.01  non brokered > cp name should be Pinnacle West

562226.01  Bloomberg, cp name should be Arizona Public Service.  (Evelyn 
inquired about this yesterday)

Thanks for your help!
Stephanie

Following are the deals I changed to the correct time zones, per Will Smith's 
list:

520330 - forward
373613 - forward
359846 - EOL
353314 - EOL
352613 - EOL
349391 - EOL
349389 - EOL
349242 - EOL
330282 - EOL
300686 - forward
272524.2 - forward
220845 - forward

Most of these were just April deals, and it looks like they all suffered from 
the same incorrect default we ran into before. On the longer term deals I 
made sure to choose "no" when it asked if I would like to clear all routes 
for the deal; but let me know if you find anything out of the ordinary.

Thanks,
Kate

Cara Semperger
03/26/2001 10:47 AM
Do you want to look into these, the first one made me nearly wet my pants!  I 
think I want a deal control professional on this one.............   :)

I'm checking with Chris Foster and Chris Mallory, who are apparently the ones 
initiating these trades. Both are out of the office right now, so it might be 
tomorrow before I can get back to you on this. But my guess is that if APX 
does not want to receive confirms on daily deals, then we don't need to send 
them. I'll let you know for sure as soon as I talk to the traders.

Thanks,
Kate

Hey Kate! I received a phone call from a Jim Cross from Automated Power 
Exchange. Now that we are confirming daily's he mentioned that he did not 
want to receive dailys per the APX Master Agreement. He told me that all 
trades are anonimus under the APX agreement and we should not be confirming 
theses. Examples: #563948 and #563381. Some of the trader doing these trades 
are Chris Mallory and Les Rawson. Could you ask them is we should continue to 
confirm these daily's or not?

Thanks

Kimberly

Enron Power Marketing, Inc.
Kimberly Indelicato Office:713-853-3031
Trading Support Fax:713-646-2443
kallen3@enron.com

Done.

Lester Rawson
03/29/2001 01:28 PM
Kate,

Heres the Nov. Will batch. Please appove and auto schedule.

11/1 565083, 11/2 565085, 11/3 565088, 11/4 565089,  11/5 565095, 11/6 
565104, 11/7 565113, 11/10 565114, 11/11 565121, 11/13 565130,  11/14 565143.

Thanks,

Les

564894 - changed to Bloomberg - but it's a buy, not a sale - is this the same 
deal prebon is missing?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/29/2001 02:25 PM
AMEREX
All deals o.k.

PREBON

Mark Fischer 
deal 564894
Prebon does not recognize

BLOOMBERG

Mark Fischer
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to El Paso 25 mw May PV  $304.00
I believe this deal is the deal prebon does not recognize--564894

he just changed it to 4/2

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/29/2001 02:27 PM
bloomberg
Tom Alonso
deal 565185
Bloomber shows term as 4/2-4/2 ........  enpower has 4/3-4/3

Evelyn Metoyer
03/29/2001 04:25 PM
AMEREX
All deals o.k.

PREBON

Mark Fischer 
deal 564894
Prebon does not recognize

BLOOMBERG

Mark Fischer
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to El Paso 25 mw May PV  $304.00
I believe this deal is the deal prebon does not recognize--564894

fee has been added

Stephanie Piwetz   03/29/2001 03:30 PM

Kate, can you check fee for above deal    mark fischer
Enron sells constellation
mona
july-sept 01
610.00
we have zero fee, tfs shows .0075    Let me know and we probably need to set 
mona delivery point in the system.
Thanks

sp

The unit on this deal is Las Vegas Cogeneration - and I asked Les to start 
entering the specific unit in the comments section of unit-contingent deals. 
Let me know if he does or does not.....

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

This is a unit contingent deal.  We have been told that we have to have the 
unit name to include in the confirmation when we confirm these deals.  Can 
you have the traders add the unit name in the comment section whe they do 
unit contingent deals?

Thanks!

Can I call you with a banana?

I've made a change to a LTNW deal, per Mike Driscoll and John Malowney, 
because it was entered against the wrong index yesterday. Cara asked me to 
e-mail you with the specifics for any scheduling adjustments that need to be 
made. And here they are -

563929 - KILLED

476578 - Legs 4, 5, and 6 added to extend deal through April

Because this is an index-forward deal, it needed to be entered against the 
on-peak, off-peak, and Sunday indices, which explains the three new legs. Let 
me know if you have any questions.

Kate

You're right - Mike Driscoll entered this incorrectly, so I killed deal 
563929 and simply added three new legs to the existing deal they were trying 
to extend. Deal number 476578 now has legs 4, 5, and 6 to extend the deal 
under the same terms through April. Please let me know if this doesn't show 
up correctly for some reason.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

I have a question about how this deal is entered.  It is a 24 hour deal 
against an index.  Shouldn't it be split out and priced against the 
individual on peak, off peak and Sunday index?

Thanks!

Please note a change in EES reported load volume on 3/31, HE 6, SP-15. The 
volume was incorrectly copied into the worksheet, but all EnPower deals 
reflect the correct number. Also, the sheets for 3/30 and 3/31 now show those 
respective dates at the top of the page. Please let me know if there are any 
questions.

Following are the terms under which I ran the Forward Obligation report and 
received this message:

General SQL error.
ORA-00907: missing right parenthesis.

Terms:

Let me know what you find. Thanks!

Kate

These are all West Services deals, and our services traders - Les Rawson and 
Stan Cocke - prefer to confirm their own deals with counterparties. So these 
should not be confirmed. Kim Hundl and I have been working on long lists of 
deals that went in to be confirmed and we've since gone in and changed them. 
Services, Real Time, and EES trades are among those. If you'd like, you can 
talk to her about what we decided to confirm and not confirm, or you can give 
me a call at (503) 464-7486.

Thanks for checking!
Kate

Hello Kate,

I saw  the following deals show up as not to be confirmed, but wanted to 
double check with you to make sure that they should not be confirmed.

They are all Stanley Cocke deals :

564959 Delano
564981 Atlantic Richfield
564983 Sierra Power
564999 Wheelabrator Martell
565001 Whellabrator Shasta

Thanks so much!
Amy

Mark -
I'm sending you two things that I hope will clarify some of these 
discrepancies. The first is an updated Real Time spreadsheet for 3/19 that 
shows the volumes for deal 553219. Bill Williams and I looked over their 
spreadsheets and could not find this deal in the 3/16 sheet - so I'm still 
wondering why EES thinks this deal should be in at a different date and 
price. 

The second document is a modified version of the sheet you sent me. In it, I 
answered the questions I could and changed things I knew were wrong. I also 
asked questions on deals where I can't find a discrepancy between my sheet 
and EnPower. 

Please keep in contact on this issue - I know this is only a start.

Kate 
503-464-7486

Mark Confer
03/29/2001 05:56 PM
I will be out of the office on Friday, attached is the spreadsheet of the 
differences noted so far between EES & EPMI and where we are with them.  
Since the GL needs to be booked by the end of the day Wednesday I am sending 
this file to everyone.  Please take a look and let me know if more 
information is needed.

Kate you asked about deal #553219.1 EES shows this deal on the 16th at a 
price of $125.  They do not see this deal on their real time sheets for the 
19th. 

 

Thanks,

Mark

Thanks Eric. I've changed the sheet to include your phone number. And you 
have a great weekend too!

Kate

djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 03/30/2001 10:08:47 AM
 Hello Kate, FYI, the phone number that you have on the fax sheet
(609-520-4452) is Jennifer's phone number.  My phone number is 609-520-4683
 Have a good weekend.
 Eric

(See attached file: DJ Index 3-30.xls)(See attached file: DJ Index
3-31.xls)

I just talked to Bob, and I don't know if he's responded yet, but I thought 
I'd fill you in anyway. He's been talking to his contact at Constellation 
about changing these deals over, but hasn't received a concrete answer yet. 
I've reminded him and he said he WILL talk to the guy and resolve it today. 
I'll keep on it, and let you know when these deals have been changed.

Thanks,
Kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
03/29/2001 11:13 AM
Hello, I hate to bug you with this.  Whenever you can spare a second would 
you ask Bob about this?  I am afraid it is going to slip through the cracks.

Thanks for your help!
Melissa
Melissa Ann Murphy
03/26/2001 10:34 AM
Hi Bob, I was wondering if you have contacted Constellation about the 6 
trades that are in the system with the Cal Px as the index price.  All of 
these trades start flowing in July of this year.

The deal numbers are as follows:

453152.01
453175.01
453294.01
462109.01
471888.01
471889.01

Let me know if Constellation agrees to change these deals to the Dow Jones so 
I can send a letter for them to sign.

Thanks,
Melissa

it's been changed.

Stephanie Piwetz   03/30/2001 11:07 AM

Kate, can you please correct the fee for del 562195.01,  to .0275

THanks
Sp

Hey, it worked! I have no idea what happened, but it looks great. Thanks for 
checking it out.

Kate

Kate, I ran the report with the exact same options and it came right up.  Try 
it again, exactly as before.  Usually if it works for one person and not the 
other it is a security issue.  Let me know what happens.

Thanks,
Brett

Following are the terms under which I ran the Forward Obligation report and 
received this message:

General SQL error.
ORA-00907: missing right parenthesis.

Terms:

Let me know what you find. Thanks!

Kate

I knew we could find a practical use for Kristian's shoes.

The West traders have requested a new pub posting code to allow them to do 
deals against the Dow Jones Palo Verde Sunday index. In particular, Matt 
Motley, our Long Term Southwest trader, has executed a deal today for Cal'01 
through Cal'06 at the Palo Verde index price. It runs all days and all hours, 
so we need to enter three legs - one at the on peak price, one at off peak, 
and one at Sunday price. The 24-hour Sunday price is the only option missing 
from EnPower. Matt has asked that we get this pub code in as soon as possible 
so his deal can be entered and calced tonight. Please let me know what you 
can do.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

It's been changed to 250 - Chris is going to talk to Bloomberg, though, 
because he thought it was a deal for 247. I'll let you know what they work 
out.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
03/30/2001 01:21 PM
BLOOMBERG

DEAL 566235
Bloomberg sent over a confirmation for a deal where:
Enron buys from Williams 25 mw 43-430 NP at $250.00

Should this deal 566235 price be $250 or $247.
Bloomberg has not sent over a confirmation for any deal at $247.00

PREBON
All deals checked out fine

AMEREX WEST 
All deals checked out fine.

Please add to this a request for the Dow Jones COB Sunday Index price. 
Thanks. 

Kate
The West traders have requested a new pub posting code to allow them to do 
deals against the Dow Jones Palo Verde Sunday index. In particular, Matt 
Motley, our Long Term Southwest trader, has executed a deal today for Cal'01 
through Cal'06 at the Palo Verde index price. It runs all days and all hours, 
so we need to enter three legs - one at the on peak price, one at off peak, 
and one at Sunday price. The 24-hour Sunday price is the only option missing 
from EnPower. Matt has asked that we get this pub code in as soon as possible 
so his deal can be entered and calced tonight. Please let me know what you 
can do.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

These have both been changed to Enmax Energy Corp. I'll let the Real Time 
traders know.

Thanks,
Kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
03/30/2001 11:59 AM
Hello, can you check these deals and see if the counterparty name is wrong.  
They are in as Enmax Corporation and we are wondering if they should be Enmax 
Energy Corporation.  The contract did not come over correctly so we wanted to 
make sure the counterparty name is correct before we set up a new contract.

Thanks,
Melissa
(713) 853-1886

Les -
I received this list from the Confirms group this morning. Looks like they 
need quite a few unit names for confirmation purposes. But if I remember 
correctly, you didn't want these deals confirmed. Please let me know when you 
get a chance, and I can go through and either change them to "no confirm" or 
add the unit names. 

Thanks,
Kate
Kimberly Hundl@ENRON
04/02/2001 07:29 AM
Hi Kate, 
The following are also unit contingent deals that we aren't able to confirm 
unless we have a unit name.
562211
564613
566060
566062
566069
566071
566077
566078
Thanks!
Kim
Kimberly Hundl
04/02/2001 09:11 AM
Hi Kate!
Hope you had a good weekend!
We need to know the unit name on these two unit contingent deals for Salt 
River Project.
Thanks!
Kim

Call with questions -

Kate Symes
503-464-7486

I haven't heard anything back. I spoke with Willie on the phone Friday 
afternoon, and he said the best way to get this done quickly would be to send 
out an e-mail. I was actually just about to call and check on the request, 
but if you have a moment, could you find out where it's at in the chain of 
commmand?

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

Has this been addressed?  

   Kate Symes                03/30/2001 03:50 PM

Please add to this a request for the Dow Jones COB Sunday Index price. 
Thanks. 

Kate
The West traders have requested a new pub posting code to allow them to do 
deals against the Dow Jones Palo Verde Sunday index. In particular, Matt 
Motley, our Long Term Southwest trader, has executed a deal today for Cal'01 
through Cal'06 at the Palo Verde index price. It runs all days and all hours, 
so we need to enter three legs - one at the on peak price, one at off peak, 
and one at Sunday price. The 24-hour Sunday price is the only option missing 
from EnPower. Matt has asked that we get this pub code in as soon as possible 
so his deal can be entered and calced tonight. Please let me know what you 
can do.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Here's the information I received from Les re: unit contingent deals. 
Obviously, we'll still enter the specific unit name in these deals, but this 
could be used as a point of reference.

Kate
Lester Rawson
04/02/2001 11:10 AM
Kate, 

Here's the list of current Service's Desk customers we sell as Unit 
Contingent. We want to confirm the sales but not the purchases.

Lv Cogen. located within Nevada Power service territory.

Unit ID: LV Cogen. unit located in North Las Vegas

Could be sold at Nevada Power system, Mead 230, Navajo, McCullough, Red Butte.

Saguaro Power Company located within Nevada Power service territory.

Unit ID: Saguaro Power unit located in Henderson Nevada.

Sale Points: Nevada System, Mead 230, Navajo, McCullough, Red Butte.

Grays Harbor Paper L.P. located in BPA service territory. Behind Grays Harbor 
PUD.

Unit ID: Grays Harbor Paper unit located in Haquiam, WA.

Sale Points: Entire Northwest interconnect.

Willamette Ind. located in PacifiCorp's service territory.

Unit ID; Willamette Ind. Albany Paper mill, located in Albany, Or.

Sale Points: Entire Northwest interconnect.

Hope this helps.

Thanks

Les

changed to caiso energy

   
	
	

This deal has an NP delivery point with firm energy.

Thanks!

Thanks for following up, Jenny. I contacted you at Willie Harrell's 
suggestion, so I appreciate your quick response, and I'll contact Donnie in 
the future.

Kate

   
	
	

FYI:

I am no longer part of the Power group - I'm was just checking on the 
progress of outstanding issues.  Please use Donnie Vinson as your contact for 
future correspondence related to this issue.  Jenny.

This request require  your group  to setup Pub Codes in Enpower Pub Posting 
for daily rates.  Enpower currently have monthly rates setup for these 
curves.  Thanks,  wlh

This deal should be with APB, not Prebon. Trader error. I'll change this when 
the calc is over - in about 45 minutes.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
11/17/2000 02:30 PM
Mark Fischer
deal 461972
error:  Prebon does not recognize this deal.

ditto on the response

   
	
	

Ditto on this deal!

This deal has an NP delivery point with firm energy.

Thanks!

changed to caiso

   
	
	

This deal has an NP delivery point with firm energy.

thanks!

Bob's just finishing up a meeting, so I'll have to wait a minute for info on 
this EES sleeve. I'll let you know as soon as I see him.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/02/2001 02:29 PM
AMEREX WEST
Bob Badeer

I am missing the following deals:

1)  Sell  Sempra Energy Trading Corp.  100  NP 15  1/1/02- 3/31/02 50mw  
off     0.0075  fee
2)  Buy  Enron Energy Services, Inc.  99.95  NP 15  1/1/02- 3/31/02 50mw   
off      0.00  fee

BLOOMBERG
All deals checked out fine.

PREBON WEST
All deals checked out fine.

AMEREX
Bob Badeer
567991 - sell sempra
567997 - buy ees

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/02/2001 02:29 PM
AMEREX WEST
Bob Badeer

I am missing the following deals:

1)  Sell  Sempra Energy Trading Corp.  100  NP 15  1/1/02- 3/31/02 50mw  
off     0.0075  fee
2)  Buy  Enron Energy Services, Inc.  99.95  NP 15  1/1/02- 3/31/02 50mw   
off      0.00  fee

BLOOMBERG
All deals checked out fine.

PREBON WEST
All deals checked out fine.

Here's the latest from our good buddy Ryan......

Ryan Langan <ryan.langan@ripcity.com> on 04/02/2001 03:29:17 PM
Sorry Kate...let me try that again,

> Just wanted to let you know that I have a small allotment of playoff
> tickets that will be available for your employees to purchase. There is a
> strong possibility of facing either the Lakers or Jazz in the first round
> so tickets will sell fast once made available to the general public.
> Playoffs begin between April 20th - 25th (exact date is to be determined).
> Please call or e-mail with any questions.
>
> Attention All Enron Employees!
> The NBA Playoffs Are Here...Purchase Your Tickets In Advance Now!
>
>
> V.I.P. Preferred Seating (lower level sideline) - $115 or $125
> *See gray sections on arena map...Amenities include:  Exclusive access to
> Legends & Players restaurant/lounge, theater style seating and in-seat
> wait service.
>
> Fuchsia Section (lower level corner) - $112.00
>
> Blue Section (lower level endzone)  - $76.00
>
> Purple section (upper level center) - $24.00
>
> Tan section (upper level behind basket) - $11.00
>
>
>  *BONUS* - In addition to bypassing the TicketMaster service fees, each
> ticket comes with worth of $3 Blazer Bucks (good for food, beverages and
> merchandise in the Rose Garden.)
>
>
>  To see a map with the colored sections go to http://www.blazers.com and
>  click on arena and tickets...
>
>
>  For tickets please call Ryan Langan @ 503-797-9936 or e-mail:
> ryan.langan@ripcity.com
>
> 

DUDE! You're too good to be true. Between you and my roommates, the emanation 
of love germs is almost too much to handle. Hey, if you get this in the next 
half an hour, write back with your phone number and I'll call you when I get 
off work. (I'm leaving at 5 p.m. ON THE DOT today....whooo, hooo!) But this 
newfound life perfection sounds like it deserves a phone conversation.

Kate

Anna Symes <annas@cobs.edu> on 04/02/2001 04:17:25 PM
Hey lady!

What's up?  I just had the most hectic week of my life!  I had such a great
time with Dad and Laura - is it just me or does he get cooler every time you
see him?  He took me, Nathan, Michelle and Monica out to this awesome
restaurant and totally paid for everyone.  I was so touched, especially
since I think they're kind of trying to watch the funds.  My car is great!
It's so little and perfect.  Then as soon as they left I went on my Outward
Bound weekend, which was incredible.  We went snowshoeing, did a ropes
course, and learned how to use a map and compass (the last thing was SO fun
- I want to buy a compass and carry it around with me everyday).  Anyway,
I'll have to tell you more about it on the phone since it was kind of
complicated, but super fun.  I had SUCH a great time, and I'm even more
convinced that this is the right job for me right now.  Nathan is still good
- I'm installing a toothbrush at his apartment, which I think is a good
sign.  He's great.

So what's going on in your life?  Call me tonight if you get a chance!

Love, yo sista

It looks like one of our schedules got cut. I'm checking with Phil Platter on 
this one, and I'll let you know when I find out.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/02/2001 12:00 PM

Kate, please check, deal 565759.01, I verballed the trade with APB on Friday 
3/30/01
Enron Sells Idaho
4/2-4/2
220.00    total mw s400
sp 15

Looks like it has been changed, each hour a different mw. 
Please let me know the details.
Thanks
Stephanie

hi

it's been changed

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/03/2001 09:06 AM
Hi Kate can you please ch the energy type to Firm instead of CAISO Energy on 
deal 532921. 

Thanks!

This was a futures contract done by Matt Motley, and I entered the forward 
deal. I wasn't aware that futures deals don't get confirmed. I only knew that 
when the contract expires, I need to enter a forward deal in EnPower to hold 
the trader's position. It looks like you've already added a comment about the 
trade going physical off of the NYMEX. Is there anything else you'd like me 
to add? If not, I'll just make a note in the comments section of forward 
deals entered in place of expiring futures contracts, and I'll mark "no 
confirm" on these deals as well.

Thanks,
Kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
04/03/2001 09:47 AM
Hello, 563928 is a deal that went physical off of the NYMEX.  I am not sure 
who entered the trade but if we could get you all to put a comment saying the 
trade went physical off of the NYMEX that would help us alot.  We do not 
confirm these trades.  We sent a confirm out to the counterparty for this 
trade and referenced the incorrect contract.

Thanks for your help,
Melissa

Yes, I just got an e-mail from Evelyn saying that Prebon didn't recognize 
this exact deal. Mark checked it out and determined he had gone through APB. 
I will change this when our calc is done - in about 30 min.

Thanks, 
Kate

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 02:48 PM
462105
broker has transalta

missing deal for mark

buy aquila
50 mw
100.00
dec
palo
on peak

Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Leaf finished his shift at 6 a.m. today - he'll be back at 6 p.m. But I 
talked to Bill Williams about it and he saw the trade in the Real Time log, 
and said he remembers hearing Leaf do the trade with Sempra. If you have a 
number for Harry at Sempra, I'd be glad to give him a call and figure this 
out. Let me know.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/03/2001 10:47 AM

Kate, 
Deal 567990.01, trader at Sempra, does not show this trade.   Harry from the 
backoffice called. 
Please ask Leaf.

Thanks
Stephanie

I just called and left a message with Harry - I'll let you know if we're able 
to figure it out.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/03/2001 11:35 AM

Kate, thanks for looking into it as always!   Harry Gaines's number at Sempra 
is 203-355-5623
I could call either way, just let me know!
Thanks

   Kate Symes                04/03/2001 01:14 PM

Leaf finished his shift at 6 a.m. today - he'll be back at 6 p.m. But I 
talked to Bill Williams about it and he saw the trade in the Real Time log, 
and said he remembers hearing Leaf do the trade with Sempra. If you have a 
number for Harry at Sempra, I'd be glad to give him a call and figure this 
out. Let me know.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/03/2001 10:47 AM

Kate, 
Deal 567990.01, trader at Sempra, does not show this trade.   Harry from the 
backoffice called. 
Please ask Leaf.

Thanks
Stephanie

These are the latest figures I have - I'm so sorry for the delay! I'm calling 
Willie Harrell in Global Risk right now to determine why these prices are not 
yet in pub posting and how we can come up with a more reliable system.

Kate
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:12:53 PM
 - Cob.xls
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:13:19 PM
 - SP 15 pages.xls
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:13:13 PM
 - Palo.xls
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:13:00 PM
 - MeadMktplace (2).xls
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:13:05 PM
 - MidC.xls
djenergy <djenergy@dowjones.com> on 04/02/2001 04:13:10 PM
 - NP 15 pages.xls

Bill Williams just talked to Jake, the Sempra trader who did the trade, who 
recognized the deal and said he'd speak with Harry and clear it up. In the 
meantime, this is a good trade.

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/03/2001 10:47 AM

Kate, 
Deal 567990.01, trader at Sempra, does not show this trade.   Harry from the 
backoffice called. 
Please ask Leaf.

Thanks
Stephanie

BLOOMBERG
569021 - changed to Bloomberg

PREBON
Tom Alonso
checked with broker - Tom Alonso did not do this deal - Jeff Richter did a 
similar one but it is with Williams, not Reliant......???

Jeff Richter
closest deal I can see is 569178 - all same terms except it's at NP not SP

AMEREX
Mike Swerzbin
569315 - added Amerex as broker

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/03/2001 02:20 PM
BLOOMBERG

deal 569021
I think the broker should be Bloomberg instead of APB

PREBON  WEST
 
Tom Alonso
I am missing the following deal
Enron sells to Reliant 25mw 4/5-4/30 SP-15 at $263

Jeff Richter
I am missing:
Enron sells to WESCO 25 mw 4/5-4/30 SP-15 at $286

AMEREX WEST

Mike Swerzbin
I am missing:
Enron sells EES 50mw May-Dec NP-15 light at $200.

568843 - added fee of .0275, but Sean Crandall believes price should stay at 
300.00

569178 - changed broker from APB to Prebon

569021 - changed broker from APB to Bloomberg

569270 - changed broker from APB to Amerex

Stephanie Piwetz   04/03/2001 02:05 PM

Kate, please check
APB showed
Diana Scholtes
568843.01   price 302.00  (and doesn't fee have .0275)

Apb did not show  Richter deal 569178.01

and Tom Alonso deal 569021.01 (apb only shows one trade 568998.01)
569021.01 >bloomberg, we received a broker confirm.

Sean Crandall 569270.01  apb no show

Thanks

broker is right - changed to Allegheny Energy Supply - formerly Merrill Lynch

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/03/2001 02:55 PM
Evelyn Metoyer
04/03/2001 04:54 PM
amerex
Mike Swerzbin
deal 569270    569323
Amerex show cp as Merrill Lynch and we show Morgan Stanley

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/03/2001 04:31 PM

BLOOMBERG
569021 - changed to Bloomberg

PREBON
Tom Alonso
checked with broker - Tom Alonso did not do this deal - Jeff Richter did a 
similar one but it is with Williams, not Reliant......???

Jeff Richter
closest deal I can see is 569178 - all same terms except it's at NP not SP

AMEREX
Mike Swerzbin
569315 - added Amerex as broker

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/03/2001 02:20 PM
BLOOMBERG

deal 569021
I think the broker should be Bloomberg instead of APB

PREBON  WEST
 
Tom Alonso
I am missing the following deal
Enron sells to Reliant 25mw 4/5-4/30 SP-15 at $263

Jeff Richter
I am missing:
Enron sells to WESCO 25 mw 4/5-4/30 SP-15 at $286

AMEREX WEST

Mike Swerzbin
I am missing:
Enron sells EES 50mw May-Dec NP-15 light at $200.

sure thing - you looked like you could use a little late afternoon pick-me-up.

Jesse Bryson
04/03/2001 05:14 PM
thanks kate

whaaaa? it's the end of a long day - i can't decipher these rhyming puzzles.

Jesse Bryson
04/03/2001 05:17 PM
where to?

Sorry - 462105 is Transalta - my error.

And Mark's APB deal # is 461972.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 02:48 PM
462105
broker has transalta

missing deal for mark

buy aquila
50 mw
100.00
dec
palo
on peak

Congratulations, Dave! 

Christopher F Calger
04/04/2001 08:31 AM
Dave Fuller has recently joined the ENA West Gas Desk.  Dave will continue to 
work here in Portland, but will report to Barry Tycholiz in Houston.    As 
Manager of Origination, Dave will be responsible for originating commodity, 
service, transport and storage transactions with utility and industrial 
customers across the Western U.S.  Please join me in congratulating Dave on 
his new position.  

Mark -
Attached you'll find the spreadsheet you sent me with notes I've added on 
each deal discrepancy. Most had already been solved, and a few pertain to 
Real Time spreadsheets, in which case I'll defer to Bill Williams. Please let 
me know if you have questions on any of my notes. If not, I believe we should 
be all set for March.

Thanks for your patience,
Kate

Mark Confer
04/03/2001 09:52 AM
Kate I believe you can help us on all of these if you note any that I need to 
get with someone else on please let me know right away.   Tomorrow is the 3rd 
workday and we need to make our journal entries booking inter-co at the end 
of the day. 

Thanks for all your help.

Brooklyn, please look this file over and let me know right away if there is 
anything I missed or need to add.

   

Oops - it might help if I actually ATTACHED the attachment.

Mark -
Attached you'll find the spreadsheet you sent me with notes I've added on 
each deal discrepancy. Most had already been solved, and a few pertain to 
Real Time spreadsheets, in which case I'll defer to Bill Williams. Please let 
me know if you have questions on any of my notes. If not, I believe we should 
be all set for March.

Thanks for your patience,
Kate

Mark Confer
04/03/2001 09:52 AM
Kate I believe you can help us on all of these if you note any that I need to 
get with someone else on please let me know right away.   Tomorrow is the 3rd 
workday and we need to make our journal entries booking inter-co at the end 
of the day. 

Thanks for all your help.

Brooklyn, please look this file over and let me know right away if there is 
anything I missed or need to add.

   

Les - 
I received the following e-mail from Confirms in Houston re: deals for which 
they need unit names. I sorted through the list and changed the purchases to 
"no confirm," and these three deals are what's left. Could you add the names 
in the comments section?

568866 - SELL EWEB AT BPA SYSTEM BORDER
568864 - SELL EWEB AT EWEB SYSTEM BORDER
568860 - SELL LADWP AT MCCULLOUGH

Thanks,
Kate
	
	

There are several unit contingent deals that don't have the unit name in the 
comment section.  Can you have them put in this information.  I know you sent 
us a reference sheet, but I think it would be better if the trader would 
specify the unit in the comment section.
568866
568864
568863
568857
568860
568865

Also, there was a deal on the no report this morning that looked to us like 
it probably should be confirmed.  Can you take a look at it and let me know?
#567992

Thanks!

Good afternoon, IT Wizards -

I'm curious about a feature on the new Forward Obligation Report. It is now 
possible to run the report showing term, scheduled, or liquidated deals. In 
the past I've always run the report showing term deals, then entered my 
desk-to-desk deals from those numbers. Now I believe the report is designed 
to pull data from our scheduling database, so I'm wondering what the 
difference is between the term deal report and the scheduled deal report. 
Each produce completely different numbers! Please let me know when you get a 
chance.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Here is the information I received back from IT in Houston regarding the 
Forward Obligation Report. It looks like, for our purposes, the most accurate 
way to run the report is showing only term deals. The "Schedule" and 
"Liquidate" versions of the report do not capture desk-to-desk deals, and 
therefore will not show our traders' positions in relation to each other, 
which I believe is what we're looking for. Am I right? Or totally crazy? Let 
me know what you think.

Thanks,
Kate
    Hi Diana & Kate,

    You are not wasting our time, you make our time valuable. You should be 
able to see ver 3.0.0.36 in production and ver 3.0.0.38 in stage,
    if not phone David Poston for support. Ver 3.0.0.38 is newer and includes 
insignifficant changes on the form for selection desks, which
    Corry Bentley requested here. They don't allow us to promote now things 
like that to production the last five days and the first day of the month.

   Now the report is able to show both the term and schedule (liquidation) 
data. The term data are the way the deal was entered with
   Deal Entry, Deal Blotter or EOL bridge, signed and confirmed. The schedule 
data should be very much the same with all the changes
   in Deal Scheduling. There is no difference between schedule and 
liquidation data, schedule data is a subset of liquidation one in time and
   it is about 2-3 weeks. At the moment the schedule strips for WEST contain 
data from 3/22/2001 to 4/5/2001, and the liquidation
   the same data from 4/2/1996. 

   Because we don't schedule normally desk-to-desk deals (I think we schedule 
between EAST and WEST only) we don't have schedule
   (liquidation) data for desk-to-desk. I hided the check box to avoid 
confusions. The option Show Desk is very simple, changes the format
   of the header for Region, nothing else.

   Kroum

Kroum,

I was running the new version of the Obligation Report.  I was not included 
in the testing phase of the new version and apparently the report is still 
not doing what the "fix" was initiated for.  Originally, my discussions with 
Doung Luu was for the Obligation report to capture: 1. All deals with any 
changes made in Deal Scheduling and  2.  All Desk to Desk deals.  Number 
(2),   I believe was the difficult one.  When selecting the option on "Show 
Deals"  in order to capture schedule changes you must select "Liquidate".  
This does work, but it does not give you the option to select "Show Desk to 
Desk", which like I said before, was the intent of the changes.  Please 
contact me for further discussion.  I apologize for not participating and 
wasting your time.  

Sincerely,

Diana Scholtes
(503) 464-3807

Good afternoon, IT Wizards -

I'm curious about a feature on the new Forward Obligation Report. It is now 
possible to run the report showing term, scheduled, or liquidated deals. In 
the past I've always run the report showing term deals, then entered my 
desk-to-desk deals from those numbers. Now I believe the report is designed 
to pull data from our scheduling database, so I'm wondering what the 
difference is between the term deal report and the scheduled deal report. 
Each produce completely different numbers! Please let me know when you get a 
chance.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

It should be COB S/N.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/04/2001 12:57 PM
568843
should the delivery point be cob s/n or cob n/s?

thanks

I just finally heard back from the traders on this deal. Apparently, Idaho's 
schedule was cut by the ISO on Sunday, and therefore, we had to cut our sale 
to them. The deal was originally 25 mw on peak, but was cut about 10 mw each 
hour. That's why each hour now shows 15 mw and some scraps. The remainder of 
the schedule we sold in the hour ahead market. This is a typical maneuver 
when the ISO cuts schedules, but I guess you guys haven't had to confirm 
daily deals in this situation before. Let me know if this is going to be a 
problem, and we'll figure something out.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/02/2001 12:00 PM

Kate, please check, deal 565759.01, I verballed the trade with APB on Friday 
3/30/01
Enron Sells Idaho
4/2-4/2
220.00    total mw s400
sp 15

Looks like it has been changed, each hour a different mw. 
Please let me know the details.
Thanks
Stephanie

price changed to 420.00

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/04/2001 02:02 PM
570324
broker has 420.00

changed to Prebon

Stephanie Piwetz   04/04/2001 02:13 PM

Kate, 
apb not showing Richter deal 570023.01, prebon claiming.  Thanks

Mike has this deal in his trade log as 25 MW, but he said he'd go with the 
broker on this one and sell 50 MW to BPA.

Thanks,
Kate

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
11/17/2000 02:55 PM
461136
mike
broker has 25 mw, we have 50

I've attached the EES March Dailies spreadsheet. It should reflect the latest 
volumes and hopefully will clear up some of the discrepancies we're seeing 
between EES and EPMI. Also, I've autoscheduled the following deals in an 
attempt to feed them through to the CARP report. Please let me know if you 
see the changes come through, Mark. 

The autoscheduled deals are:

533090 - 3/1/01-3/31/01
535419 - 3/2/01
535420 - 3/2/01
566081 - 3/1/01-3/31/01
550208 - 3/15/01

The last deal I'm checking on is #535568 - in your spreadsheet you said EES 
saw the on peak hours totalling 1070.75 MWH and believed the on peak hours 
should actually total 1016.75 MWH. Below are the volumes I see both in the 
EnPower deal and in the March Dailies spreadsheet. 

+____________
=         1016.75 

Maybe we need to autoschedule this one as well? Please let me know how the 
CARP report looks now, and call me with questions. Hopefully this wraps it up 
for March!

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486

570011 - Prebon said it's their deal
570023 - broker was changed to Prebon
570801 - I'm waiting until after the calc to change del.point to NP
570473 - waiting for calc to add .005 broker fee
570444 - waiting for calc to add .005 broker fee
569957 - changed in CAPS but not Enpower - waiting for calc

Sorry about all those unfinished ones, but Risk started calcing a while 
before I got your e-mail, and they're still going. I'll let you know when 
these deals have been corrected.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/04/2001 02:58 PM
PREBON WEST

Chris Mallory
deal 570011
Prebon does not recognize

deal 570023
Broker should be Prebon not APB

deal 570801
location s/b NP not SP

AMEREX WEST
All deals are fine.

BLOOMBERG

DEAL 570473
bloomberg shows fee of .005

deal 570444
bloomberg shows fee of .005

deal 569957
Bloomberg shows cp as Allegheny Energy and we show Duke Energy
P.S. if this did should be Duke the correct entity should be Duke Power, a 
division.......not Duke Energy Marketing..

570801 - changed to NP-15
570473 - added .005 broker fee
570444 - added .005 broker fee
569957 - changed CTPY to Allegheny Energy Supply

Sorry for the delay!

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 07:17 AM
What's the status on the changes?

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/04/2001 05:44 PM

570011 - Prebon said it's their deal
570023 - broker was changed to Prebon
570801 - I'm waiting until after the calc to change del.point to NP
570473 - waiting for calc to add .005 broker fee
570444 - waiting for calc to add .005 broker fee
569957 - changed in CAPS but not Enpower - waiting for calc

Sorry about all those unfinished ones, but Risk started calcing a while 
before I got your e-mail, and they're still going. I'll let you know when 
these deals have been corrected.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/04/2001 02:58 PM
PREBON WEST

Chris Mallory
deal 570011
Prebon does not recognize

deal 570023
Broker should be Prebon not APB

deal 570801
location s/b NP not SP

AMEREX WEST
All deals are fine.

BLOOMBERG

DEAL 570473
bloomberg shows fee of .005

deal 570444
bloomberg shows fee of .005

deal 569957
Bloomberg shows cp as Allegheny Energy and we show Duke Energy
P.S. if this did should be Duke the correct entity should be Duke Power, a 
division.......not Duke Energy Marketing..

I sent an e-mail to Les Rawson about these deals yesterday, but - oops! - 
he's not in the office. I just had Stan Cocke enter the unit names in them, 
so you should see the following in the comments section -

568866 - unit name is Willamett Industries Albany Paper Mill
568864 - unit name is Grays Harbor Paper Mill
568860 - unit name is Las Vegas Cogeneration Facility

Thanks,
Kate

Kimberly Hundl@ENRON
04/05/2001 07:51 AM
hi kate!
there are some unit contingent deals from the 3rd that do not have the unit 
name in deal entry.  these are the deal numbers:
568860
568864
568866
thanks!
Kim

Just a reminder -

We have added a new pub code to EnPower. The code is for the Dow Jones COB 
Sunday Index. Please advise that the Portland West Desk has one deal in the 
system at this time against that index, and more may follow.

Thanks for your help with entering these prices.

Kate

I've added the third leg to deal 566375 and changed comments in each leg to 
reflect that. We had a bit of confusion about who was actually adding the new 
pub code, but it's in the system now and the deal is ready to be confirmed. 
Just a note - I previously had all the Sunday and Holiday hours in the 
off-peak leg of this deal (so Risk could calc the value correctly), and now 
I've deleted those strips to account for leg 3 which contains only Sunday and 
Holiday hours. Please let me know if anything looks different, other than 
that, on your end.

Thanks,
Kate

I just talked to Chris about this. Apparently, the Reliant trader thought he 
was clicking an SP-15 trade, and called immediately afterward to ask Chris if 
it could be adjusted. It was more lucrative for Chris to do this deal at 
SP-15 than NP-15 anyway, so he agreed. I guess I'm unclear about the exact 
EOL guidelines in a situation like this, but please let me know if there's 
anyone you'd like me to talk to. Chris didn't have the trader's name offhand, 
but I could probably get him to research it a bit more. Just let me know what 
you need from us.

Thanks,
Kate

Kate, 
#562373 was an EOL trade that Chris Mallory did. When it was done on line the 
delivery point was NP-15 now in Enpower it has been changed to SP-15. Could 
you check with Chris if this is correct. I thought that we were not allowed 
to change EOL trades. If he did then I will have to get with Legal to find 
out what our next step would be.

Thanks,

Kimberly

Enron Power Marketing, Inc.
Kimberly Indelicato Office:713-853-3031
Trading Support Fax:713-646-2443
kallen3@enron.com

Thanks so much, Willie!

   
	
	

I have already began posting rates (4/1/2001) for this pub code.  wlh

This deal has been autoscheduled and should show up with correct on peak 
volumes on the new CARP report.

Kate

You are such a renewable energy stud! I'm excited to see you and Elliot 
transform the way the world thinks of POWER.

K
	
	

I am pleased to announce that Jesse Bryson will be joining me as a Research 
Analyst on the Renewable Power Desk effective April 16.

Thanks a lot, Kerri.

I'm just sending the sheets that are saved in our system. Bill Williams told 
me he cleared everything up on the Real Time side yesterday, but if the 
volumes in these documents still look wrong, please let me know.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

deal is in at 260.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/05/2001 02:12 PM
571497 
broker has 260.00

PREBON
571801 was a duplicate of another sale to EES - Mike killed the duplicate 
(#571920) and kept this deal

AMEREX
572245 - changed to BOM (4/9 - 4/30)

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 02:25 PM
BLOOMBERG
No Errors

PREBON WEST

Mike Swerzbin
DEAL 571801
Prebon does not recognize

AMEREX WEST

Dianna Scholtes
deal 572245
Amerex shows term as BOM we have in as 4/6-4/7

Thanks for the clarification (Mike was a little off!) - we've killed 571801 
and restored 571920.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 02:42 PM
571801 is the deal that is not good.  It is for Cal'02.  
571920 for Cal'03 is a good deal and it was verbaled

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/05/2001 04:29 PM

PREBON
571801 was a duplicate of another sale to EES - Mike killed the duplicate 
(#571920) and kept this deal

AMEREX
572245 - changed to BOM (4/9 - 4/30)

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 02:25 PM
BLOOMBERG
No Errors

PREBON WEST

Mike Swerzbin
DEAL 571801
Prebon does not recognize

AMEREX WEST

Dianna Scholtes
deal 572245
Amerex shows term as BOM we have in as 4/6-4/7

Mike did a deal with these terms but a price of 380 - deal is #571917. But he 
said a price like $292.50 doesn't sound right for Sept. - possibly May?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 03:03 PM
Amerex is showing a deal on their checkout I did not verbal

Enron buys from Aquila Sept. 01 PV 25 mw peak hrs at $292.50

Yep - the trade's there all right. I just talked to Mike again and he said 
he'd love to take the trade, but he's sure it's an error. To avoid any 
confusion later, and because he's already left the office for today, let's 
have Mike talk to his Amerex broker tomorrow morning and clear this up. He 
just might get a sweet deal out of it!

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 03:19 PM
This is what amerex is showing and this is what I have confirmed.

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/05/2001 04:59 PM

Mike did a deal with these terms but a price of 380 - deal is #571917. But he 
said a price like $292.50 doesn't sound right for Sept. - possibly May?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 03:03 PM
Amerex is showing a deal on their checkout I did not verbal

Enron buys from Aquila Sept. 01 PV 25 mw peak hrs at $292.50

This morning I was notified by Confirms in Houston that one of the deal 
changes I made last night didn't come through on their side. If you refer to 
the Deal Correction Report from yesterday, Mike Swerzbin did a deal with EES 
for Cal'03 that he mistakenly entered twice, once for Cal'03 (571920) and 
once for Cal'02 (571801). He killed 571920 and kept 571801, but the trade was 
actually for Cal'03. (Is everyone still with me?) So I restored 571920 and 
killed 571801 to reverse what he had done. But in my rush just before your 
calc last night I neglected to look at the volumes of the deal I was 
restoring, which incidently had been zeroed out, thus leaving Mike with no 
value for either of the deals. 

I've reinstated the volumes in deal 571920 and added the error to today's 
deal correction report. I just wanted to give you guys a heads up. Please let 
me know if you have questions.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn -
Here's the status of those year-long deals I changed last night. Everything 
should look good now - 571920 now has 25 mwh and 571801 is killed. Let me 
know if you still see something wrong.

Thanks,
Kate
This morning I was notified by Confirms in Houston that one of the deal 
changes I made last night didn't come through on their side. If you refer to 
the Deal Correction Report from yesterday, Mike Swerzbin did a deal with EES 
for Cal'03 that he mistakenly entered twice, once for Cal'03 (571920) and 
once for Cal'02 (571801). He killed 571920 and kept 571801, but the trade was 
actually for Cal'03. (Is everyone still with me?) So I restored 571920 and 
killed 571801 to reverse what he had done. But in my rush just before your 
calc last night I neglected to look at the volumes of the deal I was 
restoring, which incidently had been zeroed out, thus leaving Mike with no 
value for either of the deals. 

I've reinstated the volumes in deal 571920 and added the error to today's 
deal correction report. I just wanted to give you guys a heads up. Please let 
me know if you have questions.

Thanks,
Kate

This deal discrepancy seems to have a few of us stumped - so I'm referring it 
to all of you in hopes that we can solve this today. Following are the terms 
of the deal:

Short Term California buys Enron Energy Services
Hours: HE 6-9
Delivery Point: SP-15
Term: 3/29/01
Price: $110

The deal was entered by Bert Meyers, a Real Time trader, on behalf of STCA. 
It was extended for HE 9 through 22 at a price of $160. In the spreadsheet 
Real Time sends to EES each day, it shows the deal as a sale at a price of 
$130, not a buy at a price of $160.  My first instinct was to simply modify 
the spreadsheet to match the deal in Enpower, but EES claims they see the 
price coming across as $130. I'm reluctant to send any more incorrect 
information to EES, as we've already dealt with enough confusion over this 
matter. Please take a look at the deal and its corresponding documents, and 
let me know which is the correct price.

Thanks for your help,
Kate

It should have been Sierra Power Corp. I've changed it.

Thanks,
kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
04/06/2001 11:58 AM
Hello, Sierra Pacific Power Company called me and they don't recognize this 
trade.  Could it possibly be with another counterparty?

Thanks,
Melissa
(713) 853-1886

I was told that I will need an employee number in order to enter the hours 
I've worked this week. Is this something I should have already? Please let me 
know whenever you get a free moment.

I changed this deal, by the way. Please let me know if the broker thinks he's 
wrong.

Mike checking with his broker right now.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/06/2001 11:57 AM
Kate, what's the status?

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/05/2001 05:16 PM

Yep - the trade's there all right. I just talked to Mike again and he said 
he'd love to take the trade, but he's sure it's an error. To avoid any 
confusion later, and because he's already left the office for today, let's 
have Mike talk to his Amerex broker tomorrow morning and clear this up. He 
just might get a sweet deal out of it!

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 03:19 PM
This is what amerex is showing and this is what I have confirmed.

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/05/2001 04:59 PM

Mike did a deal with these terms but a price of 380 - deal is #571917. But he 
said a price like $292.50 doesn't sound right for Sept. - possibly May?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/05/2001 03:03 PM
Amerex is showing a deal on their checkout I did not verbal

Enron buys from Aquila Sept. 01 PV 25 mw peak hrs at $292.50

one was in with prebon - 572999 - it's been changed to apb

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/06/2001 01:24 PM
572988, jeff r

broker shows this deal twice.

thanks

Mark just told me this trade was done direct - I've deleted the broker out of 
deal 573083.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 06:58 AM
Kate what is the status of this deal because I just called Bloomberg again 
and they do not recognize this deal.

Thanks!!

Evelyn Metoyer
04/06/2001 04:23 PM
BLOOMBERG 

deal 573083
Mark Fischer
Is this a good deal with Bloomberg because they haven't sent a confirmation 
yet.

PREBON
All are o.k.

AMEREX WEST 
All are o.k.

Thanks!
Kate Symes

I've changed both deals to FPL Energy Power Marketing. Tom said the guy who 
calls him from this counterparty each day says he's from Florida Power & 
Light - so he's going to ask him next time which counterparty he'd like us to 
specify in the deal. Also, I changed 570450 to a price of $80.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

Kate, This is a Tom Alonso trade. For these two trades they are entered as 
Florida Power & Light. FPL Energy Power Marketing sent a confirmation over on 
this trade. Could you ask Tom if he entered the trade incorrectly for both 
deal numbers. Secondly on #570450 the confirmation shows a price of $80. We 
have $85.00 in the system. Which one is correct?

Thanks,

Kimberly

Both have been changed to CAISO energy.

   
	
	

These two deals have firm energy with np/sp delivery point.

Thanks!

574044
574061

Here you go!

Because I'm not quite sure who to direct this request to, I'm e-mailing 
everyone I think might be involved in entering new counterparty names. One of 
our mid-marketers has executed a deal with Sierra Pacific Holding Company, 
which is a new counterparty name and needs to be added as a choice in 
Enpower. Please let me know if I've contacted the correct people, and if I've 
contacted the incorrect people. (Sorry!)

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

I've added the fee - these are supposed to default when traders enter the 
deals in Enpower, but for some reason Bloomberg fees aren't coming through 
lately. I'm checking with IT on this.

Thanks,
Kate

PS - I'll add you to the Deal Correction Report mail list starting today.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 12:59 PM
deal 574356
Jeff Richter
Kate Bloomberg shows a fee of .005 on this deal and we show no fee.

Thanks

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Thanks for taking the initiative to get everyone together in the spirit of 
spending Andy and/or Gray's money. Things like this need to happen more 
often, in my opinion. 

That's a picture of you in high school, right?

fee has been added

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/09/2001 01:08 PM
can you pls check on this fee.

531888, broker has a fee

thanks

Joanie!
I have been soooo busy lately and I'm starting to feel like I sold my soul to 
the Enron devil. In fact, I have no time to be writing this e-mail right now, 
but I've been meaning to drop a line and catch up with you. I also just ran 
into Brigdet (from the class below us at SMA) at lunch - apparently she's 
married to some baseball player. Crazy! So right away I had to contact my 
ever-realistic "single" friend to bring me some sanity. I'm actually dating a 
guy right now, but it still gives me the chills to hear about anyone near my 
age walking down the toilet...I mean aisle. Anyway, call me, or I'll call you 
tonight - let's dish! I hope everything's great with you - I expect nothing 
less. I have lots of interesting stories to tell about how and why I've come 
to the decision that I'm sending my roommates to rehab.

Love,
Kate 
503-464-7486 (work)
503-288-6546 (home)
503-819-2181 (cell)

PREBON
Both Phil's deals have been changed to buys already, and Mike is entering the 
AEP sale right now.

Thanks,
kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 02:30 PM
AMEREX WEST
All deals are o.k.

PREBON

Phil Platter
deal 574394
Prebon show as a sell.....enpower has buy

Phil Platter
deal 574395
Prebon show as a sell.....enpower has buy

Mike Swerzbin
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to AEP Cal'02 NP-15 25 mw at $132.00 peak hrs.

BLOOMBERG
All deals are o.k.

I get a "no records selected" message when I try to pull up 576220. ????

   
	
	

Can you check and make sure this is the correct counterparty on this deal?  
We did a deal in February (#533916) with a little different name.  Also we 
will need a counterparty contact.

Thanks!

Sean has COB in his trade log. He originally had Mid-C, then crossed it out. 
Sounds like Amerex just hasn't updated their website with the change. 

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 02:35 PM
Amerex West

deal 576348
Sean Crandall
Amerex confirmed deal as COB however, their web checkout has Mid-C.  Can you 
please reconfirm the delivery point with Sean.

Thanks

Sorry - I misread the e-mail. Checked with Jeff Richter - they should be 
sales, and they're changed in Enpower now.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 02:44 PM
These deals should be change to sells not buys.....they are already buys in 
enpower

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/09/2001 04:34 PM

PREBON
Both Phil's deals have been changed to buys already, and Mike is entering the 
AEP sale right now.

Thanks,
kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/09/2001 02:30 PM
AMEREX WEST
All deals are o.k.

PREBON

Phil Platter
deal 574394
Prebon show as a sell.....enpower has buy

Phil Platter
deal 574395
Prebon show as a sell.....enpower has buy

Mike Swerzbin
I am missing the following deal:
Enron sells to AEP Cal'02 NP-15 25 mw at $132.00 peak hrs.

BLOOMBERG
All deals are o.k.

deal is in as off peak - did someone already fix it?

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/09/2001 01:58 PM
574712
broker has this deal off peak

Thank you!

Melissa Ann Murphy
04/09/2001 02:08 PM
Hello, I have sumitted a formal global counterparty request for this new 
counterparty.  I will let you know when it is set up.

Thanks,
Melissa

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

How in the hell do you get out of work at 3:45? Well, you've inspired me - 
I'm going to haul ass home and maybe make it there by 6 pm - whoo-hoooooo! 
But seriously, call me tonight if you get a chance. If not, I'll try you (if 
I can dig up your home number somewhere) or call when you get into town this 
weekend. I'll be around, so we HAVE to hang out at least once. 'Kay? Or I'll 
just stalk you. 'Kay? Take care.

Love,
Kate

I spoke with Paul Choi, the mid-marketer who did this deal, and he said the 
deal should be with The City of Oakland, a municipal corporation, not Port of 
Oakland. Also, the contact is still Wing Lau @ 510-627-1457. I'll change it 
when Risk is done with the calc.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

Sorry.  I guess it's time to bring out the glasses.  The number is 576228.  

Thanks!

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 04:35 PM

I get a "no records selected" message when I try to pull up 576220. ????

   
	
	

Can you check and make sure this is the correct counterparty on this deal?  
We did a deal in February (#533916) with a little different name.  Also we 
will need a counterparty contact.

Thanks!

Please let me know if this format is accessible and useful for you. I know 
some of these deal changes aren't relevant to your calculation discrepancies, 
but I included everything just in case. If you'd like it pared down or beefed 
up, don't hesitate to ask. Thanks for your patience.

I'm sorry my response has been such a long time coming on this issue, but 
I've visited with almost every department in our office trying to figure out 
what happened to this deal. Basically, Idaho got their scheduled cut by the 
Cal-ISO, which in turn means we have to cut our schedule flowing to Idaho. So 
Jeremy Morris, one of our California schedulers, cut the first Idaho deal he 
found and passed the remainder of the schedule to Real Time to fill, which 
they did in a separate deal. So EPMI and Idaho are in agreement that the 
schedule got cut, but that we kept them whole by selling the remainder to 
Idaho in the hour-ahead market. 

Now the question is, how do we confirm the deal? From your side, is it better 
if we leave the deal as-is, or restore it to the original 25 mw off peak and 
kill the real time deal (which wouldn't really be an accurate representation 
of what happened)? Just let me know, and we'll do what we can to help.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/02/2001 12:00 PM

Kate, please check, deal 565759.01, I verballed the trade with APB on Friday 
3/30/01
Enron Sells Idaho
4/2-4/2
220.00    total mw s400
sp 15

Looks like it has been changed, each hour a different mw. 
Please let me know the details.
Thanks
Stephanie

Deal has been changed to The City of Oakland, a municipal corp., and contact 
info has been added.

Kate

   
	
	

Sorry.  I guess it's time to bring out the glasses.  The number is 576228.  

Thanks!

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 04:35 PM

I get a "no records selected" message when I try to pull up 576220. ????

   
	
	

Can you check and make sure this is the correct counterparty on this deal?  
We did a deal in February (#533916) with a little different name.  Also we 
will need a counterparty contact.

Thanks!

I've modified these deals to read as follows:

572069
West Services buys from APX
NP-15
On Peak - 12 MW @ $245 for flow 4/6-4/7
Off Peak - 12 MW @ $150 for flow 4/7
TOTAL MWH = 480

576468
West Services buys from APX
NP-15
Off Peak - 12 MW @ $140 for flow 4/6
TOTAL MWH = 96

Please let me know if this is correct. (I hope!) And don't hesitate to call 
me with questions or other deal corrections. I will be running between two 
different desks today, so if you can't reach me at my regular extension 
(503-464-7486), I can be reached at 503-464-3823.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

Kate:

Can you please modify that deal that you made the price $140 yesterday to 
make it for the 6th only?  The 7th is all at $150.

Thanks

C
Audrey Cook
04/10/2001 07:51 AM
Chris,
Good morning!  Hey, one thing I probably did not clarify to you yesterday on 
was that when the new deal ticket was set up for the $140 price strip (Deal 
#576468.1), the deal should only be in for (4/6/2001) according to APX's 
statement (not including 4/7/2001).  Therefore, the entire offpeak for your 
deal would be booked on Deal #572069.1 for the $150 price for 4/7/2001.  Let 
me know if you have any questions.  Thanks.
ajc

Audrey Cook
04/06/2001 01:27 PM
Chris,
One more quick thing on 4/6/2001- APX is showing 2 different prices for 
offpeak ($140 & $150 - different MW per strip).  EPMI is showing $150 @ 12/MW 
per offpeak hours.  This difference amounts to a $144 difference (APX has 
lower invoice).  Can you verify?  Everything else is fine....talk to you next 
week.  Have a good weekend.  
ajc

The following deal has been changed once more. Here are the details:

576468
West Services buys from APX
NP-15
Off Peak - 1.8 MW @ $140
     10.2 MW @ $150
TOTAL MWH = 96

(572069 stays 12 MW @ $150)

Please call me with questions. 

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486 or 3823

   
	
	

Kate:

Can you please modify that deal that you made the price $140 yesterday to 
make it for the 6th only?  The 7th is all at $150.

Thanks

C
Audrey Cook
04/10/2001 07:51 AM
Chris,
Good morning!  Hey, one thing I probably did not clarify to you yesterday on 
was that when the new deal ticket was set up for the $140 price strip (Deal 
#576468.1), the deal should only be in for (4/6/2001) according to APX's 
statement (not including 4/7/2001).  Therefore, the entire offpeak for your 
deal would be booked on Deal #572069.1 for the $150 price for 4/7/2001.  Let 
me know if you have any questions.  Thanks.
ajc

Audrey Cook
04/06/2001 01:27 PM
Chris,
One more quick thing on 4/6/2001- APX is showing 2 different prices for 
offpeak ($140 & $150 - different MW per strip).  EPMI is showing $150 @ 12/MW 
per offpeak hours.  This difference amounts to a $144 difference (APX has 
lower invoice).  Can you verify?  Everything else is fine....talk to you next 
week.  Have a good weekend.  
ajc

Yes, that's correct, Mark says.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/10/2001 10:55 AM

Kate, please check with trader, Mark Fischer...Public Ser New Mexico returned 
our Enron confirmation letter executed, they wrote in by delivery point: West 
Wing      500KV

Is this acceptable?  Thank you
Stephanie

All these have been changed to CAISO firm energy, and deal 576511 has been 
changed to Reliant Energy Services. Thanks for catching these. I'm forwarding 
this e-mail on to the Real Time group (again) as a reminder.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

Hello!

These deal have NP/SP delivery points with firm energy.
576522
576512
576523
576517
576513
and 576511, but this one is also the wrong CP name.  Reliant HLP doesn't 
trade in the west.  I think it should be Reliant Energy Services.

Thanks!

Hey -
Are you guys boycotting CAISO energy?

Kate
	
	

Hello!

These deal have NP/SP delivery points with firm energy.
576522
576512
576523
576517
576513
and 576511, but this one is also the wrong CP name.  Reliant HLP doesn't 
trade in the west.  I think it should be Reliant Energy Services.

Thanks!

Broker is right - I've changed the deals to Allegheny Energy Supply Co.

Thanks,
Kate

   
	
	

We got a call from Allegheny Energy Electric Cooperative complaining that we 
have sent confirmations for deals that they do not have.  Could you check on 
these two deals.  The broker paper has these deals with Allegheny Energy 
Supply Company.

577363
577360

Thanks

	
	

Kate:

Can you please modify that deal that you made the price $140 yesterday to 
make it for the 6th only?  The 7th is all at $150.

Thanks

C
Audrey Cook
04/10/2001 07:51 AM
Chris,
Good morning!  Hey, one thing I probably did not clarify to you yesterday on 
was that when the new deal ticket was set up for the $140 price strip (Deal 
#576468.1), the deal should only be in for (4/6/2001) according to APX's 
statement (not including 4/7/2001).  Therefore, the entire offpeak for your 
deal would be booked on Deal #572069.1 for the $150 price for 4/7/2001.  Let 
me know if you have any questions.  Thanks.
ajc

Audrey Cook
04/06/2001 01:27 PM
Chris,
One more quick thing on 4/6/2001- APX is showing 2 different prices for 
offpeak ($140 & $150 - different MW per strip).  EPMI is showing $150 @ 12/MW 
per offpeak hours.  This difference amounts to a $144 difference (APX has 
lower invoice).  Can you verify?  Everything else is fine....talk to you next 
week.  Have a good weekend.  
ajc

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 02:15 PM
PREBON WEST 

Mike Swerbin

deal 577579..........Prebon shows price as $345
deal 577576..........Prebon shows price as $330
deal 577574..........Prebon shows price as $330
deal 577577..........Prebon shows 50mw
deal 577578..........Prebon shows 50mw

I am still checking out. I will email you the results.

Evelyn

I'm taking over Carla Hoffman's position at the Deal Control desk in 
Portland, and I've got a request from Kim Ward to look into this deal entered 
incorrectly by our Short Term Southwest desk. Unfortunately, I need more 
information, such as the deal number and term, in order to make any changes 
to it.

If you have this or know who does, please let me know and I'll be happy to 
make any necessary changes to this deal. My number in Portland is 
503.464.7486.

Thanks,
Kate
	
	

Kate,  

A request (below) has been made to fix a deal that was entered by Tom and 
Mark incorrectly (through the option exercise function in deal blotter).  The 
deal numbers and legs that need to be fixed are listed below.  Instead of 
being a forward transaction, these legs should be entered as index forwards.  
We are paying the DJ PV index plus $5 or 5%, whichever is more.  Therefore, 
if daily prices were more than $100 at palo verde, the offset should be 1.05.

I know that i have totally confused you but let me know of any questions you 
might have and I will be glad to help.

Thanks,

Kim

Kim,

The message listed below was previously forwarded to Caroline.  Per
Caroline, I would need to talk to the actual Trader.  Please let me know if
you can help me resolve this issue.
Please call me at ext.  3-6488 if you have any questions.

Thanks,
Katrina

Katrina Johnson
11/14/2000 03:02 PM

Caroline,

Deal #420886 legs 3-7 have no price attached to the deal.  Would you please
add the DJPV index plus an offset of 5%.  On legs 2 & 8 the offset needs to
be changed from $5.00 to 5%.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Thank You,
Katrina

These have been changed to CAISO.

   
	
	

I feel like I am picking on you today!

These deals have NP/SP delivery point with firm energy.

577829
577828

Thanks!

All these deals have been changed to FPL Energy Marketing.

Stephanie Piwetz   04/10/2001 02:27 PM

Kate, 
please check the cp name....we received two confirms with cp name striked 
through:
deal 569025.01
569024.01 we have them in as Florida Power and Light Co, cp sent back with cp 
name  FPL Energy Marketing, Inc

also check deals:
577374.01
577373.01
574679.01
574678.01

Thank you
Stephanie

577133 - I just added APB for the broker.

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/10/2001 02:28 PM
missing deal for chris
buy duke
11th
25 mw
325.00
np15
off peak

Mike is taking care of these changes right now.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 02:15 PM
PREBON WEST 

Mike Swerbin

deal 577579..........Prebon shows price as $345
deal 577576..........Prebon shows price as $330
deal 577574..........Prebon shows price as $330
deal 577577..........Prebon shows 50mw
deal 577578..........Prebon shows 50mw

I am still checking out. I will email you the results.

Evelyn

577824
sell sempra
np
Q2-02
$80

This is the other side of the EES sleeve - Prebon gave Mike these prices, and 
he couldn't get ahold of them tonight, so we'll check in the morning.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:35 PM
Mike Driscol
Prebon
I am missing this deal:

Enron sells from Sempra 25 mw of Q2'02 NP-15 peak hrs at $98.00

This is the price Prebon quoted to Mike tonight - he'll be checking in the 
morning to see what the spread should have been.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:23 PM
Mike Driscoll
deal 577823
Prebon shows price as $97.95 ....enpower has $79.95

BLOOMBERG
577573 - changed to Aquila
577533 - added .005 broker fee

AMEREX
577873 - LTNW sells EES/Cal'07-Cal'10/Off Peak/$44.50

PREBON
577849 - Jeff Richter buys BP (changed broker to Prebon)

AMEREX
I see several sales to Puget in Diana's blotter at a $375 price, only one 
with Amerex, and it's for 50 MW. I'll need to get ahold of her in the morning 
to verify the brokers on these. I'll let you know as soon as I do.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:15 PM
PREBON WEST

Jeff Richter
I am missing this deal:
Enron buys BP Energy Q4 SP-15 $205.00

AMEREX WEST

Dianna Scholtes
Amerex is showing the following deals on their checkout that I did not verbal:

1) Enron sells to Puget 4/11 25 mw of Mid-C at $375
2) Enron sells to Puget 4/11 25 mw of Mid-C at $375

Mike Swerzbin
Amerex  is showing the following deals on their checkout that I did not 
verbal:
1) Enron sells to EES 25 mw of Cal'07- Cal'10 off-peak Cobb at $44.50 fee of 
.0075

BLOOMBERG 

Mike Swerzbin
deal 577573
Bloomberg shows the cp as Aquila and enpower has Idaho Power

Matt Motley
deal 577533
Bloomberg show fee of $.005

Chris -
Looks like these deals might have been entered for the wrong term. I'll check 
with Jeff on this, but if you recognize that the terms are wrong, please let 
me know and I can fix them. Here are the deals:

576274
STCA buys ARCO
SP-15
May-01
On Peak
15 MW @ $260

576275
STCA buys ARCO
SP-15
May-01
Off Peak
15 MW @ $135

Thanks for checking on this.
Kate
Kate, 
I called Alicia Izarraraz from Atlantic to verbal trades and she was 
inquiring about the term of trade, May delivery, she thought they were going 
to be for April delivery. Deals 576274.01, 576275.01.  Kate, can you ask 
Chris to call regarding inquiry.  Her cell phone is 949-637-4878, her desk 
number 562-499-3201 she said she will be out if the office soon.  No broker, 
done direct.
Thanks
Sp

Mike is checking with his broker right now.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/11/2001 08:37 AM
What's the status of these prices?  

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/10/2001 06:28 PM

577824
sell sempra
np
Q2-02
$80

This is the other side of the EES sleeve - Prebon gave Mike these prices, and 
he couldn't get ahold of them tonight, so we'll check in the morning.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:35 PM
Mike Driscol
Prebon
I am missing this deal:

Enron sells from Sempra 25 mw of Q2'02 NP-15 peak hrs at $98.00

Mike is checking with broker.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/11/2001 08:36 AM
What's the status?

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/10/2001 06:29 PM

This is the price Prebon quoted to Mike tonight - he'll be checking in the 
morning to see what the spread should have been.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:23 PM
Mike Driscoll
deal 577823
Prebon shows price as $97.95 ....enpower has $79.95

I'm sorry - this was the first correction I received this morning and since 
it didn't come in the form of an e-mail, I unfortunately overlooked it when I 
was finalizing the deal error report.

Diana says Amerex told her both deals were on the same ticket - so she 
entered deal 577201at 50 mw. I asked her to get ahold of her contact at 
Amerex to tell them they're checking out incorrectly.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/11/2001 08:36 AM
What's the status?

AMEREX
I see several sales to Puget in Diana's blotter at a $375 price, only one 
with Amerex, and it's for 50 MW. I'll need to get ahold of her in the morning 
to verify the brokers on these. I'll let you know as soon as I do.

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/10/2001 06:35 PM

BLOOMBERG
577573 - changed to Aquila
577533 - added .005 broker fee

AMEREX
577873 - LTNW sells EES/Cal'07-Cal'10/Off Peak/$44.50

PREBON
577849 - Jeff Richter buys BP (changed broker to Prebon)

AMEREX
I see several sales to Puget in Diana's blotter at a $375 price, only one 
with Amerex, and it's for 50 MW. I'll need to get ahold of her in the morning 
to verify the brokers on these. I'll let you know as soon as I do.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:15 PM
PREBON WEST

Jeff Richter
I am missing this deal:
Enron buys BP Energy Q4 SP-15 $205.00

AMEREX WEST

Dianna Scholtes
Amerex is showing the following deals on their checkout that I did not verbal:

1) Enron sells to Puget 4/11 25 mw of Mid-C at $375
2) Enron sells to Puget 4/11 25 mw of Mid-C at $375

Mike Swerzbin
Amerex  is showing the following deals on their checkout that I did not 
verbal:
1) Enron sells to EES 25 mw of Cal'07- Cal'10 off-peak Cobb at $44.50 fee of 
.0075

BLOOMBERG 

Mike Swerzbin
deal 577573
Bloomberg shows the cp as Aquila and enpower has Idaho Power

Matt Motley
deal 577533
Bloomberg show fee of $.005

I spoke with Chris, and he called Alicia who said she still believes the deal 
should be for April, not May. Chris said they are in a dispute at this point, 
because he believes the term should be May. So he asked me to leave the deals 
alone for the moment, and he will be in touch later today. Would you like me 
to make a note of this in the comments sections of the deals?

Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/11/2001 07:55 AM

Kate, 
I called Alicia Izarraraz from Atlantic to verbal trades and she was 
inquiring about the term of trade, May delivery, she thought they were going 
to be for April delivery. Deals 576274.01, 576275.01.  Kate, can you ask 
Chris to call regarding inquiry.  Her cell phone is 949-637-4878, her desk 
number 562-499-3201 she said she will be out if the office soon.  No broker, 
done direct.
Thanks
Sp

Mike talked to Prebon and changed the prices for these deals accordingly

577823 - $97.95
577824 - $98

Thanks for waiting,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/11/2001 08:37 AM
What's the status of these prices?  

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/10/2001 06:28 PM

577824
sell sempra
np
Q2-02
$80

This is the other side of the EES sleeve - Prebon gave Mike these prices, and 
he couldn't get ahold of them tonight, so we'll check in the morning.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/10/2001 03:35 PM
Mike Driscol
Prebon
I am missing this deal:

Enron sells from Sempra 25 mw of Q2'02 NP-15 peak hrs at $98.00

I sent this along to Molly, because, while I hate to admit it, I think she 
might be better suited to such a daunting task.

K

Anna Symes <annasymes@yahoo.com> on 04/11/2001 09:54:14 AM
I thought you might be interested in this job.  It's just one of the
more than 250,000 great jobs on Headhunter.net:

  http://www.headhunter.net/share/det.asp?d=J26K66D0YJBB4DWPWJ

Comments:

Anna Symes <annasymes@yahoo.com> on 04/11/2001 09:54:14 AM
I thought you might be interested in this job.  It's just one of the
more than 250,000 great jobs on Headhunter.net:

  http://www.headhunter.net/share/det.asp?d=J26K66D0YJBB4DWPWJ

Comments:

Chris -
Here's the latest I've heard on our request for a new counterparty name 
(Sierra Pacific Holding Co.) to be added to EnPower. I faxed the master 
agreement to Melissa Murphy so the Confirms group could reference it; then 
she passed the pertinent information along to Samuel Schott in Global 
Counterparty, whose job it is to set up new counterparties. But it looks like 
your contact at Sierra is saying this deal should be done with Sierra Pacific 
Industries - the parent company - rather than Sierra Pacific Holding Co. 

Do you have a preference either way? Maybe you could contact Bob Ellery and 
discuss this. Just let me know which name to add to the deal.

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486
Melissa Ann Murphy
04/11/2001 10:27 AM
Hello, Samuel Schott in Global Counterparty called this company and he was 
told that they should be set up in our system as Sierra Pacific Industries, 
Inc.  The contract has the long name on it so I am planning on asking Rhonda 
Denton about this tomorrow when she comes in.  I am not sure if it will work 
this way or not.  If you know anything else about this let me know.  Sierra 
Pacific Industries, Inc. is in Enpower but I am not certain if we should use 
that name.

I will let you know what Rhonda says tomorrow.  
Thanks,
Melissa

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Thanks for following up on this, Melissa. I've forwarded your e-mail on to 
Chris Foster and asked him to discuss the counterparty name with Bob Ellery, 
his contact at Sierra Pacific Holding Co. I'll let you know which name we 
need (or if we need one at all) as soon as I hear back from him.

Thanks again,
Kate
503-464-7486

Melissa Ann Murphy
04/11/2001 10:27 AM
Hello, Samuel Schott in Global Counterparty called this company and he was 
told that they should be set up in our system as Sierra Pacific Industries, 
Inc.  The contract has the long name on it so I am planning on asking Rhonda 
Denton about this tomorrow when she comes in.  I am not sure if it will work 
this way or not.  If you know anything else about this let me know.  Sierra 
Pacific Industries, Inc. is in Enpower but I am not certain if we should use 
that name.

I will let you know what Rhonda says tomorrow.  
Thanks,
Melissa

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Okay! Real Time has finally drilled down on the problem we were having with 
deal 564094 (STCA buys from EES/HE 9-22 @ $160) and corrected the Real Time 
sheet to reflect our price. I apologize for the delay in finding the source 
of the problem, and as it turns out it was just a matter of someone putting 
the wrong price in the sheet they sent you. Very frustrating, I know, but 
I've attached the correct sheet nonetheless. Please call or e-mail with 
questions, and I'm sure I'll hear from you soon!

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

It was great to run into you, too. This shrinking world never ceases to amaze 
me......to end up working in the same building, different industry, over a 
year later? Crazy. So, on lunch or a beer after work, just let me know the 
time and place. Lunch is a rarity with me, but I love to have an excuse to 
breathe fresh air in the middle of the day. And I need to plan ahead as well. 
I'll keep the week of the 22nd open - sound good?

Talk to you soon.
Kate

John Enders <jenders@ap.org> on 04/11/2001 08:59:19 AM
Kate: It was great to run into you. I'm glad you've found something
interesting to do in Portland.
I'm up to my ass organizing the state AP broadcasters convention at
Sunriver the weekend of the 21st.
After that, lets plan to have lunch, or maybe a beer after work. As I
said, I come in early and leave at
about 3:30 each day. Lunches are possible, but I need to plan ahead.
Again, good to see ya.
John

Anytime! Thanks for all your patience!

Kate

Kate,

Thanks for all of your help!

Brooklyn

This has been changed.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
11/20/2000 07:56 AM
Can you please change the bottom start/end date to reflect 11/21 - 11/30.  
The top start/end date shows 11/21 -  11/30 and the bottom shows 11/21 - 
11/21.

Thanks!

Mike is entering these trades right now.

Kate

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/11/2001 01:54 PM
missing deal for mike s

buy bonneville
july 01
mid c
25 mw
485.00
on peak

missing options for matt

buy pinnacle
call
30.00 prem
325.00 strike
50 mw
may
pv
on peak

buy pinnacle
put
30.00 prem
325.00 strike
50 mw
may
pv
on peak

Motley just entered these last three trades. And Chris Mallory is entering 
the AEP deal right now.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/11/2001 02:04 PM
BLOOMBERG
all o.k.

PREBON WEST

Matt Motley
I am missing the following:

1) Enron buys from Williams 25 mw SP Q4'02 at $81.00
2) Enron buys from Allegheny 25 mw PV Q4'01 at $199
3) Enron sells Avista 25mw PV Q4'01 at $199

AMEREX WEST

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal:
Enron buys from AEP 25 mw May SP-15 light at $172.00

Regarding the deal Chris Foster did on 4/6 with Sierra Pacific Holding Co. -

Bob Ellery, Sierra's Director of Energy Resources, and Steve Hall, one of 
Portland's most expeditious lawyers, have decided to execute the deal under 
the designation Sierra Pacific Industries, which is also named in the master 
agreement. We still, however, need this name added to the counterparty list 
in EnPower.

Thank you all for your help on this, and I appreciate your future assistance 
in getting this deal out of the "New Counterparty" void.

Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Yes, the correct name does include "Inc." at the end. And yes, Steve Hall 
said the master agreement works for this trade. He and Bob Ellery at Sierra 
talked over the agreement and decided to use the name that Sierra Pacific 
Holding Co. is doing business under. I've changed the deal (573679) in 
EnPower. Please let me know if you turn up any more questions.

Thanks,
Kate

Melissa Ann Murphy
04/12/2001 06:52 AM
Hello, Sierra Pacific Industries, Inc. is a choice in Enpower.  Is this the 
correct name with the "Inc." on it?  I am assuming that Steve Hall said it is 
OK to use the master agreement for this trade.

Thanks,
Melissa

   Kate Symes                04/11/2001 07:38 PM

Regarding the deal Chris Foster did on 4/6 with Sierra Pacific Holding Co. -

Bob Ellery, Sierra's Director of Energy Resources, and Steve Hall, one of 
Portland's most expeditious lawyers, have decided to execute the deal under 
the designation Sierra Pacific Industries, which is also named in the master 
agreement. We still, however, need this name added to the counterparty list 
in EnPower.

Thank you all for your help on this, and I appreciate your future assistance 
in getting this deal out of the "New Counterparty" void.

Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Yes - I've been working with Samuel Schott in Global Counterparty and Melissa 
Murphy. The new name has been entered into the system, and deal # 573679 has 
been changed from New Counterparty to Sierra Pacific Industries, Inc. (That's 
the name Sierra Pacific Holding Co. is doing business as.) Thanks for 
checking in on this, though.

Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 07:08 AM
I have been out of the office.  Has anyone responded to you on this?

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 02:06 PM

Because I'm not quite sure who to direct this request to, I'm e-mailing 
everyone I think might be involved in entering new counterparty names. One of 
our mid-marketers has executed a deal with Sierra Pacific Holding Company, 
which is a new counterparty name and needs to be added as a choice in 
Enpower. Please let me know if I've contacted the correct people, and if I've 
contacted the incorrect people. (Sorry!)

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

I sent a copy of the agreement to Melissa Murphy via fax. I'll need to get 
ahold of Chris Foster, who is in your Houston office at the moment, to locate 
the original. He won't be back in the Portland office until Monday morning. 
When would you like the original by? Just let me know - we'll get it to you 
as soon as we can.

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 07:22 AM
Can I get the original of this contract?

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Okay - I can forward the contract along on Monday when Chris Foster gets 
back. Also, I think I'd like Chris and his contact at Sierra to talk over the 
issue of whether we'll amend the contract to include "Inc." or whether we'll 
amend the counterparty name in EnPower. I've left a message for Chris 
regarding this question, and hopefully we'll touch base sometime today. I 
will let you know as soon as I hear back. (And feel free to nab him for a 
moment if you see him in the office!)

Thanks,
Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 09:03 AM
When the contract is fully executed, just forward it to me in interoffice 
mail.  I do have questions about the name that the contract has been written 
under and the name that the deals are under in Enpower.  Sierra Pacific 
Industries, Inc. is in global counterparty and the deals have been changed in 
Enpower to this CP.  The problem is that the contract and the confirms will 
not agree as to who is the correct CP.  We have always confirmed deals under 
the name of the entity with whom we have a contract.  Please let me know if 
the name will be changed on the contract to reflect the correct CP or will we 
amend the contract to add "Inc." to the end of the name and set up this dba 
in global counterparty.  I need to know before we can confirm these deals.

In additiona, Geir has entered a transmission deal for this CP.  578812.  
Should this be a buy/resale?

   Kate Symes                04/12/2001 10:35 AM

I sent a copy of the agreement to Melissa Murphy via fax. I'll need to get 
ahold of Chris Foster, who is in your Houston office at the moment, to locate 
the original. He won't be back in the Portland office until Monday morning. 
When would you like the original by? Just let me know - we'll get it to you 
as soon as we can.

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 07:22 AM
Can I get the original of this contract?

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

P.S. I'll ask Bill Williams about Geir's transmission deal. Can I ask, 
though, why it looks like it should be a buy-resale?

Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 09:03 AM
When the contract is fully executed, just forward it to me in interoffice 
mail.  I do have questions about the name that the contract has been written 
under and the name that the deals are under in Enpower.  Sierra Pacific 
Industries, Inc. is in global counterparty and the deals have been changed in 
Enpower to this CP.  The problem is that the contract and the confirms will 
not agree as to who is the correct CP.  We have always confirmed deals under 
the name of the entity with whom we have a contract.  Please let me know if 
the name will be changed on the contract to reflect the correct CP or will we 
amend the contract to add "Inc." to the end of the name and set up this dba 
in global counterparty.  I need to know before we can confirm these deals.

In additiona, Geir has entered a transmission deal for this CP.  578812.  
Should this be a buy/resale?

   Kate Symes                04/12/2001 10:35 AM

I sent a copy of the agreement to Melissa Murphy via fax. I'll need to get 
ahold of Chris Foster, who is in your Houston office at the moment, to locate 
the original. He won't be back in the Portland office until Monday morning. 
When would you like the original by? Just let me know - we'll get it to you 
as soon as we can.

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 07:22 AM
Can I get the original of this contract?

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Okay - I've changed 578812 to Sierra Pacific Power Co. I asked Bill about 
this and he said he didn't realize the counterparty was in with Sierra 
Pacific Industries and not Sierra Pacific Power. The Real Time guys pay as 
little attention as possible to counterparty names, unfortunately.

Thanks for catching this,
Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 10:41 AM
When we do not have a transmission contract with an entity, we usually do a 
buy/resale to cover the transmission over their system.

   Kate Symes                04/12/2001 11:17 AM

P.S. I'll ask Bill Williams about Geir's transmission deal. Can I ask, 
though, why it looks like it should be a buy-resale?

Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 09:03 AM
When the contract is fully executed, just forward it to me in interoffice 
mail.  I do have questions about the name that the contract has been written 
under and the name that the deals are under in Enpower.  Sierra Pacific 
Industries, Inc. is in global counterparty and the deals have been changed in 
Enpower to this CP.  The problem is that the contract and the confirms will 
not agree as to who is the correct CP.  We have always confirmed deals under 
the name of the entity with whom we have a contract.  Please let me know if 
the name will be changed on the contract to reflect the correct CP or will we 
amend the contract to add "Inc." to the end of the name and set up this dba 
in global counterparty.  I need to know before we can confirm these deals.

In additiona, Geir has entered a transmission deal for this CP.  578812.  
Should this be a buy/resale?

   Kate Symes                04/12/2001 10:35 AM

I sent a copy of the agreement to Melissa Murphy via fax. I'll need to get 
ahold of Chris Foster, who is in your Houston office at the moment, to locate 
the original. He won't be back in the Portland office until Monday morning. 
When would you like the original by? Just let me know - we'll get it to you 
as soon as we can.

Thanks,
Kate
503-464-7486

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 07:22 AM
Can I get the original of this contract?

   Kate Symes                04/09/2001 03:09 PM

I just heard from Samuel (thanks for your message!) that I need to send 
Rhonda new counterparty information in order to get their names added to the 
system. I called Rhonda, but it turns out she's out of the office for the 
first part of this week, and her voice mail referred me to Melissa. (That's a 
short explanation of why I'm sending this info. to all of you.)

Anyway, following is the information connected with the new counterparty name 
Chris Foster has requested:

Name: Sierra Pacific Holding Company, dba Sierra Pacific Industries
Address: PO Box 496028
    Redding, CA 96049
Or: 19759 Riverside Ave.
      Anderson, CA 96007
Phone: (530) 378-8179
Fax: (530) 378-8139
Contact: Director of Energy Resources - Robert Ellery

I also have a copy of the Master Power Purchase and Sale Agreement if you'd 
like me to fax that over. Just let me know how I can help. We've already 
entered Chris's deal into the system with "New Counterparty," so the sooner 
we can change that the better.

Thanks,
Kate

Looks like we might have to modify this name in EnPower after all - The dba 
on our master agreement is "Sierra Pacific Industries" with no "Inc." at the 
end. I just spoke with Bob Ellery over at Sierra, and he confirmed that, 
although the company is a corporation, they never use "Inc." in their 
contracts. Thus, our confirm letters would not match up with the master 
agreement because of those three pesky letters.

Just let me know if this causes a problem for either of you. In case you'd 
like to reference it, the deal number we're attempting to modify is 573679 - 
it's a buy from Sierra done by Chris Foster on the 10th of April. 

Thanks again for all your help.
Kate
503-464-7486

Mom -
Thanks for the heads up. I am having the same nightmare with US Bank that 
I've had each time I've deposited any money: they won't let me have it! I've 
been meaning to e-mail Anna and let her know, but that's gone by the wayside 
along with pretty much everything else since I started this new job. I tried 
to close my account on Thursday in a last ditch effort to get at my money, 
and they politely told me I could close it on the same day I could get money 
out of the ATM, which will be on Wednesday. Until then my hands are tied. I'm 
really sorry about this - I know Anna needs help, and believe me, this isn't 
very convenient for me either. I'll e-mail her right now, and send her money 
on Wednesday.

Give me a call later if you'd like to meet at the gym. 

Kate

I've changed this to BP Energy - and I was wondering - didn't BP Amoco change 
over to BP Energy? Do we ever trade with the old counterparty name anymore?

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/12/2001 12:29 PM
 
Cara Semperger
deal 580011
CP name should be BP Energy not BP Amoco.

Thanks

Thanks for checking on that, Rhonda - I'll make a mental note of it.

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/12/2001 01:34 PM
According to Rhonda we never use BP Amoco however, she thinks the Calgary 
office does.

Thanks

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/12/2001 03:13 PM

I've changed this to BP Energy - and I was wondering - didn't BP Amoco change 
over to BP Energy? Do we ever trade with the old counterparty name anymore?

Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/12/2001 12:29 PM
 
Cara Semperger
deal 580011
CP name should be BP Energy not BP Amoco.

Thanks

Bob Badeer just entered the Cal-02 deal under Long Term California desk. Deal 
# is 580382.

Thanks,
Kate

Stephanie Piwetz   04/12/2001 12:29 PM

Kate, just a heads up, I called to verbal a trade with Riverside and he 
mentioned there was another one for Cal 02, we verballed 579012.01 for Q1 
02.  
Do not see other in system.

Thanks
Stephanie

580280 - Jeff had this in with Bloomberg. I changed it to Natsource.

Kate

Kerri Thompson@ENRON
04/12/2001 01:56 PM
sell ees
may
25 mw
335.05
np15
on peak

missing this deal for jeff

It's El Paso Electric - I've changed it. 

Thanks,
Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 02:22 PM
Please see if the CP on this deal should be El Paso Electric Company.  Need 
to know by tomorrow morning because we will be loading to Unify and need 
contract numbers assigned.  Thanks.

579908 Steve Merriss

BLOOMBERG
580280 - changed to APB

580168 - added broker fee

580159 - added broker fee

580169 - STCA buys El Paso through Bloomberg (Chris had it in with Calpine)

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/12/2001 02:01 PM
BLOOMBERG

Jeff Richter
deal 580280
Bloomberg does not recognize

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal  per Bloomberg:
Enron buys from El Paso 25 mw Q3'01 SP light at $228

deal 580168
Bloomberg shows fee of $.005

Mike Swerzbin
deal 580159
Bloomberg shows fee of $.005

PREBON
All deal are o.k.

Amerex West
All deals are o.k.

You're right - I think our e-mails just crossed paths.

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/12/2001 02:22 PM
I believe this is deal 580169....the cp should be El Paso not Calpine per 
Bloomberg.

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal  per Bloomberg:
Enron buys from El Paso 25 mw Q3'01 SP light at $228

Evelyn Metoyer
04/12/2001 04:01 PM
BLOOMBERG

Jeff Richter
deal 580280
Bloomberg does not recognize

Chris Mallory
I am missing the following deal  per Bloomberg:
Enron buys from El Paso 25 mw Q3'01 SP light at $228

deal 580168
Bloomberg shows fee of $.005

Mike Swerzbin
deal 580159
Bloomberg shows fee of $.005

PREBON
All deal are o.k.

Amerex West
All deals are o.k.

I'm just going to leave this deal with "New Counterparty" for the time being. 
I had changed it to Sierra Pacific Industries, Inc., but it sounds like there 
may be a problem with this name. Please let me know what I can do to help 
this along, or give me a call when a decision is reached.

Thanks,
Kate

Rhonda L Denton
04/12/2001 11:48 AM
Sam, Please contact this CP (info on Kate's previous email) or find the dba 
information online with D&B or Lexis Nexis so that we can get the true 
lowdown on this name.  I don't think we should take the trader's information 
as gospel, for as you know, they are not always accurate.  Please let me know 
as soon as you get this information.  Thanks.
Looks like we might have to modify this name in EnPower after all - The dba 
on our master agreement is "Sierra Pacific Industries" with no "Inc." at the 
end. I just spoke with Bob Ellery over at Sierra, and he confirmed that, 
although the company is a corporation, they never use "Inc." in their 
contracts. Thus, our confirm letters would not match up with the master 
agreement because of those three pesky letters.

Just let me know if this causes a problem for either of you. In case you'd 
like to reference it, the deal number we're attempting to modify is 573679 - 
it's a buy from Sierra done by Chris Foster on the 10th of April. 

Thanks again for all your help.
Kate
503-464-7486

It's changed.

Stephanie Piwetz   04/13/2001 08:10 AM

Kate, amerex said cp should be Coral Power instead of El Paso 

, THANKS 

Mark is changing this right now.

Stephanie Piwetz   04/13/2001 09:01 AM

Kate, Fischer deal , apb says dp should be 4 Corners 345kv
THanks

Well, I only went to the gym once last week, and then pretty much ate and 
slept all weekend, so I'm feeling like a pasty white blob of winter blubber. 
I'm just starting to get "homesick" for Maui, so Mexico will come not a 
minute too soon. Also, Molly and I went to see this movie last night, Requiem 
for a Dream. It was psychotic! It made me feel like moving to a farm and 
becoming a marathon-running vegan or something. Truly a horrible, horrible 
depiction of modern-day addictions and the messed-up way our society quells 
them.

So, needless to say, I am MAKING myself go to the gym today.

Anna's job opportunity sounds great, although I'm bummed we won't be roomies 
anytime soon. Maybe I'll get transferred to Enron's Colorado office.

Kate

Yes - it's with APB - I've changed it.

   
	
	

Kate, Spoke with Prebon and they don't show this trade. Could it be with 
another Broker?

KI

Done.

Lester Rawson
04/12/2001 04:38 PM
Kate,

Please approve and autoschedule annuity # 580471. It's for 10/31/2000.

Les

I've gone ahead and entered the counterparty name "Sierra Pacific Industries, 
Inc." in Chris Foster's deal #573679, in the interest of moving it along 
through the confirmation process. (The deal was done on 4/6 and flowed on 
4/10.)

I spoke with Bob Ellery (Sierra) yesterday and he seemed fine with the name 
we have in our system, although I'm sure he's not the final authority. Then I 
spoke with the Confirms group today and they were ready to get the deal off 
of their new deal report. So, since I haven't heard anything to the contrary, 
I changed the deal from it's "new counterparty" status.

Please let me know if this presents a problem for any of you.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Here's the latest I've heard from EES regarding ways in which we've managed 
to thoroughly confuse them. I'm researching most of these questions, but as 
with last month, there are a few Real Time deals they don't see in the 
spreadsheet you guys send to them. Would you mind checking this out when you 
have a minute (or despite the fact that you don't)? If you revise anything, 
just let me know or e-mail it directly to Mark Confer and Brooklyn Couch.

Thanks,
Kate
Mark Confer
04/13/2001 10:39 AM
Kate, I looked over the list below and 90% of them look easy, just a few 
updates to the schedule or real time sheets and April activities will be well 
on the way.

Please let me know what you think, If I can help from this end I will be glad 
to.

Thanks, Mark 
Mark,

See attached for updates.

Thanks
bc

PS - I will be out of the office tomorrow.

Bill, Jr. - I'm so sorry! I should know better by now.
Bill, III - You might be more interested in this e-mail than your dad.

Kate
Here's the latest I've heard from EES regarding ways in which we've managed 
to thoroughly confuse them. I'm researching most of these questions, but as 
with last month, there are a few Real Time deals they don't see in the 
spreadsheet you guys send to them. Would you mind checking this out when you 
have a minute (or despite the fact that you don't)? If you revise anything, 
just let me know or e-mail it directly to Mark Confer and Brooklyn Couch.

Thanks,
Kate
Mark Confer
04/13/2001 10:39 AM
Kate, I looked over the list below and 90% of them look easy, just a few 
updates to the schedule or real time sheets and April activities will be well 
on the way.

Please let me know what you think, If I can help from this end I will be glad 
to.

Thanks, Mark 
Mark,

See attached for updates.

Thanks
bc

PS - I will be out of the office tomorrow.

These are done.

Have a good weekend!
Kate

Lester Rawson
04/13/2001 02:57 PM
Kate,

Please autoschedule and approve. 

9/5 581303

9/24  581304

9/27  581305

9/28  581308

10/31 581310 Annuity

11/30 581315 /  581316 Annuites

Les

Go Blazers!
Ryan Langan <ryan.langan@ripcity.com> on 04/16/2001 10:07:44 AM
> We are 99% sure we will be playing the Lakers in the first round of the
> playoffs.  Once this is announced, tickets will sell out fast!  Call me
> ASAP to reserve your seats.  The game will likely take place between April
> 25th - 27th.
>
>
> The NBA Playoffs Are Almost Here... Purchase Your Tickets In Advance Now!
>
>
>
> Blue Section (lower level endzone)  - $76.00
>
> Purple section (upper level center) - $24.00
>
> Tan section (upper level behind basket) - $11.00
>
>
>  *BONUS* - In addition to bypassing the TicketMaster service fees, each
> ticket comes with worth of $3.00 Blazer Bucks (good for food, beverages
> and merchandise in the Rose Garden).
>
>
>  To see a map with the colored sections go to http://www.blazers.com and
>  click on arena and tickets...
>
>
>  For tickets please call Ryan Langan
> @ 503-797-9936 or e-mail me at: ryan.langan@ripcity.com
>
> 

This is a Real Time deal, and that desk enters deals a bit differently than I 
do. When they initially do a deal, they enter it for a certain hour or set of 
hours. Then, if they agree with a counterparty to extend the deal to flow 
through more hours, they change the deal in Scheduling, not EnPower. The way 
to see the true volume of a Short Term West Hourly deal is to look in the 
"View Actuals" tab. If you look at this deal, you'll see that they extended 
the initial 5 MW at HE 11 to look like this:

HE 11 - 5 MW
HE 12 - 5 MW
HE 13 - 5 MW
HE 14 - 4 MW
HE 15 - 4 MW
HE 16 - 4 MW
HE 17 - 5 MW
+__________
 32 MW

Please let me know if you have any other questions.

Thanks,
Kate Symes
Trading Support
503-464-7486

Judy Dyer@EES
04/16/2001 10:48 AM
Can you please let me know if there are other deals that go with the deal # 
referenced above?  We have a total of 32 MW but this is only for 5.

Thanks
Judy

BLOOMBERG
Are you talking about the broker fee?

TRADESPARK
Matt's contact is verifying this trade as off-peak.

AMEREX
Chris just changed deal 582853 from APB to Amerex

582894 - changed to 47.75

PREBON
Bob said Matt Motley gave him this deal to do. Is that going to fly with 
Prebon?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/16/2001 01:55 PM
BLOOMBERG

deal 582589 and 582423
Bloomberg shows fee as $15.00 flat on both of these deals.

TRADESPARK

Matt Motley
deal 582856
Tradespark shows hours as on-peak not off-peak

AMEREX

Chris Mallory
I am missing:
Enron sells to Duke 4/20-4/30 NP-15 Light 25 mw at $190

Mike Swerzbin
deal 582894
Amerex says price should be $47.75 not $47.25

PREBON

Bob Badeer
deal 582668
Prebon says this deal should be Matt Motley's

I've never seen anything but a .005 broker fee on Bloomberg deals. Tom Alonso 
wanted to know when that fee changed.......we're confused!

And the Matt-Bob deal swap - I guess it was just a last minute decision on 
their part, and they should have let the broker know. Matt said the trade 
needs to stay in Bob's book, and just to check it out as a good trade with 
EPMI. Let me know if you still have problems with this.

Thanks,
Kate

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/16/2001 02:16 PM
BLOOMBERG
Are you talking about the broker fee?
Yes the fee is $15.00 Flat per Bloomberg's confirmation on both of these 
deals.

PREBON
Bob said Matt Motley gave him this deal to do. Is that going to fly with 
Prebon?
I guess this is o.k. but they were insisting that this deal was done with 
Matt not Bob. 

   Kate Symes @ ECT                04/16/2001 04:04 PM

BLOOMBERG
Are you talking about the broker fee?

TRADESPARK
Matt's contact is verifying this trade as off-peak.

AMEREX
Chris just changed deal 582853 from APB to Amerex

582894 - changed to 47.75

PREBON
Bob said Matt Motley gave him this deal to do. Is that going to fly with 
Prebon?

Evelyn Metoyer@ENRON
04/16/2001 01:55 PM
BLOOMBERG

deal 582589 and 582423
Bloomberg shows fee as $15.00 flat on both of these deals.

TRADESPARK

Matt Motley
deal 582856
Tradespark shows hours as on-peak not off-peak

AMEREX

Chris Mallory
I am missing:
Enron sells to Duke 4/20-4/30 NP-15 Light 25 mw at $190

Mike Swerzbin
deal 582894
Amerex says price should be $47.75 not $47.25

PREBON

Bob Badeer
deal 582668
Prebon says this deal should be Matt Motley's

That sounds like a good one, mom. Like I've said before, I think it's a great 
idea and would be perfect for you. Now I think you should start taking steps 
to make it happen. I know you could get your house sold, no problem. And you 
should think seriously about putting it on the market soon, as I'm starting 
to get the feeling it can take quite a while to actually sell a house. Let me 
know how I can help - for example, Brian has some friends who rent out a 
great cottage in Kihei for $100 a week. He can also get really good deals on 
rental cars. If you start shopping around for a cheap ticket now, you could 
take a scouting trip this spring and make plans to move by the following 
winter - just in time for whale-watching. 

Just do it!

Here you go, Jill - let me know what you think.

Kate
503-288-6546 or 503-819-2181

Amy FitzPatrick
04/16/2001 11:37 AM

A position has become available as an Administrative Assistant working in=
=20
West Power Trading reporting to Debra Davidson.  You will be responsible fo=
r=20
the following complex administrative duties.

? Compose memos, reports and other correspondence from a brief outline,=20
=01&sketchy=018 draft or verbal instruction.
? Greet external clients.
? Code invoices, process complex expense reports, and manage employee=20
timekeeping through SAP.
? Make travel/meeting arrangements based on minimal instruction and=20
periodically make independent decisions on details such as travel schedules=
,=20
mode of   transportation, and accommodation.
? Monitor and control filing systems ensuring accuracy and efficient=20
retrieval of data.
? Occasionally prepare presentations in Microsoft PowerPoint.
? Provide backup switchboard support for Receptionist during periods of=20
absence.
? Work closely West Power Trading administrative staff to provide coverage=
=20
and assistance during periods of employee absences.

